



Home  Forty Millenniums of Cultivation  Chapter 1
 

Chapter 1
Chapter 1: Artifact Graveyard
Translator: Strivon, Ash  Editor: Geoffrey_, Lancent

Lake Rusty.

Federal Special Waste Treatment Plant No. 23.

Also known as the “Artifact Graveyard.”

Growth of civilization has been fueled continuously by the powers of cultivation. Artifacts used to be out of reach back in the day, but the artifacts that could only be operated by Cultivators spread to every household. They became necessary items in ordinary lives, helping them with living, traveling, studying, and working.

They made the lives of people easier, but also brought forth a great deal of waste — artifact waste and metal scrap.

Artifact waste usually has quite some essence energy remaining in them, easily causing radiation pollution. The glyph arrays that compose the artifacts are highly volatile such that there is risk of explosion. If left unattended, artifact waste could cause major damage to the environment.

Therefore at the perimeter of every federal city, “Special Waste Treatment Plants” were installed in order to treat artifact waste.

Special Waste Treatment Plant No. 23, located at the southern outskirts of the Federal Cultivation City “Floating Spear.”

Underneath the hazy yellow sky, a purple polluted swamp emits a heavy stench. A mountain peak of metal shards protrudes from the swamp like the spine of a dinosaur. Fragments of flying swords lay scattered chaotically on the peak. Sitting next to the swords was a rusted crystal golem; it’s vacuous eye socket showed its spirit fire had long extinguished. The only thing left was an essence eating bug, which poked out of the skull, cautiously looking around in the “Artifact Graveyard” where danger lurks on all corners.

“BOOM!”

Closeby within another mountain of trash, a discarded artifact’s glyph array began to fracture. Its excess essence energy suddenly exploded and sent half the mountain flying through the air.

boxn ovel. c0m
Countless metal parts scattered in the sky like a maiden scattering flowers, spattering in all directions. The surrounding mountains were triggered into chain reactions. Looking up, all that could be seen was smoke and dust. It gave the image of a dance of demons that covered the entire sky.

Here, it appeared that life was forbidden. Only insignificant cockroaches and worms could consider this a paradise.

However…

Li Yao dormantly lurked behind a mountain of trash. Licking his cracked lips, he wore a dirt yellow windbreaker covered in dust that made him blend with the environment.

He shot a glance at the slowly rising mushroom cloud nearby. In his clear youthful eyes, no trace of emotion could be seen, no feelings rippled out.

Only when the dirt and metal shards spattered upon his refuge mountain of trash did he retreat somewhat deeper into the trash heap. At the same time, he slipped on goggles, covering half his face.

“It’s here!”

When the essence watch on his wrist began to vibrate, the youth became excited and the corner of his mouth hooked into a sly grin.

3:52:38 pm, the daily routine garbage disposal time, also known to “salvagers” such as Li Yao as party time!

The essence watch on his left wrist was an Elite Hunter Model produced three years ago by the cultivator guild “Zephyr Guild”. He had found it within a garbage mountain and it took him no less than two months to repair.

It had an extraordinary function besides telling time. It could record the frequency of unique vibrations. When a unique vibration propagates in the vicinity, the owner is notified.

This function was intended to be used to alert hunters of the existence of powerful Fiend Beasts nearby.

However, after being modified by Li Yao, the function was changed to alert at the arrival of garbage ships.

Shortly, accompanied by an insignificant sound of buzzing, a dozen or so black dots appeared on the northern horizon.

Covering the earth and concealing the sky, the smoke and dust brought upon by the explosions still had not dissipated. The dozen or so black dots were mixed within and could not be distinguished.

Li Yao raised his nose. His finger brushed gently against the glyph located on the side of his goggles. “Swoosh.” A sheet of blood red appeared on the surface of the googles.

Under the red gaze, the garbage ships hidden by the smoke had their round silhouette rendered clearly.

The essence watch’s hunting function also allowed locking on to the unique vibrational frequency of a single garbage ship.

“Garbage Ship No. 1327, I choose you!”

From when Li Yao was born until he was ten, these ten years he stayed in the “Artifact Graveyard.” He knew every inch of dirt and every garbage ship in the sky, as if they were fingers on his hand. This “Garbage Ship No. 1327” was specifically responsible for collecting trash from Floating Spear Inner City’s Upper East Side.

The Upper East Side was the most luxurious of the rich districts, containing the residences of several cultivators. The artifacts they threw away were of most value.

Several of the artifacts were still in good condition. They were only discarded without care by the cultivators and the rich simply because they had gone out of style, or because a new generation of artifacts had been released.

From Li Yao’s perspective, this was not a garbage ship. It was a treasure ship filled to the brim with gold!

“Swoosh!”

Li Yao’s pair of legs rippled out power. Like a shell being shot, he madly sprinted through the mountains of trash and charged into the smoke and dust, charging towards Garbage Ship No. 1327.

The mountains of trash all around him were on the verge of collapsing. Bubbles of the dangerous poison swamp rumbled beneath his feet. Li Yao was like the most nimble monkey of the mountains and woods. Every now and then, he would apply force somewhere on a mountain of trash, moving tens of meters with every step. His movements were like the floating clouds and running waters, giving a sense of tranquility.

“Li Yao, you bastard. You’ve come to fight over food with me again!”

At the moment, from behind the base of a few mountains appeared a dozen or so figures. They were dressed similarly to Li Yao, except they didn’t have the advanced red goggles and essence watch equipped on Li Yao.

Holding metal spades and rods, these people aggressively approached.

They were the same as Li Yao. They relied on “Special Waste Treatment Plant No. 23” for survival as garbage salvagers

Where there is profit, there is competition. A ship’s discarded artifact waste may only be trash for the upper echelon cultivators, but for these people at the lowest rung, these artifacts represent hope for survival. Li Yao was the salvager that had adapted the best to the Artifact Graveyard. Of course, this also made him the greatest thorn in the other garbage salvagers’ sides, a thorn in the flesh.

Actually, Li Yao did not care about getting along. With a laugh, his waist suddenly emitted power and his body twisted in a strange fashion. Without warning, he turned 90 degrees, splitting away from the glaring fat youth with furrowed brows that was in front of him. He seized the opportunity to use his foot to ferociously launch off of the fat face, propelling his whole body by 30-40 meters.

“Fatty Leung, everyone’s here to bring dinner to the table. It all depends on who is faster! You should lose some weight!”

The fat youth’s face was stamped red, his nose nearly sunk into his fatty flesh. He was angry to the point of tantrum. Unable to accept this, he commanded his men to pursue and they quickly entered the smoke and dust filled area.

As an explosion had just occurred, the area was super unstable. Dozens of garbage mountains could collapse at any time, causing even the diabolical Fatty Leung’s group of youths to have no other option but to slow their steps and stare blankly at Li Yao’s lightning speed.

Seeing this, Fatty Leung could not help but spit a mouthful of saliva.

“This son of a b*tch! He really lives up to the reputation of caring about money more than his life! God, if you have eyes, may lightning strike him dead…”

True to those words, a mountain of garbage exploded near Li Yao. Thousands upon thousands of metal parts and broken artifacts flooded down like a torrent!

“It came true!” Fatty Leung and the youths were flabbergasted. They were at a complete loss!

However, a shriek pierced through the smoke and dust crying, “Small Black, Save me!”

A path more profound than the night sky, a black streak shot out like lightning and carved a hole in the flood of metal. It was rusted, it had a nicked edge, and it was completely black. This flying sword possessed a giant handguard that had the shape of two extending black wings. Li Yao was like a drowning man grasping tenaciously on a rice straw. He hugged the flying sword for dear life. Curling his entire body onto the black streak, he pierced into the sky.

In the middle of the sky, the giant figures of a dozen or so garbage ships had already emerged. Each garbage ship was hundreds of meters long and had a round plump figure like the mythological turtle that props the earth. On top of each “turtle shell” was carved tens of thousands of glyphs, all densely packed together. They flickered with the light of essence in five vibrant colors, helping those gigantic over-ten-thousand-tons guys resist the effects of gravity.

“Crash!”

The “giant turtles” opened the hatches on their bellies one after another. Out came a rain of metal parts and broken artifacts that blotted the sky, pounding relentlessly against the earth.

In a moment, the essence energy within the entire field was madly disturbed and shook. A perilous situation was triggered!

Even the over-ten-thousand-tons garbage ships shook left and right in the midst of the essence energy waves. Under the violent turbulence, they had no option but to use all their strength to separate from each other, in hopes of reducing the damage.

Fatty Leung’s group even more so did not dare to rashly approach. They feared being caught in the turmoil.

Li Yao was still riding on the black flying sword, dashing quickly through the waves of essence energy. His appearance was destitute to the extreme, but he moved nimbly just like mud fish.

Naturally, he did not dare to directly face the raging waves and stormy sea head on. Rather, he relied on over ten years of survival experience, striving to discover areas where the tides of essence energy destructively interfered with each other and cancelled into tranquility, solely for the sake of approaching as close to the location of the dumped artifact waste as possible. The pavilion closest to the water was the first to bask in moonlight.

Finally—–

After nearly 10 minutes of dumping, the garbage ships let out a rumble like a behemoth. They changed their direction, lazily returning home. The smoke and dust gradually dissipated as well.

Fatty Leung had just barely climbed into the center of massive garbage dumping. He saw right away Li Yao sitting comfortably on a newly made mountain of garbage, looking at him with a beaming smile.

“Sh*t!” Fatty Leung’s face was shaking in anger, but his heart was a mess.

Li Yao chose this garbage mountain rather cleverly. It was not the largest, and it also did not seem to have the most abundant of materials.

There were still dozens of garbage mountains all around, all containing priceless discarded artifacts.

As for the salvagers, there were more than just these two parties…

If Fatty Leung continued to compete with Li Yao, it was possible that some of the profits may be snatched up by other fishing salvagers.

The figures of other salvagers had already faintly emerged. Joyful cries could be heard from the peaks of several garbage mountains; people had discovered valuable treasure.

Not to mention…

Fatty Leung had heard that this loathsome kid, Li Yao, was a student of Floating Spear City’s famous Crimson Nimbus Guild’s Second Affiliated High School.

The Crimson Nimbus Guild was a famous sect located in the southern part of the Federation. Their strength was tyrannical and they had numerous experts.

Although Li Yao may not have learned any true techniques of masters, he was not someone who could be handled with just three fists and two legs. Otherwise, he would not have made a living battling for over ten years in this Artifact Graveyard, still being perfectly healthy and spry, also seizing the nickname “Vulture!”

But how could Fatty Leung just let it go? Where did his face go? His nose was still embedded inside his flesh!

While his heart was a mess, a gale of wind swept by. Fatty Leung subconsciously grasped out his hand, and his hand felt something ice-cold. In his hand was actually a scrapped crystal processor unit the size of a fist.

Li Yao laughed heartily, saying, “Fatty Leung, everyone’s here to make a living. I just snatched a”Starlight” class CPU from you last time. It’s not like I murdered your father. Isn’t it unnecessary to go this far, to be unceasing until the point of death? Here, I just found a ‘Brave Dragon-17’ CPU produced by the Viridian Dragon Guild. It’s the newest model, capable of calculating over 5000 telepathic thoughts per second. Even though it’s fried, I reckon you can get three or four thousand bucks for it. Just take it as a sign of respect from me, big brother Fatty Leung. From now on we’re even, what do you say?”

“You…” Fatty Leung did not expect Li Yao to say something like this. He was immediately stunned and was somewhat distrusting, as he scratched the fat on his face.

“Yo! Look over there. Wild Wolf’s men are almost here. They don’t run solo like this guy. They will absolutely digest dozens of garbage mountains completely bare. They won’t leave behind a single screw for you!” said Li Yao as he rapidly pointed towards the west.

Fatty Leung’s face changed color. He squinted his eyes for quite a while and finally made a resolution. He immediately gave Li Yao a giant thumbs up, squeezing out a sentence, “Alright kid, you’ve got chops! Let’s go make out with the goods asap!”

A party of salvagers scattered in all directions, charging towards garbage mountains in every direction.

“Whew….”

Li Yao let out a long sigh of relief. His butt was sitting on a garbage heap and big beads of sweat rolled down his forehead. The grin on his face transformed into wailing as he suddenly got up.

“Die Fatty! I painstakingly found that Brave Dragon-17 Processor, and it became yours for nothing!”

“Just you wait. Do you think it is that easy to take from me, the ‘Vulture’ Li Yao? There will be a day where what you’ve eaten of mine will be spat back to me. I will take back what you took from me with interest. I will make sure it’s of high interest too! I will let you know… Why everyone calls me the ‘Vulture who values money more than life’!'”

“No, this won’t do. I need to be faster. Wild Wolf’s Gang, those bunches of mince-meat, they’re even more unreasonable than Fatty Leung!”

Li Yao pulled down his goggles so that it rested on his neck. Rubbing his hands together, his pair of eyes contained a gleam of light. Licking his lips, he rushed towards a newly created garbage heap!





Home  Forty Millenniums of Cultivation  Chapter 2
 

Chapter 2
 
Chapter 2: Hologram Projector
Translator: Strivon, Ash  Editor: Geoffrey_, Lancent

Five hours later, nightfall had descended.


“Morning Sun Village” was located next to Special Waste Treatment Plant No. 23.

Although its name was pleasant sounding, Morning Sun Village was actually Floating Spear City’s most dilapidated, cheapest residential rental area.

A location right next to the Artifact Graveyard meant the climate was absolutely vile. Year round, an acrid odor would permeate through the air. Even when the main city had blue skies and white clouds, there would be a sheet of gray overcast over here. Of Floating Spear City’s nineteen residential rental areas, this one had the lowest quality of life. Naturally, the rent was the lowest.

No matter how cheap the rent was, not many people would want to live next to a waste treatment plant. Several residential buildings were completely empty. Due to years of wear and tear without any maintenance, both the exterior and interior were covered in cracks. Corridors were covered in cobwebs. It was, for all intents and purposes, a ghost town.

And Li Yao was a long term resident of this “Ghost Town.”

He liked the quietness here. He wouldn’t disturb anyone when he repaired and modded his artifacts at home. It was close to the Artifact Graveyard. The rent was cheap. It simply served a multitude of benefits.

His home was roughly fifty square meters. There were two rooms, an outer one and an inner one. The outer room was for eating, drinking, and entertainment. The inner bedroom was remodeled into an artifact workshop.

When one enters the house, the first eye-catching image one would see would be the hundreds of crystal processors hanging down by rope, looking like hundreds of skeletal skulls.

These crystal processor units were mostly relics of several hundreds of years past, already losing their computing abilities. They were picked up by Li Yao, becoming a part of his collection. He was a crazy crystal processor fan and was super into these kinds of artifacts which were able to process a myriad of telepathic thoughts like the brains of cultivators.

In this tiny living room were piles of paper books, something rarely seen in this era. The piles revealed titles such as <A General Guide to Repairing Artifacts>, <A Beginner’s Textbook on Crafting Flying Swords>, <An Artificer Prepares>, <Black-Mountain Elder-Devil Class Crystal Battleship Maintenance Manual>, and <99 Ways to Detonate a Planet> . Many were ancient texts from hundreds of years ago. They were gray and yellow as well as flakey and mushy.

boxn ovel. c0m
Surrounded by the books and crystal processors was a used and somewhat-old straw mattress. This was Li Yao’s table, chair, and bed.

And within the artifact workshop of the inner room were piles of precious treasures that Li Yao had collected from the waste treatment plant. There were shimmering flying swords, talismans with mystical calligraphy drawn on it, and elixirs with an extremely pleasant scent…

Even more artifacts were dismantled by him into their most elementary components and were absentmindedly piled up in the corner, becoming miniature garbage mountains.

At this moment, Li Yao held up a silvery white cube-shaped artifact. His eyes shined and glistened, just like a big bad wolf eyeing a small bunny. A line of saliva nearly trickled down the edge of his mouth.

The long, black-winged flying sword was extending out his back, trying to take a look around like a rather curious plump snake.

“Surprisingly it’s the Thousand Illusion Guild’s newest generation’s ‘3D Hologram Projector’ with a market price of over 20,000 bucks! If I can repair this, I may be able to get up to 10,000 bucks for it! Small Black, we’ve struck it big this time!” Li Yao was unable to resist letting out a long whistle.

The black flying sword made squeaking noises. It’s two sheets of wings flew up and down, as if dancing in merriment. Unexpectedly it displayed the same hint of “greed” as its owner.

Li Yao’s hands flared and seven to eight oddly-shaped tools used for maintenance appeared among his fingers. Some resembled screwdrivers, some resembled tiny pliers. There were also long and thin silver needles as well as curved and hooked unnamable tools.

“Small Black, guess a number of seconds?”

The Black Flying Sword make two sneering squeaking sounds, flying in the air using its pointed end to draw out a “50.”

“50 seconds? You’re totally underestimating me!”

He closed his eyes and took a deep breath, becoming tranquil for three seconds. After opening his eyes, the greed and excitement within his eyes disappeared without a trace. Like an unmoving ancient well, all that was left was cold and clear overflowing confidence.

Li Yao’s pair of hands suddenly mobilized. Ten fingers turned into ten paths of flowing light, completely enveloping the silvery white artifact. At first, if one looked closely, they could vaguely make out the courses and movements of the tips of his fingers. Soon, however, only a cloud of dazzling fluorescence could be seen. Within the fluorescence came the sound of rustling.

Half a minute later, the fluorescence shook and a rustling sound faded away. Hundreds of shadows retreated back to their origin. Li Yao’s pair of eyes were still set on their original position, not making the tiniest of movements.

As for the silvery white artifact, the “3D Hologram Projector” had already been dismantled by Li Yao into 425 elementary parts.

“39 seconds, and done!”

Li Yao let out a victory cry, winking in pride at the black flying sword. Then, he began to study with full concentration.

“Tsk tsk, this Thousand Illusion Guild’s newest model hologram projector really is something. An elaborate composition, the balance of essence is like a work of nature. The most amazing part is this master crystal chip is It’s about the size of a fingernail, but somehow over three-hundred glyphs were engraved on this crystal chip, all working in tandem with each other to form over twenty glyph arrays — it’s simply a work of art!”

Li Yao’s hand was holding a magnifying glass, carefully observing the extracted master crystal chip. His face was filled with intoxication like that of a pilgrim. The more he observed, the more profound his expression became.

“That’s not right… There aren’t just three-hundred glyphs. This master crystal chip appears to be utilizing crystal folding technology, taking three crystal chips and layering them atop of each other, altogether containing over a thousand glyphs and forming over a hundred three-dimensional glyph arrays. This is inconceivable!”

The more he studied, the more profound and deep he felt. Li Yao entered a state of complete engrossment, forgetting the passage of time, and studied meticulously for a complete three or so hours. He failed to completely comprehend a single glyph array; instead, his observations caused him to become dizzy and lightheaded as his vision became black.

Right now, he had at most the level of a “Junior Artifact Technician.” The gulf between his level and that of a “Thousand Illusion Guild” Master Artificer was really too wide, far far too wide.

If this “master crystal chip” had a problem, then he would have no choice but to take this 3D Hologram Projector and sell it as a defect.

Fortunately, after using an “essence reserve tool” to inject essence energy, Li Yao discovered that the essence energy flowed smoothly in the master crystal chip. The essence circuits were clear, the glyph array was stable, and there were no anomalies.

After a careful inspection, he discovered that the problem originated from a crystal conduit. An essence energy fluctuation anomaly had caused this crystal conduit to burn out.

Luckily for Li Yao, this crystal conduit was a standard component and was very easy to replace. Li Yao quickly found a replacement from the inventory in his house.

Closing his eyes, he recalled in silence the process of his recent dismantling. An image of a complete structural diagram surfaced in his mind. His hands mobilized automatically, a gust of wind swept, and the 3D Hologram Projector was assembled once more.

He used the essence reserve tool to inject a river of essence energy. The pure white exterior faintly emitted a blue fluorescence as if it were a lustrous transparent sapphire, giving the appearance of being possessed by a living fairy.

When the blue glow swept over his forehead, from the depths of Li Yao’s mind, dozens of control glyphs automatically came into view.

“Hologram Projector, power on!” Li Yao thought to himself and the control glyph in his mind flared.

The blue fluorescence of the hologram projector converged into a single glyph in the shape of “回”. The two rings spun rapidly, looking like a vortex. From the middle of the vortex, a blue beam of light was emitted into the air and solidified into a massive hologram. What appeared was the image of a middle-aged cultivator wearing an Eight Trigrams Dao Robe, rendered down to the finest hair, looking true to life.

Behind this esteemed cultivator’s back was an even larger hologram. On the hologram were interweaving red and green glyph-script, numbers, and arrows, all constantly pulsing and fluctuating.

The middle-aged cultivator’s face was expressionless. With a voice like that of an unmoving ancient well, he said, “Up next, news in the world of finance. Today’s top story is undoubtedly the “Traceless Sword Faction’s” announcement of the release of their newest flying sword propulsion glyph array, “Violet Lightning”. Reports say that after implementing “Violet Lightning,” the maximum velocity can be increased by 9 percent, the instantaneous destructive power can be increased by 11 percent, and the essence consumption can be decreased by 5 percent. Towards flying swords, the composite increase in performance is obvious.”

“Receiving favorable reviews, the share price of the Traceless Sword Faction is on the rise. Starting before 10 AM, the share price approached the market limit and remained at that level til the market closure.

“The rest of the Sword Cultivation Industry is feeling ripple effects from the announcement. This includes the Giant Sword Gate, Polar North Sword Sect, and the 22 families of schools within the Southern Sea Sword Faction. The stocks are hot and on the rise up until market closure. The Sword Cultivation Industry as a whole rose by 5.42 percentage points.”

“On the flip side of this announcement, the defense-focused “Gold Armor Sect’s” share price fell. Experts believe that with the announcement of the glyph array “Violet Lightning”, flying swords have made a revolutionary leap in technology. Modern mainstream battle armor is fundamentally unable to guard against the newest models of offensive flying swords. By market closure, Golden Armor Sect’s shares had tumbled 8%.”

“After market closure, the Golden Armor Sect called for an impromptu news conference. The Golden Armor Sect’s spokesman, Elder Hei Yan, announced a development in the newest generation of “Star Strike Shields” thanks to an imminent breakthrough in battle armor research and development. A prototype will be available within the year and will absolutely be able to guard and nullify all flying sword attacks.

“As for the Grasslands Region in the northern part of the Federation, the calamity known as the Black Roundworm Epidemic continues to spread, already proliferating into the cultivation bases of many Beast Taming Sects’ spirit beasts. The afflicted spirit beasts numbered over 500,000. This rarely seen disaster drove the stock prices of the beast industry continuously down. Several Beast Taming Sects’ share prices have tumbled to a three-year low.”

“Now, let’s turn to a famous market analyst, Tianxingzi, here to comment for everyone on today’s developments.”

“…”

Li Yao watched for a while. He confirmed that the image was stable, that the sound was clear, and that there weren’t any static or streaks. The 3D was exceptional, being extremely distinct and causing one to feel immersed. The artifact should be completely repaired.

After pondering a bit, he thought deeply within his mind, “Switch to the entertainment channel.”

The blue glow flashed. The middle-aged cultivator and the red-green hologram flashed and faded away. In their place was a stadium buzzing with activity.

This full-house stadium was filled with a hundred thousand people with sounds of clamoring people rumbling through the air. Under the shining rainbow rays of light, a hundred thousand fired-up teenagers raised their hands up high. Together, they were cheering a name:

“Lu Yinxi!”

“Lu Yinxi!”

“Lu Yinxi!”

Atop the three-story main stage towered a dozen or so jutted crystals like entwining canine teeth. When the cheers of the teenagers converged to their peak, the thickest of the crystals suddenly burst. With an appearance like that of clear, cold snow yet possessing an expression heated like lava, a young lady wearing white jumped out from the crystal. Slanted on her waist was a zither that seemed to be formed out of a stack of crystals. Her slender white hand swept across the strings, and the magical clashing sounds of metal like that of a powerful army roared out.

“Within my heart, I have the dream to fly proudly. The opposing shore of the celestial river is our direction! This belongs to us. Cultivate! A! New! Era!”

Just like with all the teenagers, Li Yao’s blood also began to boil.

The girl, “Lu Yinxi”, radiated energy all throughout the stage. She was a singer of an idol school that recently rose abruptly in the last two years. Immediately debuting with an ice-cold figure and an explosive performance style, she attracted a great number of adolescents. She composed the song “Forty Millenniums of Cultivation” that became popular in the whole nation within a short half a year. Countless teenagers were motivated by this song to walk the path of cultivation.

Li Yao was also one of her fans, but for a reason different than other people’s. The reason why he liked Lu Yinxi was because their past were the same.

They were both orphans.

Li Yao was born in Special Waste Treatment Plant No. 23. For as long as he could remember, the skies were always ashy and yellow.

He ate rotting meat from the garbage heaps. He drank contaminated putrid water. He relied on primal instinct as well as a little “secret” hidden deep in his memories, struggling to survive. Since the beginning, he suffered and endured for these ten or so years, transforming into the Artifact Graveyard’s most dangerous existence, the “Vulture”.

If the “Old Man” had never appeared, Li Yao probably would have become part of the garbage plant, turning into a “Fatty Leung” or a “Wild Wolf”.

But one day, six years ago, a garbage ship had dumped the old man together with dozens of tons of garbage. Li Yao felt compassionate and dragged the scar riddled old man back home.

From then on, destiny had completely changed for him.

The old man never talked about his past. Li Yao only knew for certain that he was a tremendously skilled Expert Artifact Modder. In a short five years, the old man taught Li Yao all sorts of fantastic and bizarre skills for modifying artifacts. He taught Li Yao knowledge of all kinds of fundamental academic subjects. He also spent money for Li Yao to attend a private high school in the city, allowing Li Yao to blend into normal society.

A year ago, one of the old man’s old injuries flared up again and he passed away. He left behind for Li Yao a mysterious flying sword named “Black Wing.” The old man said Black Wing was a strange weapon that he tried to study for half a lifetime with no success. In the end, he left Li Yao some words:

“Little Yao, this old man has been to dozens of worlds in his life. I have seen and met thousands upon thousands of Expert Artifact Modders and Master Artificers. But, your natural talent is the highest I have seen!”

“With only the hands of an insignificant mortal, you are able to maintain low-level artifacts. You really are talented.”

“But relying only on one’s natural talent is not enough! By only relying on one’s talent, you will always only be capable of maintaining low level artifacts, civilian artifacts!”

“Promise this old man that you will properly study, fight and get accepted into into a university, and become a cultivator! Only by becoming a cultivator will you then have the chance to move further along in artifact repair. Such that one day in the future you…”

“Become a Master Artificer!”

When the old man had spoken these words, his pair of eyes were wide open. His eyes blossomed with radiance and were filled with boundless energy. This memory was fresh in Li Yao’s mind.

A Master Artificer… A part of the circle of cultivators, one of the most prestigious professions.

He did not know whether he would end up disappointing the old man.

The sword Black Wing silently accompanied his side, listening to the young lady and her volcanic performance. Its two protective wings twisted fervently, dancing along to the energetic song.

After quite some time, the youth’s expression became clear. The corner of his mouth once again hooked into an unperturbed smile.

“What am I thinking so much for? Regardless of the consequences, I just have to stake it all!”

“Lu Yinxi was a small orphan and she transformed into the federation’s most popular female singer. Why can’t I, a small salvager, become a Master Artificer?”

The youth thought back to a time long long ago, in a place far far away. He remembered hearing this sentence:

“One should always have dreams, for what if they come true someday?”





Home  Forty Millenniums of Cultivation  Chapter 3
 

Chapter 3
 
Chapter 3: The Uncanny Dream
Translator: Strivon, Ash  Editor: Geoffrey_, Lancent

“F*ck, Li Yao, no wonder everyone calls you the ‘Traceless Hand’! This 2011 model Mustang GT you modded can go from zero to a hundred in three seconds. It’s like you swapped it for a different car! It’s practically a rocket! I’m ecstatic!”

“…”

One minute fifty-nine seconds! One minute fifty-nine seconds! Good heavens, am I reading this right? A new god of underground racing has been born!”

“…”

“Promise me you won’t go street racing any longer. Become an honest car mechanic, no one will look down on you. There will be a day when we will have our own Auto 4S Shop!”

“…”

“Brother Yao, Brother Yao, I’m begging you, help me out. Soar one last time. Besides you, who else can achieve a time of 1 minute 59 seconds on this track? I owe Violent Scar 300 grand. If I don’t pay him back by today, I’ll die. I’LL DIE!”

“…”

“Doctor! Doctor! Hurry and save him! He’s only 23 years old!”

“…”

While in the midst of producing an ear-piercing scream, Li Yao abruptly leapt up from the floor. His body was drenched in sweat.

boxn ovel. c0m
From outside the window, the rays of morning dawn illuminated all around. The Hologram Projector continued to chitter and chatter, broadcasting classic songs. The youth, like a puppet, was lifeless for half a minute; he was slowly shaking off the utterly realistic nightmare.

This nightmare was his deepest secret. Even the old man was never told about it. Since he could first remember, he would have this same uncanny dream every few days. It was like a period from a memory… one that was impossible to forget.

In this strange dream, his name was still called Li Yao, but he possessed a completely different life. He was in an utterly bizarre world, in a place that was called an Auto “4S” Shop, working as a “Car Mechanic.”

And at night under the city of bizarre rainbow lights, he was part of the “Underground Street Racing Circle” as an extraordinarily skilled expert car modder and racer. The rumbling of each and every engine ignited adrenaline within the night. He soared, setting staggering records — until he soared to his death!

Over and over, he repeatedly died in that dream world. Even though this was an experience filled with suffering, Li Yao did not actually loathe it. Instead, he was somewhat glad. If the dream world had not given him the experience of an another life, he would absolutely not be able to survive in the crisis-filled Artifact Graveyard until now.

It did not matter if this was a strange nightmare or if this was an entangled memory from a past life, neither was important.

There are various yesterdays, such as a yesterday of death; there are various todays, such as a today of life.

It did not matter what kind of person yesterday’s Li Yao was. Today’s Li Yao is one of Heaven’s Origin Sector’s, Star Glory Federation’s, Floating Spear City’s, ordinary high-school student

—One who will become a Master Artificer!

He took a deep breath. He had finished tidying up his room in a simple manner and completed washing his face and rinsing his mouth. The time is just past six o’clock. Li Yao shouldered his school bag, carrying the 3D hologram Generator, and with large strides walked out the house door.

Today was Monday. Dawn was just about to break. He needed to hurry to school before 7:30.

Morning Sun Village’s distance to the Crimson Nimbus Second Affiliated High School was a length of 30 miles. He could take the underground crystal rail’s third line and transfer to the seventh line to arrive at his destination. However, that would require spending 8 bucks in rail fare.

Li Yao hated spending money. He swung his long legs out, used the skill his school taught him, Body Art of the Spirit Serpent, and shot out like lightning towards the main city.

At this time, the morning sun was just rising and the multi-colored light of sunrise was boundless; it was a dawn that bubbled with spirit energy.

From afar away, Floating Spear City appeared like a giant beast waking up. Every major sect unleashed and dispersed their powers, emitting bright rainbows of radiance.

Many cultivators were floating in the air. Availing the transition between night and day, they absorbed and emitted solar essence and moonlight. Their bodies spiraled and wound in the form of an eight-figured luminous diffusing glyph script. At some people’s sides were immortal cranes and fire crows. Meteors were orbiting around. Grand and great powerful noises were produced. Altogether, they produced a domineering appearance.

A large-scale floating airship dragged along a fiery tail, sluggishly advancing in the middle of the sky. The fiery tail interweaved with the blue sky and white clouds, becoming a net of essence. The delicate and exquisite private flying shuttles continuously needled through the mesh, emitting beautiful sounding whistles.

—This was precisely the Federal Cultivation City Floating Spear’s morning!

Li Yao bounced and bounced like a spring stored with great energy. With every step, he leaped over twenty meters. His speed was exceedingly fast. Although his stance looked quite ugly and caused passersby to stare, he couldn’t give a damn and continued to concentrate on cultivating his art. In only half an hour, he arrived at his school. A white mist swirled above his head and on his back was a layer of pure white salt produced from sweat.

He did not go directly into the school gate. His body flickered and he leapt into a destitute alley next to the school.

Deep within this small alley hung a rusted store sign. On it read five words: “Old Wang’s Second-Hand Shop.” Below was a row of densely packed tiny words: “Specializing in all sorts of second-hand artifacts, also providing artifact modding, battle armor refinement, magical beast training, glyph array maintenance, monastery ceremony, and other professional services.”

As if knowing that Li Yao would arrive, a window slid open to expose a big bald head. It was a shifty-eyed old fellow.

“Haaa, last night I lost over two grand playing cards. I was just worrying about how to explain this matter to my wife, but the God of Wealth dropped by right away. Little Devil, what good stuff did you bring to your old grandpa this time?” The old fellow smiled sinisterly.

“Save it! Even if you lost your underwear, don’t think I will slash down my prices!” Li Yao, with no restraint, batted down Old Fellow Wang’s extended claw. He hesitated for a second and even though it caused him emotional pain, he still took out and passed over his hologram projector.

A large part of him wanted to hold onto the device so that he could further study the three layer stack folding crystal chip technology, but when all’s said and done, genuine gold and silver was more important. Studying at a private high school was expensive. In order to cultivate, people must purchase essence pills and auxiliary equipment, racing to increase their killing capabilities.

No matter what, at the end of the year, being poor in education and rich in martial might was also valid in leading to the road of cultivation — one that needs piles of shining white silver to complete.

“This really is some good stuff!”

It was clear that Old Wang knew his stuff. Receiving the Hologram Projector, his eyes swept. His eyes exuded a radiance of praise. He did not test it and instead spoke, “ A flat price, 9,500!”

A warmth bubbled from the bottom of Li Yao’s heart. This price was not that different from the actual second-hand market price. Old Fellow Wang was once again giving Li Yao a good price.

Even though this Old Fellow had a shifty-eyed appearance of a suspicious man, he was actually the one person, besides the old man, who treated Li Yao best. Every transaction, he would more or less add a bit to the price for Li Yao. And every few days, he would give Li Yao some work with high pay.

Without Old Fellow Wang’s assistance after the old man’s death, Li Yao would very likely be unable to continue paying the expensive fees of the private high school.

“I don’t need that much, just 9,000 is fine. Give the 500 left over to Ms. Wang, just say you won it from cards. No need for thanks, who told me to respect the elderly and cherish the young? I can’t bear to watch you and your weary old body having to kneel and wash clothes on a washboard. Gotta catch the morning assembly. Just deposit the money in my bank account!” Li Yao waved his hand and hopped away.

Old Wang suddenly shouted after him, “Hold on, Little Devil.”

Li Yao stood and purposely said, “Wa, Die, old fellow. You don’t think 500 is too little do you?”

“Bah, back in the day, this old fellow was a step above top ranking master artifact modders. In a few minutes, I could make several million. From the looks of it, in this regard, you can only make scraps? This old fellow wanted to tell you that the university exam is in a hundred days. You, youngster, need to properly take it and get accepted into a good university. Do not believe that you already have the skill of artifact repair and not know the immensity of heaven and earth! The world is huge and you will realize this when you go to university. In front of a true Master Artificer, your current ability isn’t worth a damn!” Old Fellow Wang fumed.

Li Yao’s heart once again stirred with warmth and he vigorously waved his fist, “I will absolutely get accepted into university, Grandpa Wang!”





Home  Forty Millenniums of Cultivation  Chapter 4
 

Chapter 4
 
Chapter 4: Fiend Blade Peng Hai
Translator: Strivon, Ash  Editor: Geoffrey_, Lancent

The head instructor gazed like a tiger watching its prey as Li Yao ducked his body and scuttled little by little to the closed school gate. Li Yao let out a breath and checked his watch 7:29 — just in the nick of time!


Just like all the other high schools in the federation, Crimson Nimbus has entered early into the yearly “Crazed University Entrance Exam Season”. An aura of murder permeated through the campus, similar to that of a battlefield. Right through the school gate entrance towered a gigantic hologram in the center. Upon it were several words:

“Time until the entrance exams: 99 days 18 hours 32 minutes and 57 seconds!”

The numbers on the hologram pulsed and changed every second. The change was small, but it brought the exam candidates a great deal of pressure.

On the two sides were several lines of slogans:

“As long as studying has not reached the point of death, one should beat studying to death!”

“Rising by a point means crushing a thousand people!”

“Crimson Nimbus Second dominates the federation. Vow to pierce through the examination or be exiled!”

“Gain admittance into the ‘Nine Elite Universities’. Become a cultivator. Step onto the apex of life!”

A fervent and passionate march resonated through the campus. Nearly a thousand students moved like a tide of water, rushing towards the sports field. Li Yao increased his footsteps as well, sneaking into the tide of people. As soon as they arrived at the field, the tide of people separated into three sections, changing into completely different groups.

The first group had about forty students. All carried a dignified appearance with handsome features appearing chiseled by nature. These were the overbearing and arrogant heaven’s chosen. The school uniforms that covered their bodies were made from heaven’s silk, custom tailored, and refined by cultivators. They fluttered in the absence of wind, stirring from the rays of hidden treasures. All these contributed to give an uncommon martial appearance. These people were of the “Important Class” of students; each was a one-out-of-ten-thousand cultivation genius. They had the strength to shock seedlings of the ‘Nine Elite Universities.’

boxn ovel. c0m
The second group of people were the most numerous, numbering about seven to eight hundred students. The clothes they wore were also spun from heaven’s silk, but they weren’t custom tailored, nor did they undergo refinement from cultivators. They looked to be dull and mediocre, like the faces of a thousand people. They were the “Ascending Class” of students, comprising mostly of the children of Floating Spear City’s rich and elite families. In regards to their aptitude, their strength stemmed from using heaps of resources.

The third group had a hundred or so people. Their clothes were inferior school uniforms weaved from ordinary materials. The uniforms were loose and worn, large and baggy, giving a somewhat sloppy appearance. The owners of this uniforms also did not give off any special energy. This was the “Common Class” of students. Most were born as children of common worker class families. Within the private high school “Crimson Nimbus Second”, they were an existence like a mishmash of fish.

Li Yao was quite familiar with the “Common Class” and found his position within the formation. Just when he was about to stand fixed, someone patted his shoulder. A voice sounding somewhat greasy rang out, “Little Devil, you only just got here? There’s probably going to be an important person coming to our school today!”

Li Yao did not need to look back to know that this was his best friend, “Meng Jiang”. Raising his eyes, he looked at the main platform. Sure enough, he discovered that there was the headmaster, vice-principal, and disciplinary director among the people on the stage. All of the high-ranking people were present. This was indeed a special occasion never seen on a typical morning.

“Which important person could be so tremendous? Even Baldy Zhao has personally appeared to greet him!”

To be exact, Baldy Zhao was Crimson Nimbus Second’s Headmaster, Zhao Shude. He was the very serious and solemn core member of the Crimson Nimbus Guild. His Refinement stage was that of a high-level cultivator. However, rumors claimed that when he was young, he suffered an internal injury while cultivating in the “Fiend Beast Wasteland” to the northwest. Year round, he would remain behind closed doors training, rarely coming out personally to supervise school affairs.

“Its Peng Hai! Man, it’s ‘Fiend Blade’ Peng Hai!” Meng Jiang’s excitement was maxed out. His voice was completely shaking.

This one name had also caused Li Yao’s heartbeat to speed up its tempo in a flash.

Fiend Blade Peng Hai was Crimson Nimbus Second’s largest alumni legend in several hundred years.

He was born in the slums. Since childhood, he’d exhibited a dazzling gift for cultivation. When he was eleven, he was specificallyspecially recruited by Crimson Nimbus Second. By twelve, his “Spirit Actualization Quotient” reached 100% and he awakened to a spirit root of the highest quality, stepping onto the road of cultivation. At age thirteen, he was accepted to the “Nine Elite Universities’”, “Grand Desolate War Institution”. By the time he graduated at age fifteen, he had already stepped into the 10th rank of the Refinement stage, becoming the Federation’s star of hope!

From after his time in the “Grand Desolate War Institution”, he rejected high salary offers from over a dozen Cultivator Sects, resolutely deciding to join the “Federal Army”. In the Fiend Beast Wasteland, he fought against millions of fiend beasts in order to defend the federation’s youth and blood, creating a mountain of corpses and a sea of blood from the fiend beasts, amassing the fierce and impressive name “Fiend Blade”. Finally at age 22, he became the federation’s youngest ever Cultivator to reach the Foundation stage!

After retiring from the army, Peng Hai returned to his hometown. With an astronomical signup bonus as a condition, he joined the Crimson Nimbus Guild. In a short three years time, he had already become the business manager of Crimson Nimbus Guild’s new “Crimson Nimbus Transporter Group” department, responsible for creating new transportation routes in dangerous areas where fiend beasts ran rampant. Aside from his outstanding salary, it is said he also possessed a large share of stocks in the “Crimson Nimbus Transporter Group,” receiving mountains of gold and silver yearly just from dividends!

“Did you hear the rumor? Peng Hai was just at the border of the ‘Silver White Beach’. He bought an unparalleledunequalled seaside villa. It’s said to be worth seventy to eighty million! Tabloid reporters say he often brings dozens of women back to his villa for open parties!” Meng Jiang drooled as he spoke, unable to conceal his jealous and envious thoughts.

From being a penniless kid in the slums to becoming a great faction’s upper-level manager. Having a net worth over a hundred million, exotic cars and beauties, and a seaside mansion — this was simply the dream of all slum kids. Li Yao and Meng Jiang were also no exceptions.

They all thirsted to become the next Peng Hai!

“He’s here!”

Li Yao’s wrist-watch vibrated lightly, indicating that something was arriving at high-speeds through the air. He raised his eyes to look towards the eastern horizon. A black stream of lightning shot over, its speed was extremely fast. A second ago, it was at the horizon. With a single Blink skill, it was already silently floating in the sky over the field. It was a black flying shuttle!

The body of this flying shuttle was sleek and narrow like a stretched drop of water. Its length was nearly twice as long as that of common flying shuttles. Its exterior was crystal clear and no seams or rivets could be seen; it was of the highest quality. It was hard to tell from the exterior what kind of offensive magical devices this flying shuttle was equipped with. However, hidden under the radiance of its black glow was actually a dangerous air that caused the pulses of people to stop. It was a killing intent that seemed to reject being restricted to the confines of space and caused the thousand of high school students to simultaneously feel stifled.

“It’s the ‘Battle Shuttle Mystic Bird’! The federation’s most advanced military shuttle! Its battle strength may be greater than that of a peak Foundation stage Cultivator! When piloting the ‘Battle Shuttle Mystic Bird’, even the Fiend Beast Wasteland can be crossed unhindered, without restraint!” Li Yao called out wildly from within his heart.

As Li Yao was an artifact fanatic, it went without say that the “Battle Shuttle Mystic Bird” elicited great admiration, greater than that towards Peng Hai himself!

More importantly, he knew that the barest configuration of the Battle Shuttle Mystic Bird would reach a market price of nearly a hundred million. Even ordinarily rich and powerful families absolutely could not afford it.

A second passed. The pits of thousands of students’ stomachs loosened. They were able to resume their breaths. The Battle Shuttle Mystic Bird that was once in the air had already faded out of sight.

Left behind was only a pair of pupils, pitch black to the abyss. There was still a radiance within them. Every now and then, they would flit around, reminiscent of lightning, like a fiend blade.

Whomever his gaze reached was affected. Even Second’s Headmaster Zhao Shude and the usually fiendish Disciplinary Director were unable to bear it, shuffling faintly sideways. They did not dare to meet his gaze.

“Cultivators really are wealthy! They really are awe-inspiring! They really are domineering!” Li Yao mumbled, swallowing some saliva.

“Rumor has it that the school specifically invited Peng Hai back to coach the ‘Important Class’ of students! Little Devil, hey, did you know that our Crimson Nimbus Second was a century famous school, but the examination scores for the past few years were not too remarkable. There were not many students who were accepted to the ‘Nine Elite Universities’. As such, The Crimson Nimbus Guild’s reputation has not been so hot, so this time, they specifically invited Peng Hai to come back to do some specialized training in hopes of reversing this decline in fortune and once more give birth to glory!” Meng Jiang’s voice was permeated full of jealousy.

After all, only the “Important Class” of students were fortunate enough to enjoy being personally taught by Fiend Blade Peng Hai. There was no chance for them, the “Common Class” of destitute youths.

Li Yao heard the news and he inwardly sighed a breath as well.

The “Nine Elite Universities” had the federation’s most profound inner knowledge. They were abundant in resources, and these nine institutions had the greatest number of high-level experts. Out of the myriad of schools in the federation, this was the ultimate dream.

Ordinary universities did not necessarily place fostering cultivators as their primary objective. Even if a student had high natural talent, no matter how hard they tried, no matter what multitude of good fortune they encountered, the probability of becoming a cultivator did not exceed one in ten-thousand.

However, the Nine Elite Universities had the backing of numerous cultivator sects. They specialized in fostering cultivators as their objective. As long as one gains acceptance to the Nine Elite Universities, one would have a thirty percent chance of becoming a cultivator, stepping onto the apex of life!

Becoming a Master Artificer requires that one must first become a cultivator. And to become a cultivator, one must first pass the university entrance exam for the Nine Elite Universities. Li Yao always regarded this as his objective to strive for, but from beginning to end, his innate talent was at a disadvantage, incapable of being redeemed. The distance to his dream appeared to grow further and further.

With these worries on his mind, Li Yao’s enthusiasm somewhat waned, even causing him to not hear what was being said on stage. The time of a cultivator was valuable. Fiend Blade Peng Hai did not speak for too long and Headmaster Zhao Shude soon announced the end of the morning assembly.

Peng Hai was escorted by the arrogant heaven’s chosen youths of the Important Class and left. And so, the Ascending and Common class of students also had their enthusiasm disperse as they walked in twos and threes towards the school building.

And with that, today’s studies have officially begun!





Home  Forty Millenniums of Cultivation  Chapter 5
 

Chapter 5
 
Chapter 5: Exam Simulation
Translator: Strivon, Ash  Editor: Geoffrey_, Lancent

As students were currently cramming for the college entrance exams, any courses that should have been taken had already been completed long ago. These last hundred days were primarily for filling up gaps and taking all sorts of tests. On a certain morning of each week was a very important exam simulation.


Under the urging of the impatient teachers, Li Yao took a deep breath and stepped into the “Examination Chamber” tagged with his student number. The chamber door sealed shut and the entire world became deathly silent.

“Even though I didn’t receive personal tips from Peng Hai, I still need to test into the ‘Nine Elite Universities’. If I give my all, what do I have to fear?” Li Yao clenched his fist resolutely.

“BEEP! BEEP! BEEP!” On an inner face of the examination chamber appeared a hologram, upon which a number ticked. At the moment, it was counting down. Upon hitting zero, an emotionless voice, like an ancient well, rang out, ”The examination has begun. Prepare yourself, student!”

In response, thousands upon thousands of arcane glyphs carved onto the inner face of the examination chamber flared simultaneously. Li Yao only saw the scene in front of his eyes blossom with the turning and flying of stars, having already appeared in the middle of a red-brown wasteland.

The ground was roasting hot and his feet had the sensation of pins and needles. The air was thick to the point of almost congealing; it was like having a wet towel wrapped around one’s body that could not be shaken off. Occasionally, a hot gust of wind would blow by, carrying with it the strong odor of mish-mashed blood. From all directions came faint ghostly wails and wolfish howls.

It was vivid to the five sense, as if one was truly standing in this world, placed in this murderous field of malevolent spirits.

Nevertheless, Li Yao knew that this was the “Great Illusionary Land” metamorphosed by the examination chamber. Time was of the essence. He composed himself and sped forward, following the directions of a translucent arrow symbol in the sky.

The Fifty Kilometer Long-Distance Cross-Country run. It was one of the Federation’s basic courses designed for the purpose of distinguishing the elites from the rest of the youths, in hopes that they would one day become cultivators. The path was filled with danger and chocked full of traps.

Sure enough, when Li Yao passed through a faintly bulging mound of dirt, the mound of dirt burst, shooting out countless rock fragments. In the midst of the rock fragments was a pair of dirt yellow Sand Wolves!

This species of Demon Fiend Beast was larger than ordinary feral wolves by a factor. Their spines bulged high and on top grew an abnormality, a small head. It was a mutated form of the low-ranking demon fiend beast, “Sand Wolf.” Besides having the advantage of camouflage within the sand dunes, they also possessed a high level of intelligence. It was an extremely troublesome opponent for a highschool student.

boxn ovel. c0m
But for Li Yao, who had survived in the Magical Equipment Artifact Graveyard for 18 years as the “Vulture”, observing every inch of his surroundings had long already become instinctive. The camouflage of the two Sand Wolves was rather sloppy, and he had seen through them early on.

“Dire Bear Stance!”

Without hesitation, the two Sand Wolves pounced into to the air. Li Yao’s pair of legs launched, his body curled into a ball, and his shoulders sank. His appearance was like a berserk dire bear as he fiercely rammed across!

The timing he chose was impeccable. It was when the pair of wolves’ flight had reached their apex. The wolves’ power had all been exhausted with nowhere to borrow strength and, furthermore, were incapable of changing directions. They were hit head-on by Li Yao.

“SNAP!”

The pair of Sand Wolves were sinisterly cunning, but their bodies were fragile, designed primarily for ambushing unsuspecting enemies, not fighting an opponent head-on. In a single exchange, their spines were snapped by Li Yao’s “Dire Bear Stance”. They bounced back towards their sand pit.

Li Yao sneered and slithered forward. He extended his claws like a blade’s edge, firmly grabbing the small heads on the Sand Wolves’ backs.

“Steel Hawk’s Claw!”

The wolf heads disintegrated in a flash. The pair of Sand Wolves let out a blood curling scream and died.

From the void rang a sweet “Ding Ding” sound. It was the examination chamber calculating Li Yao’s score for his kills.

Li Yao felt delighted in his heart. The set of skills he used in succession originated from the basic martial art <<Thirteen Forces of the War Beasts>>. At minimum, he would gain 10 points for himself.

He did not hurry on impatiently but rather dragged the corpses of the two Sand Wolves out from the sand pit. In his perimeter, he found a rock that was quite sharp, and with it, he cut open the bellies of the demonic beasts.

Not long after, four ribs were whet into four bone blades, and with difficulty, the wolf pelts were sewn into a water sack which was then filled with wolf blood.

A sack of wolf blood can save one’s life in this broiling wasteland.

After reorganizing, resting, strategizing, and completely arming himself, Li Yao continued to advance forward. Not even an hour later, he had already shouldered a black crisis, killing four low-ranking Demon Fiend Beasts. Although the examination had just begun, this was still nothing more than a warm-up. The following rounds were the ones that caused every Federation test taker to encounter so much pain that they’d wish they were dead.

In the midsts of the sky, green glyph characters showered down like a torrential storm, forming into a quiz:

“Xiao Ming is a cultivator of the Refinement stage. His body had formed 52500 crystals worth of spiritual energyessence. Once, when he was cultivating, he accidently was hit with a strange ‘Heart Devouring Bug’. Every second, 48 crystals of spiritual energy essence were gobbled. Xiao Ming’s master discovered his condition 1 min 13 secfive minutes later. In order to save him, he passed 55 crystals of spiritual soul energy per second into his body. In addition, after two minutes, he increased his rate to 59 crystals of spiritual soul energy per second. Question—-”

“One, how much time does Xiao Ming need to restore his spiritual energy essence to his original level?”

“Two, please summarize the method for refining the ‘Heart Devouring Bug’. Also provide the steps for treating the symptoms after being afflicted by the heart devouring bug.”

“Three, please state which sect guild first succeeded in refining the ‘Heart Devouring Bug’. List at least five major leaders of this sect guild. Furthermore, outline the root cause of the destruction of this sect.”

Li Yao lightly slapped his cheeks. He never thought that such a highly troublesome “comprehensive question” would come up, mixing mathematics, history, and medicine. The knowledge of Warzone Medic Studies and other numerous subjects were needed. This “Exam Simulation” was worthy of being called a complete simulation!

Attention rapt and without disturbing the air, he pondered deeply and carefully. Within his mind appeared countless knowledge accrued from calmer times. Li Yao concentrated his attention and responded at lightning speeds. He overcame one question after another. At a rapid speed, a light blue answer appeared underneath the green problem as he spoke telepathically.

The answer was completed, onto the next question!

“A cultivator on the right path of the ‘Spirit Mountain Guild’ steps his foot onto a flying sword. He flies from the east towards a ravine at a speed of 247 meters per second. And another cultivator on the depraved path of the ‘Blood Murder Stronghold’ treads his foot onto a black cloud. He flies from the west in the opposite direction at 239 meters per second. Currently, the two people are separated by a distance of 122.5 kilometers. The question is, how much time later will it take for them to meet?”

“Suppose the cultivation of these two are equivalent and that they employ equivalent fundamental techniques and artifacts of their various sects. Please link the characteristics of the Spirit Mountain Sect to the Blood Murder Stronghold and deduce the course of battle between these two — at least deduce seven exchanges. The number of words may not exceed 500.”

This problem was clearly much simpler than the previous. But right when Li Yao was about to answer the problem, the assailing odor of Demon Fiend Beasts permeated from ahead. Impatient, low-sounding roars came closer and closer.

—In the midst of this terror, he calculated, answering the question. The test takers’ stamina, martial skill, willpower, calculation abilities, and the strength of quick thinking were tested. All these capabilities are synergized into an individual that surpasses the ordinary. Only then could one distinguish himself in the Federation’s university entrance exams, stepping onto the road of cultivators!

Li Yao’s pair of hands crossed as he pulled out two ghastly white bone blades. He licked his lips and welcomed the front of him as countless thoughts boiled ceaselessly in his brain, calculating at high speeds…

There was an absolute silence in the large campus. Every classroom was set up with 90 examination chamber units. In the Great Illusionary Land, each and every third-year student was frantically striving and struggling, disposing of the heads of demonic beasts and exam questions.

Imperceivable to the test takers, over four hours had already passed within the Great Illusionary Land. The examination was heading towards its conclusion.

Li Yao’s entire body was covered in seventy to eighty cuts of all sizes. Several areas had bled dry. Of greater concern was his abdomen, which had been pierced by the fang of a Demon Fiend Beast. He did not dare to pull it out. The bone blades he held in his hands were practically ground into sticks.

Only his pair of bright, crystal moon eyes remained unbroken. They retained their clarity, hardly concealing the radiance that was bubbling up.

“This should be the final problem…”

At this moment, the fluorescence of an eight-figured rune character appeared in the sky, glistening with golden rays of light. Li Yao relied on his abundant test-taking experience to make the judgment. This was the final great problem worth a hundred points, the “Summary Question”.

As expected, the question wasn’t long, but each word was supreme: “Please summarize ‘The Great Dark Age’.”





Home  Forty Millenniums of Cultivation  Chapter 6
 

Chapter 6
 
Chapter 6: The Great Dark Age
Translator: Strivon, Ash  Editor: Geoffrey_, Lancent

Li Yao’s eyebrows trembled; his complexion was somewhat grave. The period of “the Great Dark Age” was the most important phase in the development of the Cultivator Civilization. So much so that one can say the Great Dark Age divided civilization into two periods — the “Classical Cultivation Period” and the “Modern Cultivation Period”. This was an extraordinarily typical question. Although everyone knew about it, it was not easy to give a comprehensive answer.


Muttering deeply for a moment, Li Yao’s thoughts coursed with electricity and were spoken telepathically, flying upwards, “The cultivators of the ancients held an eternal life without death as their ambition, creating a matchless Ancient Cultivator Civilization that was full of splendor. They established from the Refinement and Foundation stages to the Orichalcum and Monad stages… until the Tribulation Ascension and True Immortal stages. These are the ascending stages in their system in order to gain immortality. Moreover, to advance bravely on this strip of path means to unceasingly break through the limits of life and stride towards the endless sea of the stars.”

“When Ancient Cultivator Civilization was at its peak, the Greater Thousand Worlds were established one after another by Ancient Cultivators. They constructed ancient transmission formations to run through the endless sea of stars, allowing for travel at will between stars and worlds. They’d reached a level where they began exploring the ultimate mystery of time!”

“With the continuous evolution of the Ancient Cultivator Civilization, the Ancient Cultivators became more and more powerful, their lifespans grew longer and longer, and the amount of resources they seized grew larger and larger.”

“When the Ancient Cultivator Civilization was in its early stages, there were only several hundred Orichalcum stage cultivators and dozens of Monad stage cultivators within the three thousand worlds. The “Apotheosized Devils of the Old” and the “Tribulation Ascended True Monarchs” were unheard of. On dozens of worlds, only one may appear after thousands of years. They were an existence that was few and far between.

“But when the Ancient Cultivator Civilization reached its later stages, the number of high stage cultivators exploded massively, multiplying factor by factor like a geometric series. During this time, there was a saying: ‘Monads were numerous like dogs and the Apotheosized were happy to walk them.’”

“And so, there were numerous high stage cultivators, all needing tremendous amounts of resources to cultivate. Additionally, more and more cultivators reached the penultimate stage to immortality. Their craving towards resources also reached — an endless bound!”

“In the beginning, it was possible to satisfy the avarice of the high stage cultivators through the exploitation of resources on the Greater Thousand Worlds. But after ravaging resources over the course of thousands upon thousands of years, after discovering nearly five thousand worlds and spending an entire millennium, the Ancient Cultivator Civilization came to find not a single new existence of a Greater Thousand World.”

“A world is limited, but the demands of cultivators are boundless — the Ancients spent a millennium in order to understand this truth. Naturally, civil war broke out as cultivators contested over the natural resources.”

“A three-thousand year civil war swept across all the Greater Thousand Worlds. Ancient cultivators that could conjure profound magics and transform nature engaged in slaughter on every star! Planets flamed and the ancient transmission formations were destroyed. Crystal battleships detonated one after another, and the high stage cultivators who claimed to be immortal fell one by one. The ‘Orichalcum Seizers’ and the ‘Old Monad Devils’ were like the mortals they had once treated like ants, turning into worthless cannon fodder. They disintegrated into scattered ash and smoke by the assaults sufficient to cause the annihilation of planets. ”

“Over seventy percent of the Greater Thousand Worlds were destroyed during the later stages of the civil war, and countless Greater Thousand Worlds had their connections severed from the Master World. Over 90% of the high stage cultivators turned to ash. The remaining low-stage cultivators struggled at death’s door in the midst of ruin.

boxn ovel. c0m
“It seemed like the civil war was about to collapse, likely ushering the dawn of a new peaceful era — until an ignorant cultivator genius on an unknown Greater Thousand World invented a ‘Small Playful Invention’.”

“Historical records of this cultivator genius’s name and sect had long been lost. His refining methods had also been swept away by the winds of time. Modern society calls what he invented — the ‘Fiend God Virus’!”

“Perhaps his thought process was very simple: since there weren’t enough soldiers, why not create something that could enhance the combat abilities of spirit beasts to replace cultivators in the battlefield — after all, there was seemingly no end to the number of spirit beasts!”

“He succeeded. The beasts that were catalyzed by the Fiend God Virus, countless once-docile spirit beasts, were transmogrified into terrifying machines of slaughter, becoming war machines known as Fiend Beasts. They did not tire. They did not falter. They appeared to be undying!”

“In a short 10 years, this cultivator genius relied on his army of Fiend Beasts to unify his Greater Thousand World. His Fiend Beast army numbered a hundred million strong. Cultivators of other worlds discovered what he had done and each began to refine their own ‘Fiend Beasts’.”

“In a hundred year’s time, Fiend Beasts became the main forces of the cultivator civil war, emerging in every nook and corner within the sea of the stars.”

“Unfortunately, all of the cultivators failed to realize two key issues.”

“The first, the ‘Fiend God Virus’ possessed an extremely powerful self-replicating ability and was violently contagious.”

“The second, while the ‘Fiend God Virus’ raised the fighting power of the Fiend Beasts, it also continuously increased the intellect of the Fiend Beasts at a rate that was imperceivable at first. Within a hundred years of savage blood-filled battle, a tremendous number of 10 billion fiend beasts had undergone catalyzation. A ‘Fiend Race’ possessing intellect surpassing mankind was born!”

“Eventually, on the final day of the three-thousand year civil war — the Fiend Race awakened!”

“All of the Fiend Beasts within the sea of the stars rebelled nearly simultaneously against their masters, as if they were being conducted by an existence of terror. The cultivators, who had been hiding behind closed doors living like royalty for ages, stood not a single chance against the experienced Fiend Beasts. Additionally, the Fiend Beasts grasped the technology and skills of cultivator human society!”

“Spirit countries were razed to the ground one after another. Entire sects were utterly extinguished. Within a hundred years, the Fiend Race ferociously hunted down the cultivators that managed to escape their net within the sea of the stars. The once high and lofty cultivators were now like stray dogs. They hid in the dark regions and cracks in space-time of the sea of stars, living in endless terror, unable to carry on.

 

“The next 30,000 years in its entirety was humanity’s ‘Great Dark Age’. Within this infinite darkness, the Fiend Race established a tremendous ‘Fiend Beast Dynasty’ and all of mankind was reduced to being lowly slaves. They lost their dignity. They lost their pride. And they lost what was most valuable of all — the right to cultivate!”

“It lasted three millenniumsthirty-thousand years, an entire three millenniumsthirty-thousand years! The old days lustered with glory where the Ancient Cultivator Civilization ruled the boundless sea of the stars. However, it was like a castle of sand, destroyed by the raging waves, with no trace left behind! The descendants of the high-level cultivators of the days of old, who possessed “an eternal immortal life”, could only rely on the most powerful primitive methods of reproduction, reproducing in great quantities, striving to ensure the preservation of their race!”

“The Great Dark Age ended only after the passing of 30,000 years due to internal power struggles within the Fiend Race; they constantly had conflicting views which split their society. Only then was humanity able to take a faint breath of opportunity. Cultivators launched three ‘Cultivator Revolutions’ from the shadows under the relentless efforts of countless cultivator geniuses. They set up a ‘Modern Cultivator Civilization System’ completely different from that of the Ancient Cultivator Civilization. Only then could they walk anew on the surging road of cultivation, reviving this road of glory!”

“Under the guidance and tenacity of the unprecedented ‘Supreme Emperor’, humanity was able to excavate a great number of the vestigial remains of the Ancient Cultivator Civilization and was able to found twenty ‘Guilds of Provenance’ anew once more. A thousand years of blood-filled battle passed and the humans achieved prosperity. Mankind became the rulers of the endless sea of stars once more; Modern Cultivator Civilization had achieved a shining and thriving reprieve from annihilation!”

“Ten thousand years have passed since the end of the ‘The Great Dark Age’. And an entire forty thousand years have past since the collapse of the Ancient Cultivator Civilization. The present is currently the best age of cultivation history; it’s the year forty thousand of the Cultivation Era of endless glamour!”

While Li Yao was pondering over the final passage, a countdown had appeared in the sky, representing that the examination was coming to a close, leaving him no choice but to abandon his thoughts on continuing to expound on the “Supreme Emperor’s” life. He spoke a few factual sentences without much thought, ending the passage in a rush.

In nearly the instant the final word emerged in his mind, the entire world collapsed with a loud bang and shattered into butterfly-like fragments. Li Yao was ejected by a tremendous force, his vision blossomed, and his consciousness returned back to the classroom.





Home  Forty Millenniums of Cultivation  Chapter 7
 

Chapter 7
 
Chapter 7: Second’s School Goddess
Translator: Strivon, Ash  Editor: Geoffrey_, Lancent

“BZZZZ…”


The out-dated examination chamber opened slowly, allowing Li Yao to take a step outside. He shook his head trying to clear a faint headache, a side effect from overtaxing the mind after staying too long in the Great Illusionary Land.

“Damnit! My head hurts like hell! The only students that are still using these kinds of garbage devices are those of us in the ‘Mish-mash class’. All the students of the Important Class and the Ascending Class had their spirit exam chambers swapped to the newest generation. There wouldn’t be any side effects for them no matter how taxing it was!” Meng Jiang was at his side complaining loudly, rubbing his eyes soon after. “Little Devil, this time, the difficulty of the exam simulation was really high. I probably failed again. When I get back, I’ll definitely eat some stir-fried bamboo shoots. How did you do?”

“So so I suppose.” Li Yao rubbed his nose. This time, the examination’s difficulty was indeed a bit high. Although in comparison his fundamentals were more solid and his mentality was sufficiently calm, he felt that he had been drawn to his utmost limit.

“Come on, let’s see!” Meng Jiang moved to the examination chamber’s side and began to extract a device. Every examination chamber had high-speed crystal processing units installed, allowing for test scores to be instantly calculated. The test scores were released the instant the examination ended.

“Wow! 525 points! What a high score! Thats enough to get admitted to the main universities. And yet, you said you did so-so? To be excessively modest is really just being arrogant. Go die Little Devil!” Meng Jiang cried out in surprise.

Li Yao swept a glance at the hologram. He actual letting out a dark sigh within his heart. Indeed, a score of 525 points wasn’t technically low. It was barely enough to meet the minimum passing score for a few of the well-known, main universities within the Union. However, the following numerical value was red, causing his eyes to feel somewhat prickled.

“Spiritual Actualization Quotient, 35%.”

The Spirit Root. A “pineal gland” located on the front medial part of the brain of those of the human race. It was a mysterious organ. It was a mystery because from the perspective of anatomy, this organ fundamentally does not exist; not a single genuinely true specimen of the spirit root has been found in the hundreds of thousands of years up to now.

 

However, this organ genuinely exists in the world of cultivation. Moreover, this organ is of most importance for cultivators. It is the link between mankind and the essence energy of heaven and earth. It is the key to the Essence Energy of the Universe!

boxn ovel. c0m
Only when one’s Spirit Actualization Quotient reached 100% can one’s “Spirit Root Awakening” occur. Only then could one step onto the road of cultivation!

When an ordinary university decides on their admissions, they don’t look at the value of an applicant’s Spirit Actualization Quotient. It didn’t matter even if the value was just 1% since an ordinary university only fostered ordinary people.

But when it came to the admission process of the “Nine Elite Universities”, who specialized in fostering cultivators, they would take the examination score and multiply it with the Spirit Actualization Quotient to produce a final score. Naturally, the higher one’s Spirit Actualization Quotient was, the more of an advantage one had.

Li Yao’s Spirit Actualization Quotient was pitifully low. After multiplying 500 or so points with 35%, only a mere 200 points remained.

As for the arrogant Important Class of the heavens, it was common to have a Spirit Actualization Quotient exceeding 60%. In other words, others only needed to score 300 or so points to be able to effortlessly crush Li Yao.

Even worse was that the when one’s Spirit Actualization Quotient became higher, their thinking process became quicker, their five sense became sharper, and the degree of control over their body became greater. How could the scores of those from the Important Class not be different from them of the mish-mashed Common Class.

It wasn’t that Li Yao never thought of putting in painstaking work to increase his Spirit Base Opening Degree. Its that this matter was different than studying. Facts from books can be learned from rote memorization. Physically ability and martial skills can be exercised and cultivated crazily. Yet, one’s spirit base opening degree genuinely needed one to rely on heaps of natural resources to improve.

Take the arrogant heaven’s chosen one’s of the Important Class as an example. Everyday, they consumed all sorts of heavenly materials, earthly treasures, and strengthening concoctions. They purchased special “Actualization Quotient Trainers” for home use or they went to “Underground Cultivation Shops” for special training. The amount of money they spend on opening their spirit bases each month varied from being less than several tens of thousands to being over dozens of billions. Only by demolishing mountains of gold and silver could they increase their Actualization Quotient by a single percent.

As for Li Yao, he scavenged scraps from the Artifact Graveyard. The most he made was 10,000 a month. After paying rent, living expenses, and tuition fees, all that was left was chicken feed, not even enough to fill his stomach. How would he have the money to increase his Actualization Quotient?

To summarize in a sentence— He was poor as f*ck!

Right while his heart was bogged with worries, he heard Meng Jian howl like a pig being slaughtered, “Damn! Two people got 691 points! Its Si Jiaxue and Helian Lie, those two bastards. These two are tied for first place again in the exam simulation this time!”

This time, all the third-years took the exam simulation simultaneously. In the front of the classroom was a hologram projector. The names and information of the top 10 students of the entire school came into view at lightning speeds.

Those tied for first were a beautiful girl who was as cold and pure as snow and a tall teen with an intimidating gaze and a flourishing heroic appearance.

Their scores did not really shock Li Yao. But the Spirit Actualization Quotient that followed caused flames of jealousy to erupt within his eyes.

Si Jiaxue, Actualization Quotient 71%; Helian Lie, Actualization Quotient 72%!

Meng Jian was still clamoring, “Tsk Tsk Tsk, They are truly worthy of being Crimson Nimbus Second’s stars. The school beauty and the school Adonis. The elites of the top dozen elites of the Important Class! Come take a look at these two bastards. Not only is the dude handsome and the chick beautiful, but they also come from rich and powerful families. Rumor has it that several cultivators have emerged in their family line. Their grades are good and their Actualization Quotient are also high. They are our school’s secret weapons for attacking the entrance exams! Everyone says that it should be a cinch for them to test into the Nine Elite Universities. The school specifically asked Fiend Blade Peng Hai to give them special training. This also has another meaning. The school hopes that they would be able to break into the top scores of Floating Spear City’s university entrance exams. At least breaking into the top 10 in the city!”

Speaking and speaking, Meng Jian let out an exaggerated sigh, “Alas, goods will eventually be thrown away, people will eventually die. Everyone here are equals as high school students. Everyone’s all hanging out in this school, but once we get through the university examinations, I am afraid that they shall fly, soar away, and enter the circle of cultivators, crossing over to indulge in a life of luxury, living a declining life of degeneracy. As for poor kids like us, we could only become laborers for life, the salaried class. Thinking about this cools my heart!”

He had spoken for a long time, but he was not met with a reaction. Meng Jiang turned his head to look and was surprised to see Li Yao’s pair of eyes staring blankly, gazing at Si Jiaxue’s picture. The look in his eyes was serene and remote, leaving no clues as to what he was mulling. Meng Jiang promptly tapped the head of his best friend, “Hey kid, it can’t be that you fell for Si Jiaxue? I’ll remind you out of the kindness of my heart. This women is indeed untouchable for you and I. She and Helian Lie are childhood family friends. Rumor has that their two main families have the intention of joining by marriage. And also, Helian Lie has her as a must-have target. Don’t you even look at this tall insurmountable power, for he has the smallest tolerance. Never has he allowed anyone else to get close to Si Jiaxue. Last time, it was a fresh transfer student who didn’t know his limits. He let out a declaration that he would pursue Si Jiaxue. The result was that in ‘Martial Arts Class’, Helian Lie broke three of his bones. As for us mish-mash of students, Helian Lie only needs a single sneeze to cause us to cough blood from internal injuries.”

“Nonsense.”

Li Yao retracted his gaze and appeared to make a resolution. “Let’s not mention Helian Lie for now. Lets just talk about this Si Jiaxue, who spends the entire day assuming the ice cold face of a dead person. Most likely, it’s because she has a frigid personality. How can I like this type of girl?”

……

……

The school’s resources was biased for the most part towards the Important Class and Ascending Class. Their policy towards the Common Class was very relaxed. After taking the simulated exam, the students of the Common Class focused on each of their weaknesses and practiced special skills. The day went by quickly. At 4 in the afternoon, class was about to end.

“Wait a moment so that we can walk together. I found a pancake stall recently. The owner’s third uncle works part time as the Vulcan Sect’s burner. The owner was also taught the skill ‘Fire Cloud Palm’. The ‘Hand Engraved Crimson Flame Omelet’ he produces is of the utmost quality. Today, I’ll treat you to dinner. What do you say?” Meng Jian heroically pounded his chest a multitude of times.

“I can’t, I have something I need to do today.”

“Or, I’ll treat you tomorrow then!” his best friend replied without hesitation. Li Yao fled the classroom at lightning speeds.

For a moment, he looked to his left and to his right, acting like a thief. Circling around the campus, he moved half a giant circle’s distance. He passed through two chow halls and stopped in a forest grove at the back of the campus for a dozen or so minutes before turning back the way he came. He walked quietly on his tiptoes, sneaking towards the first floor of an old school building where there was a room filled with junk.

He closed the door softly and was met with the faint and indistinct fragrance of wild valley orchids.

A pair of cold eyes like a clear spring was glaring somewhat impatiently right at him from the darkness. Beneath those pupils were a nose that was tall and raised and thin lips that were pursed tight.

If Meng Jiang was here, he would absolutely let out his iconic pig-slaughtered howl, “Okay, you’re a dead little devil. You really actually hooked up with the Second’s School Goddess! You! Your thirst knows no bounds!”





Home  Forty Millenniums of Cultivation  Chapter 8
 

Chapter 8
 
Chapter 8: Repairing a Crystal Processor
Translator: Strivon, Ash  Editor: Geoffrey_, Lancent

“You’re late by 55 minutes,” said the beauty coldy, like a frozen mountain.


“Sorry, this place was kind of hard to find. Did you bring the goods?” Li Yao criticized implicitly as he extended his dirty claw.

Si Jiaxue willow-like eyebrows wrinkled slightly as she judged Li Yao’s appearance. She felt that it appeared she had chosen the location without much thought. She hesitated for a short while but, nevertheless, fished out a crystal processing unit from her school bag.

“It’s this CPU. It’s super unstable after bootup. It crashes every time if you let it run over three minutes. I already went to dozens of repair shops and they all say that the architecture is way too archaic, that there’s a lot of components inside that are no longer produced, and that it’s impossible to repair. I’ve heard you are a veteran crystal processor enthusiast and also a complete expert on repairing them. If you can fix this, name whatever price you want. Money is not a problem. Of course, if you can’t fix this… Please don’t break any of the countless components within.”

“Let’s discuss this after I take a look.”

Repairing crystal processors required a broad and profound set of skills. Li Yao did not dare to give a guarantee. He pulled out a pair of dust-repelling gloves and put them on. Only then did he solemnly take the CPU.

When the CPU was pressed into his hand, he felt fully the firmness of a true crystal processor classic. This was an antique CPU with at least over a hundred years of history. Half of the architecture was still mechanical in nature. There was a triangular button on the ball-shaped exterior.

When Li Yao lightly pressed the button, the crystal processing unit made a humming sound and lightly vibrated as it awakened. It seemed that its mechanical architecture was operating at lightning speed. A few seconds passed and suddenly, it flew out of Li Yao’s palm to float in midair. Two beams of light shot out from the two openings on its top and bottom, condensing together to form a giant hologram. It morphed 49 glistening, shining glyph characters into existence, which formed a elaborate virtual glyph keyboard.

“This is simply a work of art…” Li Yao’s eyes became filled with an incomparable tenderness.

He identified that this was the Heavenly Zither Sect’s Tube Type CPU, the Vast Tomb-7, developed over a hundred and forty years ago.

In the history of crystal processor development, the “Tube-Type CPU” was only in the arena for a mere dozen years before falling to the more advanced “Chip-Type CPU”. Moreover, the Heavenly Zither Sect was a small sect that only existed for 50 or so years. This small sect relied on the success of releasing generations of the “Vast Tomb” Crystal Processor architecture, but they never kept up with modern developments in technology. During the decade when Chip-Type CPUs were rampant, this sect decided to go all in. They poured all their resources into developing the Vast Tomb-7. Ultimately, their source of capital fractured and they had to declare bankruptcy.

boxn ovel. c0m
Thus, the Vast Tomb-7 was known as the shining final glory of all Tube-Type Crystal Processors, setting its place as a masterpiece.

Li Yao’s pair of hands turned into a light breeze as they hopped around on the glowing, rippling glyph keyboard.

His typing speed wasn’t necessarily fast, but his movements were natural and flowing, rolling freely and easily. His appearance wasn’t that of tapping a keyboard but of strumming a priceless zither. Appearing on the hologram were rows and rows of glyph script instructions that followed his movements, dropping down like a torrential storm of rain. And the crystal processor followed as well through its interface by emitting an utterly weak beep that was incomprehensible to the ordinary person.

Li Yao leaned his ear closer, listening attentively. He had an expression of complete concentration. Each of his movements was incomparably precise.

After all, Tube-Type CPUs were artifacts created over a hundred years ago. Their architecture was simpler in comparison to the opposite mainstream Chip-Type Processor of the present. Two minutes later, Li Yao was able to make an initial verdict, “There should be something wrong with the heatsink, causing the internal temperatures of the crystal processor to become abnormally high during run-time. The functionalities of modern crystal processors are becoming more and more powerful, having to process greater amounts of telepathic data and information. As for the older type crystal processors of over a hundred years ago, the load becomes too heavy. It is the same as a 150 year old man who’ve had to bear over a thousand pounds of weight everyday, year in year out. It’s hard to avoid destroying the joints.”

“This crystal processor is a remnant left behind by a close relative of mine. To me, it’s an important memorial containing meaningful memories. As long as you can fix it, I am willing to pay any cost,” Si Jiaxue spoke seriously.

Li Yao thought and thought, and nodded his head, “A scraped heatsink is a common breakdown in crystal processors, technically it’s not a big issue. The reason why none of the repair shops you went to were unable to repair is primarily because this model number of crystal processors is way too rare. The technology utilized by this processor is also way too obsolete. The heat sink used inside has not been produced in the last hundred years, and modern heatsinks used in modern processors are fundamentally incompatible. Anyways, it doesn’t matter. I just happen to have some extremely precious antique heatsinks in my collection. All I need to do is give it a few tries, even if a few of them become scrapped, I should be able to mod one to fit as a heatsink for this processor.”

“No need to bullsh*t! Just name a price!” Si Jiaxue had read between the lines.

“Oh my. Isn’t it sad to be so urgent to discuss money matters between fellow students? Anyways, it’s not a big problem. Time is short, let me bring it home. I estimate all I need is one night to finish this. As for the dismantling fees, testing fees, repair fees, component costs, assembling, and installation fees, and adding my labor fees altogether… I’ll discount it down to 95% for you. I calculate it to be 98,500 credits. Do you want to pay in cash or do a transfer?”

“Hmm?”

Si Jiaxue squinted her eyes. A dangerous glow exuded from within the depths of her eyes. All of a sudden, the ambient temperature of the junk room seemed to drop by ten degrees.

“I may have money, but it doesn’t mean I’ll let other people treat me as an easy target to cheat. Do you understand?”

Li Yao swallowed some saliva with utter difficulty. He bore against the pressure explaining, “Its true. When compared to repairing an ordinary crystal processor, this price is a little bit high. With nearly 100,000 credits, one can buy a high-end crystal processor with ‘Computational Power’ comparable to a cultivator at the peak of the Refinement stage. However, your crystal processor unit has over a hundred years of history. It can already be considered an antique. Obviously, the price for repairing an antique is different! Lets not talk about the other costs, let’s just talk about the several heat sinks I will need to use on this crystal processor. They were all acquired through years of bloody effort. I had to spend tremendous utmost effort in order to acquire these rare collection pieces. All of them are simply priceless treasures! So believe me, this is an absolutely fair and reasonable price!”

Si Jiaxue did not speak a single word. Her serene eyes fixed onto him.

Her Spiritual Actualization Quotient exceeded 70%, bringing with it spiritual pressure that was unyielding. Li Yao’s heart tightened and he was on the verge of collapsing. But when he thought of his own “objective”, he still forced himself to speak, “If my fellow student Si Jiaxue feels it’s too expensive, that’s also not a problem. Lets just say that my inspection was free this one time. You can mail it to a few of the large repair shops in a different country. Let them slowly find the corresponding heat sink for your model. I think it will take at most 3-5 months in order to find one or two in stock. If you decide to go this way, the cost should be cut down to under 10,000 credits.”

“Three to five months…”

Si Jiaxue groaned lightly. She knew that Li Yao spoke the truth since the technicians of several repair shops told her the same thing. From what they said, repairing the old CPU types wasn’t difficult, but finding the appropriate components was very hard. They also gave an estimation of three-five months. However, if her luck was bad, it was possible that she would have to wait up to half a year.

Presumably, this little rascal also saw this point, thereby considering herself to be an easy target!

Forget it. She, herself, still needed to go cultivate. There’s no need to get tangled up with these bastards of the Common Class. Si Jiaxue nodded her head, and with an expressionless face said, “Okay fellow student Li Yao, I can give you 100,000 credits, but business transactions require business contracts. Tomorrow at this time, I want to see the crystal processor looking completely brand new. Also, you will guarantee its operational stability into the future. If something goes wrong every now and then, I won’t pay any follow up repair fees. Is there any problems?”

“There’s absolutely no problems. After I replace its heatsink with a suitable one, it can resume normal operation for at least three years. During these three years, you can continue searching for the appropriate heatsink for this model. As long as you replace it at regular intervals, it will be fine,” Li Yao responded at lightning speed, wearing a smile on his face.

“Then that’s fine,” Si Jiaxue nodded her head. She was unwilling to deal with this small rascal for even one more second, so she turned around to leave.

Li Yao sat down onto a box of junk, his head was covered with cold sweat. Only after much time had past did he feel the weight off his shoulders, letting out a whistle.

Success!

With 100,000 credits, he can go to the “Underground Ghost Market” to buy the illegally produced “Knock-Off Strengthening Drugs”, giving him the chance to increase his Actualization Quotient by a huge percentage!

Knock-off strengthening drugs contained a great amount of impurities and their consumption causes extremely violent side effects. However, they are superior in termstimes of cost and sufficiency. 100,000 credits was enough to buy a three month’s supply of dosage for consumption, giving him the opportunity to temper his spirit root within the “Hundred-day Sprint” timeframe — to be completely reborn!

“My desire is to test into the ‘Nine Elite Universities’. This is my one and only chance. Even if you are the ‘Second’s School Goddess’, I have no choice but to fiercely cheat you of your money. I am really sorry!” Li Yao shoved the “Vast Tomb-7” CPU into his school bag. He rubbed his somewhat swollen and aching temples for a bit. A glimpse of a smile appeared on his face as he strutted out the room of junk.

(TL Note: I translated the CPU types to be “tube type” and “chip type” because I feel that they analogous to our vacuum tube and solid-state transistor technology. I decided to use “chip” over “wafer” because a “master chip” was stated in chapter 3, where as wafers would refer to moreso the silicon wafer upon which integrated circuits are created via the lithography process. )





Home  Forty Millenniums of Cultivation  Chapter 9
 

Chapter 9
 
Chapter 9: Salted Fish and Shoes
Translator: Strivon, Ash  Editor: Geoffrey_, Lancent

With the day’s school session end came a rare moment of calmness over the campus. Along a small path above the shade of the trees flew cheerful laughter and conversation. Several luxury private shuttles slowly descended from the air as parents arrived to pick up their children. There were also several students like Li Yao, who dragged their weary bodies along, slowly walking towards the school gate.


Just as he was about to exit the school gate, Li Yao suddenly felt his body tighten up. A tall silhouette obstructed the path in front of him, “You’re called Li Yao? Was it you who was with Si Jia Xue just a moment ago?”

Li Yao’s eyes suddenly shrank back into their sockets. He felt like ten-thousand needles had stabbed into his entire body. His heart rate sped up in a flash. A chill spread from his tailbone and rushed up to the top of his skull. The pressure exuded by this person was too great. He was like a poisonous viper staring fixated at a mouse. Li Yao was absolutely unable to move a single step. Even swallowing some saliva became incomparably difficult.

“It’s He Lianlie! Its Crimson Nimbus Second’s number one expert, He Lianlie! This time I’m done for!” Li Yao shrieked in his heart. He intended to explain himself, but he was unable to speak even half a word.

He Lianlie stood casually and wantonly. A crystal processor was clasped in his right hand and was immersed in calculating through a set of applicable exam questions, not at all looking directly at Li Yao in the eyes. He said without much thought, “No need to be afraid. I obviously know that with your type of trash, it’s impossible for you to have something with Small Xue. I’ll forget it this one time. I don’t feel like cleaning you up.”

His finger tapped a hologram lightly, switching to the next question. He Lianlie continued speaking, “Nevertheless, right now it’s the urgent and critical moment — the ‘Hundred-day Sprint’. Small Xue and I are the people who will attack for first place in Floating Spear City’s university entrance exams. I hope that during this time-frame, there won’t be any sketchy garbage disturbing Small Xue, distracting her. Do you understand yet?”

Li Yao’s eyes squinted into slits as he firmly bit down his teeth, “You’re saying I’m trash?”

He Lianlie didn’t even lift his head as he said indifferently, “Don’t be mistaken, I’m not specifically targeting you. From my point of view, you bunch of mishmash Common Class students, each and every one of you — are trash!”

After he said his last word, he finally raised his head and swept a glance at Li Yao.

Just a single glance caused Li Yao to feel like the pits of his stomach were ferociously hit by massive hammer. It was unbearable. He fell back two steps and coughed violently.

He Lianlie snorted coldly. Disdain filled his face as he turned and left.

boxn ovel. c0m
Li Yao was bending over coughing, looking like a giant shrimp, and even coughed up his tears. A long time passed before he was able to stand straight. He breathed heavily and glared unwaveringly towards the direction of He Lianlie’s departure.

“DAMN IT!”

“Don’t tell me that in these days, all one needs is to be tall and lofty, to be bold and powerful, to be handsome and stylish, to be confident and relaxed, to have thin eyebrows and starry eyes, to be born to a rich and powerful household with a net worth of 18 billion, to possess an exceedingly powerful talent for cultivation and unyielding strength of a tyrant — then one can be this arrogant?”

……

Half an hour later.

“Lucky lucky, indeed this time luck has brought me to grandma’s house. For the sake of repairing Si Jiaxue’s crystal processor, I actually offended He Lianlie! If I had known things would turn out this way, I absolutely would have increased my price. Only a minimum of 200,000 credits would have been worth it!”

“Also, there’s He Lianlie. This. Son. Of. A. B*tch. Armed with the power of money, he consumes heavenly materials and earthly treasures as if they were food. He drinks strengthening drugs as if they were tap water. He also has underground cultivator experts helping him strengthen his mind. Great martial arts masters help him forge his physique. Only then could he raise his Actualization Quotient to over 70 percent. Surprisingly, he is this arrogant! Trash? I am not trash! The day will come. I will become a true Master Artificer. I will beat you into a pig’s head and stuff you in a trash can!”

A lone youth walked solitarily on the road home. His expression was just like a devil’s as he gnashed his teeth in anger. Occasionally, when he happened onto a small rock by the road, he would ferociously kick it flying.

The appearance of He Lianlie caused him to clearly understand the distance between him and a cultivator genius, and sure enough, the gap was extremely large. It caused him to understand that the chance of success of his dream of “testing into the Nine Elite Universities, stepping onto the road of cultivation, and becoming a Master Artificer” were however uncertain.

A scene that he saw over and over in his uncanny dreams emerged in the sea of Li Yao’s mind. It appeared to be a scene from a movie.

There was a youth wearing a red tank-top. With raised eyebrows and open-wide eyes, he spoke loudly, “If we don’t have any dreams in life, how are we different from salted fish!?”

From the past until now, this scene would motivate Li Yao deeply. It let him advance bravely on the road of his dreams without any fear.

It was only at this time that he finally recalled the rest of his dream. What the other person’s response was when the red-tank-top youth had finished his words was:

“You don’t even have shoes. Doesn’t that make you a salted fish?”

Li Yao stood fixed as he subconsciously looked down at his pair of feet.

What he wore was a pair of basic exercise shoes picked up from the garbage heap. Normally, he cultivated like mad, so his shoes had been overworn long ago. Not only was the sole’s engraving worn away, even a hole was rubbed into the tip of the left shoe, exposing a big dirty toe.

He thought back to a moment ago when he saw the shoes He Lianlie wore. It was a pair of the newest model of the cultivating shoes, “SuperStar G-9”. They were handcrafted and refined using the toughest and most durable hides of fiend beasts. Scales were attached to the exterior, increasing the wear resistance by a large degree.

It was said that the sole is made of two layers, and in between was a cushion of air refined from the swim bladder of the deep sea devil fish. Not only does it increase jumping power, it also protects one’s leg joints. The price of this mere pair of shoes runs several tens of thousands of credits!

In this entrance exam battlefield where mighty forces were displayed and where only one can reign on top, there were still countless students of rich and powerful families just like He Lianlie, all wearing SuperStar G-9s and consuming endless resources!

For himself, a poor youth possessing nothing, how could he be capable of suppressing and rising above these people in the cruel blood-filled field of battle? How can he realize his dream?

Li Yao’s heart was above all at a loss, and his steps turned particularly heavy as well. The road ahead seemed to be long — quite long.

Night fell and the evening lamps lit up. He had finally made it to the main district.

Ahead was a large crystal bridge. If he crossed over the high-speed crystal rail tracks and went through the culvert under the bridge, he would find himself in Morning Sun Village’s residential area.

This was the suburbs; it was relatively barren with very few people coming and going.

Right when Li Yao was about to go through the culvert, he suddenly heard a piercing explosion from the side of his ear. All he could see was a radiating glow all around. A crystal train was crossing the bridge.

Li Yao suddenly stood fixed and rubbed his eyes, looking towards the bridge.

In the instant the flash of light shot out a moment ago, he made out an image. There was a person standing on top of the bridge!

This was probably the rail line bridge’s expert railway passer-througher!

The “high speed crystal rail” was one of the Federation’s 10 ginormous grand artifacts, praised to be a “national treasure”. It’s maximum velocity can exceed 1000 km/hour. Furthermore, every cut of car on the crystal rail train was outfitted with the best defensive military grade artifacts to defend against fiend beasts. The destructive capabilities of its high speed assaults were in no way inferior to a high stage cultivator striking with his all!

In order to prevent unexpected accidents, the high speed crystal train was normally levitating a dozen or so meters off the ground on its dedicated rail line. The rail line was sealed all around as a restriction— How did this idiot crawl inside?

That’s right, Li Yao saw it clearly. An old man actually stood on the bridge’s rail line.

This old man looked very odd; he was old and gray-haired, and his appearance was dull and ancient. He looked like he was unearthed tens of thousands of years ago, like having once been in a museum seen by Li Yao.

But, his body actually exuded an air that was extremely heavy. Even though they were over a hundred meters apart, it caused Li Yao to practically hear his own heartbeat beat violently.

Thump! Thump! Thump!

It was like a large hammer was continuously bombarding a metal sheet!

The old man’s air was like a vast ocean. He Lianlie’s oppressive strength was simply feeble and pitiful in comparison. The difference between the two was greater than the gap between the sun and a firefly. Li Yao also had a certain feeling. When compared to He Lianlie’s created display of fame and power, this old man simply wasn’t manifesting this air consciously. Although there were waves inadvertently overflowing from the old man, what Li Yao felt was just the tip of the iceberg!

The old man wore a simple and plain coarse robe, it was like he stepped out from the ancient world of cultivation 40,000 years ago!

“Hey—” It was a dangerous moment. Li Yao could not make out whether this old man was lunatic or some kind of eccentric. He saw that the train was arriving here at galloping speed. His hands and feet were gesticulating as he cried loudly.

The old man turned a deaf ear to Li Yao’s shouts as he continued to size up the continuously expanding light in the front of him.

It appeared he was in a state of complete curiosity about everything in his surroundings. He was especially curious about the crystal rail line that lay on the bridge and the screaming crystal rail train that was about to arrive. Even more so was the expression that appeared on his face; it containing the joyful thoughts of a mischievous child who had discovered a brand new toy.

In the next second—





Home  Forty Millenniums of Cultivation  Chapter 10
 

Chapter 10
 
Chapter 10: Possessed by a Ghost
Translator: Strivon, Ash  Editor: Geoffrey_, Lancent

The high speed crystal train rushed across. With a “Pwa”, like the shattering of an egg, the old man was rammed head on! He disintegrated in a millisecond! Limbs and bones snapped and disintegrated under the bombardment of a torrential surge of essence energy. He was annihilated all the way down to the cellular level, vanishing from the face of the planet!


All Li Yao saw was a bright flash of red and the mysterious old man disappeared completely!

He let out a somewhat helpless sigh from within his heart.

Having grown up in the Artifact Graveyard, which had a terrifying environment filled with danger, encountering dead bodies was nothing out of the ordinary for him. Furthermore, he personally experienced countless deaths in his uncanny dreams, and so when it came to the issue of death, Li Yao was not the ordinary kind of person who would react with terror or unwell feelings.

Nevertheless, in the end, this was still a living being and having this life fade away in front of him in this miserable manner left his heart feeling somewhat strange.

“This old man was probably a cultivator who fell into madness, going insane. This is the only reason why someone would do something this crazy,” Li Yao thought to himself inwardly.

The crystal train was not affected at all by this minor mishap and maintained its high speed, moving along. It went away, never to return, disappearing quickly into the horizon.

Li Yao knew what would happen. There would be security guards on the train who would surely notify the local police department of this matter. There was also the military; they would rush here with large numbers of their military police.

He was a scavenger who collected scraps in the Artifact Graveyard. It can be said that his actions bordered on the edge of the law. As always, Li Yao would abstain from dealing with the military police in order not to stir up any trouble. He straightened his clothes, sped up his footsteps, and passed through the culvert.

Yet, he was unaware that in a separate plane that was invisible to him, a transparent crystal human form, looking like an exact carbon copy of the mysterious old man, appeared in the exact same place where the mysterious old man was standing on the bridge’s rail line. The old man looked somewhat puzzled as he sized up his surroundings. Finally, the old man eyes flashed, locking into a state of irradiating anger.

The transparent crystal figure suddenly shattered into a myriad of traceless and incorporeal fragments, refracting and shining bright in the moonlight like thousands upon thousands of gorgeous butterflies using their wings to soar. Without any warning, they silently entered inside Li Yao’s body!

boxn ovel. c0m
“It’s cold!”

Li Yao felt a bone-chilling ghastly wind. He seemed to be hearing something murmur an absolutely ancient and mysterious language quietly near his ear. It was an unspeakable terror; a unmentionable horror. He involuntarily gave a shiverish shake.

Bizarre — this is really too bizarre. Some of his hair stood on its end, and his blood ran cold. He straightened his school uniform and simply started running.

According to logic, when a person begins to run, their four limbs would move and their body would generate heat. But no matter how much Li Yao ran, no matter how much he increased his sprint to the extreme tornado-like limit, to the point of puking, the bone-chilling coldness in his soul followed without end like a shadow following the body. It was as if there were maggots in the bones of his feet, swallowing him inch by inch.

He staggered home and threw himself through the house door. By that time, his entire self had already frozen into an ice cube. But if one were to look at his exterior appearance, they would actually find his face flushed red, his brows beaded with sweat, and his entire body surrounded by a white mist of steam vapor rising in the air. It was a unspeakable strangeness!

“Small Black, Small Black, I think I got sick. Quickly help me to my bed and then find the anti-fever medicinal artifact from the medicine box!” Li Yao spoke with a slurred speech. Bursts of darkness appeared in his vision. The top and the bottom of his eyelids were battling endlessly. He was unable to wait for the Blackwing sword to fly over. His legs had weakened, and he had already fallen on the floor. He gave a wheeze and was completely passed out.

It was like he had sunk in a deep swamp. His five senses were stripped to practically nothing. He was unceasingly in an absolute darkness. **. **. It was never-ending.

Eventually, right before he was about to go mad, right before he was going to pray to the hundreds of millions of gods in this infinite world for them to simply put an end to it all, his whole body loosened and the darkness retreated like the receding tides. He breathed fresh air once again — and the air he breathed was a hundred fold fresher than any he had ever breathed!

“What kind of place is this?” Li Yao observed his surroundings, feeling somewhat bewildered.

He knew subconsciously that he had fallen into a dangerous and fearsome “nightmare.” However, this nightmare was different than when he went over to the ”uncanny dream.” This dream world was extremely clear, containing strong elements from an ancient era.

 

He was standing above an incomparably vast military ground. In all directions were countless numbers of gigantic weapons and bronze statue artifacts towering tall, reaching through the clouds. They encompassed this enormous field of over a hundred acres. And this ground surprisingly lay on the peak of a floating mountain in the sky.

Below at the edge was an unforgettable sight, the rolling of large waves in a giant black sea!

 

The masculine odor of blood and stinky sweat of smoky figures assailed and bombarded Li Yao’s nostrils, nearly killing him from the stench. In his surrounding were several thousands of muscular humanoids with well developed limbs, bright bursting muscles, and fierce faces. Each of these buff humanoids carried a hammer that looked to weigh over a thousand pounds upon their shoulders. They spared no energy, engaging in drills.

Boom! Boom! Boom!

Several thousand-pound hammers smashed simultaneously against the floor, causing the base of the entire floating mountain to tremble and shake.

At this moment, Li Yao was in a state of shock. He discovered that he had unexpectedly become one of these nine-feet tall burly giants. Even his looks had changed entirely. He touched his chin with his hand and felt beard stubble that was like iron needles!

He was grasping in his hand the same type of iron hammer, the size of a tree. Its coiled-rope grip had rubbed, breaking into his palm and soaking in his blood.

At the front of this military ground was a giant that was twice as large as all the other giants. It was simply not of human race, a “Titan.” It glared as it opened its large copper-bell eyes and shouted like a thunderstorm, “You 3527 useless pieces of sh*t, you have already been officially admitted under the ‘Hundred Smelting Guild’ and have become the lowest level workers of the Hundred Smelting Guild. This is the result of the cumulative efforts of your forefathers, a good fortune created from three generations of cultivation. We, the Hundred Smelting Sect, are the greatest and most powerful crafting guild within this ‘Grand Foreworld’. Our guild is strict. Even if you have the smallest and most rudimentary job in this guild, you too must put forth your life in cultivating!”

“As low-grade workers, each day, each of you must carry 3000 pounds of water, chop down 50 trees, and travel to the ‘Abyssal Sea’ below to hunt at least 10 Thornridge Sharks. This shall be your food!”

“However, the absolute most important thing is… you must cultivate in the Hundred Smelting Guild’s foundation techniques, the <<One-Hundred-and-Eight-Hands Chaos-Gale Hammer Technique >>. After you all have finished listening to me, you useless shits. Everyday, you must swing down your iron hammers 10,000 times, and each swing cannot be lacking. When you are able to hammer out a deep hole within this pure-orichalcum-smelted floor, then you will be promoted to a ‘Metal-Forge Worker’ and be able to cultivate techniques of higher quality!”

“Cultivate! Cultivate! Give me your life for cultivation! Ou Yeming, what are you standing around like a retard for? Why aren’t you cultivating?”

Li Yao still hadn’t understood what was going on when he discovered that the entire group of humanoids were observing him with eyes of extreme pity. His heart immediately froze. A whirlwind filled with ferocity and malice lunged over from ahead. It was the enormous Titan coming from over a hundred meters away. In a blink of an eye, the Titan used a skill to appear right in front of him. The Titan towered above and glared ferociously at Li Yao.

“Ou Yeming, yesterday you were babbling nonsense at dinner. You were also the one saying some crazy talk about absolutely becoming the Hundred Smelting Guild’s Guildleader in the future. Whats wrong? You don’t feel that the <<Chaos-Gale Hammer Technique>> is too rudimentary, that it’s not suitable for you, the ‘Future Guildleader’, to cultivate? Alright then. Today, I will let you experience for a bit how formidable the One-Hundred-and-Eight-Hands Chaos-Gale Hammer Technique can be! DIE!”

The Titan’s pair of hands spread opened. Black smoke condensed in the palms of his hands and transformed into giant hammer that was larger than Li Yao’s skull. It danced, producing a strong wind; and it struck, smashing through Li Yao’s head. Li Yao still had not process what was going on. All he felt was that he grew a pair of wings as he soared through the air, and his head felt like it had grown 10 times in size. He shrieked endlessly in his heart, “What’s wrong with this f*cker?!”





Home  Forty Millenniums of Cultivation  Chapter 11
 

Chapter 11
 
Chapter 11: As if a Dream
Translator: Strivon, Ash  Editor: Geoffrey_, Lancent

From this day onward, Li Yao assumed the identity of “Ou Yeming“, and the miserable life of a low-level Hundred Smelting Guild worker unfolded for him.


This strange dream was completely different from a typical dream to the extent that it seemed even more real than the uncanny dreams that Li Yao had experienced since childhood. Even the passage of time appeared to be abnormally slow. No matter what Li Yao tried, there wasn’t even a single trace of indication that he would awaken from this dream.

It was as if he had truly become “Ou Yeming”, carrying out an entirely different chapter of life.

Being a low grade worker in the Hundred Smelting Guild was not easy. Along with the slow passage of time, the burden that was pressed upon their shoulders grew greater and greater every day.

In the beginning, they carried 3,000 pounds of water and cut down 50 giant trees. Then it turned to carrying 10,000 pounds of boiling molten iron and cutting down 100 of the metal-like orichalcum trees. Additionally, they had to swing the 1,020 pound ‘Heaven Forging Hammers’ down 30,000 times!

And the Instructor of the Low Level Workers, the Titan, seemed to have Li Yao firmly marked in his mind as a thorn in his flesh. Everyday, he would bring Li Yao troubles during the three daily meals. If Li Yao made the smallest mistake, he would unavoidably be hit with a series of the One-Hundred-And-Eight-Hands Chaos-Gale Hammer Techniques, beating him into a state between life and death, a state so painful one wishes they were dead.

Day after day, year after year, time passed in the dreamworld like flickering lights and passing shadows. It was as if 10 years had passed.

Day in and day out, the grueling and mundane drudgery of work was of inhumane torment and slowly extinguished Li Yao’s sense of self. The name “Li Yao” was a thing that was already far distant. Even his past memories became mere grains of sand within the deepest depths of his mind. They had sunk into the hidden depths of the ocean floor and not a single ripple emerged on the surface.

He was completely “Ou Yeming”. The Ou Yeming who was the most outstanding of the Hundred Smelting Guild’s low level workers!

30 years of blood, sweat, and tears. He forged himself a majestic body of steel muscles and iron bones. And much to the bitterness of the Titan, he also completely comprehended the essence of the One-Hundred-And-Eight-Hands Chaos-Gale Hammer Technique to the extent that his proficiency surpassed several inner members of the Hundred Smelting Guild.

Other than the Titan, people no long called him “Ou Yeming”; all the low level workers called him “Elder Brother Ou Ye!”

boxn ovel. c0m
Year 11. He finally became the number 2 ranked Metal-Forge Worker of the Hundred Smelting Guild and received the qualifications to enter the “Metal Forging Room”.

The following years passed by at flying speeds.

Year 14. He became an outer member of the Hundred Smelting Guild and received the title of “Blacksmith”. He was now qualified to assist in casting and forging the low-grade flying swords used by the outer guild members.

Year 21. He became a “Master Craftsman” and possessed his own Crafting Furnace. He could now cast and forge low-grade flying swords all by himself.

Year 29. He became a “Grandmaster Craftsman”. He was the number one crafter among the outer guild members.

Year 31. The demonic cultivators invaded. Ou Yeming took charge in resisting against the Seven Great Demonic Guilds on the battlefield. He smashed and killed 24 Building Foundation Stage members of the demonic cultivators. It was at the time that the Hundred Smelting Guild discovered that he’d taken the most basic technique, the One-Hundred-And-Eight-Hands Chaos-Gale Hammer Technique, pushed forward an evolution, and transformed it into One Hundred and Eighty-Nine Hands!

Year 33, Ou Yeming sat and paid respects to the Hundred Smelting Guild’s Elder ‘Daoist Yu Chang”. He became an inner guild member of the Hundred Smelting Guild. Another three years later, he and became a core guild member and was the Metal Forging Room’s attendant.

Year 38. Ou Yeming distinguished himself amongst the Hundred Smelting Guild’s countless youths by becoming the first to reach the peak boundary of the Building Foundation Stage. Also, deriving from “Ou Ye Elder Brother”, other people began addressing him as “Senior Master Ou Ye!”

In the same year, he took the Hundred Smelting Guild’s thirty-fifth supreme guild leader’s only daughter as his wife.

At the wedding festivities, beautiful women lined the walls. Ou Ye Ming was like the rising sun — his future looked boundless. He thought back to the days when his identity was a low-level worker, when he had declared in jest, “Eventually there will be a day, when I will become the Hundred Smelting Guild’s Guild Leader!”

It seemed that this was no longer an impossibility.

At present, he held great power. He sat upon endless resources and advanced peacefully down the road of cultivation, making tremendous progress. Numerous elders of the guild watched over him from above, and countless blood-brothers aided him from below. His future landscape was truly boundless. He was at the apex of life!

Only… When he thought back to when he had said those words in jest dozens of years ago, he could faintly recall memories of some sort. Inevitably, a ripple of recollection would churn from the depths of his mind, letting him feel somewhat uneasy.

“My husband, you will certainly make and build our Hundred Smelting Guild to become the most powerful crafting guild within the three-thousands worlds…” his darling wife lay upon the bed gazing at him with a smile. Her blurry eyes were as tender and soft as water.

Ou Yeming deeply, deeply deeply, deeply deeply deeply deeply felt a cold shiver.

A strange vision rippled suddenly, surfacing. It was as if there was something distorting space and time, ripping a hole in the world. The face of his wife lying on the bed became fuzzy, unclear, and hazy. It changed to a another face that was clean to the point of pureness.

““Promise me, don’t go street racing any longer. Become an honest car mechanic, no one will look down on you. There will be a day when we will have our own Auto 4S Shop!””

“Promise me! Dear Yao!”

He subconsciously nodded his head. He blinked his eyes once and suddenly woke up.

It was a feeling that was completely bizarre. Something similar to a spirit had disengaged from the body. It changed into a transparent empty shadow and floated midair. It looked with absolute calmness in the bridal room at Ou Yeming and his wife. It had once shared Ou Yeming’s personal experiences, but now it turned into a complete spectator.

“I am not Ou Yeming, I am not Ou Yeming! Who am I? I am… I AM — LI YAO!”

It was like a rush of clear spring water had flushed his heart. His mind awakened to a bright comprehension that was incomparably clear. In a flash, he found his sense of self once more and the seventy two years of past memories also shattered into multi-colored shards, a transient dream.

“Too close. Too close. If I’d kept on wallowing in this dream and was unable to free myself, then I fear that the day I woke from this dream, the one who would awaken would be only Ou Yeming, not the real me!” Li Yao thought back to his various moments in the past, and he could not help but to be drenched in sweat as he let out a shout of luck.

From this day forward, he assumed the role of a spectator and continued to participate in the dreamland’s development. Even though he still had not broken free, he knew clearly that this was a dream. Within the dream were countless things that caused him to be perplexed.

In psychological terms, this was called a “lucid dream”.

The rate at which the dreamland unfolded grew faster and faster. It was like the blurred lightning speed of a crystal rail train. Only during important moments did the speed slow down, allowing Li Yao to clearly see their details.

Year 41. Li Yao saw Ou Yeming become the Hundred Smelting Guild’s youngest Elder in history. In that same year, he crafted a secret sword, the Profound Spark, and beheaded True Monarch Dulong, a demonic cultivator tyrant who’d seized the Core Formation Stage.

Year 43. Li Yao saw Ou Yeming representing the Hundred Smelting Guild in the “10 Worlds on Sword Theory” competition. He used the might of the one-of-a-kind, tyrannic greatsword, “Hundred-Meter Swallowing Dragon”, to suppress the other outstanding competitors. He cut through, breaking 92 of his opponents weapons in succession, seizing the title “Blade Saint of 10 Worlds”, and became a master swordsmith that could shake this dozen of worlds.

Year 52. Li Yao saw the demonic cultivators invade once more. Their most important target was the Hundred Smelting Guild. Dozens of necessary core members, the Guild Leader, highest level members, Elders, fell one by one.

The situation was dire. Ou Yeming was elected to act as the Hundred Smelting Guild’s 36th generation Guild Leader.

 

Under his leadership, the Hundred Smelting Guild transformed into a gigantic weapons manufacturing plant, steadily providing Masterwork Weapons to guilds on the path of good.

Year 68. The final disciples of Nine Great Demonic Guilds were exterminated and slayed by the Masterwork Weapons crafted by Ou Ye Ming!

At this time, there were no longer any people who called him “Senior Master Ou Ye” or “Guild Leader Ou Ye.”

Every person addressed him with absolute veneration as — Ou Yezi!

Year 109. The name Ou Yezi had already spread through to the several hundreds of surrounding worlds. Even people on the other shore of the sea of stars from unknown worlds, even people from close distances of millions and millions of kilometers braved the danger of being consumed by the raging maelstrom of primordial chaos. They crossed over using ancient transmission arrays, arriving at the Grand Foreworld, all for the sake of acquiring a Masterwork Weapon crafted by Ou Yezi.

Year 130……. Year 250…… Year 320……

At last ——

“Supreme Guildmaster! Elder Forebearer! Please sir, think twice, think twice about this! Tunneling through time is fundamentally impossible! You sir are the great pillar of heavens that supports our Hundred Smelting Guild. You absolutely cannot undertake such a risk yourself!”

Li Yao looked on within the giant palace hall that was incomparably majestic and upon which clouds and mist curled around. Over ten thousand cultivators were kneeling simultaneously on the ground. They were facing towards Ou Yezi and were kowtowing repeatedly. The knocking called the entire hall to echo with “bang bang” sounds while blood flowed to fill the earth.

Ou Yezi, who’s hair and beard were completely white, was standing magnificently in the center of a grand and mysterious transmission array. With a flick of his sleeve, he indifferently said, “There are a great number of worlds in the universe. There are a great number of eras in eternity. The true meaning of cultivation is… to explore the endless mysteries of the cosmos. This old man has happened to coincide with destiny and has accidentally crafted something that could possibly traverse time, the ‘Great Time Array’. Even if the possibility is uncertain, I need to test it out. To find out if it can truly traverse to the ends of time.”

He stopped for a moment. Slowly, he swept his eyes across the people within the great palace hall. Ou Yezi face was written full of melancholy. He murmured, “My disciples, you need not speak any further. All the artifacts in this world have already been studied fully by this old man. I have no regrets. I just hope that at the distant era on the other shore, this new world several tens of thousands of years in the future, there would be new artifacts capable of making people somewhat happy.”

His tone left nothing out. Ou Yezi had already ignited the Great Time Array. A pillar of blinding light came from the depths of the bizarre transmission array and enveloped him within.

This pillar of light flooded with an incomparably violent surge of essence energy. It was just like a flood rushing and spreading in all directions. All those at the great palace cowered and shivered in front of the surge of essence energy. All the cultivators were forced to erect essence shields of protection. The cultivators closest to Ou Yezi were directly caught in the wave of essence energy and were overturned.

And that essence energy seemed to be infinite. It continued to gather unceasingly… increasing, expanding. It was like the essence became a mythical beast which beared its fangs.

“No. Not good. Right now this transmission array is assimilating the surrounding essence energy in an unending stream, transforming into a chaotic flow of essence energy. It can explode at any time!”

“Something has gone wrong with the transmission array. Everyone, quickly evacuate. RUN!”

“No, we can’t escape in time. Hurry, put up the essence shields. Use the most powerful artifacts to withstand it!”

“AHHH——”

The last scene Li Yao saw in his eyes was an expanding ball of milky white bright light that was like a roaring sea. The entire palace, the hundreds of floating mountains outside, and even the entire sea below were all engulfed entirely.

And in the instant Li Yao witnessed the milky white ball of light expand to its limit, he completely and thoroughly awakened. In the Cultivation Era Year 40,000, in Heaven’s Origin Sector, in the Star Glory Federation, in Floating Spear City’s suburbs, in Morning Sun Village’s residential area, In his house, Li Yao suddenly sat up in his bed.





Home  Forty Millenniums of Cultivation  Chapter 12
 

Chapter 12
 
Chapter 12: Ecstatic Enough to Fly
Translator: Strivon, Ash  Editor: Geoffrey_, Lancent

“PAIN, PAIN, PAIN, PAIN, PAIN, PAIN, PAIN, PAIN!”

Li Yao’s head felt like it had a splitting migraine. Hundreds of years of time birthed from the vivid, realistic dream and transformed into countless sand grains of information that flowed into his mind. It was like a mountain flood had erupted within the depths of his brain, shaking, barging, and colliding around. At last, they directly collided into the pineal gland near the medial part of his brain!

The flesh between his eyebrows twitched and twitched. It was like the shoots of a stump that had experienced rain. Something was on the verge of piercing through the skull, breaking through the body to rise up!

Suddenly, Li Yao was overcome by a bizarre feeling that was indescribable by words.

It was as if his exterior was bound heavily like an encased person, and every time he experienced this pain, a hole was ripped in his exterior shell. His five senses improved substantially, allowing him to perceive an absolutely marvelous true world.

In a flash, he enumerated 327 cracks in the ceiling. He saw clearly the several hundred small print characters engraved on a tea cup located over 3 meters away. Moreover, he recognized that this was a battlefield poem written by a poet of the Federal Army 133 years ago. At the same time, this Army Poet’s life history and experiences within seven military campaigns emerged within Li Yao’s mind. Even the outcomes of the seven military campaigns were extremely clear.

Incidentally, he also heard the sounds of flesh hitting flesh from within the adjacent room twenty meters away down stairs.

“What the hell is this! This is practically… an overturning invigoration!”

Li Yao blinked his eyes, and every time he blinked, he felt the world become clearer by a degree. Countless gorgeous colors that he was unable to speak the names of struck against his optical cells. The collisions caused his head to become giddy and his eyes to become dim. His heart blossomed with joy.

Both his hands rubbed forcefully at the flesh between his eyebrows. Li Yao attempted to clear up his thoughts, but the information within his mind flowed like a destructive tsunami. Like an overflowing great river, it could not be controlled.

“58,942 multiplied by 88,743 equals 5,230,689,906! Last year’s issued winning ticket number for the Federation’s Cultivator Lottery was awarded to number 73 89 52 74 55 16 with a prize of 13,547,328 credits. After deducting 14.32% in special taxes, one would receive 11,607,350.64 credits! The area of Star Glory Federation’s territory is 37,140,000 square kilometers. The total population is 10.455 billion. The size of the military is 16.7478 million. The military possesses 13 gigantic ‘Elder Heaven’s Provenance’ class strategic crystal battleships; 52 ‘Open Heaven’s Founder’ class heavy armament crystal cruizers…”

boxn ovel. c0m
“Three years ago on May 30th, I crossed the intersection between Luofu Main Street and Qishan Street. That day, the temperature varied between 13 and 21 degrees, and there was a category 2 wind blowing from the north west. From my southwest direction situated 11 meters away was a woman wearing a light green skirt. Her age was between 26 and 29 years old. The wind gust lifted up the skirt, it was pink with a light violet pattern!”

The warfare of attrition occurring right now downstairs should be Elder Zhou’s Family. 72 strikes were made within a minute. This rate is higher than Elder Brother Zhou’s typical display by 35.8%, and the female’s yelling shouts were also sharper than normal by at least 23.4%. If Elder Brother Zhou hadn’t eaten some sort of secret medicine, then I fear that he is being cuckolded!”

“Is this a mistake? How am I suddenly able to think of so many things and process this many numerous and disorderly thoughts? It’s exactly like… being the same as a cultivator!”

Li Yao was frightened by his own thought and jumped! He thought back to just a moment ago when he had escaped from the dream of grandeur and felt somewhat of a chill in the back of his head.

He squinted his eyes and gripped firmly on his thigh. He used pain to focus his thoughts and came to a state of quiet concentration. He reflected on the causes and effects.

A short time later, over a hundred strips of pertinent information jumped out from within the area of his brain that was the storehouse of information. It was like a glistening shining pearl that was made up from tying information into a chain of clues.

“Crystal Processor. Activate!”

Li Yao let out a soft breath of noise. A crystal processor emerged at the end of the bed and emitted a soft beam of light. After a series of musical “ding ding” start up rings, the beam diffused and became a giant hologram.

Li Yao accessed the world wide web. He opened a website called “Wanxiang Searcher”, entered into the search field the three words “Hundred Smelting Guild”, and lightly pressed down on the “Launch” glyph script.

The webpage flowed with brilliant lights and vibrant colors; all seven colors of glyph script danced chaotically and formed into several short paragraphs of glyph writing.

“The Hundred Smelting Guild was a guild from 47,000 years ago as of this time, situated in the middle of the Classical Cultivation Period. It was a guild that was once flourishing, located in the ‘Center Provence Domain’s Grand Foreworld’. Their specialty was crafting, casting swords, and forging famous artifacts. Of special note is their 36th Guild Leader, Ou Yezi, who was known as the ‘Model Artisan’. He was a well-known and moving Master Artificer. He is mentioned in several ancient writings and records.”

“Approximately 46,000 years ago, the Hundred Smelting Guild’s headquarters was destroyed by a large explosion of unknown origin. Within a timeframe of a short dozen years, they vanished like smoke into thin air, completely perishing.”

“According to written records by cultivators of that era that were unearthed so far, there are claims that Ou Yezi crafted a certain transmission array that can shuttle through time. When he conducted the first experiment, he inadvertently triggered a large essence energy wave explosion and ended up being vaporized. His consciousness was scattered and destroyed.”

“Nevertheless, not a single remnant of the Hundred Smelting Guild has been discovered at the present time. All information pertaining to the Hundred Smelting Guild have their origins in ancient writings, classified as indirect evidence. The true cause for the sudden death of Ou Yezi and the decline of the Hundred Smelting Guild is still unknown.”

“Addendum: The Hundred Smelting Guild appears within the newest game developed by our Wanxiang Group, <<World of Ancient Cultivation: Heroic Sword Piercer>>. Players can play as a character disciple in the Hundred Smelting Guild, interact directly with ‘Model Artisan’ Ou Yezi, and explore the most profound secrets of crafting! If you join now, you will receive a novice gift box. The first 10,000 players to telepathically download this game will also receive an additional 5 cool and amazing battle armour equipments. What are you waiting for!? Download telepathically now! Join the game!”

Li Yao ignored the last paragraph of information in a straightforward manner and flipped between the previous few paragraphs a few times. He looked and looked.

Gradually, his eyes began to shine. His mind flew and spun as he read telepathically. Countless thoughts like shuttling threads interweaved into an intricate and complicated delicate design.

“So it turned out to be this way. The Hundred Smelting Guild really existed as an ancient sect. Ou Yezi too was a Master Artificer with outstanding talent that warped the heavens. 46,000 years ago, he invented some time machine that could travel through time. Moreover, he experimented with it on himself. He did not expect it would trigger a world shaking gigantic explosion and cause the destruction of the Hundred Smelting Guild.”

“Although the Hundred Smelting Guild was destroyed, Ou Yezi’s experiment was actually a success. He really crossed over the obstructing wall of time and arrived 46,000 years later in the year 40,000 of the Cultivation Era!”

“This era possesses innumerable mystical artifacts unthinkable by the ancient cultivators. Ou Yezi, being a madman crafter, was obviously thrilled in his heart when met with them, especially towards the modern large-scale artifact system that is the high speed crystal rail train. How could he research and figure out its inner nature with a just a moment with it?”

“The result is that he was… hit and killed by the train!”

“I reckon that in the matters of time traveling, cultivators would receive great harm to their bodies. Ou Yezi must have received serious damage and his cultivation base took a large hit. Otherwise, based on the tyrannical strength he displayed in the dreamworld, I can’t say for sure if the crystal train would have been even capable of knocking him off the bridge.”

“Regardless of any words, Ou Yezi’s corpse was ripped to shreds by the crystal rail train. However, his incomparably tremendous mental consciousness would vanish to thin air that easily. He just happened my crossing below the bridg,e and his mind entered my body with a futile attempt to force me out!”

“Yes, it was right when I felt a bone chilling wind wreak havoc within my body. It has to be this old despicable fellow with malicious intentions. The dream took many unusual forms, it was all him trying to deceive me by dressing things up to look good. If I had not promptly seen through his illusion, the one who would be lying on this bed would without a doubt be the ‘Ou Yezi’ who would feel that he got a good deal!”

“But, I am just a lowly commoner in terms of cultivation How did I resist Ou Yezi’s powerful mind and thwart his possession attempt?”

Li Yao’s thoughts coursed with electricity and turned. He muttered to himself for a short time and thought back to within the dream of grandeur when he was about to join with the supreme guild leader’s daughter in the bridal room. At that time, an inharmonious ripple had emerged.

His mind suddenly flashed with divine light. He had found what was the cause.

“Ha ha, Ou Yezi this fellow is truly unlucky!”

“When considering his peerless tyrannical cultivator mental strength, if he’d tried to possess any person within the federation who could be considered low stage cultivators, I fear that he would not have encountered even the least bit of inconvenience.”

“But I am different. A memory not of this world is originally hidden beneath the surface within the deepest depths of my mind. To explain in a certain sense, this body of mine has already been seized once by Li Yao of planet Earth. It’s the equivalent of having already been injected with a vaccine. There is a natural immunity towards possession.”

“Even the most ruthless virus is powerless against a person who has had a vaccine. Ou Yezi just had bad luck. Not only was he unsuccessful in possessing me, he has instead left behind great benefits!”

No matter how slow Li Yao’s reactions were, he was aware of all the fearful serious changes that had occurred to his body. His thought process speed was quicker than his previous by at least tenfold.

The other changes will not be mentioned. Let’s just say that the fundamental information he clawed out was able to be processed within 3 minutes to figure out the causes and effects to a pretty accurate degree. If it were the him from the past, it’s very likely that he would not understand things even after three days and three nights.

“The teacher of the Profound Cultivation Arts once said that the highest realm of the Profound Cultivation Arts is to enter a kind of incomparably slow flowing river of time. While 1 minute passes in the real world, a year would occur in the mental world, a fantastic situation. If one were to cultivate in this situation, great benefits would be provided to raise their Spiritual Actualization Quotient!”

“While I was in the dream of grandeur, it seemed that several hundred years of time had past. Could it be that I really entered into this kind of mysterious realm. I was also sharpened by Ou Yezi’s formidable mental mind. Did my Actualization Quotient rise greatly while I was unconscious?”

Li Yao heard the teacher say before that raising the Actualization Quotient would increase one’s ability to recall large amounts of memories in a flash, raise analyzation and computational abilities, and thought process ability and perception.

Another direct sign of further proof was the pineal body between his eyebrows. There he felt a growth that was on the verge of bursting out.

These signs matched with what had happened to his body!

“Development! Development! I don’t know how much my Actualization Quotient was raised. Could it be that I now possess the power to beat that heaven’s arrogant person of the Important Class by the nostrils and turn his head into a pig’s head?”





Home  Forty Millenniums of Cultivation  Chapter 13
 

Chapter 13
 
Chapter 13: Reincarnation of a Glutton
Translator: Strivon, Ash  Editor: Geoffrey_, Lancent

Li Yao was like a nouveau riche with the sudden acquisition of wealth. His excitement was palpable and his mind was filled with scenes of various annoying natures. He tossed aside his blanket and jumped off his bed. Surprisingly, his two legs buckled, and with a popping sound of despair, he fell and sprawled out on his back. In his body, only an empty and vacated feeling remained, and he was unable to bring forth even half his strength. It was as if a thief had cleared out a house and even taken the door with him!


The black sword heard the noise. It flew in from the outer room while urgently shouting in squeaks. With a swoosh, it flew back out again, brought back with it a handheld mirror, and shined the mirror onto Li Yao’s body.

“How can this be!” Li Yao was gobsmacked.

It was as if he had been stranded in a giant desert for several months, struggling on the verge of death. All that was left of him were mere skin and bones. A deep set of hollow eyes took up half his face. There simply wasn’t any flesh left on him from head to toe. Light purple veins drooped around his skeleton weakly without strength. He was the same as an earthworm that had been baked dry by the sun. His skin had completely turned into an ash-like color, largely like that of a vampire.

This fright was not important… The sharpness of his five sense. His outstanding faculty of memory. The crystal brain calculated and analyzed his abilities. In a flash, his previous scare disappeared like smoke in the air. Li Yao was nearly struck back with shock to his normal self. His abilities had only improved by a tiny bit when compared to his previous self.

It was at this time that he felt as if his stomach was stuffed with a ball of fire. A spreading ball of fire of never ending explosions!

Li Yao seemed to hear the cells in his entire body from head to toe all scream and howl mournfully, “Hunger! Hunger! Hunger!”

It was extreme to the point that even the myriad of telepathic thoughts in the depths of his mind were all at the limit of hunger, devouring each other!

“Hurry, Small Black, hurry and give me food!”

Li Yao never thought he would be this extremely hungry. He felt the same pain as the flaring of a drug addiction. He rolled about on the floor and suddenly got up when he heard Blackwing give a great shout.

Blackwing squeaked out two shouts. It was not happy with its owner’s behavior. Nevertheless, it still flew to the outer room and quickly brought back two 5 lb cans of “Giant Creatures of Starry Skies” canned meat.

boxn ovel. c0m
Although the name “Giant Creatures of Starry Skies” sounded very domineering, high class, and luxurious, in truth, it was actually a product of modification by cultivator sects using secret drugs. They took ordinary meat from pigs and elephants and hybridized it. Classified as a rapid growth product. Within three months time, they induced the life of a 10 ton heavy artificial livestock. The final canned product was very greasy, and its taste was of the utmost inferiority. The typical resident of the city rarely ate this product.

However, this canned meat, with its blend of bones and viscera, had a cheap sales price. 15 credits can buy an entire 5 lb large can of the meat and was considered a rare delicacy among the poor class. It was also Li Yao’s primary source of protein. He held 35 cans in stock in his house at any given time.

When Li Yao came in contact with the can of Giant Creatures of Starry Skies, he was like a 3-day starved feral wolf meeting a lamb that was skinned, cleaned, and spiced. His eyes let out a red glow and “wheezing wheezing” sounds came out of his throat . It was unknown where he drew the strength, but his entire person lept up and seized the can of meat into his embrace. He opened his mouth wide into the gaping bloody hole of a predator and gnawed down, ignoring the circumstances.

“Gnash Gnash! Gnash Gnash!” The sound of teeth colliding was like two meat grinders striking against each other. Sparks flew out from between the sawlike teeth.

A can of Giant Creatures of Starry Skies meat was extremely salty, extremely fishy, and extremely oily. Normally, Li Yao only needed a thin, small flake to pair with three big bowls of rice. This time though, it was like he was eating the world’s most precious rare and delicious delicacy. He devoured the food ravenously as if possessed by a Taotie, finishing the entire 5 lb can of the canned meat in a minute.

There was a numbness between his lips and teeth, and his stomach had actually swelled to an incomparable state. The Giant Creatures of Starry Skies meat is compressed into great density. When the meat is introduced to liquid, it can increase in size by at most a dozen fold.

A thought shook in the depths of Li Yao’s mind and jumped out as a scene. It was from the dream of grandeur. The instructor of the Hundred Smelting Guild’s low level workers, the Titan, was speaking,

“Breathe in the stars and swallow the moon. This Fasting Cultivation Technique allows you to devour the essence energy of heaven and earth directly. Only high stage cultivators can use this profound art. You pieces of sh*ts aren’t even capable of attempting it!

“For you pieces of sh*ts, your only source of essence energy is from food. The basis for all cultivators is to ‘eat’. Learn how to ‘feast’. It is the first step to becoming a cultivator!”

“Next, I will impart onto you all the Great Art of the Swallowing Whale. This technique has the specialized purpose of teaching you all how to feast. It is capable of helping you all gorge down the sea and absorb the energy contained within the food!”

“When this art is cultivated to the pinnacle, the digestive strength and speed of the digestive system is raised by a hundredfold, allowing one to swallow 800 lbs of animal meat per day. Even the toughest and hardest skulls of magical beasts are grounded to dust, completely absorbed, and transformed into the most fundamental of energies — essence. The essence instantly replenishes within the skeletal bones of the entire body, allowing one’s blood vessels to expand energetically, giving one extraordinary strength.

“Keep in mind, the Hundred-and-Eight Hands Chaos Gale Hammer cultivator art is not perfect. There is still a small margin for improvement. However, if you don’t practice the Great Art of the Swallowing Whale well, you will forever be a mortal. Don’t even think about stepping on the road of cultivation!”

“Ou Yeming, come up here for this senior. Take this repulsive 200 pound fish and eat all of it down. This senior will first teach you members of the Hundred Smelting Guild’s Main Mountain this secret technique, the Great Art of the Swallowing Whale!”

……

Li Yao’s eyelids suddenly opened to a pair of round and protruding eyes. A “Rumble Rumble” sound pierced out from within his stomach. It was as if a powerful engine had suddenly been ignited!

In a split second, it was like several monsters fleeing within his stomach. The skin of his belly was stretched to near transparency!

The speed of his stomach intestines digestive movement exceeded that of a normal person by a dozen fold. It digested the Giant Creatures of Starry Skies meat at lightning speeds, breaking the meat down, transforming it into the most rudimentary form of energy, and supplied steady energy to the dried skeletal bones of Li Yao’s body and also to Li Yao’s eight meridians!

The speed of the Giant Creatures of Starry Skies meat’s expansion when introduced with water was not able to exceed the speed of digestion and absorption. The protruding belly quickly flattened down to its normal state and even started to cave inward.

“This won’t do. I’m still hungry. Hurry, bring me another can!”

The food just slid down Li Yao’s throat. With two or three bites, he devoured his second can of Giant Creatures of Starry Skies meat completely clean. Still, he was not satisfied. He slapped the floor board to let Blackwing know to continue fetching meat.

Three cans. Five cans. Twenty cans …

In a short hour, he had unrelentingly eaten a total of 31 entire cans of the Giant Creatures of Starry Skies canned meat. He had drank down a full bucket of water, eating dry and wiping clean his house’s entire stock of food. Only then did he let out a burp, wishing he had more to eat.

“Squeak squeak, Squeak squeak?”

Blackwing looked at his owner somewhat worryingly. It had never seen a person eat the Giant Creatures of Starry Skies canned meat in such a crazed fashion. It did not know what kind of illness it’s owner caught and could not help asking with concern.

Li Yao smacked his lips and used his tongue to pick out a sliver of shredded meat from his teeth. He reflected quietly, “It seems like I’m not full yet. I can eat three or five more cans.”

“…” Blackwing was speechless for a moment. It would have surely rolled its eyes at this moment if it had eyes.

“Finally, I am alive again!” Li Yao was completely satisfied and let out a relaxed breath. He held his fist tight and carefully sized up his arm, trying to understand the bubbling force coming from within the depths of his marrow.

Following the crazed digestion and absorption of the cans of Giant Creatures of Starry Skies meat through the use of the Great Art of the Swallowing Whale, his body had experienced a change like the turning of heaven and earth.

The beast meat had transformed into the purest of essence energy, and an abundance of essence energy permeated through his body. The once dried veins filled once more, and the withered muscles swelled once again. His skeletal system became like reinforced steel, and his body had turned exceptionally durable.

Looking in the mirror, his face still had a somewhat ashy tone to it. His body was a bit thin compared to before; however, concealed below his pale dark skin were dense muscles that bulged out with only a slight flex. His muscles were like coils of thick steel rope.

Li Yao held his fist tight. He hammered his pecs twice with strength that wasn’t too light nor too strong, making a muffled sound. It was as if seven to eight layers of dried leather were padded around his sternum; he absolutely did not feel any sort of pain.

“Whoosh! Whoosh!” He swung his arm, consciously swinging out seven to eight punches. Three to five oppressive images appeared suddenly in the empty air, and the sound of the fists piercing the air of the void rang out.

“My punching power has increased by at least 15%. My punching speed has increased by at least 20%. The Great Art of the Swallowing Whale can be summarized in one sentence — It’s really f*cking tyrannical!”

The recollection of the fragment of memory from the dream of grandeur gave him a technique that could surprisingly be used in the real world. Li Yao could not help but be wild with joy. He was similar to a wandering hobo who had picked up a windfall that fell from the sky.

However, when he was revisiting the enormous storehouse of memories within the dream of Ou Yezi, he discovered that although he could remember with absolute clarity the first second, the next second was mired with haze. Spots were mottled. It was absolutely useless.

“If only I could recall the dream world in all its details… Even if I am only able to sneak learning from Ou Yezi’s life experiences from his youth to his death, becoming the first Master Artificer of the Federation would be as easy as turning over my hand! When that time comes, I’ll have mountains of gold and seas of silver, I’ll have luxurious vehicles and beautiful women, I’ll be revered by everybody, I’ll be the most popular idol of millions and millions of youths…”

Li Yao chuckled with a foxy smile as he let his mind imagine freely.

Blackwing made a cold snort of complete utter disdain. It twisted its hilt and flew away.

Right at this time, the crystal processor suddenly let out a “Dee Dee” sound. A virtual origami crane flew out from the right hand corner of the hologram. It flew and orbited around Li Yao’s head for three rotations. With a “Bang” sound, it exploded, transforming into an ice cold message strip,

“You didn’t come to school today?”

A small plump yellow avatar followed at the end. The small avatar’s eyebrows were angled vertically; its entire face was filled with questioning. It was Si Jiaxue.





Home  Forty Millenniums of Cultivation  Chapter 14
 

Chapter 14
 
Chapter 14: Little Border of Hidden Lake
Translator: Strivon, Ash  Editor: Geoffrey_, Lancent

Li Yao had to stare blankly for quite a while for him to recall that “yesterday” he had made a promise with Si Jiaxue. Only when he looked at the time did he realize that it was already 5 pm in the afternoon. He had surprisingly slept for an entire day and night.


No matter what fantastic magical abilities he could conjure in the dream world, in the real world, he was still the ordinary poor youth with an embarrassing lack of money. Just a moment ago, he had eaten his entire stock of a few months worth of food provisions with a single breath. A hundred thousand credits was simply a huge sum of money for him. He had the urge to hold it physically tight within his grasp.

Li Yao hastily typed a response on the virtual glyph-script keyboard, “Where are you? In two hours — no, in one and a half hour, I will deliver it to you!”

When he hit “Send”, the glyph script condensed and transformed into a tiny virtual magic origami crane. It flew to the lower right hand corner of the hologram and faded away.

Only after exactly 3 minutes did Si Jiaxue send out an address, “I’m at this location. There will be a person waiting outside the door for you in half an hour. It will be fine to just directly hand over the goods to this person.”

It appeared as if she really did not have a good impression towards Li Yao. She did not even want to meet face to face with him.

Li Yao did not care though; everything was fine as long as he received his money. He replied with an “OK” and closed the hologram. He took out Si Xiaxue’s outdated crystal processor and with a “crack crack” of his knuckles he began to repair it.

“Huh?”

He immediately discovered something different about himself when he was opening the crystal processor with a screwdriver.

Today, his mental state was especially good and his mind was especially clear. With just a careful scan with his two eyes, he seemed to be able to clearly understand the underlying architecture of the complicated and profound interior of the crystal processor in front of him.

He softly closed his eyes. A phantom transparent image of the outdated crystal process slowly emerged into view. One by one, every piece of fine component broke away and whirled slowly in mid air, allowing him to see each component from every angle and giving him an extremely clear understanding of the details in its entirety.

boxn ovel. c0m
Li Yao had a certain feeling that even if this job wasn’t the kind of easy task that swapping a heat-sink was, but rather the challenging assignment of repairing the crystal core and the like, he would still be capable of tinkering and repairing the processor.

“It looks likes it wasn’t a total waste to watch Ou Yezi craft artifacts for several hundreds of years. Although I have completely forgotten about all the dream’s details, my visual judgement has improved by leaps and bounds!”

And as such, his repairing speed had increased phenomenally. He only needed 30 minutes of his original estimation of at least an hour of work in order to complete the repair successfully. In addition, he also subtly modified the heat sink structure. He used a new type of heat sink structure that only existed 30 years ago and applied it within this hundred year old crystal processor. He estimated that the heat dissipation efficiency of this crystal processor would increase by 17%, increasing the clock speed needed to trigger the thermal trip by at least 9%.

“It’s practically perfect. To have this job done is worth paying 100,000 credits. It’s not the least bit expensive!”

Li Yao scrutinized his own work and was extremely satisfied. He felt that this was the most remarkable piece of work he had ever displayed since birth.

While engrossed in his satisfaction, an acrid stench permeated into his nasal cavity. Li Yao was suddenly aware of the sticky sweat he had produced while he was dreaming; it stained his body. He lifted his wrist to look at the time, it still wasn’t too late in the night. He might as well go take a shower. He scrubbed his body up and down ferociously, changed to a clean set of clothes, and walked out relaxed and invigorated.

The address given by Si Jiaxue pointed to a buffet-style restaurant located in the upper eastern district. The upper eastern district was a rich district where the bigwigs gathered. Li Yao rarely went here in the past, and during the times he did pass through this area, he would always feel a sense of shame and inferiority. He had felt like he was a beggar bursting into a banquet hosted by high society.

But today, he lifted his head high, held his chest straight, sucked in his belly, and raised his nose to the sky. With each step, he travelled three meters. He did not care what others thought of him. He was in high spirits!

Even though his wrinkled jacket had its colors already washed out, even though the top of his knees were patched cloth, even though the toes of his pair of feet met the open world with a smile, even though, with a glance of an eye, one could tell that he was a destitute youth who did not know when his next meal would be…

His expression was like that of a tyrannical guild leader who was just about to sign a billion dollar contract, carrying a chunk of gold in his pocket.

This fiery aura came from the dream world, from amassing countless imperceivable influences from countless high stage cultivators. It was a pure state of mind of the utmost superiority that had nothing to do with physical strength, rank, or status.

He was like a person who had lived dozens of years dealing with prehistoric dinosaurs. An encounter with a tiger would only be considered meeting a fat housecat to him.

The upper eastern district was located in the center of Floating Spear City and encompassed a total of 7 areas of the artificial lakes. Each of these areas were concealed, isolated from each other. The address provided by Si Jiaxue pointed to the border of one of these areas of artificial lakes, “Hidden Lake of Winter”. It was a buffet restaurant called Little Border of Hidden Lake.

This restaurant had bamboo forests orbiting around its surroundings and the restaurant also utilized the natural environment. Weather glyph arrays were set up to cause the drift of snow all year round within the radius of a hundred meters.

The snowfall wasn’t heavy but instead gave the restaurant a trace of an astral zen.

This restaurant wasn’t considered one of Floating Spear City’s highest class of luxury restaurants. The price was relatively cheap and its environment was not bad; it was very stylish. For those in power who have not seized great wealth, for the children who were supported by rich parents and were given allowances, spending money at this location matched quite well with their status.

A woman wearing a silk skirt uniform was standing outside the door of Little Border of Hidden Lake. This beautiful waitress was in costume for she carried a paper fan. She greeted Li Yao as he swaggered inside with large steps. The manner which Li Yao walked and the clothes he wore were completely contrary to one another. It was awkward to look at, causing the waitress to actually stare for quite a while. Only after did she act with her shallow procedure of etiquette, “Hello sir, may I ask if you are a student of Crimson Nimbus Second, Li Yao?”

“That’s correct. Si Jiaxue must have made you wait for me. I have the goods here. Do you need to give it a test run?” Li Yao did not waste words as he grabbed and handed the crystal processor over.

The costumed waitress smiled and said, “There’s no need. Young lady Si said that she will naturally go and find her fellow student Li Yao should any problems really occur. Please, accept this card.”

With a slight bow, the costumed waitress held a translucent glass card covered in glyph scrypt in both hands and handed it over with the utmost respect.

This was an anonymous instant cash card. The glyph script inscribed on the card can be read by a crystal processer and the money contents inside can be transferred to a bank account. The card can also be used at most stores by swiping. It was very convenient.

When Li Yao received the instant cash card, he gently brushed against the light purple glyph characters that were twined in silver on the upper left corner of the card. The instant cash card trembled slightly, and on the card’s surface emerged a string of digits — 100,000.

Si Jiaxue unexpectedly pooled in the whole price in one card. Li Yao’s eyes were bright. With a somewhat unintended boasting whistle, he said, “Fair lady, many thanks! Oh thats right, when it’s convenient, help me convey my thanks to Si Jiaxue. And if she wants to do any sort of further business, remind her often that I will totally give her a large discounted price!”

Li Yao took the instant cash card and stuffed it very gently and cautiously into his skin-tight pocket. He turned around and left with smiles and giggles. He was calculating what he would buy at the supermarket located in the commoner district. He would buy several hundred more pounds of the Giant Creatures of Starry Skies canned meat to bring home, and buy an entire flat bread beef sandwich. He was excited to eat this midnight snack.

It was right at this moment that a “Tsss” sound traveled through the air from within Little Border of Hidden Lake. It was the sound of a small fresh and tender beef steak searing against an iron grill.

The faint smell of meat mixed with the aroma of a dozen or so rare spices into a unique fragrance that rose as an intoxicating breeze and floated outside.

Li Yao’s stomach rumbled. He suddenly stopped still. It was if an invisible rope was tugging at him.

“Damn it. How am I hungry again so soon!?”

He contested in intellect and in bravery while he was joined with Ou Yezi within the dreamland. The energy he consumed, from his mental will to his physical stamina, was too great. He had simply overtaxed his life force. Consuming several dozens cans of Giant Creatures of Starry Skies meat was simply not enough to restore him. He was fine before, but when he smelled the fragrance of meat, he was simply sent back to the same drug addicted state he had experienced a few moments ago. His stomach turned into an empty pit. Every part of his body down to his bones ignited with the raging flame of hunger. His face twisted to the extreme and drool dripped down away from the edge of his mouth.

Li Yao automatically reversed his steps and charged inside with a blank stare.

His fiery aura like that of a hungry tiger frightened the costumed waitress. The young lady blocked the entrance subconsciously.

“Hmm?”

Li Yao squinted his eyes. His molars were rubbing against each other, creating a “ka ka” ringing sound. He was like a velociraptor that could only eat grass for the last three days.

The young lady was about to burst into tears. Her heart cried, “Where did this savage man come from? Based on his appearance, is he going to swallow me too?”

She could not help but fall back two paces. She composed herself and with great difficulty put on a smile as she said, “This, this guest. Sir has come at the right time. We of Little Border of Hidden Lake are celebrating today. We have 15% off all items and are waiving the service fee. The self-served dinner is only 1280 credits per guest. It also comes with a 30 year old bottle of maiden wine. The owner personally buried them in our basement in those years past.”

This was a restaurant winery located in the rich district. The waiters and waitresses received special training in serving people. Their skills were extremely high. Naturally, they wouldn’t kick someone out based on appearances. They would not commit the folly of using his clothes to determine if he was poor sick person.

This was especially because they were located at a Cultivator Hub which housed a sizeable population of bizarre individuals with somewhat twisted mentalities. These people were dragons who liked to wear the guise of fish. They disguised themselves as pigs in order to eat tigers. It was a sin if their eyes could not recognize the greatness of these people. Not to even mention what great fortune could happen in a fraction of a second. The entire staff could end up using sick leaves at the hospital’s intensive care unit.

And thus, in the rich district, as long as a guest did not come to eat food just wearing his boxers, all guests are treated equally and favorably in this luxurious food joint.

The costumed waitress also did not know what place this rough god Li Yao came from. She had been extremely tactful with her clear speech on the restaurant’s quality and had quickly ducked to the side.

“1,280 credits?”

Li Yao’s pair of eyes went somewhat blank. This number ran through his mind and transformed in a flash to a number of Giant Creatures of Starry Skies meat that filled every nook and cranny. His number one thought was to turn around and leave.

Nevertheless, the body is more honest than the mind. The fragrance of barbeque seemed to transform into full-bodied, juicy beautiful women in front of him who licked her red lips, flicked with charming eyes, and laughed lightly with a musical tone.

It was like he swallowed a giant walnut. His adam’s apple rolled up and down continuously. The devil and angel in his heart were raging war. He was completely paralyzed.

He was in a deadlock for an exact… half a second. His heart’s defense was completely shattered. A flame burned in Li Yao’s eyes. Hunger was etched upon his face. He loosened his waist belt by a bit and was like a fierce tiger stepping off the mountain. Like a hungry dog let out of a cage, he howled as he entered.

“It’s only 1,280 credits right? I just got 100,000. One meal won’t make me poor. Today will be an exception!”

The interior design of Little Border of Hidden Lake was complete genious. The dining area was made into a long corridor. Lanterns and gardens divided into a dozen or so private areas. Tables placed full of food could be found all around in each of the areas. This guaranteed that each guest could eat in their own private environment.

And what a bounty of fine delicacies there were! How could it even be described? At this point, Li Yao felt that his knowledge of biology had been swapped with that of his combat training class. Not only could he not name most of the exotic delicacies, but he had not encountered most of them ever before!

Li Yao found a more peaceful corridor, and he unrelentingly grabbed an over 20lb strip of lamb leg roast without restraint. He ruthlessly bit down the meat, blood and all.

“Twelfth level attained. The Realm of Completion. Overdrive Mode — The! Great! Art! Of! The! Swallowing! Whale!”





Home  Forty Millenniums of Cultivation  Chapter 15
 

Chapter 15
 
Chapter 15: Audacious
Translator: Strivon, Ash  Editor: Geoffrey_, Lancent

Under the clean shining moonlight, a group of teenagers with an uncommon, outstanding bearing was located 20 meters away from Li Yao, separated by a lotus pond. They were Crimson Nimbus Second’s Adonis and Goddess, Helian Lie and Si Jiaxue.


Helian Lie’s expression was cordial as he half rose from his seat, “ Small Xue, my apologies. I was too rash yesterday. I should not have sought out that trash from the common class. I did not expect this matter to travel down the grapevine. You were even questioned by your father. It was completely my fault, please accept my apologies.”

Si Jixue’s manners were, as before, cold as ice and frost. She was like an iceberg that had been frozen for the last 10,000 years. She replied in a tone as cold as frost, “I can accept your apologies; however, I wish for you to put an end to this matter. Remember, I have the freedom to deal with whomever I wish. That bastard is really just a greedy scoundrel that could never be satisfied. It’s none of your business to come criticizing!”

“I understand, I understand. Come, let’s go inside and drink a cup with Junior Zheng. Today is his birthday. Let’s not get angry because of a piece of trash,” said Helian Lie patiently enduring her temper.

“I feel a bit tired, I will go back first. Say a word to Junior Zheng for me,” Si Jiaxue had received the crystal processor. She did not give a single bit of face as she turned around to leave.

Helian Lie had a gloomy look in his eyes. He stared fixed at the figure of the beautiful woman until it disappeared. Then he returned to the back of the corridor. There was a cracking sound. The limestone flooring beneath his feat had surprisingly split into a spreading web of cracks.

“Tsk tsk tsk tsk, Your leg strength is quite strong Senior Helian,” an exaggerated sarcastic voice sounded from behind. It looked to be a drunken youngster wearing purple clothing with somewhat swollen eyes.

“Junior Zheng,” Helian Lie retracted his gaze. His expression resumed to being tranquil.

“It’s just a girl. What does it matter that Si Jiaxue’s family has some influence in Floating Spear City if it makes you humble and submissive?” said Junior Zheng laughingly. His right hand was hanging on Helian Lie shoulder without restraint.

Those in the Crimson Nimbus Second who would dared to say that Helian Lie was a humble and submissive person have already been beaten into a condition that not even their parents would recognize.

However, this rich junior, Zheng Dongming, was the third generation eldest grandson of the impressive Zheng Household in Floating Spear City. The family had the backing and support of numerous profound and fearsome cultivators. He was also an elite student, but of the Phoenix Ridge Guild’s Auxiliary High School. His Spirit Actualization Quotient was at 74%. He was a powerful competitor within the college entrance exams known as “Floating Spear City’s Exam Top Scorer”. His strength was faintly above Helian Lie’s.

boxn ovel. c0m
And as such, Helian Lie could only restrain his ferocity and anger. He said with great difficulty, “You don’t understand my feelings towards Small Xue.”

Zheng Dongming shrugged his shoulders and said with a high pitched voice, “Of cooouurse, how could we common folk possibly understand the subtle moods of the great sacred emotions you possess, Helian? Since I don’t understand, we might as well go drink wine. Today’s my birthday, you aren’t going to keep wearing a sour face are you?”

Helian Lie made a snorting sound. A bit of life returned to his complexion. The two intended to enter the room when several groups of rich youngsters suddenly walked out with weird expressions. Each of them was holding in their laughter until their faces turned purple and their breaths gasped for air.

“What can possibly be so funny? Tell us about it so that we can share in your moment of happiness,” Zheng Dongming asked with a smile.

“Junior Zheng, there’s a bumpkin over there. Who knows what kind of place this guy spawned from. He’s like the incarnation of a Preta who hasn’t eaten for three years. His eating manners are unsightly,” the rich youngster clasped his stomach. He was almost cramping from his laughter.

At places like Little Border Hidden Lake, the customers were mostly made up of people from high society. They focused on the style and the atmosphere; this was a place to socialize. Eating food was not the priority. People took care not to overdo things in order to preserve the grace worthy of elegant nobles.

If one’s first concern was to stuff oneself by swallowing and chewing great amounts of food, there were better places to go to.

Zheng Dongming said lazily, “Although, at present, the quality of Little Border of Hidden Lake is unacceptable, it couldn’t possibly be that someone has specifically come here to eat? It looks like next time we will have to find a more quiet place to go out to eat. Nevertheless, it’s only bad table manners. It can’t be that funny to make you laugh until this state?”

“Nope, Junior Zheng. That guy really is too ridiculous!”

A different rich youngster suppressed a smile as he gestured reaching out with his hand. “It was this long, the leg of barbeque meat was this long! Snap Crack! He ate it down in three bites, crushing even the bones to powder! He swallowed everything, not a single speck was left behind!”

The first rich youth supplemented him, “There’s more, there’s more. An entire large bowl of deep sea king crab, shell and all! Shell and all! Was wiped clean in two or three bites by the bumpkin! You haven’t seen the plates after he eats, tsk tsk tsk tsk. They were cleaner than if they were scrubbed and brushed!”

The other rich youth proceeded to follow, “Yep I saw him, eyes blinking not even once, swallow 20 sea urchins in under half a minute, shell and all!.

“In summary, it really is ridiculous! Junior Zheng, do you want to see for a moment?” the two youths spoke in unison.

“Forget it, my interests lie in watching women strip, not to watch dudes eat. Helian, are you into this sort of thing?” Zheng Dongming let out a slight yawn.

“Not interested,” Helian Lie said indifferently.

The first rich youth suddenly said, “Thats right! Senior Helian, I think that bumpkin is wearing your Crimson Nimbus Second’s school uniform.”

“Yea?” Helian Lie glared and his complexion immediately turned somewhat ugly.

Zheng Dongming also became interested. His irises shined. “Helian, although your Crimson Nimbus Second cannot be compared to our Phoenix Ridge Second, your high school is still considered to be among the high side of the rankings in Floating Spear City. Surprisingly, you guys have this kind of person? We must check this situation out!”

“All of Crimson Nimbus Second are the cream of the crop. How can there be this kind of glutton!” Helian Lie said harshly. He glared at the two rich youths for a glance and with large steps he walked in the direction they came from.

Zheng Dongming promptly gave the two rich youths a wink, he mouthed out silently, “If it turns out that you were mistaken, Helian will go on a rampage for sure. You best pray for some luck then!”

After he finished talking, he followed behind Helian chuckling.

They had not even walked down the corridor when they heard the sounds of snapping and cracking. The sound of chewing was like the sound of swords striking.

“This… this really is ferocious enough,” Zheng Dongming mumbled when he saw Li Yao occupying the dining table, chewing loudly. Zheng Dongming stared blankly for a while.

He shot a glance to the person at his side. Zheng Dongming felt Helian Lie was about to explode. He resisted a smile and prodded the person by his side in the waist.

“Senior Helian, may I ask if this… warrior is a great talented student of your school?”

The other two rich youths, who were hiding behind Zheng Dongmings back, could not help letting out “Hee Hees” in laughter.

Helian Lie seemed to have turned into a statue. He was dark and cold, silent for three seconds.

His eyes narrowed into a pair of sharp curved blades. Suddenly, his figure flashed and with a step he crossed over to be in front of Li Yao. His voice was thick when he asked, “What are you doing here?”

Floating Spear City is a large city. Their population numbered several million. Helian Lie did not believe that there could be this kind of coincidence. This trash of the common class had come at the right time to Little Border of Hidden Lake to cause shame.

He must have stalked Si Jiaxue. That’s how he got here!

Li Yao had eaten until he was in high spirits. Suddenly, there was someone roaring next to his ear. Turning his head to look, he stared slightly and could not help but frown. As he chewed, he sneered as he said, “I am here to wash myself. Don’t tell me you can’t see that?”

While Li Yao was in the dream of grandeur, he’d encountered many cultivators with tyrannical strength. The sort of small side character that was Helian Lie simply could not become even cannon fodder. Li Yao’s irises automatically displayed a wisp of disdain.

Helian Lie of Crimson Nimbus Second always kept to his word. Even the students of the important class did not dare to disobey him. It was unthinkable that this trash of the common class had not only ignored his warning but also deliberately mocked him with an expression of disdain. Suddenly, his rage was boiling! “You piece of trash! You’re simply tempting death!” Helian Lie suddenly made one large step across. With his hand like a pitchfork, he spread open his fingers and ferociously slapped Li Yao across his face!





Home  Forty Millenniums of Cultivation  Chapter 16
 

Chapter 16
 
Chapter 16: One Strip of Sea Cucumber
Translator: Strivon, Ash  Editor: Geoffrey_, Lancent

“Whoosh—–”


Helian Lie gave off an air that was both astonishing and imposing. His hand was as fast as lightning, like a high-speed crystal rail train. He hadn’t even made contact, but the eye-blinding gale he produced had already hammered fiercely upon Li Yao’s face.

Li Yao’s eyeballs were like pin cushions. A chill rose up his spine and collided into his heart. Suddenly, it seemed like a “Gate” had opened from within the recesses of his mind. Five incomparably sharp senses had just awakened from the dream of grandeur a moment ago to descend once again.

Within a tenth of a second, he saw with absolute clarity the dumbstruck faces of three rich youths standing not so far away. He saw clearly each stem, branch, leaf, and flower of every plant. He smelled the fragrance of a dozen dishes coming from within the kitchen fires. He even clearly saw a mosquito wobble in flight at a distance of seven to eight meters away.

At the same time, he also saw a sea cucumber lying on the floor in between himself and Helian Lie. He had dropped that sea cucumber on the floor just a moment ago.

From the depths of his mind, a mass of numeral digits exploded, exploded, and exploded. They combined together into a series of wondrous formulas, condensing into countless torque rotational forces, levers and fulcrums, force vectors, motion trajectories, and more as a flow of information.

After this tenth of a second had passed, Li Yao blinked and blinked his eyes. His body reacted first before his thoughts had yet to produce a response. He subconsciously shifted a small step to the left.

Helian Lie immediately reacted at the moment of Li Yao’s shifting. His figure slightly shimmered, moving his attack trajectory by 0.1 meters. Thus, when he slammed down fiercely with his right foot, he stepped perfectly on the slippery sea cucumber and lost balance in his body!

Helian Lie would not have been this careless if he were facing a different opponent, but Li Yao was no more than an insignificant piece of trash in his eyes. Afflicted by rage, Helian Lie was simply not prepared and his leg slipped out from under him.

Li Yao turned slightly sideways. Helian Lie slid across from a hairs distance by Li Yao’s side. Li Yao even saw clearly Helian Lie’s shocked and heartbroken expression. Helian Lie’s bulging eyes seemed to be bursting out of their sockets. After sliding three meters, Helian Lie crashed into a table filled with food, flipping it over. With a “Crash!”, three or four large plates of food flipped over and smashed onto his skull.

The thick juice of the sea cucumber had the rich smell of scallop. The sublimely delicious pearl fish balls… not a single bit was wasted. All of it appeared on the Helian Lie’s hair, face, shoulder, and his expensive hand tailored lavish clothing. It looked like Helian Lie had just taken a bath in a bucket of slosh.

boxn ovel. c0m
He was silent. It was a terrifying silence, like the silence of a cemetery!

Helian Lie was stupefied. Every nerve in his face was frozen. His bizarre expression had been twisted into being somewhat confused, ashamed, wrathful, and crazed.

Li Yao blinked his eyes. He looked helplessly at the strip of sea cucumber on Helian Lie’s “sharp eyebrows and starry eyes” that was like a carved work of art. The sea cucumber slid leisurely down onto the floor, appearing reluctant to part from Helian Lie.

“This, this fun situation is escalating into something big. Where did this youngster spawn from? He’s too reckless!” Not far away, Zheng Dongming seemed to be violently twitching like an epileptic. His once healthy face had already turned purple from stifling his laughter.

He dragged the two rich youths and backed a few steps in a calm and collected manner. He couldn’t help but laugh and say, “I never thought watching a guy eat food could be more fascinating than watching a girl strip her clothes. Do you guys think Helian Lie set this entertainment show up specifically for my birthday?”

One of the rich youths hesitantly said, “It can’t be? I remember Helian has some sort of O.C.D. Junior Zheng, look and see. From Helian Lie’s expression, it looks likes he’s about to cry. Should we go help him?”

“Obviously not. This sort of wonderful show simply comes once in a blue moon. Obviously, we must watch until we’re fully satisfied!” said Senior Zheng without any loyalty at all.

Sure enough, Helian Lie had awakened from his initial shock and stupefaction. He was now like an active volcano that had awakened from a state of hibernation. Broiling hot magma was about to erupt. A concentrated aura of fire, so dense that the naked eye could make out its essence, coiled around his body. The temperature of the atmosphere within a half meter radius had risen by several degrees!

“Crack! Crack!” A series of explosions like the cries of firecrackers rang out from his entire body. It caused one to tremble with fear.

Li Yao’s brain went off processing at maximum velocity. Countless memory fragments whirled frantically within the depths of his mind. The surfaces of each of these memory fragments reflected images of intense battle.

On the surface, it appeared that he was completely intimidated and suppressed by Helian Lie’s bottomless fearsome aura, that Li Yao was struck as dumb as a wooden chicken.

But beneath his lifeless exterior, every muscle fiber of his began to slowly tighten. He was like a spring compressing to its utmost limit, gathering and condensing a great and powerful force.

His hands grasped the void, but he automatically reached towards both sides of his body. It seemed like he was gripping two shafts of thousand pound hammers. He rocked faintly, waiting to unleash his stored power.

Right when the air was splitting, right when he was hanging by a thread —

A fat, chubby hand occupied the space on Helian Lie’s left shoulder. A middle-aged fatso weighing around 200 pounds wore the uniform of a manager had appeared behind Helian Lie without making a sound. With a smile, he said, “Senior Helian, you’re drunk.”

Helian Lie’s pupils abruptly contracted. His concrete hostility turned 180 degrees, fully disclosing the enmity towards the fatso’s direction.

This large fatso manager did not seem to be the type to have cultivated in any sort of martial techniques. However, when confronted against Helian Lie’s hostility, he brushed it away like the spring breeze, completely unaffected.

He said composed, “Absolutely any guest who comes to Little Border of Hidden Lake to eat a meal are given top quality service. We depend on them to make a living. This goal has been our tradition for the past dozen years at Little Border of Hidden Lake. Who doesn’t know this out of all those in the upper eastern district? If Senior Helian isn’t drunk, why else would you behave this way? To strike a hand at the guests who I need to make living?”

“Are you threatening me?” Helian Lie paused after each word, his tone was heavy.

The fatso manager gave a slight laugh; the fat on his face jiggled randomly. He had a somewhat cunning appearance when he said, “I would not dare to threaten Senior Helian even after eating the heart of a bear and the guts of a leopard. This is nothing more than a one sentence reminder. Behind Senior Helian at the third corridor, eating at dining table number 22 is a journalist of the Floating Spear City Entertainment Daily.”

“There’s a reporter?” Helian Lie’s face turned absolutely ugly. He lowered his head to look at the mess on his body. If a photo this “glorious” was shot by a tabloid reporter, he would absolutely become Floating Spear City’s most famous rich and powerful youth within half an hour. He absolutely did not want this type of fame.

He tenaciously, tenaciously glared at Li Yao. He gritted his teeth, bearing the pain and without saying a word or looking back, he slipped out of Little Border of Hidden Lake.

It was only then did the fatso manager turn his head to look back. He silently sized up Li Yao.

Li Yao’s external appearance was completely different from his cool and collected manner, causing the fatso manager to be a bit astonished. After a brief stare, the fatso manager apologized with complete sincerity, “This honored guest, I am truly sorry for the inconvenience. It’s because we neglected our jobs that we let you receive harassment at Little Border of Hidden Lake. I wish to compensate for your damages. Today, your meal is completely on us. Think of it as a treat by us. I hope today’s episode won’t influence your impression of Little Border of Hidden Lake, and I hope you will continue to find our store favorable.”

This restaurant was able to stand for several dozen years in the upper eastern district because they possessed great attention to detail and exceptional design. The manager would not judge a guest based on their appearance and their identity. In all, they carried on the ultimate service, following its theory. It was only through this remarkable level of service that the restaurant was able to build a public praise that was worth its weight in gold.

Li Yao gave a stare, and right when he was about to give a nod, the fragrance of wine assaulted his senses. A peeping youngster with oiled hair and a powdered face appeared right in front of Li Yao. There was a smile across this youngster’s face.

“My fellow student, I am called Zheng Dongming. You can call me Junior Zheng. You can also call me Big Dong, but never in a million years can you call me Small Ming. I saw everything that just happened. I feel that you are simply a giant amongst men, one picked out of ten-thousand, the best quality goods of the best quality goods. How ‘bouts you and me be friends?”

Under the vigilant watchful gaze of Li Yao, Zheng Dongming reached out his hand cooly and calmly. A gorgeous spirit-patterned business card was wedged lightly between his fingers. “No need to be nervous. I have no ulterior motives. I just wish to introduce you to an extraordinary professional insurance sales agent. I suggest you to go withdraw all your money right now and immediately buy the most expensive personal injury protection insurance you can afford, because —”

He paused for a bit. A smile of utter strangeness permeated across Junior Zheng’s face. He said sorrowfully, “Believe me, you will be using it tomorrow.”





Home  Forty Millenniums of Cultivation  Chapter 17
 

Chapter 17
 
Chapter 17: Aunty of the Ghost Market
Translator: Strivon, Ash  Editor: Geoffrey_, Lancent

An hour later.


Li Yao walked alone on the main street under an intoxicating evening breeze. He thought back to when Helian Lie’s head was covered in lobster, scallops, and sea cucumber and to the image of how he’d run away with his tail between his legs. Once again, he could not hold back from laughing at the top of his lungs.

His life had actually changed over a day and a night. It hadn’t even been 30 hours, and yet a wonderful reversal had happened!

Just a day ago, he was confronted by Helian Lie. Like a mouse confronted by a hungry wolf, he couldn’t resist at all. Even breathing lightly became impossible for him.

A day later, he actually made Helian Lie slip and fall flat on his face. He had forced this Adonis of the Crimson Nimbus Second into defeat, causing him to flee.

 

If those crazed Helian Lie fangirls within the school saw what had happened, they would probably all dislocate their jaws in shock!

Is there a more miraculous reversal that could happen on this earth?

As for Zheng Dongming’s warning, he did not take it seriously.

An indescribable confidence faintly permeated upwards, originating from the depths of Li Yao’s marrow. Although he was certain that he still was no match for Helian Lie, he knew that once he went through a period of cultivating, he would certainly break into a new horizon of heaven and earth that was unbounded and wide, ferociously trampling Helian Lie beneath his feet!

“Helian Lie. Yesterday, you insulted me, calling me trash. Today, you wanted to slap me across the face. I will firmly remember these two matters deep in my heart.”

boxn ovel. c0m
“Three strikes and you’re out. If you behave well, if you straighten your character, if you conduct yourself with your tail in between your legs, and if you cease provoking me, I will be disinclined to handle you, for I am a great person of great magnanimity.”

“But if you insist on stubbornly continuing with your foolhardy way, if you continue to bumble about in front of Li Yao the Vulture, your next scene won’t be as simple as today’s!”

Unbeknownst consciously to Li Yao, a biting cold air like that of a forty-six-thousand-year-old ancient cultivator had manifested and coiled around his body.

Right now, he was originally preparing to head home for a night’s rest. Tomorrow, he would go to the Underground Ghost Market to buy the knockoff Strengthening Drugs. However, at this moment, he suddenly changed his mind and strolled towards the elevator that led underground.

Only 99 days remained until the university entrance exams.

He had to strive for each minute, snatch up every second, and grasp for every bit of time in order to cultivate. Then he would stun the world at the university entrance exams!

“Helian Lie, didn’t you say that we, students of the common class are all mishmashes of fish, are all pieces of trash? If this ‘piece of trash’ unexpectedly scores higher than you in the university entrance exams — what kind of ‘thing’ would that make you?”

Every major city within the federation had an underground ghost market. It was a unique landscape that belonged to the common social class.

In Cultivation Era 40,000, peace did not necessarily exist. The right path and the devil’s gate. The human race and the demon race. The conflicts between the various powers of influence caused constant unrest. The Star Glory Federation had also been in a state of war for a long time.

Every Strategic Cultivator Hub in the Federation had 10,000 feet excavated from the ground during their initial construction. They built refuges, air-raid shelters, sewers, and ventilation wells.

Each of the various underground facilities were interconnected with each other, forming a tangled and complicated knot into a maze-like dark fortress. And the underground city kept a large amounts of food, fresh water, and other living necessities in stock. They used spiritual energy to envelope and seal these goods, forever preserving the goods in their freshest state.

In the worst case scenario, even if the surface had been overrun and occupied by the demon race, humanity could still defend by retreating into the underground fortress. The various supplies were enough for several hundred thousand people to survive on for at least a decade.

And the underground arsenal contained the most secret of hidden weapons of artifacts and flying swords that could, in an instant, mobilize a hundred thousand soldiers for a counter-offensive opportunity, lying in wait.

However, at this time, humanity was enjoying its golden years of prosperity within the Heaven’s Origin Sector. The Star Glory Federation had continued to pioneer and enlarge its territory within these several hundred years. With strategic military offensives, they broke through mountains and cut down citadels. The military presence that once existed in the olden days gradually waned as territorial frontiers became hinterland. And so, the underground fortress also unintentionally lost its military significance.

No one was sure when it began, but several members of the poverty class slowly emmigrated into the empty underground space, living and reproducing in great quantities underground.

Or perhaps, at first, it was because they were forced to flee underground due to the combined pressures of the ever more expensive housing and sky high costs of living on the surface. However, they quickly discovered that the facilities of the underground world were completely intact and that there were wide and vast amounts of open space. It was much better than the slum housing on the surface.

It was in this fashion that the number of underground dwellers grew. The underground world had already grown by a flourishing extent after going through several hundred years of development. Although it was somewhat inferior, the underground world’s bustling noise and excitement far exceeded that of the surface’s land of prosperity.

This place wavered on the edge of the law, existing in a grey area; it had its own unique social order and ethos.

To put it simply, merchandise had somewhat unknown origins in the underground ghost market. The residential environments were somewhat of poor quality. There were a little bit more thieves and a little bit more pickpockets. The food was a little bit unsanitary.

However, if one was able to overlook these somewhat insignificant “inconveniences”, one would be able to enjoy an incomparably low cost of living and experience a myriad of completely different cultures and customs from that of the surface world.

“Bang! Bang!” the old spiritual energy powered elevator shuddered violently, letting out monotonous sounds of striking, and headed several hundred meters underground towards the Ghost Market.

The air changed, carrying with it a trace of dirt that faintly blended with the smell of people’s cheap perfume.

Li Yao took a deep breath. He was like a fish returning once again to water after having flopped ashore for a long time. His entire body become reinvigorated again.

He liked mingling within the Underground Ghost Market much more than in the Upper East Side. If it wasn’t for the convenience of being near the Artifact Graveyard to scavenge, he would certainly choose to rent directly within the Underground Ghost Market. The rent was 50% cheaper.

Three minutes later, the spiritual energy powered elevator stopped at the entrance of the marketplace where the noises and clamor of people rang. Li Yao pulled heavily on the rusted iron fence, pulling it open with ear piercing creaks. A burnt smell with an arousing feel assaulted his face.

Every structure within the Underground Ghost Market shared the same composition and only differed by a little. Since they were initially employed following military building fortification codes, numbers were used to mark out the districts.

Li Yao entered District No. 59.

This was a well-known culinary street. The ingredients had a suspicious history, having gone through all sorts of unimaginable and bizarre means, and were transformed by the culinary arts into the Ghost Food and Drinks that were famous far and wide. The taste was guaranteed to cause people to even swallow their own tongues, provided that they don’t research the manufacturing process too deeply.

The piping hot lard rice cake stickers… The golden searing of deep fried stinky tofu… The blutwurst made from a blend of garlic, pigs blood, and horse meat and most importantly used oil that was produced by simmering lamb tail to delicately saute the product. Then an additional sprinkle of the Black Crystal Salt, a specialty product from the great northwestern Demon Beast Wasteland was added. The blutwurst caused people to urgently take a bite, burning their tongues. The half congealed blood paste blended with the lamb tail oil slipped down the throat before one could even begin to chew. One only felt the warmth of spring blossom in their body, relaxing and stretching the entire body as it opened every pore. It was something unexchangeable with even the most free and everlasting of immortals!

It’s said that quite a few cultivators could not resist the ghost food and drinks. They often changed their guises to come and eat to their hearts content.

Even though he had just stuffed himself an hour ago at the sumptuous buffet, Li Yao moved to feed himself. He bought 5 blutwurst sausages and stood in front of the vendor, squinting his eyes in pleasure.

A thirty year old aunty hugging a baby squeezed in. Rushing in his face, she said in a low voice, “Young lad, are you interested in jade slips?”

She withdrew a leather bag from beneath the baby’s sling. Reaching her plump hand inside, she snatched out three jade slips and spread them out in her hand.

The bodies of these jade slips sparkled clear and translucent. They flowed with brilliant lights and vibrant colors, emitting a rainbow of ripples. The colors converged in front of Li Yao’s eyes, becoming three names.

<<Female Cultivator Baijie>>, <<Youngster Sword Immortal Ahbin>>, <<The Sly Master Medicinal Refiner>>

“Too old. I’ve seen them already.” Li Yao swept a glance and remained unmoved.

“These are different. These are high fidelity remasterings that have gone through refinement by powerful cultivators from scratch. Every jade slip contains 900,000 imprints of telepathic will. The definition is at least 10 times higher than normal. Every stem of hair can be seen clearly and distinctly. I guarantee that for you, young lad, once you watch it, you will never forget it. Once you watch it, you’ll want more!” the aunty made her spiel with great enthusiasm.

“……still, forget it. I came out to kill time and didn’t bring money with me. I’m truly sorry for the inconvenience. When I’m back, I’ll be sure to help out your business.”

He got rid of the jade slip selling aunty with great difficulty and also finished eating his five blutwurst sausages. Li Yao wiped his mouth feeling perfectly satisfied. He walked calmly without hurry into the public restroom at the culinary street’s corner.





Home  Forty Millenniums of Cultivation  Chapter 18
 

Chapter 18
 
Chapter 18: Strengthening Drug
Translator: Strivon, Ash  Editor: Geoffrey_, Lancent

The culinary street had people coming and going. Scoundrels were mixed in with honest people like dragons concealed amongst fish. The air surrounding the restroom was utterly disgusting with its overwhelming stench.


Li Yao pinched his nose as he opened a toilet stall. As expected, he found several dozen packed lines of information written on the back of the stall door.

“Are you lonely? Are you yearning for someone? During those long nights lying on your pillow, do you find it hard to sleep? Hurry and send a message to Spiritual Energy Crane Link Number 3877134. Succubi of the devils gate. Shrine maidens of the buddhist sect. Gorgeous female sword cultivators. 90 beautiful women are here for you to pick and choose from. You won’t need to suffer through long dark nights any longer!”

“We specialize in used flying shuttles. We have the best quality cars and the lowest prices. We absolutely don’t sell lemons. Message E-Crane Link No. 893764.”

“7734982. We have over a hundred ex-special forces soldiers and Ten Refinement Stage Cultivators. We specialize in resolving any ‘inconvenience’!” The word “inconvenience” was written in red. There was also a skull drawn at the end. It was a very fervent display.

Li Yao skimmed quickly, reading ten lines with a single glance. He scanned down and soon was able to find the information he wanted.

“We specialize in supplying strengthening drugs. Our prices are cheap and the drug’s effectiveness is stable. Our drug’s side effects are small. Scan the arcane glyph for further details.”

At the end of this strip of information was an engraved silver twine that made up a profoundly mysterious, intricate, and complicated arcane glyph.

Li Yao took out a handheld mini crystal processor from his pocket and turned on its scanning function. A blue ray of light swept over the arcane glyph. The crystal processor’s hologram jumped to a webpage. It was actually the local bulletin board of Floating Spear City, a post in the “Free Exchange Section”.

This post listed over a hundred different strengthening drugs. The post even introduced in detail the prices, effects, and side effects as well as instructions for use and other information.

The term “Strengthening drugs” referred to a collective group of drugs. Basically, every cultivator of every sect, even those who just dabbled in drug synthesis, have tried to create their own version of the strengthening drug.

boxn ovel. c0m
Every strengthening drug contained different ingredients and underwent different synthesizing methods, thus they also had different efficacies.

Some drugs could raise one’s Spirit Actualization Quotient, health, and fitness. Some drugs could burn one’s life force to produce great martial power. Some could nourish one’s cells and maintain their cellular activity, increasing one’s lifespan. Some could cause one to be aroused to awe inspiring heights, to have a golden spear that can never fall, to be able to plow hundreds of women in a night.

After hundreds of years of research and development, each sect now produced thousands upon thousands of safer, more stable, and more effective strengthening drugs. However, the selling price of these drugs were on the absolute high end. Normal commoners would find them difficult to obtain for long term consumption.

The drug market was incomparably large. Naturally, there would be people who wanted to make knock-offs of the strengthening drugs.

After several hundred years of continuous experimentation, a small town called Serpent Mountain Village, located at the southern frontier of the Federation, finally managed to produce the first knock-off strengthening drug.

This was something that could ruin lives. They feared labeling their names onto the production of this strengthening drug and simply marked the drugs as produced by the “Knock-off Guild”.

Serpent Mountain Village continued to expand. It turned from a small town on the frontier’s edge into the most chaotic city in the Federation with a population of 10 million people. It became known as a “Lawless Ground”. The word “Knock-off” also became a term that specifically referred to imitated goods.

The drug that Li Yao was preparing to buy was a knock-off version of a strengthening drug that was well known to be used by youths for the university entrance exams.

This type of strengthening drug was synthesized mostly in illegal factories. Its quality varied extremely, and it was absolutely necessary to find a more reliable seller.

Li Yao took his time reading over the descriptive details of the drug. He first scrolled to the end of the post to skim over replies by other netizens.

He discovered that other netizens’ had not bad impressions towards this supplier. It seemed that the supplier did not fluff up his goods. Furthermore, the location of the business had an address that was a regular numbered address.

The type of reputation that this shopkeeper had was much greater than that of a wandering peddler.

He inputted this address into the Wanxiang Searcher. He did not discover any negative news about them.

Only then was he able to relax and look up the items he needed. Soon, he was able to find relevant information.

He saw, with a bit of surprise, that the prices for the typical knock-off good were higher than normal by around 5%. However, the owner had a statement saying that they used the exact same materials and ingredients as certified products. The synthesization procedure followed closely to that of the original’s. Their synthesized strengthening drug was of the utmost purity; there were absolutely no side effects.

After considering for a moment, Li Yao sent a message via E-Crane link to the owner, “I want one hundred of the ‘Proud Heaven’s Path’ strengthening drugs that are meant for university exam takers. Do you have any in stock?”

“I do, I am at my store. We can make the deal any time.” This amount of money was not small business. The owner had replied very quickly.

“OK, I am coming right away.”

Li Yao shut off the crystal processor. He thought and thought, and pulled out a pen. With great difficulty, he found a sliver of space on the stall door and squeezed within the crooked lines of information his own paragraph.

“Retired High Ranking Master Artificer of the Crimson Nimbus Guild that still burns with passion for work. Aided by over 10 elite disciples. Specializing in repairing every type of flying swords, artifacts, and flying shuttles. We provide an economical price. We can also provide maintenance for the above items.

At the end, he left the E-Crane link number he used for work. He schemed in his heart. If a cash cow were to drop in, he could let Old Wang play the part of the Retired High Ranking Master Artificer of the Crimson Nimbus Guild and ruthlessly gut the cash cow.

Feeling satisfied, Li Yao clapped his hands and walked out of the public restroom.

The address provided by the shop owner pointed to a location that was four districts away from the culinary street, a distance of approximately 1,500 meters. Li Yao increased his pace.

He went through two districts and happened upon an Automatic Arcane Glyph Vending Machine on the road.

This was a convenient machine that was commonly installed. In stock with the unit were several hundred different types of common Arcane Glyphs with prices on the lower side. It was self-service to purchase so it was very convenient for the city’s residents.

Li Yao thought of something. He felt for three coins in his pocket, took them out, and stuffed them in the vending machine’s coin slot. With a light tap of his finger, he selected the “Pattern Mask Glyph.”

The vending machine vibrated at high speeds for two seconds and something that was as light as a feather fell out from the dispenser below.

He ripped apart the packaging and discovered a sticky facial mask. Several dozen glyph script characters were engraved on the surface. They snaked down, interweaving and forming into an elegant decorative design.

He stuck the facial mask on his face, which created “tshh tshh” slithering sounds. Li Yao felt the muscles of his face contract and pull. He looked at the glass window of a store on the side of the street. There was a strange spider-esque design covering his entire face. If his bro for life Meng Jiang were here to witness this, he would probably not recognise him and wonder what deity this was.

The underground ghost city had criminals mixing in with ordinary people. This was Li Yao’s first time dealing with this particular drug supplier. He did not know any inner information on the other party. He couldn’t help but be prudent and careful by changing his guise.

In this way, if the two parties produced any sort of altercation based on conflict, the worst case scenario would be a departure with a slap on the butt in a direct and efficient manner. A mess wouldn’t be left behind.

This type of Pattern Mask Glyph produces a unique decorative design on the face. Its use was to change one’s ambience into something else. The final effect can be maintained for 10 or so hours. It was the most popular and the hottest selling Arcane Rune in the Underground Ghost Market.

Since Li Yao was going to conduct in the shady business with only himself as a party, he believed that the drug owner would not find anything to be suspicious.

District No. 63 was the Underground Ghost Market’s spiritual energy supplier district. They were responsible for supplying the entire underground infrastructure and ventilation ducts with uninterrupted spiritual energy.

This place did not have many pedestrians. The passageways were narrow, and thick pipelines were crisscrossed all around, appearing like a myriad of entrenched giant metal snakes. Because they were worn through the years without repair, quite a few of the metal pipelines were full of rusted spots, and steam spurted out at the seams going “Tss Tss”.

The metal passageways were dim and dark. Half the crystal stone spiritual energy lanterns were broken. The other half flickered between bright and dark. The lighting was intermittent.

At the depths of a passageway was a narrow, sliding metal gate that was half opened. Imprinted on the gate was a black wolf that was baring its fangs and brandishing its claws. The black wolf had a military spike stabbed in it that drew blood from its head. And on top of the metal gate were four square-shaped words that were made by welding metal strips.

“Militant Wolf Slayers!”

Sudden shouts, the “thump thump” sounds of beating, the smell of rust, and the dense stench of men came from inside.

This was a Cultivation Gym.





Home  Forty Millenniums of Cultivation  Chapter 19
 

Chapter 19
 
Chapter 19: Militant Wolf Slayers
Translator: Strivon, Ash  Editor: Geoffrey_, Lancent

The Star Glory Federation had a culture rooted in martial might. The cultivators with outstanding martial strength held the most paramount of statuses. Without exception, all common citizens of the Federation wished to step onto the road of cultivation and achieve the highest level of glory.


Even if one was not able to become a cultivator, people loved to steadfastly work on their strength, sharpen their physique, carve out their build, and dedicate their lives to maintaining cultivation practices.

And so, fitness centers could be found on every major street and alley, consisting of cultivation gyms and martial art schools. The majority of those that practiced cultivation in these centers weren’t extreme martial experts who were fearsome and vicious, but rather were obedient and disciplined law-abiding students and workers who strictly followed the rules.

When Li Yao saw the “Militant Wolf Slayers” sign, he felt more confident towards buying the drugs.

He knew that owners for places like these were mostly feverish cultivation fanatics. The knock-off strengthening drugs they synthesized were meant to be consumed mainly by themselves and the members of their cultivation gym. Their priorities weren’t necessarily to increase profits, so they often did not cheap out on manufacturing costs, guaranteeing the final product’s quality.

Li Yao felt around on the spider design on his face and strolled along inside.

The front gate of the cultivation gym was not large and lead to a completely different world inside — a dozen or so muscular dudes dripping in sweat grasped barbells with bursting muscles in a three to four hundred square meter strength training room. Steel rope and iron plates pounded with “bang bang” ringing. A ripped giant was in the corner ferociously pounding on a sand bag.

Li Yao gazed around in a circle. He noticed that these ripped giants weren’t lifting too much weight and that their facial appearances were relatively kind and friendly. The feeling that they gave off wasn’t that of fear and violence. They appeared to be ordinary job workers. Li Yao couldn’t help but let out a sigh with his heart feeling more at ease.

He walked to the corner and prepared to ask the ripped man who was punching the sandbag a question; this gentleman looked to be the most friendly of the bunch.

This ripped man was in the middle of a pulled tight stance. He thrusted the pulled-back hand forward. The explosive power unleashed by the entire body coalesced into this one heavy fist. The sandbag was smashed and flew upwards towards the sky, just happening to collide into Li Yao’s face with a “Pow!” sound.

The ripped man let out a “Ah!” and asked worryingly, “You ok dude?”

boxn ovel. c0m
Li Yao’s head was dazed and his nose was somewhat painful. His nostrils throbbed twice and he shook his head saying, “It’s nothing. May I ask where I can find Zhao the gym leader?”

……

In a small, small tea room located in the back of the strength training room, two buff dudes each sat upon their own green-camo-colored cushion. In between these two were two mugs, bacon, roasted chicken, peanuts, and other sorts of cooked food.

The person on the left was approximately forty to fifty years old. On the bald, bump-riddled head was a tattoo of the wolf stabbed with a military spike. His left arm was missing, cleanly chopped off from the shoulder blade. In its place, was a spiritual-energy-powered prosthetic arm engraved with over a thousand glyph characters.

Over on the right looked to be a young man no older than 30 years old. He wore a very low-key gray-colored military jacket. He seemed to have worn it for many years since the colors had already been washed out and faded.

If Li Yao saw this person, he would be excited to the point of pissing and collapsing. This awe-inspiring young man was the idol of every student in Crimson Nimbus Second, the new upstart within the cultivator circle of Floating Spear City, a member of the foundation stage — Fiend Blade Peng Hai!

At this moment, Peng Hai was not producing half a single bit of the imposing air of a cultivator from his body. He raised his mug and spoke frankly and straightforwardly towards the bald tattooed man, “Old Instructor, come. To our years in fierce battle during those days in the Demon Beast Wasteland. Another cup!”

The mugs clearly contained the coarsest of Sorghum Liquors. Peng Hai was of great extravagance, living a life of luxury as a big member of the cultivation circle. But his behavior was as if he had encountered the nectar of gods, drinking it all in one gulp. He smacked his lips loudly, “Good alcohol! This sh*t is what all men ought to drink!”

Moving somewhat rigidly, the bald headed tattooed man used his spiritual energy prosthetic arm to grasp and raise the mug. He said, deeply moved, “Peng Hai, kid, I know that you place great importance in feelings. Our camaraderie, even if you have become a cultivator of the Foundation Stage, has not been forgotten by you. You have not forgotten this old instructor and the days we braved through the fires of hell together! Even now, you are considerate. It’s fine when you come every few days to drink with me, but it really isn’t necessary to continue to practice cultivation at this place of mine. This place of mine is meant for amateurs. Our achievements are very low. As a Foundation Stage Cultivator, you are wasting your time by practicing here!”

Peng Hai laughed, “Old Instructor, the friendship between us simply cannot be described adequately with the words, ‘braving through the fires of hell’. Think back to that year when we executed ‘Operation Razor’s Edge’ together. That one time… If you had not blocked them off for me, I would be long dead to the point of no return. How would I have been able to become a Foundation Stage Cultivator then? And Old Instructor, you…”

His gaze swept over to the the left side of the bald tattooed man’s body. Peng Hai’s voice carried with it a hint of heaviness when he said, “You actually threw away your entire left arm. The shock was so much that even your heart lost 70% of its strength. You fell from the 13th stage of refinement all the way down to being a common military grade man, having no choice but to leave the ‘Wolf Regiment’.”

The bald tattooed man gestured back and forth with his hand. He said unperturbed, “The road of cultivation is filled with danger at every corner. I’ve faced death in the eye, yet I am still alive. When I had already stepped onto this road of no return, I had lived life on the edge far early on. I am prepared to lose my life to the underworld at any time! This is just a hand I’ve thrown away. What does it matter? If you couldn’t even see through this point, why did you continue to cultivate in those days? Wouldn’t it have been safer to just go home as soon as possible and live life as a white-collared office worker and marry a wife? You don’t need to keep on carrying that matter in your heart. We, who choose to cultivate, when our arms are severed, when our legs are cut, those limbs still return to the origin through death, happily seeing God. This is fate! My severed arm was decreed by fate! What does it have to do with you? I’ll repeat again. If I can’t cultivate myself, then why can’t I teach others to cultivate? This uncle collects a huge veteran’s disability pension every month. I drink some alcohol, roast some skewers, and everyday, there’s always someone on top of my bed. You don’t know how free and chill I have it, how happy I am! As for the old war companions who still remain in the military, you are correct. Quite a few have become Foundation Stage Cultivators. There are even two people who formed their core becoming big shots. What does that matter? You can’t say for sure that tomorrow they won’t become a sack of chunkless diarrhea inside a fiend beast’s stomach without even a trace left behind! If you think about it, I got off good. Hahahaha!”

Peng Hai cheerfully replied, “Seizing opportunities, letting go of worries. You are the Old Instructor of my memories. Your bones clang like iron with your body of steel! However you are a bit mistaken, Old Instructor. I am not wasting my time by coming here everyday. I’m actually engaging in some extremely important cultivation methods.”

The bald tattooed man said with eyes wide in surprise, “Cultivating? In this broken down place of mine, what kind of techniques can you even cultivate?”

Peng Hai lightly laughed and explained, “I can already explode my essence force into reaching the high levels of the Foundation Stage for a moment. However, my state is very unstable. In so many critical moments of battle, my power would unexpectedly fall into the mid levels of the Foundation Stage, nearly causing my death. This is because I raised my absolute power far too quickly, and so I have not yet achieved perfect control over my strength. If I want to truly stand firmly in the high levels of the Foundation Stage, if I want to assault the boundary of the Foundation Stage’s apex, then I absolutely need to thoroughly and completely resolve this problem.

The tattooed bald man muttered to himself for a moment. He nodded saying, “ You are the youngest Foundation Stage Cultivator in the Federation — there is no one like you. You advanced too quickly. Indeed, this has brought you your problem with your unstable foundation. How do you intend to solve this?”

Peng Hai laughed answering, “In order to control my body’s power, I suppress my power down to 3% every time I come visit Old Instructor’s Militant Wolf Slayers Cultivation Gym. I only bring out 3% of my strength and I do progressive overload training!”

A light bulb went off in the bald tattooed man’s head, “So it turns out you’ve been only emitting 3% of your strength? No wonder, I can’t feel even the least bit of a cultivator’s aura from your body.”

Peng Hai nodded, “I have persevered being in the 3% state of power for a month already. In this way, when I release my limits and bring forth 100% of my strength, I feel that my instantaneous explosive strength will increase by a huge margin. My control over spiritual energy will also increase quite a bit. My ultimate goal is to suppress my strength down to 1% and still be able to proceed with progressive overload training and sparring. If I can achieve this, I will definitely rush to the boundary of the peak Foundation Stage!”

He paused for a moment and laughed without worries, “My greatest weak point is my unstable spiritual energy. I don’t want other people to know this, so I can only come to Old Instructor’s gym to do training. I only trust two people within Floating Spear City, and Old Instructor is one of these people. Unfortunately, the strength of your gym members are far too weak. None can withstand three minutes of my attacks in my 3% mode, and it seems they also differ by a stretch when just comparing strength training.”

The tattooed bald man glared an eye at him, “My gym members are all diligent salaried class workers. They don’t specialize in military applications, so of course they aren’t enough for you to fight. Even if you do use just 3% of your strength, you would completely slaughter them! Needless to say, this Old Instructor will take care of it. I know you’ve been looking for a durable high-level sparring partner, so I specifically got in touch with a small famous gold medalist in my circle for him to be your sparring partner. Wait a bit for him to arrive.”

When Peng Hai heard this, he became interested, “Oh? Is he skilled?”

The bald tattooed man replied, “I contacted him through a friend and have not met him yet. Nevertheless, this person has hung out in the Underground Ghost Market crowd for quite a number of years already. He’s been at several gyms and schools as a specialized sparring partner. It’s said that his defensive and resistive strength is extremely strong, giving him the nickname of ‘Iron Turtle’. He should be able to take on three minutes of your attacks in your 3% state, right?”

A one-way transparent glass made up the entire wall of one side of the tea room. By looking out from within, one can see what was going on in the strength training room.

When these two were talking, they saw Li Yao walk inside and get smashed ferociously in the face by the sandbag as if nothing had happened.

“He’s here. What do you think, is he not good enough for you?” The bald tattooed man stood up.





Home  Forty Millenniums of Cultivation  Chapter 20
 

Chapter 20
 
Chapter 20: A Man Doing Body Exercises
Translator: Strivon, Ash  Editor: Geoffrey_, Lancent

“There’s a bit of meaning. His defensive and resistive strength are considered the best in the civilian martial arts. He’s ten times better than the weak chickens of your cultivator gym.” Peng Hai also stood up and slowly moved his joints. Every bundle of muscle fiber of his was like a myriad of vipers flowing and roaming underneath his pure white jade-like skin. Spiritual Energy stirred incomparably.


“Of course! This guy’s a professional! How about you first go to the sparring room to prepare. Don’t forget to use the ‘Pattern Mask Glyph’. Don’t let other people discover your true identity,” the bald tattooed man had said to the side. He pushed open the door and walked into the strength training room.

The ripped dude who was hitting the sandbag faced the bald tattooed man and said, “Gym leader Zhao, this mister has been looking for you.”

The tattooed bald man nodded his head. He gave a gaze over to the spideresque design on Li Yao’s face and laughed saying, “You’re here. We have discussed the price quite clearly. You don’t have any problems right?”

“Everything’s good, there are no problems. Let us directly make the transaction,” said Li Yao coldly as he donned the appearance of an old experienced actor.

“Then that’s good. Come with me.” The bald tattooed man led the way in front. He went through a corridor and brought Li Yao to a hundred square meter sparring room.

The atmosphere of the sparring room was more crude. Placed all around on the walls were straw mats meant for cushioning against impacts. The flooring was just a straightforward rough cement floor that had seen use for quite a while since there were bumps everywhere. Cracks could also be found chaotically all around.

The tattooed bald man took out from the corner a set of protective sparring gear, sewn from nine layers of leather, and offered it to Li Yao, indicating that he should wear it.

“We are all part of the same circle, so I don’t need to keep blabbering on. Anyways, as long as you can endure past three minutes, you will receive 10,000 credits. But if you can’t withstand three minutes, then you won’t receive even half a penny. This senior is saying, you’ve worked at quite a few martial art schools as a gold medal sparring partner. What we have here is all standard. You don’t have any problems right?”

“Three minutes? Gold medal sparring partner?” Li Yao blinked his eyes and realized that the opposing party was had mistaken his identity.

The pattern mask glyph wasn’t necessary random in nature. There was a total of over 1,300 different styles. On occasion, it was possible that two different people may receive the same design allowing for mistaken identities. This was known as being “doppelgangers”.

boxn ovel. c0m
This owner was probably waiting for someone else, a gold medal sparring partner with a spideresque design on his face. Li Yao actually mistakenly became this person.

“I am sorry — ” Li Yao’s next intention was to explain himself, but then his thoughts suddenly stirred.

What did this bald tattooed man just say? If I can withstand 3 minutes, I can get 10,000 credits? Being a sparring partner was surprisingly this profitable?

Li Yao was a bit envious.

He struggled through life and death in the Artifact Graveyard. With painstaking effort, he could only make around 10,000 a month. Even though this time he had painfully gutted Si Jiaxue a blade and earned 100,000 credits, this type of cash cow wasn’t something that Li Yao could happen on anytime he wanted. Right in front of him was the opportunity to earn 10,000 credits just by enduring for 3 minutes. It was enough to buy a dozen more of the strengthening drugs. What was he waiting for? Just do it!

His body had just undergone a change, becoming different. His defensive and resistive strength had increased by a large margin when compared to his previous self. His top layer of skin had become a thick coarse layer of flesh!

And the gym members who would come to Cultivation Gyms of this quality were mostly at the amateur level. Maybe they just got off of work and they might need to go get groceries in a bit. How much strength could they possibly have?

Li Yao line of thought went like this as he looked up and gazed forward to the opposite side. He almost let out a laugh.

A man with a tall thin stature stood in the corner of the sparring room. His upper body was bare, revealing a lack of muscle. His skin seemed to be somewhat deathly pale. On this gentleman’s face was also a ‘Pattern Mask Glyph’. Red and black decorative lines interweaved into the appearance of a laughing clown.

The feeling this clown gave was that this was a completely normal person, a trivial commoner. This person lacked completely the air of an expert.

Li Yao could not help but smile as he entered. This gentleman was in the middle of warming up in completely serious manner. He was doing the Federation’s most fundamental exercise, The 5th Sequence of Body Exercises!

This sequence of body exercises was developed by expert cultivators of the Federation specifically for commoners to keep in shape and to loosen their bodies. Every citizen of the Federation had started learning this since kindergarten. This absolutely was not a type of military-grade technique. It was the most basic of limb movement exercises that did nothing more than to unfold bones, muscles, and tendons.

Nowadays, if one had increased their skill level, they would have displayed more complicated movements such as the 9th Sequence of Body Exercises, which needed slightly more martial skill. As for the completely basic 5th Sequence of Body Exercises, only an elementary school student would continue to use it as a warm-up exercise.

It was clearly the warm-up exercise an elementary school student would use. The smiling clown was actually executing it down to the letter. Not a single hair was out of place. Every movement stretched his body to the limit. It was like the clown was cultivating in some sort of earth-shattering unrivaled feat.

“This 10,000 credits is simply free money off the ground! If I don’t collect it, God will strike me down!” Li Yao shouted madly within his heart.

The bald tattooed man took the protective leather set and draped it on Li Yao’s body. He frowned and asked, “Is there a problem?”

“Uh…” Li Yao muttered to himself for a moment and asked, “I can only take blows? I can’t hit back?”

The bald tattooed man stared blankly for a moment. His expression was both of that of a smile and not a smile. It was like he had just heard the funniest joke in the world. He took from an equipment chest in the corner, a big iron plate insert and strengthened ceramic sheets. He stuck them into specialized pockets on the surface of the protective leather gear.

In this way, Li Yao had three layers of protection on his body — a strengthened ceramic sheet, an iron plate insert, and nine layers of leather.

The bald tattooed man said, “If it makes you happy, go ahead and hit back~ Anyways, I strongly encourage you to first do the utmost to withstand his attack before thinking about this. Okay~ You guys play slowly. I’ll come back in in three minutes. I hope…”

He ended the subject and looked at Li Yao with eyes that conveyed meaning without words. He patted Li Yao once on the shoulder with a strength that was not light nor strong when he withdrew from the sparring room and closed the door.

“It really is a hobbyist level Cultivation Gym. Nevertheless, it’s three minutes of sparring training and nothing more. Is there a need to wear this much safety gear?” Li Yao tried jumping two times and he also swung out a series of sluggish fists. He felt the effect of the protective gear on his body.

He found out that this set of protective gear was made in an utterly elaborate manner. Even though adding the iron plate and strengthened ceramic sheet caused his weight to increase by ten pounds, it did not affect the movement of his limbs. Other than reducing his speed faintly by a bit, it did not affect his offensive and defensive capabilities.

And his opponent was still leisurely warming up. He moved from the fourth movement, the Stretching Exercise, to the sixth movement, Chest Expansion Exercise. If Li Yao was not mistaken, there was still five small movements left!

“This senior, you have been warming up since I entered. Can it be you need to finish the entire sequence of body exercises? Is there a need to be this serious?” Li Yao could not help asking.

The smiling clown was in the middle of maintaining a striding open and arched stance, a state with his chest open. When he heard Li Yao’s words, he ceased his movements. He asked exasperatingly slow, “ You don’t need to warm up?”

“There’s no need. In a real battlefield, you won’t have this much time to warm up!” Li Yao replied somewhat impatiently. He had struggled for survival in the Artifact Grave. Anyways, if he said he would fight, he would fight. If he said he would run, he would run. Fatty Long, Ye Wolf… These bastards. Who would give him time to warm up?”

The smiling clown tilted his head and let out a soft “ah” in surprise. It seemed he did not expect Li Yao to be able to speak out words with this much reason. He pondered for a short moment and nodded saying, “What you said is correct. I am done preparing. Three minutes… starts now!”

“Whoosh!”

In practically the moment when the words “Starts Now” traveled into Li Yao’s ears, the ear piercing sound of the wind breaking bore into his eardrum. Just an instant ago, the smiling clown was still several dozen meters away engaging in his arched stance doing his chest expansion exercise. The next instant he had actually completely disappeared.

Li Yao absolutely was not capable of seeing through the movement trajectory of this smiling clown. All he felt was a stab of pincushion-esque pain coming from his sternum. It was like an incorporeal hand had pierced through his three layers of protection in an instant! It directly pierced into his chest and firmly gripped onto his heart!

“— What the devil is this!?”





Home  Forty Millenniums of Cultivation  Chapter 21
 

Chapter 21
 
Chapter 21: Dividing Four By Zero
Translator: Strivon, Ash  Editor: Geoffrey_, Lancent

The depths of his mind had only produced half a thought when his sternum felt like it was fiercely rammed by a high-speed crystal train. All of a sudden, he was flying seven to eight meters away. The wall went “Bang!” as he crashed into it and sent seven to eight straw mats flying. All of a sudden, straw reeds were flying in the air!


Li Yao fell heavily to the ground. His eyes, his nose, his mouth — all sorts of liquids squirted from his orifices. He lost feeling in his entire chest. The numbing sensation was like a lightning fast virus spreading within his body; he felt his entire body freezing up!

“Too, too fast. I couldn’t even see if it was his fist or his foot. What kind of person is this bastard? He has this much strength, yet he still cultivates in this hobbyist gym. So that’s why if I endure three minutes I can make 10,000 credits!” Li Yao’s brain was just a sheet of blankness. Only after gasping half a day’s worth of air was he able to barely support himself against the wall and stand up.

Li Yao’s pair of legs were completely shaking. When he looked at the clock that hung on the opposing side of the wall… he saw that only five seconds had passed. Why did it feel like five minutes had passed instead!?

The smiling clown stood lightly 10 meters away. He was a bit surprised and frowned when he asked, “Your defensive power doesn’t seem to be that strong. If you can’t keep going, it would be better to call it off. There’s no need to struggle.”

“Who says I can’t keep going!? I wasn’t ready just then. Again, come again!” Li Yao took a deep breath. He swallowed a ball of liquid pain back down his throat. His eyes gradually began to emit a red glow. His brain was filled completely with thoughts of “Three minutes, 10,000 credits”!

10,000 credits can buy a dozen or so strengthening drugs; or 3,500 cans of the Giant Creature of Starry Skies meat; or an entire set of Cultivator Glyphs with high scalability made from special materials; or 10 banquets at the Little Border of Hidden Lake restaurant!

In the Artifact Grave, he was called by others to be the “vulture who values money more than life”. When faced with this enormous sum of money, how could he abandon it so easily? That’s simply a joke!

“Come! Come then!” Li Yao stood firm and adopted a defensive stance. He stared unwaveringly at his opponent’s two feet. He beckoned at the smiling clown by curling his finger, and his opponent nodded his head in response without a hint of courtesy.

“Swoosh!” The smiling clown disappeared once again!

“How can this be!? It’s still not visible! I can’t see the trajectory of his movement!” Li Yao’s eyes were wide open. He strived to find the smiling clown’s trail, but he ended up with nothing. His eyeballs were fundamentally unable to keep up with his opponent’s speed. He could only rely on his instinctive reaction to danger to withstand the attack.

boxn ovel. c0m
“Bang!” It was as if a giant python viciously rammed itself into Li Yao’s right side. Somehow, he managed to defend himself this time. He moved sideways with great difficulty. The strengthened ceramic sheet inserted on his right shoulder disintegrated with a shattering sound. Even the inner iron plate was hit into ringing echoes of “bang bang”.

“This strength is too terrifying!” Li Yao’s head was covered in sweat. In a single move, his opponent had smashed the armor on his shoulder into pieces. Yet, the smiling clown had not the least bit intention of stopping. The clown attacked in a tricky manner at unfathomable angles. It was like a shower of gales that enveloped him in a flash!

Suddenly, the sounds of “pow pow pow pow pow” came from his body as strengthened ceramic sheets ruptured. “Bang bang bang bang bang” could be heard as well as the iron plate warped.

“Can’t see him. Can’t see him. I completely can’t see him! If these attacks keep coming, it won’t even be a minute before my armor all explosively turns to mush. I won’t have any protective gear. This monster only needs half-a-minute to send me flat on the ground!” A scene of new 10,000 credit bills stuck on the wings of birds flying away with “quack quack” sounds emerged from the depths of his mind. A trace vicious malice gradually appeared on Li Yao’s face.

“I need to think of a method quickly. I must see through his attack pattern!”

Li Yao felt like his body was being crushed underfoot by a crystal rail train coming and going. He was in so much pain that he wished to be dead.

To his astonishment, he was surprised that he knew this type of painful feeling knew quite well and was quite familiar with it. Memory fragments like wisp of debris once again emerged from the depths of his mind.

From within the sea of his mind, memory fragments collided, smashed, conformed, and reorganized, ultimately forming a warped scene.

He suddenly was able to think back to the dream of grandeur, to when he was still a low-level worker at the Hundred Smelting Guild, to when he was being persecuted day and night by the titan with giant iron hammers. It was at this time when he was unable to see through any of the attacks, that an old companion who he had hung out with all around the world told him:

“Ou Yeming. Do you feel that the titan’s iron hammers come at you way too quickly, that you can’t see them clearly? Come, give your next month’s worth of fish fins to this uncle to eat. This uncle will teach you a unique skill! What unique skill you ask? It’s simple… If you can’t see clearly with your eyes facing directly, then tilt them as much as possible to the limit. Use your peripheral vision to see. Your peripheral vision can capture clearer scenes than your direct vision!”

Using one’s peripheral vision?

Li Yao’s thoughts coursed with electricity. He did not have time to think it over, so he squinted his eyes and consciously used his peripheral vision to gaze over his surroundings.

Li Yao saw him!

The smiling clown’s entire body was curled up into a ball. He looked like a lethargic house cat. Right now, he was ducked behind Li Yao’s right rear. All of a sudden, he let loose, and in a flash, the lethargic house cat turned into the embodiment of a malevolent python. A simple strike of a whipping leg swept across at Li Yao’s right tibia!

This strike was like an explosive jet taking off. Not only would the strengthened ceramic sheets on his right leg completely burst, even the bones of his right leg would receive serious effects. Li Yao’s speed would be reduced by at least half. It was possible that he would lose support in his leg entirely!

“That 10,000 credits is mine for sure!” Li Yao bit down on his mushy lips. He mustered nearly every single moving cell in his body. His right calf was like a folded blade. “Swoosh” it had folded up to the inner side of his thigh!

The smiling clown’s attack all of a sudden failed, causing his entire body to lose balance in a flash. The clown had to continue moving half a step forward. This was the first time the clown’s figure was forced into the open.

The offense that was like flowing quicksilver was broken forcibly. It was like the super-fast tempo of a song was forced to come to an end spontaneously.

Li Yao took a step and twisted. He originally wanted to take advantage of his bent leg and give his opponent a hidden kick.

The smiling clown seemed to be able to predict such matters. A strike could not be made since the clown had dodged seven to eight meters away in a flash. The clown looked at Li Yao with a smile that was not quite a smile. The clown’s eyes displayed a hint of astonishment and praise, “In a short 57 seconds, you were able to see through my attack trajectories? Like hidden dragons and crouching tigers, the Underground Ghost Market really does have concealed talent!”

“That… that goes without saying. Do you or do you not want to know which method I used in the end, to be able to see through your attack? It was spoken by my master. It was twenty years ago on a stormy rainy night…” Li Yao breathed heavily like an ox. He was trying with all his might to stall for time.

“Don’t want to!”

The smiling clown cut off the conversation in a completely straightforward manner. Once again he disappeared from where he was standing. This time Li Yao caught sight of the clown’s attack trajectory in the same way. What was weird was that the smiling clown seemed to transform into two separate people. They pounced at Li Yao from both left and right sides simultaneously!

……

Within the tea room, the bald tattooed man leisurely drank sorghum liquor, gnawed on chicken wings, and hummed to military songs.

A man with a spideresque design on his face suddenly knocked on the door, entering in soon after.

His build was short and stocky with a form that greatly resembled a wall.

“And you are?” The bald tattooed man fixed his gaze onto the stocky man, as he held a chicken wing midair. The chicken bone shook and shook.

……

……

In the sparring room, two minutes and thirty seconds had passed already!

Li Yao was like a small fishing boat that was being flipped up and down in the raging waves of a stormy seas. One after another, he was hit ruthlessly by an earth-shattering wave, smashing into the abyss. Yet somehow, he was able to once again float back up to the surface after a short moment each time!

Li Yao’s body. He had received Ou Yeming’s powerful spiritual purification and flood of training. Every single muscle fiber, every single cell was incomparably tough and durable. Even though every punch he received gave him a feeling of pain down to his marrow, he still did the utmost to persevere. It was a perseverance of complete insanity. It was only because…

“Dear god. I’ve already been hit by this bastard for a full two and a half minutes with six hundred and twenty fists! If I give up now, wouldn’t all this beating have been in vain?”

Two minutes thirty-one seconds, Two minutes thirty-two seconds…

When every second passed, Li Yao’s conviction to persevere increased firmly by a measure. What was even crazier was that he felt his opponent’s super high speed assault during this time had decreased in speed and strength by a negligible strand. Perhaps, the clown would soon expose some mistakes.

In this two and a half minute interval, he was not just taking a beating like a sandbag. He was paying complete attention, observing his opponent. Even though the smiling clown’s speed was strangely fast at incomparable speeds, he discovered that there was an utterly small habituary pattern in his movements. Every time the clown attacked from the right side, he left leg first would bend slightly once.

This unnecessary movement approximately caused the smiling clown’s speed to be slower by 0.1 seconds.

Li Yao was waiting exactly for this opening!

He was not a buddhist practitioner who would never raise a hand and only take beatings. The strength of his opponent clearly was much much higher, just landing a fist of air would be fine!

Nevertheless, now was not the time. At this time, the opponent still had strength. He was still vigilant, he was still smiling.

It’s fine. Li Yao could wait. He was like a vulture waiting for the most opportune moment to hunt. Living in the Artifact Graveyard for over a dozen years had taught him how to conceal his claws and the importance of patience.

While he was being knocked about, while he ducked his head scampering like a rat, while he wailed like a ghost and howled like a wolf, all this time, Li Yao’s brain still maintained a calloused tranquility. Memory fragments whirled at lightning speeds in the depths of his mind. The scene of the full potential of the Hundred-and-Eight-Hands Chaos Gale Hammer Technique as unleashed by the titan condensed once more in his mind. It had turned clear from fuzziness.

The first move… The second move…

He searched at lightning speed within the weapons storehouse of his memories for the most suitable of “weapons” for this situation.

……

In the tea room.

The bald tattooed man suddenly stood up, spilling the sorghum liquor onto his body, “You are the ‘Iron Turtle’?”

“Of course I’m the Iron Turtle. Didn’t we get in touch just a while ago? It was you who told me to wear the spider-esque design and come. Is there a problem?” the short stocky man frowned his brows, feeling at a loss.

“If you are the Iron Turtle, then who the hell is the guy in the sparring room?” the bold tattooed man’s expression turned incomparably strange. He was distracted for a short time, then all of a sudden, he pushed the Iron Turtle aside. With two or three steps, he crossed over to the sparring room’s entrance and turned the handle to the big door.

“Hey Hai! Quickly stay your hand!”

“Three minutes are up!” At practically the same time, Li Yao, with blood all over his face, let out an ear-piercing shriek.

The two had not intended to yell at the same time. It caused the smiling clown’s offensive that was like the moving clouds and flowing water to abruptly stop. The clown subconsciously looked up gazing towards the wall. He discovered that actually only…

Two minutes and fifty-nine seconds had past!

“The time is now!”

Li Yao let out a low roar. He loosened his body, advancing. His right hand stabbed the void. His left fist was concealed behind his body. His fingers pinched causing his bones to produce a chaotic ringing of “ka ka” as his joints protruded, giving a mace-like appearance. Right after, he used his left heel as a pivot point and his entire body rotated 90 degrees at lightning speed. Borrowing an enormous amount of centrifugal force, he took his left fist and threw it out swinging furiously!

“Pow pow pow pow pow pow!” The fist’s spear-like tip had unexpectedly punctured the air, emitting a series of sonic booms! Li Yao’s clenched fist was like a whistling iron hammer as it directly pounded towards the smiling clown!

“Chaos Gale Hammer Technique, The 94th Hand, Murderous Hammering Tornado!”

“Please let him off easy!”

The howling of the bald tattooed man was somewhat mournful when it came from the entrance. However, Li Yao was unable to stay his hand. His clenched fist was at the tip of the smiling clown’s nose. There was approximately a hair-width of distance between his fist and the clown.

Then, the smiling clown changed.

He was still the same person. His eyelashes hadn’t even shook half a brow. 36,000 pores on his entire body seemed to spurt out in a flash a dense air. His aura seemed to contain actual substance. It was like he donned a layer of solid armour. His entire person swelled up a level. From a common martial arts practitioner, he transformed into an exceptional expert!

Li Yao realized at this time that the words “Please let him off easy” was not meant for him.

0.01 seconds later, he had no idea how but his clenched fist changed directions and fiercely smashed upon his own nose, sending him flying over a dozen meters. He was still in mid air without even the time to scream half a shriek, when he completely passed out!

The absolute air that curled around the smiling clown only persisted for half a second before fading without a trace. He changed completely back into the domesticated harmless commoner.

He walked leisurely to Li Yao’s side. Half squatting down, he checked out Li Yao’s breath.

“How is he? It’s nothing right?” the bald tattooed man had ran over without delay, asking somewhat nervously.

“He’s passed out. It appears to be serious, an overtaxing of his strength. It should be fine if we immediately replenish his strength with a strengthening drug.” Fiend Blade Peng Hai felt Li Yao’s nose. He said somewhat surprisingly, “This bastard is quite amazing. He actually made me break my baseline. I exploded out to 4% of my strength.”





Home  Forty Millenniums of Cultivation  Chapter 22
 

Chapter 22
 
Chapter 22: Fed Until Satisfaction
Translator: Strivon, Ash  Editor: Geoffrey_, Lancent

In the depths of the Militant Wolf Slayers Cultivation Gym.


A recovery pod towered over two meters high within the Gym leader’s private medical treatment room. Looking through the transparent glass observation panel, one could see Li Yao’s naked body submerged in a great quantity of strengthening drugs. His pair of eyes were closed as he bobbed up and down. A large quantity of bubbles curled around his body.

The bald tattooed man and Fiend Blade Peng Hai were standing right in front of the recovery pod. They stared with great interest at the unconscious and unwakeable Li Yao floating within the green liquid drug.

Fiend Blade Peng Hai seemed to have just eaten to satisfaction. His entire face radiated with perfect content as he said, “Old Instructor, this bastard is truly worthy of being called a gold medal sparring partner. Not only did he withstand 3 minutes of my storm-like gale of attacks while I used 3% of my strength, he also surprisingly had enough energy left over to launch a counter-attack at the end. It was really unexpected! I originally thought I could perfectly suppress my strength down to 3%. I never thought that under this bastard’s surprise attack, I would still fail at the end. I was forced to explode out with 1% more power!”

He paused for a moment. Peng Hai still had some words he still wished to express. He licked his lips and said, “This 10,000 credits spent really is way too worth it! Old Instructor, ask for me later to see if he has time tomorrow night. I want three more minutes with him!”

The bald tattooed man scratched and scratched his head. He hesitated for a long time before he replied with an expression of loss on his entire face, “Hey Hai, earlier I wanted to tell you this, but this youngster is not the gold medal sparring partner, Iron Turtle, that I had arranged for you.”

Fiend Blade Peng Hai’s eyebrows jumped up, “He’s not the Iron Turtle? Then who is he? There’s still such an amazing expert in Old Instructor’s gym? That’s not bad!”

The bald tattooed man’s expression turned gloomy as he said, “That’s the problem. This youth is not a member of my gym. I simply don’t know where the hell this guy spawned from. Oh, that’s right. He was wearing the school trousers of your high school. Who knows, he could be a school mate.”

Having said that, the bald tattooed man brought Li Yao’s trouser over and pointed at the school’s crest for Peng Hai to see.

This time, even Fiend Blade Peng Hai was astonished to the point of jumping. With shock, he said, “It can’t be. When I was sparring with this youngster, I could clearly feel out that even though his combat strength wasn’t especially strong, his combat sense was extremely good. He had plenty of combat experience. In that final moment, he brought forth a smell that was violently and imposingly sharp. It was as if he had experienced several thousand years of life or death slaughter, sharpening himself on a mountain of corpses and a sea of blood! Crimson Nimbus Second. When did they produce such a fierce person? How could I not know?!”

Fiend Blade Peng Hai thought back to the time when he saw the students of the Important Class. Although there were a few who had pretty good strength, all of them were flowers grown in greenhouses. Not one of them had endured the onslaught of rain and wind, of trials and tribulations. This youngster with an imposingly sharp air was completely different from them.

boxn ovel. c0m
Could it be that he was one of the elite graduates of recent years?

“Do you want me to use the special lotion to wash off the spideresque design off his face? Then we can see his appearance and find out his identity,” asked the bald tattooed man somewhat worryingly.

Fiend Blade Peng Hai muttered himself for a moment before shaking his head, “He applied the Pattern Mask Glyph. That means he doesn’t want other people to know his identity. I did not feel any sort of hostility emanating off of this youngster’s body. Even if he was one of my hated enemies, he wouldn’t have assumed this kind of bastard role to come find me. I think there must have been some sort of misunderstanding. Let’s wait till he awakens. Then we can ask him clearly.”

In the Underground Ghost Market, removing someone’s guise without their permission was an extraordinary rash action, with the potential of breeding a kind of unceasing and undying hate. Fiend Blade Peng Hai did not fear making enemies, but he also did not want to disrespect the customs of the Underground Ghost Market.

“I don’t know when this youngster will wake up. For a typical person, staying in the recovery pod for an hour should be enough for them to regain their consciousness. It’s been exactly half-an-hour since this youngster has been in here, yet he’s still snoring loudly in deep sleep!” The tattooed bald man glanced an eye at Li Yao, having suddenly discovered this very strange thing.

The color of the strengthening drug in the recovery pod became diluted quite a bit just a moment ago. Originally, the deep green colored liquid drug churned along with Li Yao’s body, producing a great quantity of bubbles. At lightning speeds, it turned to a light green color, then to a sky cyan color, then finally it became almost transparent.

The tattooed bald man stared distracted. He walked in front of the recovery pod and brought up a hologram. “Pa Pa” he went on the hologram. After a few taps in rapid succession, a string of digits appeared before his eyes.

“The strengthening drug’s concentration changed from 33% to 14%. It continues to decrease at a lightning fast speed of 1% every minute!”

“That’s enough strengthening drug to restore three to five buff guys that were beaten black and blue back to their original condition. Within an interval of 30 minutes, this youngster surprisingly engulfed it all? That’s impossible!” the bald tattooed man involuntarily cried out in alarm.

From the depth’s of Fiend Blade Peng Hai eyes bubbled forth a radiance that was serene and profound. He muttered saying, “It’s like this youngster’s body had been starved for far too long. Anytime there’s the opportunity, his body would impatiently devour ravishingly any nourishments, fully absorbing an entire pod’s worth of strengthening drugs to process! I did not expect this. He surprisingly dragged this type of starved hunger with his body to come spar with me! If his body could ‘eat its fill’, what would he become?”

After muttering to himself for a moment, Fiend Blade Peng Hai wrote down names and dosages of several dozen strengthening drugs on top of the hologram while saying, “Old Instructor, follow the prescription that I am writing here. Recalibrate three standard doses of this blend of strengthening drugs. Add it to the recovery pod.”

The bald tattooed man glanced at his writing with an eye. He frowned, saying, “If I follow this prescription, one standard dosage would cost at least 50,000 credits. And looking at his absorption rate, he may consume three to five doses every time I give him his medication. That’s a hundred-ninety to two-hundred grand. No matter how I look at him, he looks to be the type of person without money!”

Fiend Blade Peng Hai laughed with ha ha’s. He said with the least bit of concern, “It doesn’t matter. I will pay the costs.”

“Oi Hai, what you’re doing is…” The bald tattooed man did not understand.

Fiend Blade Peng Hai shrugged his shoulders and said, “Old Instructor, wait till the youngster wakes up. You ask him whether, for a month starting this day, he would be willing to come every night to this place to spar 3 minutes with me? If he is willing, I can sign a contract with him. The reward is 10,000 credits a day. Also, he will be supplied strengthening drugs in sufficient quantities!”

The bald tattooed man said, “The reward is a small matter. But after a month of this, the costs in strengthening drugs would not be a small amount of money. It might cost several million!”

Fiend Blade Peng Hai laughed lightly, “I have a premonition. This youngster is absolutely a monster. If I spar with him, my ‘strength precision control’ cultivation will be completed very quickly for certain. I will be able to stand firm in the high levels of the Building Foundation Stage!” What is several million credits worth in comparison? Going to the Demon Beast Wasteland and hunting the head of a high-stage Demon Beast would make that money back!”

“Ding!”

The bald tattooed man’s portable processor rang out a pleasant sound.

Fiend Blade Peng Hai put on his military jacket and walked out to the exit as he said, “ Old Instructor, I just transferred 5 million credits to your bank account. Have it pay the costs of the strengthening drugs. Use however much money is needed to feed this youngster until he’s full. Tonight, I still need to go the Crimson Nimbus Second to give a few of the top students in the Important Class a course lecture on ‘Night-time Raiding’. I will come spar with this youngster tomorrow night!”

He reflected on the three minutes just a moment ago, when he was filled to his heart’s content. Fiend Blade Peng Hai all of a sudden felt that the course he will be lecturing in a moment later would be somewhat dull. No matter how strong the top students of the important class were, they would never peak his interest.

This was because their bodies were missing a sort of air — the murderous air of bloodshed!

When he walked to the entrance, Fiend Blade Peng Hai could not help but cast a glance back.

Within the recovery pod, Li Yao’s 36,000 pores were entirely spread open. They were absorbing nutrients in a thoroughly famous and extremely vicious manner from the strengthening drugs. A wisp of strange luster surfaced on his ashy white skin with each undulation of his sternum. Each bundle of muscle fiber and each blood-filled vein gradually floated and surfaced, like a once hibernating Fiend Dragon sleeping in the abyss. They sketched a strong physique that was heart-shaking.

Fiend Blade Peng Hai laughed lightly as he turned around and left.

He was brimming with anticipation towards the three minutes of tomorrow night!





Home  Forty Millenniums of Cultivation  Chapter 23
 

Chapter 23
 
Chapter 23: Eating Without Discrimination
Translator: Strivon, Ash  Editor: Geoffrey_, Lancent

From Li Yao’s perspective, the events that had transpired tonight were all part of an inconceivable and fantastic trip.

All he remembered was himself being beaten black and blue by the smiling clown and that he had shamefully fainted and passed out. Then, he felt like someone put him in a piping hot sauna. He felt himself bobbing up and down in broiling hot magma.

He had been steeped for a full five hours before he awakened. Li Yao had never felt an ecstasy as pleasurable as this his entire life thus far!

This sense of satisfaction was hard to describe with words and was absolutely impossible to describe using pen and ink. It can barely be described in the following way. It was as if from head to toe in his body every single muscle visible, every single strand of vein, and every single cell had enjoyed an incomparably fine banquet, soaked in a very comfortable bath, and lastly received a meticulous whole body massage for three hours. The pleasure simply carried him beyond the highest clouds!

The only thing was… A dark expression on the bald tattooed gym owner’s face. The owner glared at Li Yao with a bad complexion. It was as if Li Yao had cheated the owner of 900,000 credits!

It was only after the 30 second interval where Li Yao snorted down two large bowls of corn congee, swallowed down four giant sausages that were as large as arms, all while engulfing twenty meat buns, that the owner’s complexion turned a bit better.

“Have you served in the army?” the owner asked him abruptly.

Li Yao stared blankly and shook his head.

“The way you eat is very similar to some special forces soldiers in the army. True special forces soldiers who survived through the malevolent battlefield of slaughter know how to do this. They know how to consume the greatest amount of energy in the shortest amount of time. This is an extremely important skill that raises your survival rate by leaps and bounds! From the way you eat, you must have received special training. If you haven’t served in the army, that means one of your family elders must have been ex-military. Probably someone with an extraordinarily high ranking in the secret forces!” the bald tattooed man explained as he looked attentively at Li Yao’s expression and became completely cordial.

He didn’t continue nagging Li Yao about his background. He just straightforwardly fished out a brand new contract.

“That member you sparred with a while ago was utterly pleased with your performance. He wants to sign a month’s contract with you acting as his sparring partner. Are you interested?”

boxn ovel. c0m
……

And just like that, on the early morning on the second day, at the same time when Li Yao appeared in front of Crimson Nimbus Second’s school gate with vigor and valiance, his bank account increased by a whole 11,000 credits. An invaluable contract lay in his pocket. His veins rushed and bubbled with a strength that was on the verge of eruption. It was as if his chest was stuffed deeply full with crystal explosives. Each time his heart beated, it was like an earth shattering explosion had detonated!

“There’s still 97 Days, 18 hours, 33 minutes, and 45 seconds until the University Entrance Exams!”

Li Yao stood fixed beneath the front of the University Exam Countdown sign. The flickering digits reflected deep in his irises, becoming two fiendish fanatical flames. He waved his fist with aggression, wishing he could let out a whistle and fly up to fiercely kick the countdown sign into pieces!

“Little Devil, where did you go yesterday? You didn’t even respond to my E-crane message. What happened?” His bro for life Meng Jiang’s voice came from behind his body.

Li Yao did not look back. He tossed the oily paper bag he had in his hand behind his body. The bag landed perfectly in Meng Jiang’s embrace. “I got a fever all of a sudden yesterday, so I stayed at home to rest for the day. Here’s an egg pancake from the Fire Cloud Palm Vender!”

Meng Jiang cried with “wa wa” as he got scalded by the hot bag. He opened the oily bag to look. Eyes brightened as he said, “Wow, you’re rich! You actually gave me an ten entire pancakes. How can I eat all of this?”

“Eat five of them and toss the rest!” Li Yao laughed heartily as he hooked his arm around his best friend’s neck. The two chatted bantered as they walked to the classroom.

“Hey, Little Devil. Did you hear the rumors? Some earth-shattering and explosively shocking news emerged last night about our school!” Meng Jiang said, winking his eyes.

“What kind of news?” Li Yao ate a pancake with each bite. In a flash, he had eaten three scalding hot egg pancakes and looked at Meng Jiang looking stupefied.

Meng Jiang composed himself and said, “Rumor has it that last night outside, out of us mishmash of fish of the Common Class, there was actually a retard who had a conflict with the number one expert of our school, Helian Lie. We don’t know what method he used, but somehow he messed with Helian Lie and made him into a sorry figure. When Helian Lie got home, he was berated by his family elders. It was so bad that he’s grounded in his house for a full week! They forbid him from going out and stirring up trouble!”

“Oh?” Li Yao’s steps slowed and his complexion turned somewhat odd.

Meng Jiang did not notice the change in his good friend. With smiles of delight, he continued speaking, “I heard that this conflict arose due to Si Jiaxue. Alas, we don’t know which one among us Common Class is this heroic and courageous person with this much character. Who made Helian Lie, the tyrant of this school, eat defeat. Nevertheless, this reckless retard will be extremely miserable in their next encounter. I think today there should be a nice show to watch!”

Li Yao asked strangely, “Didn’t you say that Helian Lie’s forbidden to leave his house? That he hasn’t come to school? How can there be any kind of show to watch?”

Meng Jiang shook his head, “Little Devil, normally, you don’t care for the inner politics of our school. That’s why you don’t know about Helian Lie’s influence within the school. It’s not that simple! Let’s not talk about how his father, Helian Ba, is the number one board member of Crimson Nimbus, possessing an enormous amount of influence. Let’s just talk about about Helian Lie himself. He is the president of Crimson Nimbus Second’s Student Council and is also the organizer for several clubs. He possesses a large amount of subordinates with tyrannical strength. No matter what he competes in, there isn’t anyone who can surpass him!”

He paused for a bit. Meng Jia said with a lowered voice somewhat secretively, “Do you still remember? Last year, there was a student in the Ascending Class who somehow offended Helian Lie. Not only was he beaten miserable, but after he was sent to the sick bay, they ‘accidently’ used the wrong medication on him. It took him half a month of lying in bed before he could recover with great difficulty. Then the school actually found an excuse to expel him. Tsk tsk tsk tsk, it truly was a life worse than death!”

Li Yao’s pupils contracted suddenly. “Helian Lie has this much influential power?”

Meng Jiang nodded his head, and with an expression of full of sympathy, he sighed a breath as he said, “You only know just now? If he doesn’t retaliate back, why would everybody have a reason to be so fearful of him? In brief, it doesn’t matter who provoked him last night. That person will need to take the initiative to quit school as soon as possible. At least then they would avoid a round of physical pain. Huh? Little Devil, when did your complexion become this bad?”

“Really, its bad?” Li Yao chewed nonchalantly and burped out loud.

“It’s bad. Who told you to eat six pancakes with a single breath! You fathead. You’re probably stuffed way too full from the last one!” Meng Jian suddenly slapped his back. “Strange, do you have some sort of padding on your back? Why do the muscles on your back feel so hard? It’s like a chunk of rock!” …

Ten minutes later at Gymnasium number 9.

There were a total of nine gymnasiums in Crimson Nimbus Second. The ninth gym was constructed in the oldest decade. Its equipment were the most obsolete, and its conditions were of the poorest quality. It was the primary place for students of the Common Class to practice cultivation.

The gymnasium was somewhat empty. All sorts of cultivation training equipment were set up inside. Over a hundred of Common Class students had already changed into the stretchy training clothes and were engaging in extremely difficult training. The sounds of battle cries, the sounds of strikes landing, and the sounds of iron plates and barbells colliding rang out. All sorts of sounds blended together and resonated under the dilapidated ceiling.

Li Yao squeezed into an examination chamber, getting ready to test out his Spirit Actualization Quotient.

He faintly felt that his Actualization Quotient had increased greatly, as if he had been reborn into a different person!





Home  Forty Millenniums of Cultivation  Chapter 24
 

Chapter 24
 
Chapter 24: A Leap of Advancement
Translator: Strivon, Ash  Editor: Geoffrey_, Lancent

The world in front of his eyes twisted and warped as a myriad of arcane glyphs flared one by one, changing the world completely into the Great Illusionary Land. Soon, Li Yao found himself in the middle of an enormous arena made up of embedded black stone tiles.

The test he was about to take was a simpler one, so the coming challenges were unlikely to prove as big of a spectacle as the ones from the last exam simulation.

The black stone arena was about 500 meters in diameter. Black walls were placed in all directions reaching towards the clouds. One could see countless passageways the color of blood all around when gazing far into the distance. The faint roars of demon beasts came out from inside them.

The figures of savage demon beasts gradually came into view.

Li Yao warmed up each joint of his body in a loose yet not leisurely manner, causing his body to produce a ringing of “pop pop pop pop” bursts. He thoughts suddenly moved to action when he thought back to last night and the earnest motions of the Federations 5th Sequence of Body Exercises performed by the smiling clown.

“It seems that this exercise is nothing special, there’s nothing profound about this. Forget it. Let’s first test the limits of my speed!” Li Yao ignored the dozen or so demon beasts that were approaching. He knelt on one knee, used his pair of hands to support himself, and stuck his buttocks up, adopting the stance of a starting runner.

“Bowowowowow!” Several demon beasts with scarlet eyes shouted for Li Yao to come over.

“Woosh!” Every single muscle fiber in Li Yao’s two legs burst forth like thousands upon thousands of sharp blades unsheathing. Two gaping holes the size of fists were stamped into the black stone tiled floor. He turned into an image of savageness as he flashed past seven to eight demon beasts!

Li Yao did not pay any attention at all to the eye-catching demon beasts. He only had one thought in his head, and that was to run!

He dashed 250 meters away from the center to the edge of the black tiled arena in an instant. He was 50 meters away from the wall, yet he still maintained his sprinting speed. Just when it looked as if he was about to crash into the wall, his body flew into the air and turned in a strange fashion. His pair of feet stomped heavily against the wall.

“Bang!”

boxn ovel. c0m
A web of cracks appeared on the wall’s surface. Li Yao was like an arrow let loose from a bow as he shot towards the other side of the arena.

The dozen or so demon beasts had not even grasped half a hair on his head up to this point!

He traveled another 500 meters at lightning speed. Li Yao reversed directions once again and was standing fixed once more in the center of the arena. He had done this in the time it took to glance up at the sky.

“1000 meters in 1 minute and 32 seconds! Not bad. I have improved by 41 seconds over my previous self. The next thing to do is to test the limits of my jumping power!”

Li Yao squatted once again. He took off, sped up, and sprinted forward. Right before two of the demon beasts was about to rip him to shreds, he leapt super high, and like a released flying sword, he pierced towards the sky!

It was in this fashion that he tested his speed, endurance, jumping power, anti-gravity strength, and limit-burst ability under the surrounding pressure of demon beasts.

An hour later.

Li Yao was weary; his strength was spent. He was gasping for breath while he sat in the middle of the dismembered corpses of demon beasts. His face was painted with the wild blood of the vanquished foes.

His eyes pierced through the fog of blood. He gazed towards the sky, brimming with anticipation.

A black cloud was raging in the middle of the sky; a dark wind wreaked havoc while muffled lightning struck in waves; a series of complex calculations was happening. Finally, the Great Illusionary Land produced his current Spirit Actualization Quotient:

“58%!”

“58%!”

When Li Yao saw this sparkling shining figure, he could not help but wave his fist and roar out in excitement.

Two days ago, his Actualization Quotient was only 35%, categorized into the worst aptitude grade. After his mind went through purgatory training in the longest dream with Ou Yezi, his Actualization Quotient actually increased by over 20%. He was only one distant step away from reaching the cultivation geniuses of the Important Class.

Even though he knew clearly that this type of bodily rebirth probably can only happen once, there were still exactly 97 days until the exams. He had the absolute confidence that he could raise his Actualization Quotient by another 10% within this time frame!

The road ahead of him was still very long, but if he could forge onwards and pierce through any obstacles no matter how difficult, he would surely pass the test and join the Nine Elite Universities to step onto the road of cultivation — to become a Master Refiner!

Only when Li Yao left the Illusionary Land and stepped out of the examination chamber, did his heart finally stir greatly with emotion. It took a long time before he calmed down.

He felt an itch in every joint of his body. He felt every fiber of his muscles howling. Every time he breathed, he puffed out steam. His strength wandered throughout his body with nowhere to disperse. It caused him to stir incomparably restless and made him extremely impulsive.

He surveyed his surroundings. Everyone was training diligently. His best bro, Meng Jiang, was nowhere to be found. Li Yao was unable to share in his delight.

He swallowed a mouthful of spittle. The fire of restlessness still remained in his throat. Li Yao took a deep breath and walked to the end of the gym.

An old, dilapidated Strength Tester machine was set up over there.

These days, students were long accustomed to using the Great Illusionary Land to test their strength. They had no interest towards this old artifact with its simple mechanism and glyph array structure.

It had been a long time since someone had last used this old strength-tester artifact. The strength-testing machine was covered fully in dust. It was like a giant creature that had been dead for who knew how many years. Only a dark skeleton remained.

Li Yao was actually very fond of these kinds of old artifacts that were the complete opposite of the virtual and formless Great Illusionary Land. He felt these artifacts that were comprised of assembling countless parts, glyph arrays, and channels had an elaborate composition. It was a profoundly complicated, old artifact. It had a charm that was moving and thrilling.

The him of the present… needed urgently to unleash the feelings of excitement within his heart.

While it’s true he could do anything he wanted in the Great Illusionary Land, it was still incomparable with the real physical world. How could it compare with the real feeling of fist hitting flesh?

“Bang!”

Li Yao exploded out with an extremely simple fist. It landed perfectly on the center target of the strength tester machine. Suddenly, dust surged into the air, filling the sky as far as the eye could see.

The old artifact was like an enormous beast awakening from its slumber. Arcane glyphs flared one after another. Sweet sounds of colliding metal resonated from within the artifact. The sounds of gears churning and the sounds of essence energy surging through crystal channels rumbled out. Finally, a series of numbers appeared on the crystal channel counter on the surface of the strength tester machine.

“355 Pounds!”

“One strike of my fist only produced 355 lbs of force? It seems that my strike wasn’t very strong! I feel like I’m missing something… In the end, what could it be?” Li Yao squinted his eyes, allowing the dust to curl around his body. He stared dazedly at his fist, thinking hard from every angle.

He let out a light laugh a moment later and fished two earbuds out from his pocket.

This was the “Tone Bell” artifact crafted by the “Sounds of Wonder Guild”. With these plugged in one’s ear and with a telepathic thought, the microglyph arrays within these earbuds begin to operate to produce the sound of beautiful music for one’s ears.

“Look and see. The dark rolling clouds are incapable of blocking the ever-flowing galaxy!”

“The endless darkness will dissipate under the radiance of the heavenly stars that ignite all of life aflame!”

A recording of a resounding singing voice that caused one to believe in themselves over false gods and buddhas exploded between Li Yao’s pair of ears!

That’s right! This is it! The dark rolling clouds are incapable of blocking the ever-flowing galaxy! “DIE!” Li Yao’s hips sunk as he unleashed a deep howl. The dust that had settled on his body just a moment ago dispersed in a flash, forming a light gray orb with a radius of half a meter around his body. And just a moment later, this orb was ripped apart by the wind of his fist!

“Bang!”

“Bang Bang Bang!”

“Bang Bang Bang Bang Bang Bang Bang Bang Bang Bang Bang Bang Bang Bang Bang Bang Bang Bang Bang Bang Bang Bang Bang Bang !!!!”

Right when the strength tester machine was producing the result, the tall silhouette of a bold and powerful person strode leisurely into the gymnasium.





Home  Forty Millenniums of Cultivation  Chapter 25
 

Chapter 25
 
Chapter 25: The Iron Beast, A Storm Arrives
Translator: Strivon, Ash  Editor: Geoffrey_, Lancent

Several dozen students of the Common Class were engaging in strength training near the entrance of the gymnasium. Right at this moment, they seemingly became aware of something that caused them to drop their barbells at practically the same time. They stared at each other in terror and unintentionally swallowed a mouthful of saliva at the same time.


“What a terrifying aura, who could it be…?”

The sun’s light shone in through the large entrance door. An extraordinary mighty giant blocked half the light from shining in, forming an enormous shadow that enveloped these several students of the Common Class and caused the students to tremble in fear.

“It’s… It’s Wei Tie!”

Some of the students murmured subconsciously before awakening from their thoughts. They immediately covered their mouths. “Ge ge” sounds of teeth grinding could be heard coming from the slits between their fingers.

This person had a height that exceeded 210 cm and his entire body was covered in bursting muscles. He was like a giant monster that had donned a layer of metal armor and was known as “Iron Beast” Wei Tie. Wei Tie was the strongest in the Ascending Class and was also a vicious and fierce eminent tyrant!

Rumor has it that he overdosed on strengthening drugs for a long period of time, causing his body’s organic functions to be in disorder. His muscles grew excessively, but the growth of his Spirit Actualization Quotient was adversely affected. So, he was unqualified to enter the Important Class.

Despite this, there was no one who would dare doubt his battle strength. Most notable was his sheer power. It was even stronger than some of the elite students of the Important Class.

However, there was something even more fearsome than his bizarre strength and that was his tyrannical temperament. He loved to bully the weak on a fundamental level. After he entered his third year and because he hadn’t been accepted by the important class, his temperament became aggravated severely. He was blood-thirsty as if he was mad. His crazed insane tantrums caused him to hit even the teachers!

Strictly speaking, all the students of the Important Class were the heaven’s chosen arrogant children. They did not cross often with the riffraff students of the Common Class. Even if something escalated to the Important Class, the Important Class students were disinclined to go out of their way to bully the Common Class.

So in the eyes of the Common Class, the arrival of this Iron Beast Wei Tie even more terrifying than an entrance by Helian Lie!

boxn ovel. c0m
“I’ve heard that this Iron Beast Wei Tie carries a small book on him for recording how many bones he’s broken in each month. Rumor has it that he broke 22 bones last month and that he wants to break that record this month as well!”

Several students of the Common Class looked at each other, sending warning messages tacitly in understanding to each other. They separated to the two sides of the gym without saying a word.

There was only one person who reacted too late. He was still doing bench presses and had only just got up. His entire skull was clamped by Wei Tie’s giant hand. Wei Tie lifted the student directly up saying, “Howdy, small troublemaker. There’s someone among your class called Li Yao. Where is he?”

The pitiful student was 189 centimeters tall and was considered one of the taller and mightier students in the Common Class. But under the palm of Wei Tie, he was like a small little toy. He was flailing his legs frantically for his face was being choked to a deep red. With a blood-curdling screech, he shouted, “Older Brother Tie. I… I don’t know! I haven’t seen him!”

“Humph!” With a squint of Wei Tie’s eyes, he easily tossed the over 150 lb student like he was a piece of trash. The student was tossed over 20 meters away and crashed into a few of the female students. The female students immediately began to scream.

However, as soon as the female students saw that Wei Tie was standing not so far away, their shrieks stopped abruptly. It was like a hen’s throat had been slashed by a blade.

An eerie silence enveloped the entire gymnasium. Every single student was shivering coldly. They did not dare to gasp even half a breath of the atmosphere. Even the teacher had gone to who knows where.

Everyone looked at each other in dismay. Everyone had the same thought circling in their minds:

“This monster came here to give whom some trouble? Some Li Yao? This time Li Yao is going to experience misfortune!”

“Elder Brother Tie, Elder Brother Tie!” Meng Jiang heard whispers within the crowd of students.

He heard that this Iron Beast was actually looking for his bro for life? His face turned deathly white. He hesitated for a good moment, but he still rushed out of the crowd. He obstructed Wei Tie with a face full of smiles and said, “Elder Brother Tie, You’re looking for Li Yao? He just had what seems to be a stomach ache. He went to the bathroom!”

“Oh?”

Wei Tie stopped his steps. He swept a glance at Meng Jiang and laughed. Suddenly, he launched a flying kick straight at Meng Jiang’s stomach!

Meng Jiang’s eyes bulged wide open. He sunk to his knees on the ground and vomited a huge mouthful.

“Nonsense. Did I ever ask you?” said Wei Tie coldly. He swept his surroundings and fished into the crowd of people by saying, “You. Come out!”

The crowd suddenly dispersed leaving only a short and small female student. Her flowery look lost all color under the tremendous intimidating aura. With no choice, she walked trembling with fear to be in front of Wei Tie. She laughed with a laughter more hideous than crying, “Tie, Older Brother Tie.”

“Be good. Tell this Older Brother Tie. Can you tell me where Li Yao is at?” Wei Tie smiled, revealing a strong thick fang.

“I… I don’t know.” The girl shook her head frantically.

“You don’t know? If you don’t know then go ask somebody at once!” Wei Tie glared and let let out a thunderous roar.

The girl’s legs turned knobbly and she almost collapsed on the floor from paralysis. She moved frantically back amongst her fellow students. She asked with a sobbing manner, “You all, which one of you all have seen Li Yao?”

The gymnasium wasn’t actually too big. Li Yao’s training corner was not very hidden. Soon, he was discovered.

Wei Tie gave a cold snort. He turned his neck that was as thick as the waist of a young girl and headed towards the corner with large strides.

Everybody feared being close to Li Yao and Wei Tie. Even more people did not dare to warn Li Yao. A few of the less courageous girls even covered their eyes, fearful of seeing the bloody scene that was about to occur. A few people frantically tried to escape by fleeing the gymnasium. No one knew if they were going to go call a teacher or to just simply get away.

As for Li Yao, he was still immersed in his showers of gale fists. He was in the middle of his explosive music that could pierce clouds and split stone, indulging in the pleasure of using his bombarding strength with the music. He absolutely did not notice the events that were happening behind him.

Finally, Wei Tie arrived behind Li Yao. A fiery aura enveloped him. It was like a lion, whose stomach was rumbling with hunger, was standing behind a small white bunny.

“You are that Li Yao? Someone put out 50,000 credits for me to break 10 of your bones. It would be better for you to choose. Ultimately, which 10 bones shall I break?”

Right when Wei Tie said these words, the final passage of “Conquer the Cosmos” by Lu Yinxi just happened to play in Li Yao’s ears.

“Whenever I feel despair in my soul, there will always be a song that I can sing loudly!”

“No matter how cruel destiny is too you. You will become that much stronger!”

The blood racing lyrics were like a bolt of lightning splitting into Li Yao’s marrow. It was like the rusted shackles in the depths of his mind were completely cleaved open.

An absolute and bizarre strength entered his pair of legs from the ground, vibrating and swelling within his skeleton as it passed through his entire body. It rushed into his pair of arms like a mountain flood breaking out. The One-Hundred-And-Eight Chaos Gale Hammer technique transformed into fist techniques. He shot left and right in a chain of cannon strikes. He let loose with all his firepower!

“Bang Bang Bang Bang Bang Bang Bang !”

“714 lbs! 822 lbs! 794 lbs!”

He punched with over thirty fists that produced sparks like flint. Every single punch was held at over 700 lbs. The heaviest fist even reached 915 lbs. The strength testing machine was punched into bouncing back and forth repeatedly. The thick rivets securing the machine to the ground groaned with “zhi zhi” sounds. They twisted and deformed.

When he was done, Li Yao’s pair of fists gave off a curling white smoke that rose in spirals, like having a ladle of cold water poured on a red-hot iron. And the center target of the strength testing machine was already caved in deep. No matter how much time passed, it would never return to its former elasticity.

Li Yao took off his earbuds and turned around. He looked somewhat suspiciously at Wei Tie. “What did you say just now?”

Wei Tie was completely stupefied.





Home  Forty Millenniums of Cultivation  Chapter 26
 

Chapter 26
 
Chapter 26: Someone Fiercer Arrives
Translator: Strivon, Ash  Editor: Geoffrey_, Lancent

Wei Tie saw the crystal tube counter continue to tick away a string of digits, causing him to swallow a mouthful of spittle with great difficulty.


Cold sweat formed on his forehead, back, and between his waist. His body was as if it had just been scooped out of a body of water.

Wei Tie, also known as the Iron Beast, did not dare to even make a single move to wipe off his sweat. His mind was filled with a scene of those 30 explosive fists bombarding upon his body.

He would absolutely… be beaten to death!

“You must be Older Brother Tie of the third years. What business do you with me?” Li said as he recognized that this was the school’s infamously fierce Iron Beast.

Wei Tie’s lips trembled, not knowing how to respond.

Li Yao was likewise extremely surprised and blinked his eyes few times. He had heard long ago that Wei Tie was notorious for being a ruthless person. However, everyone minded their own business in the past. Wei Tie and Li Yao had not crossed paths before. Today was the first day they exchanged words. Why did it seem like this guy… was a bit retarded?

“Li. Fellow student Li Yao. I came looking for you since I have something I need your help with,” answered Wei Tie in a stammer.

“What is it?” Laughed Li Yao in reply.

“It’s— It’s like this. When I punch out with power, I feel that there’s something not quite right. I don’t know if fellow student Li Yao has some time to give me some pointers? As the martial arts teacher would say, I should be able to punch out with 50% more force with my strength, but the power of my punches always fails to reach that lever of power!” said Wei Tie with the utmost sincerity.

Li Yao was stunned. It took quite a while before he responded by going through the motions, “Sure thing~ As fellow students, we ought to learn from one another. The thing is… I’m all booked for today. How about we exchange pointers next time when I have time?”

boxn ovel. c0m
“Sure! Sure! So it turns out that Older Brother Yao has matters to tend to. Then let’s exchange pointers next time. I’m going to go now! Older Brother Yao go ahead and tend to your stuff! Go ahead!”

Wei Tie left. Or it can be said… that he broke into a run.

This sight would have been unbelievable if not personally seen with one’s own eyes. It would have been very hard to believe that the 210 cm tall and over 300 lb buff giant would be able to utilize the Spirit Serpent Footwork Technique to the degree of moving like the floating clouds and flowing water. He left without a trace, exercising caution to avoid calamity.

The hundreds of students in the gymnasium were left feeling stupefied, dumbstruck, and shocked. All of them watched with eyes that stared rigidly at Li Yao, feeling as if they had fallen into an illusion. They stared at him as if he was the king of the demon beasts wearing the skin of a human.

“What the hell is going on? Why did the Iron Beast run in such a panicked manner after saying a few sentence? What did they say in the end?”

“Loud thunder can be accompanied by small raindrops. This is probably the Iron Beast’s style. I had thought that he would break all of Li Yao’s ribs!”

“What kind of cultivation technique did Li Yao use? Could it be that he stashed a high quality ‘Hypnosis Glyph’ on his body? Hypnotizing the Iron Beast?”

The students discussed earnestly within themselves. They were extremely astonished.

Bro for life Meng Jiang massaged his stomach. He managed to nudge to Li Yao’s side with great difficulty. Unable to deal with the pain, he said urgently, “Little Devil, is there anything wrong? In the end, what did the Iron Beast want?”

Li Yao rubbed his skull. Shaking his head he said, “I don’t know man. It’s a complete mystery. He said he wanted to find some time to study punching techniques together. Give a few pointers to each other.”

Meng Jian jumped in astonishment as he shouted bewildered, “What? The Iron Beast wants to study punching techniques with you? Don’t you know that the last person who ‘studied punching techniques’ with the Iron Beast had their right leg broken into three pieces while he was still conscious?! But — but why did he go and leave?”

“I said I still had matters to attend to today, that I didn’t have time, and that we can do it next time. He went ‘Oh’ and then walked away! Huh? Did you just vomit?” Li Yao circled around his bro for life. When he discovered the imprint of a shoe on his bro for life, his pupils suddenly contracted and his irises gave off a cold glow.

He understood now.

“I know roughly why Wei Tie was looking for me. Damn! I should have made him stay just then… Small Jiang. It would be better for you to keep some distance from me for the next few days,” said Li Yao with utter seriousness.

Meng Jian stared at him and asked, “Why?”

Li Yao creased his nose and said, “Didn’t you just say that some poor unfortunate student of our Common Class had provoked Helian Lie? That he will suffer a misery incomparable for vengeance? That poor unfortunate student… seems to be me.”

“Wha?”

Meng Jian jumped with shock, ejecting over three meters away subconsciously as if Li Yao was the demon of pestilence. When he came to, he felt a bit ashamed. With a bitter face, he said, “Little Devil, we are all good brothers. Needless to say, my code of honor isn’t lacking. Let’s see, which hospital’s intensive care unit would you like to stay at? I will help you reserve a bed right now!”

……

Wei Tie ran in a small sprint the entire time. He scuttled out of the Ninth Gymnasium and had just turned around the corner when he saw someone standing by the flowers and bushes. A tall skinny youngster with a malicious expression on his face.

The youngster’s hips were quite high on his body. His pair of legs were at least 102 cm long. The pants of the school uniform were wrapped tightly around his muscular legs; originally the pants were designed to be loose, but on him, it was like they were skin-tight pants.

“Really? This fast? Are you sure you broke 10 of his bones? You’ve recorded the whole ordeal right? I’ll send it via e-crane link for Senior Helian to watch!”

Wei Tie did not dare to be bossy in front of this malicious youngster, adopting a well-behaved attitude.

It’s because this youngster with the name Zhao Liang was a student of the Important Class.

Although he was the lowest ranking student, ranked 41st, of the Important Class, he had an elite Spirit Actualization Quotient of 60%. Zhao Liang was not someone Wei Tie could confront.

“Older Brother Liang. When I walked in the gym just now, I felt some pain in my stomach. It’s probably my appendicitis flaring up again. I need to go see the doctor asap!” Wei Tie’s eyeballs turned about and he clenched his teeth. His face was scrunched up into a ball. His enormous body even began to shiver and his forehead began to sweat once more.

“Appendicitis? Did you make a mistake!?” Zhao Liang was unable to restrain his rage. He wished very much to slap Wei Tie across the face. He said in a low roar, “At first, I thought that you had a bit of potential. I even put in a few good words for you with Senior Helian Lie to help you move up Senior Helian Lie’s ladder and receive some good benefits later on. I never thought you were actually a pile of shit. How could you not withhold your end in this key moment!”

“Right, right. It’s exactly as Older Brother Liang says. My appendicitis flared at the worst moment. Oh man, it hurts! It hurts! What if it’s infected!” Wei Tie covered his mouth. The pain was enough to squeeze a few tears out of his eyes. He squinted his eyes, peaking at Zhao Liang. He tested the waters by asking, “Older Brother Liang. How about I first go to the infirmary to get it checked out and to take a bit of a rest. If it’s not too bad of a hindrance, I can come back to teach a lesson to this kid?”

“Fuck off! Fuck off! Senior Helian wants to see the kid beaten the sh*t out of as soon as possible. Who has the patience to wait for a pile of shit like you to get checked by a doctor? In the end, I have no option but to do the job myself. How annoying!” Zhao Liang was ruthless. A leg kicked over that was like rapid bolt of lightning whipping onto Wei Tie’s body, creating a “Bang” of explosion.

Wei Tie was grimacing in pain, but his eyebrows indicated that he was happy beyond delight. He said repeatedly, “Expert Brother Liang, it’s a given that you will beat this kid so badly that even his parents won’t be able to recognize him! Ok! Let’s not talk about this anymore. I’m going to go ahead and see the doctor. I’ll come back again to give Elder Brother Liang an apology!”

His neck shrunk and he slipped into a small run. Soon Wei Tie ran away without a trace.

“This kid, why is he acting kind of strange today? As if he’s hiding something like a thief?” Zhao Liang did not understand so he rubbed his head. He faintly felt that there was something not quite right. But then he recalled Helian Lie’s appearance when he’s in his towering rage. He quickly broke out in a cold shiver and headed to gymnasium number 9.

“Which one of you is Li Yao? Get the fuck out here!”





Home  Forty Millenniums of Cultivation  Chapter 27
 

Chapter 27
 
Chapter 27: Actually, He’s the Fiercest
Translator: Strivon, Ash  Editor: Geoffrey_, Lancent

The voice was both sharp and piercing, like the cry of a bird of prey. It ripped through the just-congealed atmosphere within the gymnasium.


The students had just recovered with great difficulty back from their stunned state when they became seriously frightened once more.

No one expected that a person even more fierce and malicious than the Iron Beast would come the instant the Iron Beast had just left. Zhao Liang was a student of the Important Class. With an Actualization Quotient surpassing 60%, he was a cultivation genius. He was in a completely different world of existence when comparing the skies of the Important Class to the earth of the Common Class.

“This Li Yao, just which person did he offend? To cause Wei Tie and Zhao Liang to come bulldozing over searching for him?”

“We don’t know what methods he used to drive Wei Tie away just now. What’s going to happen this time when he faces Zhao Liang?”

“You guys don’t even know. Man, last night Li Yao offended Helian Lie!”

“What? He’s the unfortunate bastard who offended Helian Lie? Then he’s done for!”

Whispering rose and fell like waves in the group of people. Everybody looked at Li Yao with expressions full of pity, as if he were a sick patient with his body fully cast in plaster.

While numerous students were making lamenting sounds, Li Yao walked very slowly over. He walked with great hesitation. From time to time, he would put a hand on a piece of training equipment to support himself. It seemed that he was somewhat scared to advance onward.

“So you are that Li Yao. You’re nothing special!” Zhao Liang observed Li Yao from head to toe for a long time. A cruel smile emerged on his malicious face. He said softly, “I have a combat technique problem that I don’t quite understand. I wish to exchange pointers with fellow student Li Yao. Come then!”

“So they’re actually going to duel!” Everyone tilted their heads and took a deep cold breath.

boxn ovel. c0m
In Cultivation Era 40,000, Demon Beasts ran rampant. The flames of war burnt on. Humanity had adopted a culture of valiance. They held the philosophy of “Survival of the Fittest where the Weak are Prey to the Strong” in extreme revere. Private schools, such as Crimson Nimbus Second, followed this philosophy particularly closely and had the goal of producing cultivation geniuses. They did not prohibit students from dueling each other.

Besides, the schools had perfect medical treatment facilities that contained miracle cures that could bring people back from various near-death situations, and the students were even overseen by several of the greatest medical researchers. As long as someone didn’t die on the spot, they would quickly be restored back to be as good as before.

So, when hot-blooded youngsters full of vigor had some beef with each other, they would often exchange the words “exchanging some pointers” as the preamble to conducting a duel.

However, typically duels were conducted between two students with similar strength. A duel issued between Zhao Liang, an elite of the Important Class, and Li Yao, this riffraff of the Common Class, would be a great loss of reputation for Zhao Liang.

Zhao Liang would not have gone forward in this manner that would reduce his reputation were it not for the raging fury of Helian Lie. Helian Lie wanted to absolutely see Li Yao be beaten black and blue by the end of today, and Wei Yei had unexpectedly backed out at the key moment.

Therefore, Li Yao adopted a meek attitude. He said softly under his breath, “You are a great expert of the Important Class. I’m no match for you. I forfeit!” These words were felt by all the students of the Common Class and Zhao Liang to be an expected matter and a natural course of action. These words weren’t surprising at all.

A riffraff student of the Common Class under the provocation of an elite student of the Important Class could only surrender and beg for forgiveness. How could there ever be a second option?

Zhao Liang yawned and said somewhat impatiently, “So it turns out you’re this sensible. I’m also disinclined to take care of your sort of trash. Be good, go kneel down and let me break 10 of your bones. Then this matter will…”

The last word “will” had just been half spoken when Zhao Liang felt his tail bone turn cold. A chill rushed to his scalp. The only thing he felt was a strong gale assaulting his senses. He reached his hand out subconsciously to block it and heard only a “Bang.” A white mist had exploded in front of him. Countless dust-like pellets stabbed into his eyes. The scene in front of him suddenly turned snow white. The pain was incomparable. He could not see a damn thing!

“AHH!” Every student of the Common Class let out cries of surprise. They did not dare to believe in the scene they had just witnessed.

It was when Li Yao was cowering his head in forgiveness; his right hand had suddenly awakened and within his palm was gym chalk that was commonly used to increase friction for strength training which he grabbed at an unknown time. That chalk was now right in Zhao Liang’s eyes!

Zhao Liang lost his vision for an instant.

Li Yao used the opportunity to lift a 30 lb dumbbell with his foot. He smashed the dumbbell onto Zhao Liang’s skull!

“Boom!”

Zhao Liang was worthy of being an elite student with an Actualization Quotient of 60%. When the gym chalk entered his eyes, when he temporarily lost his vision for a moment, he was still able to maintain a high state of vigilance. He responded to Li Yao’s attack by using only the sound of the wind, crossing his two arms to block the dumbbell attack firmly!

But he had not expected that Li Yao would reach such a terrifying degree in strength. Even more than that, he had not foreseen that Li Yao would be so shameless and despicable as to use a dumbbell to attack. Under the bombardment of the great powerful energy, his pair of arms were smashed completely and snapped. The force was strong enough to even send his entire body flying dozens of meters away!

The numerous students of the Common Class went into states of astonishment once again. Only a small minority of students, the ones who were proficient in martial skill, had been able to see how much Zhao Liang wanted to use a soaring stylish method to dispel Li Yao’s offense and give birth to an exaggerated scene.

However, it did not matter what Zhao Liang’s intentions were. In the end, Li Yao sent Zhao Liang flying. Just this sole move was enough to send all of Crimson Nimbus Second into an uproar!

“*SPLAT!”

From over a dozen meters away, Zhao Liang spat a mouthful of blood. A flaming hot rage twined around his body. He knew that what had transpired today was like a large ship being capsized by force of a mere small steam. Things should have gone smoothly today, but everything had gone completely wrong instead. At this point, even if he beat this kid to the ground, he would still remain the laughingstock of the Important Class.

“Way too despicable! Way too shameless! You actually used gym powder and a dumbbell! But I’m afraid trash like you wouldn’t know that my greatest weapon is not actually my arms but my legs!”

Zhao Liang laughed hideously. He spread his fingers into a pair of pitchforks and stabbed his own eyes fiercely. Large drops of tears flowed from his eyes immediately, causing the gym chalk to be washed out of his eyes. Once again, a blurry image came into view before his eyes. His eyes locked in Li Yao’s direction.

“I’LL SLAUGHTER YOU!”

With a shriek, Zhao Liang’s pair of legs turned into a pair of bizarre serpents. He devoured a dozen meters of distance with only a single leap. His left leg stamped hard, producing wood splinters and fragments, and the power of his right knee was like a fierce tiger taking off like lightning!

The Thirteen Forces of the War Beasts technique with the greatest power was unleashed…Treading Tiger Strike!

It took no more than half-a-second to execute the leap and the knee strike. Li Yao simply wasn’t able to react in the least and wasn’t even able to adopt a defensive stance. Zhao Liang’s knee struck directly onto Li Yao’s sternum.

“AH!”

Quite a few female students let out cries of alarm and subconsciously closed their eyes. They could not bear to see the tragedy that was about to occur.

… When Zhao Liang was crying out tears to wash out gym chauk a dozen seconds ago, Li Yao had leisurely grabbed a 35 lb plate and stuffed it down his clothes to protect his chest. Everyone else had witnessed this scene very clearly.

“*CLANG!”

A sound like the ring of a monastery bell came from Li Yao’s sternum.

A stabbing pain of pins and needles could be felt around Zhao Liang’s kneecap.

Even though Zhao Liang’s kneecap was very hard, the hardness could not be compared to metal. The knee strike had been performed using his entire strength, resulting in his right knee shattering completely! Being smashed into fracturing!

A strong and experienced military soldier could’ve perhaps withstood this splintered knee fracture, bear through the pain, and still be able to maintain their combat strength. But no matter how vicious and fierce Zhao Liang was, he was still an ordinary high school student. A broken knee would cause him to lose his combat strength completely.

Zhao Liang screamed miserably over and over. He fell to the floor in shock. The pain caused him to start twitching.

Li Yao ripped open his school uniform, took out the iron plate, and discovered that there was a small crater in the center of the iron plate. It appeared that if he had not donned the iron plate guarding his chest, his sternum would have been completely shattered.

“This ‘Treading Tiger Strike’ move really is overpowering!” Li Yao raised his eyebrows as he praised his opponent. He sized up his opponent from left to right. He headed towards a barbell rack.

Li Yao stuck his left hand into his pocket. His right hand casually picked up plates and loaded both sides of a barbell with a great amount of weight. The barbell now weighed over a hundred pounds. He tried brandishing the barbell for a bit. “Whoosh whoosh” sounds permeated through the air, causing people’s scalps to turn numb.

Li Yao walked towards Zhao Liang dragging the barbell.

The half-bit of malice remaining on Zhao Liang’s face flew away and scattered from fear. Even his miserable shrieking was stiffly stifled in his throat, turning into sharp thin pleading words for forgiveness, “You. What are you up to? DON’T GET ANY CLOSER!”

“Little, Little devil. Calm down a bit! No need to create a big mess out of this!” Everyone was stunned and dumbstruck. Their scalps were numb. Only his bro for life Meng Jiang was able to eek out of the state of shock and alarm, dissuading Li Yao with stammers.

Li Yao was silent for a period of time. He turned around and returned the barbell back to the rack, “Okay. After all, we are all fellow students. I also do not wish to be too excessive…”

“That’s the right thing to do…You! what are you doing!” Meng Jiang had just let out a breath of relief when he suddenly saw Li Yao lift a somewhat lighter but at least 75 lb barbell. The lips Meng Jiang had just sealed had opened up once again. But this time, he did not know what he should say.

And this time Li Yao didn’t give him that chance to talk. He walked directly to the left side of Zhao Liang and raised the barbell up high, aiming at Zhao Liang’s undamaged left knee.

“You — you, don’t you know!? Senior Helian was the one who sent me here!” Zhao Liang let out cries of fear, curling his entire body, looking like a giant dying shrimp.

“And that matters how?” asked Li Yao.

The barbell tore through the air, exploding out with a strong gale of wind, ferociously smashing downwards.

“*SNAP!”

Zhao Liang’s pair of legs were bent in an unnatural position. He was in so much pain that he was frothing at the mouth and his eyeballs went completely white. He had gone completely into shock.





Home  Forty Millenniums of Cultivation  Chapter 28
 

Chapter 28
 
Chapter 28: Of Course He Needs to be Aggressive
Translator: Strivon, Ash  Editor: Geoffrey_, Lancent

Five minutes later, doctors from the school infirmary came bustling through the ninth gym’s entrance.


Zhao Liang’s pair of legs were in an extremely critical condition. There was no way to carry him to the infirmary, so the doctors directly came on-site for treatment.

For the medics who had mastered the latest cultivation technology in the Federation, fixing a shattered bone fracture would be a trivial matter with an expected recovery within a few days. At most, there would be a little bit of… pain in the process.

“AHHHHHHHHHHH!” Zhao Liang’s miserable shrieks echoed throughout the gymnasium in large waves and waves. All those who heard the shrieks had their scalps turned numb. The stabbing pain in his knee was incomparably painful.

And Li Yao, together with his bro for life Meng Jiang, squatted by the flowers and shrubs outside of the gym. An incorporeal air seemed to have curled around both of their bodies, causing all the other students of the Common Class to avoid them and keep their distance. They did not dare to get close to Li Yao and Meng Jiang.

Meng Jiang’s face was knotted in a state of loss. He wanted to say something, but he was hesitating.

Li Yao glanced at his bro for life. “What do you want to know? Come on, ask. Ask before a teacher takes me away!”

Meng Jiang spat out a dirty air. With a bitter laugh. he said, “My mind is a chaotic mess right now. I still haven’t processed all this yet. You little devilish monster. When did you become so strong?”

Li Yao thought for a bit and said, “I was on the breach of a breakthrough in a cultivation technique. Before practicing this technique, my strength was weak and feeble, just like that of the average person. But as soon as I succeeded in my training, my strength exploded into sky soaring heights! The reason why I didn’t come to school yesterday was because I was at a critical point in my training yesterday. Right now, I have already succeeded with the first step of this technique!”

“So it’s that amazing!” Meng Jiang’s eyes brightened and he did not inquire any further.

The Federation had an unwritten rule. It was the greatest taboo to investigate the roots of the combat skills and technique origins of other people. Even cultivators with power overflowing the heavens could not ask other people of their secret family techniques.

boxn ovel. c0m
Without this rule, the consequences could be dire… Today, a cultivator might randomly interrogate the weak for the source of their combat skills. Tomorrow, the Federation could call up an army of millions to encircle a cultivation guild’s base and force them to give up their deepest secret extermination miracle techniques.

In every world, there was the most basic of rules — to protect the weak from the tyranny of the strong. People have fought for the basic right of not being taken advantage of.

It was because there were these rules that society was able to be established, that the strong and the weak could be united!

The Star Glory Federation relied on precisely these sets of rules to reach unity between cultivators and the common folk, to face-off jointly against the Fiend Beasts and those that walk the Demonic path. The Federation would have long perished if these rules weren’t in place. Cultivators and commoners would be hostile enemies towards each other, and the state of the Federation would sink into volatility, like a sheet of scattered sand. How could they possibly hope to fight against the Demon Beasts and Demonic Cultivators if this were the case?

And so, Li Yao thought of this pretext to explain his own sudden increase in strength. He wasn’t worried about being exposed by others. Even if people discovered that he was lying, his secrets would not be exposed… In the world of cultivation, who doesn’t have a few hidden secrets?

Meng Jiang nodded his head as he accepted the fact that his bro for life had suddenly increased his strength. However, he wrinkled his brow as he asked, “But, is there a need for you to be this excessively vicious? You had already sent Zhao Liang to the ground, yet you still pulverized his left knee. Isn’t that too extreme? You don’t know how scary you looked when you lifted that barbell up. You basically looked like… a blood-thirsty monster!”

“I had to do it,” Li Yao explained, “You told me this morning the enormous power Helian Lie holds in this school and how he has many henchmen. Since I’ve already offended him, his underlings will certainly come searching for trouble. Zhao Liang is only the first of them!”

He paused for a moment, before continuing, “Zhao Liang is the lowest ranked student of the Important Class; he’s in last place. If I only knock him to the ground, do you think other people would be scared? Wouldn’t they continue coming one after another to cause me trouble? No matter how I fight, I would fall before a revolving wheel of war! But now, when Helian Lie’s gang sees Zhao Liang’s pair of knees and hear his painful shrieks, they would reconsider a little bit before looking for me. The vast majority of them might even shrink back.”

Meng Jiang fixed into a blank stare. He did not think that far. He had only felt that Li Yao’s actions were too excessive.

Li Yao patted the shoulder of his bro for life and said seriously, “Small Jiang, you know my background. You know that since I was a kid, I lived and grew up in the trash heap. In the world I grew up in, people could get in blood feuds over even a half-rotten banana. One time, I even saw two groups of people have a brawl over half a bag of cold meat buns. In the end, two people died. Two people died over half a bag of meat buns! Trust me. I grew up in this kind of environment, so I know how to deal with threats and trouble!”

“But, but….” Meng Jiang’s mind was a huge mess. All this time, he had never witnessed this other face of his bro for life.

Perhaps, this was Li Yao’s most genuine face.

Li Yao said flatly, “The experience of a dozen years of life in the waste treatment facility had taught me…When it comes to facing the threats of other people, it’s not that thing’s can’t be reasoned and that a compromise can’t be found. It’s that first, the opposition must be beaten to such a state that even their parents would not recognize them, then negotiations and compromise can proceed. Otherwise, things can’t be reasoned out and compromises can’t be made. Instead, you place yourself in a pot for others boil or steam! As for what happened today… When Zhao Liang first arrived, he wanted me to kneel before him. And he wanted to break 10 of my bones. I was already determined not to kneel, and I also did not want to have 10 of my bones broken. What other choice did I have besides to fight him to the bloody end?

Meng Jiang had a blank expression for quite a while, “I heard you say before that you had a nickname in the garbage dump. The Vulture. When I heard that I had my doubts. I thought you were just talking big. I believe you now.”

With a laugh, Li Yao said, “Yea man~. The me back then was ten times more vicious and a hundred times more crazy than the me now. I had no choice. I was just a kid who couldn’t even hold a knife steady. If I weren’t a bit vicious and crazy, how could I have fought for food from the mouths of the grownups? Later, I met my Old Man. He taught me many things, including social standards and rules. When I assimilated into ordinary society, I lost a bit of my edge. Anyway, my Old Man is long dead. When I encounter this sort of situation, I can act only in accordance to the instincts of the ‘Vulture’ in order to settle things~.”

Meng Jiang let out a sigh, “I understand now after hearing you, Little Devil. You had no other option. But other than me, people would take you as a kid tooting his horn and that you are being too aggressive.”

“Aggressive? Of course, I have to be aggressive!” Li Yao’s nostrils flared. He spoke, objecting, “We who live in the Artifact Grave must work to eat as scavengers. We live in the now, not the future, for who knows what type of priceless treasure we may salvage in the next minute… only to have, the minute after, it’s spiritual energy explode so greatly that nothing remains! So for us scavengers, as soon we have power, we must immediately act with aggression. I won’t wait till the next second to be aggressive if I can be aggressive now. I won’t act with 90% aggression if I can act with 100% aggression! If I don’t be aggressive when I have this strength, if I continue laying low… What if I dropped dead in the next second? Wouldn’t it all have been a waste? It’s like winning 5 million credits in the lottery. Say you don’t spend it to live a life of luxury. You would rather stick it in the bank. What if right after you deposited your money, you get hit by a flying shuttle and die!? You’ve been wronged even as a ghost!”

Meng Jiang conceded saying, “Okay okay, since you’re this confident, you can act aggressively. But did the thought of Helian Lie using his family’s influence to make you quit school ever cross your mind? What will you do then?”

“I don’t have to remain here, there are other places I can be. Crimson Nimbus Second is not the only school under the skies. At worst, I will just switch schools. Even if I don’t go to school, the Federation still lets citizens enter privately in the university examinations. The procedure is just a little bit more troublesome! If Helian Lie applies pressure for me to quit school, I’ll just let him fulfill that wish. After all, why not? There’s a long future ahead. He and I will still have our beautiful youthfulness!” Li Yao’s eyes produced a vicious aura as he spoke nonchalantly.

While these two were talking, a short, thin, weak figure tottered towards them.

“It’s a teacher!” Meng Jiang said in light voice and pulled Li Yao to stand up, jumping off of a short wall by the bushes.

“Isn’t that Old Sun, the school’s warehouse logistics manager? What did he come here for?” Li Yao stared confused.





Home  Forty Millenniums of Cultivation  Chapter 29
 

Chapter 29
 
Chapter 29: Fiend Blade Forger
Translator: Strivon, Ash  Editor: Geoffrey_, Lancent

The old fogey who walked over had a thinning head of white hair, ashen white seemingly-cataract eyes, a hunchbacked posture, and a shortness of breath. A gust of wind could practically topple him.


Li Yao remembered that when school started, he and his fellow students had gone to the warehouse to get their uniforms. He had met this old fogey once before at that time.

“Even though he’s only a warehouse manager, I’ve heard that over 70 years ago, this old fogey ‘Sun Biao’ was the school’s Combat Skills Teacher and was a tremendous and extraordinary expert. His foresight for talent was extremely fierce. He found quite a few cultivation geniuses and was the one who discovered Fiend Blade Peng Hai from the slums, recognizing that the boy at the time was out of the ordinary. He was the one who had Peng Hai specially admitted! Even though he’s already over 150 years old and is practically retired having quit teaching 10 years ago, he felt too restless at home, so he continues working at this school as he’s done for all his life. This time as the warehouse logistics manager to kill time. At first glance, he looks completely ordinary with his emancipated figure, but his reputation holds great influence in this school. Even Headmaster Baldy Zhao has to show him a bit of face!” Meng Jiang was the school’s king of gossip and rumors, letting out a flood of words to explain to Li Yao.

“The man who unearthed Fiend Blade Peng Hai!” said Li Yao with deep veneration.

“I never thought Old Sun would appear. It seems that things may have changed for the better. Remember, he’s an old man so if you’re a bit clever about it, you may be able to get off scot-free and avert disaster. Go on, hurry!” Meng Jiang pushed Li Yao hard, but suddenly said, “Wait wait!”

“Huh?” Li Yao stood and stopped.

“Little Devil, you said just a moment ago that when facing the threats of opponents, one must first fight to the bloody end. Then one can negotiate and reach compromise. Your words sounded very grand…. But, what if you and your opponent can’t come to peace with each other?” Meng Jiang was pondering over Li Yao’s words all this time. The more he thought, the more he felt the words were cool, awesome, and domineering, but he felt something was a bit off somewhere in those words. And now, he had realized what it was.

“If you can’t make peace, then just run. If you can’t lose them by running, then stall. If you can’t halt by stalling, then you can always just die~!” Li Yao rolled his eyes at his bro for life and walked towards warehouse manager Sun Biao.

He was taller than Sun Biao by a full head. When he stood right in front of Sun Biao, all he could see was the sparse hair on the top of a head. The top of the head was covered in liver spots and looked normal with nothing out of the ordinary.

Actually, Li Yao was at the peak of nervousness with his heart beating wildly… The man who unearthed Fiend Blade Peng Hai was in front of him!

Sun Biao tilted his neck. It seemed that his neck muscles weren’t too good for he used some effort to slant his head. Sun Biao sized up Li Yao carefully and attentively for a long time.

boxn ovel. c0m
The expression in his eyes was like that of a feverish gourmet eyeing a fresh, tender juicy piece of veal. He stared at Li Yao until Li Yao’s scalp was turning numb and Li Yao’s back had chills before he slowly said, “Not bad, scattering that gym chalk!”

Li Yao was caught off-guard and stared blankly. He couldn’t help but reveal a smile. He also felt that using the gym chalk was a good move; it allowed him to seize the advantage and secure a narrow victory.

Otherwise, in a fair fight against Zhao Liang with his Actualization Quotient of 60%, the outcome of which one of them would be beaten into a pig’s head would not be certain!

“However…” Sun Biao took the conversation for a turn and reached out two dried up fingers of his. “If it was me, I wouldn’t have used gym chalk, but rather the iron shavings in the sandbags. As long as enough strength is applied, if there is a direct collision with the retina, it would cause the opponent to lose his vision completely! Then I would scatter iron nails all over the floor. And since my opponent wouldn’t be able to see, he would step all over them and have his foot be absolutely pierced! Of course, this wouldn’t result in death. But when it comes to these sorts of good darling babies who’ve grown in a sheltered environment, their greatest fear is pain. This would certainly cause them to lose all mobility! With the loss of both vision and mobility, all I would need is two seconds to get rid of him!”

Li Yao was dumbstruck hearing Sun Biao. It took a long time before awakening from his stupor. He couldn’t help debating, “But the circumstances were dire. It’s already not bad of me to be able to sneakingly grab a handful of gym chalk. How can there be time to break open a sand bag to get the iron shavings inside? The iron nails are even more ridiculous. Where in the gymnasium are there great quantities of iron nails for me to scatter?”

Sun Biao laughed two evil “ha ha’s”, saying, “As a fighting expert, one must take every second of the 24 hour day to make preparations for battle. Iron shavings, iron nails, and other miscellaneous oddities should absolutely already be carried on your person. Even if you’re taking a shower, you still need to have an iron nail wedged in your ass. You lack even this most fundamental of preparations, and you still dare to come out and fight with others at this school!?”

Li Yao was speechless for a time. He felt all of a sudden that this old fogey was more despicable and shameful than himself by a hundredfold.

Sun Biao gave a cold snort. He continued by saying, “However nowadays, the number of youngsters who can truly fight are dwindling~ I see that you have some potential I suppose. Walk. Let’s go to my place. Chat and keep this old fogey company!”

After all was said, he turned around. With two hands held behind his back, he walked to the warehouse.

Li Yao hesitated for a moment and followed obediently behind the old fogey.

Then he discovered something strange… Sun Biao looked to be unsteady and wavering, shifting with small steps. A single sneezed seemed to be able to topple him. But his speed was not the least bit slow. And, it seemed that he had eyes on the back of his head, for he adjusted his speed according to Li Yao’s. He maintained a distance of 5 meters in front of Li Yao from beginning to end.

Li Yao could not believe he couldn’t catch up to Sun Biao. He clenched his teeth and directly used the Spirit Serpent Footwork Technique, running into a small sprint.

As always, Sun Biao had his pair of hands clasped behind his back and walked with unsteady steps.

But no matter how much Li Yao increased his speed, even to the point of causing his head to sweat in steam, he was completely incapable of cutting the distance by even a hair!

“Is it a high-level footwork technique? Or is it a kind of spatial warping cultivator technique?” Li Yao was astonished down to his core.

To the side, a few students slowly walked at a snail’s pace across them. It was only then did Li Yao suddenly realize. It wasn’t that Sun Biao was walking very fast, but rather he was moving extremely slow!

He was clearly using the Spirit Serpent Technique to its peak hurricane like speed, but he hadn’t even ran 10 meters after running for a long time. All that time, before the other students crossed paths with him, he did not have the slightest clue that something was wrong.

“Could it be an illusionary mental attack?” Li Yao’s scalp turned numb. He finally understood just how unfathomable Sun Biao was. He stopped his technique and followed obediently behind Sun Biao with his tail in between his legs, not daring to act carelessly or rashly.

Something strange happened when he stopped using the footwork technique. The speed of the two had inconceivably sped up. There were over a thousand meters of distance between the ninth gym and the warehouse, but they were able to see the big door of the warehouse after only a minute of walking.

The warehouse was a small building filled and piled with dust. Peeling paint was on quite a few places on the walls, exposing the yellowish brown bricks inside. Overall, the appearance was a bit ugly.

The building did not appear to be big, but a whole universe seemed to be contained inside. At the 7th turn and 8th detour, after passing by piles of goods and items, a shocking sight appeared in front of Li Yao’s eyes — a standard stadium-sized essence Cultivation Field.

Dumbbells, barbells, pec fly machines, squat machines, strength tester machines, crystal clay gel humanoid training dummies… It contained all sorts of cultivation equipment that one could ever need.

However, the majority of the equipment were dozen-year-old models. The finish was coarse, black, and full of rusted spots. They let out a rough and doughty air.

Dust covered every cultivation equipment entirely. It seemed that it had been a long time since they were last used.

They walked to the center of the cultivation field. Sun Biao turned around and did something that Li Yao would have never expected no matter how much he guessed.

This retired old teacher was 150 years old. He unearthed Fiend Blade Peng Hai. He was a person of great reputation and prestige. Yet unexpectedly he faced Li Yao and bowed solemnly. His voice turned incomparably serious as he said, “First and foremost. Student Li Yao, please accept my apologies.”





Home  Forty Millenniums of Cultivation  Chapter 30
 

Chapter 30
 
Chapter 30: You Are So Arrogant~
Translator: Strivon, Ash  Editor: Geoffrey_, Lancent

“Sun, Teacher Sun. Sir, what are you doing?” Li Yao was confused and flustered. He stepped forward, intending to help Sun Biao up. But he never thought that this old fogey would be as immovable as casted metal that continued to maintain its bowed form. No matter how much Li Yao tried, Sun Biao would not move.

Sun Biao was still bending over when he said seriously, “This school is meant for discovering talent and is a place where talented people are fostered. Your overall combat strength isn’t too outstanding, but you possess the combat awareness like that of a keen beast, and you have an abundance of combat experience as well. Indeed, you are a sapling that’s worth nurturing. However, our school was unable to unearth you from the Common Class a bit earlier, wasting and harming a great amount of your youth. This was a neglect of duty by all members of our teaching faculty and staff. So, I can only represent our school in giving you an apology. Student Li Yao, I am truly sorry.”

Li Yao’s mouth was gaping open. He truly did not how to respond. He was indescribably touched from the depths of his heart.

“Is this the mettle of a true ‘teacher’?”

Li Yao had never met a teacher like Sun Biao. No wonder Sun Biao was the man who was able to unearth Fiend Blade Peng Hai!

“Then…” Sun Biao finally rose and once again a frivolous expression appeared on his face. A fanatical flame burned in the depths of his eyes. “Kid, have you heard of the Federation’s Youth Limit Challenge?”

Li Yao’s pupils suddenly shrunk back and he subconsciously nodded his head. His heart rate sped up abruptly.

Of course, he had heard of it before. The Federation’s Youth Limit Challenge Competition was held jointly between the Federal Army and the Nine Elite Universities. It was a large-scale competition that was meant to unearth cultivation geniuses. The competition was held every year around two months before the university exams, with a scope that encompassed the whole nation. It was comprised of several hundred competition arenas that ran simultaneously. This Youth Cultivation Competition was the Federation’s oldest tradition.

It’s said that each competition arena was like an isolated island, built in such a way that no one could escape. The military would set loose countless savage Demon Beasts on the island, and the competitors would have to find a way to survive for five days on the island in unarmed and defenseless circumstances. Besides facing the Demon Beasts, competitors must also complete a series of utterly difficult missions. These missions were known as the “100% Complete Simulation of True Combat”. The difficulty level was set at an absolutely hellish standard.

Competitors were required to push their physical bodies and mental capabilities to the limit. Only then would they be able to distinguish themselves from the many other young geniuses.

Scouts from the Nine Elite Universities were very likely to keep an eye out for those who succeeded and would directly recruit them into the Nine Elite Universities on the spot. There wouldn’t be a need to take the University Entrance Exams.

boxn ovel. c0m
Even if your performance wasn’t that outstanding, as long as one demonstrated a type of special strength, there was still a huge possibility that one would get on the Nine Elite Universities’ Preferential Score Admittance List. If one was able to get their required entrance score reduced by 10~20 points, they would be able to simply eliminate thousands upon thousands of competitors!

These benefits caused all the third year exam takers to rush madly to compete in the Limit Challenge Competition. They sharpened their mental capabilities to prepare to compete, and Li Yao was no exception.

However, this was an important competition. No average Joe Shmoe could willy-nilly take part in it.

Every year, the competition organizers would send out invitations to every major high school in the Federation. The number of “admission tickets” they sent for each high school was determined by the high school’s ranking and strength.

This year, Crimson Nimbus Second received 10 of these tickets!

The competition would start in about 40 days. Crimson Nimbus Second was assigned to competition arena #0571. This area would contain three thousand elite students of Floating Spear City and thirteen neighboring cities. All of these students would be gathered under one roof, to go head to head against each other!

In a month, Crimson Nimbus Second would hold a fighting competition in which all of the third year students were qualified to participate. This was the fairest method to decide which students would get these 10 tickets!

Sun Biao saw Li Yao’s heart racing and infatuated expression and said, “Kid, I know you stirred up some trouble in this school. However, there is a way to get off scot-free! All you need to do is to prove your strength by seizing one of these tickets in the fighting competition. Then Helian Lie can’t do a thing to you!”

Li Yao thought it over and asked, “Over a thousand students make up the third years and there are only 10 admission tickets. In other words, my strength must reach the top 10?”

Sun Biao shook his head saying, “There will certainly be luck involved when the entire grade fights in the competition. Following what happened in the previous years, those whose strength were in the top 20 were able to seize the hope that is the admission ticket.”

Li Yao thought back to his memories. The top 20 in the grade seemed to be composed of cultivation geniuses with an Actualization Quotient of at least 65%.

His Actualization Quotient was only 58%. He could not even achieve an absolute victory just then against the person who was ranked last in the important class, Zhao Liang with his Actualization Quotient of 60%. Li Yao had to rely on underhanded means for victory.

Videos of the fight between him and Zhao Liang would certainly be spread across the entire campus instantly. Everyone would be on their guard. They wouldn’t give him opportunities to prevail.

After a month, would he be able to face directly and prevail against those experts with Actualization Quotients exceeding 65%?

His heart was filled with hesitation, and this hesitation was written all over his face. Sun Biao laughed lightly and said, “Kid, based on your current strength, don’t even think about being top 20 in the whole school. You might not even count as top 50! But, if you receive my special training for a month at my place, then things may change!”

“What?” Li Yao’s pair of eyes flickered and glowed. He jumped from excitement and asked enthusiastically, “Teacher Sun, you’d be willing to teach me personally?”

The man standing across from him was the super amazing man who unearthed Fiend Blade Peng Hai. Yet, this man was willing to carry out special training for him! Tsk tsk tsk tsk. As long as he could cultivate to the strength of Peng Hai’s pinky finger, it would be enough for him to strut arrogantly at Crimson Nimbus Second!

Sun Biao laughed heartily, exposing a big mouth that was missing a few teeth. “This old geezer has been working in this stuffy warehouse for many years. The bones in my entire body are practically rusted. It was rare enough to discover this interesting toy. Free time is still free time. I can play as I wish! However, it’s a bit too soon to be celebrating. This old geezer’s special training program can’t be endured by any average schmuck. Come, kid. Look at this old geezer’s hellish special strength training program.”

Sun Biao’s arm flickered causing a micro crystal processor to project a hologram that was densely packed with words describing cultivation training programs.

“Day one, at 4 am. Run 20,000 meters at a variable speed as a warm up.”

“At 5 am, 10 sets of 10 reps of 500 kg squats. To be done in half an hour.”

“6 am. Breakfast while studying the military applications of the Thirteen Forces of the War Beasts. Only that cultivated by the special forces of the military. It removes all the fanciness and reduces it down to its principles, raising the killing potential of the Thirteen Forces of the War Beasts. It’s completely different than the simplified version cultivated by high school students.”

“7 am. Frog jumping 5km while bearing 100 kg of weight.”

“8 am……”

“9 pm, the first day of special training is done!”

“Day 2……”

Sun Biao grinned nastily and said, “Whats wrong? If you can’t handle this, then speak up now! Don’t be embarrassed. Back in the day, countless cultivation geniuses were trained into dying dogs under this old geezer’s special training program. They had no choice but to give up. Over the course of 90 years, only a few people were able to make it through an entire month!”

Li Yao read through the program rapidly. He finished reading at rapid speed. He asked somewhat baffled, “It looks to be nothing special. Completely average with nothing weird. There’s nothing particular about it…”

In the dream of grandeur, he had assumed the identity of a low-level worker at the Hundred Smelting Guild. He bore through training that was a hundredfold more painful and bitter. That was true persecution and ruin that could easily break a trainee completely. Then the trainee had been kneaded back together, and broken again, then kneaded back together. Only after this happened over and over for several hundred times did he rise from a low-level worker to a forge worker.

Sun Biao’s special training program was, in the end, at the high school level. In the eyes of Li Yao, there was nothing excessive about it.

“Student Li Yao, you sure are arrogant!”

This special training program was formed from 90 years of Sun Biao’s heart and blood. An unknown number of cultivation geniuses had shown shock and horror when faced with this special training program. Yet today, Li Yao had devalued the program to being worthless. And, according to the calm and composed expression on Li Yao’s face, Li Yao really didn’t think this training program was serious.

A prickling glow was unable to be held back by Sun Biao and was let out immediately from the depths of his eyes. Sun Biao’s entire face was wrinkled and bunched together. In an instant, his expression had suddenly changed to an incomparable malevolence.





Home  Forty Millenniums of Cultivation  Chapter 31
 

Chapter 31
 
Chapter 31: I’m No Salted Fish!
Translator: Strivon, Ash  Editor: Geoffrey_, Lancent

Li Yao cried out deep in his heart, “this is bad”. Internally, he asked himself how could he ever take the cruel tempering training of an ancient cultivator guild from 40,000 years ago to be the norm.


He had to keep in mind that in the dream of grandeur, the hundred smelting guild had several hundred low-level workers who were unable to endure the torment and died, crossing over to the afterlife.

The Hundred Smelting Guild was one of the more lenient and benevolent among the major ancient guilds. Several thousands of people would die each year if it were one of the harsher guilds. The Hundred Smelting Guild’s training could be considered a trifling matter.

Needless to say, in regards to the demonic cultivator guilds, the creation of each strong individual came with it, the sacrifice of ten-thousand weaklings.

The Ancient Cultivation Civilization was this ruthless.

“Hic. Teacher Sun, I took a good look at it again. Your infernal special training program of death truly comes from the depths of hell. It’s super deadly and super terrifying~ I’m so scared that I won’t be able to finish it!” Li Yao spoke tongue in cheek.

As an old man, Sun Biao was very much experienced. How could he not see that Li Yao was putting on a show? He was agitated into rage. With a sneer, he said, “Okay, kid. No need to shoot off talking big. Change into training clothes. First, try it out by doing 10 sets of squats.”

Sun Biao got up. He felt out a set of training clothes that had an utterly old-fashioned design from the dust-packed corner of the cultivation field. He tossed it over towards Li Yao.

“Squats? My favorite!” Li Yao warmed up for a bit. He took off his school uniform, changing it for the dust-smelling, old-fashioned training clothes. His eyes gave off a glow as he giggled and spoke.

His current strength was bizarre and astonishing, so what he was least fearful of was squats, bench, and other strength training exercises. In just a moment, when he shows his maximum strength, he will certainly cause the old fogey to have eyes bulging from their sockets!

He walked up to the rusted squat rack and thought for a moment. He flung out two iron plates from the mound of Olympic plates and ferociously pounded them onto the bar.

boxn ovel. c0m
The squatting weight was… 300 kg!

“Indeed, 200kg of weight is too light. It wouldn’t have any effect on tempering my body. I often use 300 kg as a warm up so I’m used to it. It won’t be a problem right, Teacher Sun?” Li Yao clashed a light laugh with Sun Biao, exposing his snow-white teeth.

“Of course, it’s fine. I’m just scared that you might regret it later~” Sun Biao also gave a laugh, exposing tawny teeth.

“It’s no more than 300 kg. Twenty sets can be done by a single breath. What’s there to regret from?” Li Yao spat some saliva into his palms and rubbed his hands together to a burning hot state. He grabbed the bar with a death grip and lifted it onto his solid traps. Suddenly, power was sent through his pair of feet as he lifted the weight up. Then…

He felt his body tighten up. The training clothes, which were originally loose, seemed to awaken with a life of its own, suddenly contracting and transforming into a layer of tenacious leather. It bound him completely!

At the same time, an absolutely powerful bizarre strength exploded down, like a giant mountain striking down and smashing his skull. Suddenly, he was smashed to the ground!

“I forgot to mention, small bastard. This set of training clothes was an artifact that I used for training a dozen years ago. I call it ‘Give Up’. It possesses many magical abilities. The first of which is the ability to create a gravitational field. Wearing these clothes is like wearing a several hundred pound set of armor. Let’s see, right now you’re bearing 200 kilograms of weight on your body!” laughed Sun Biao nastily.

200 kg of weight. Plus the 300 kg of weight on the barbell. That’s a total of half a ton. Li Yao was not prepared for that weight. Of course, he was firmly squashed.

“How despicable. But, five… five hundred kilograms is still nothing special!”

Li Yao was smashed into seeing stars. He gritted his teeth unwaveringly. He braced his hands tightly and veins, thick and solid, popped out on his arms. The bones in his entire body creaked randomly as he stiffly straightened his back. He grasped the barbell once again, spread his feet apart, lowered his hips, and got up with complete stability.

One repetition of the standard squat… was completed!

With a total weight of… 500 kg!

In the dream of grandeur, I had to endure several dozen years under the Titan. His methods were crueler than yours by a hundredfold, you dying old geezer. You think this is hard enough to stop me? You’re dreaming!” cried Li Yao in his heart. He once again squatted down to a deep position to prepare for his second rep.

Suddenly, it was like a bolt of lightning hacked into his soul. Li Yao felt that all 720 acupoints in his body simultaneously conducted with a strong current of electricity. The shock caused his hair to puff up and his eyes to go white. With a blood-curdling shriek, he fell once more to the ground. The barbell slammed heavily into the squat rack with a “Bang!”, causing rust to randomly explode off and dust to fly into the air.

“The second ability of ‘Give Up’ is the ability to produce a powerful electric current. It has short intervals of 3-5 seconds and long intervals of 2 minutes per shock, bombarding against your body’s acupoints. It will stimulate your cells into becoming stronger and purify your body and mind so it can be reborn completely. Tsk tsk tsk tsk. This is a cultivation treasure that anyone would dream of using! The only thing is the small bit of minor pain that comes with it. You can still handle it, right?” Sun Biao was beaming with smiles as he asked.

“You, you’re joking! Of… of course, I can handle this!” Li Yao’s lips were bitten into a bloody mess. He lay on the ground, panting for breath for a long time before he was able to crawl back up with utter difficulty. His right hand was shaking and trembling. He felt for the barbell with a difficulty incomparable.

His fingers hadn’t even touched the barbell when the assault of an unbearable pain came striking once more! This time, the pain wasn’t that of a strong electric current but that of extreme heat!

It was like his entire body was tossed into a volcano. He was struggling in the incomparably hot magma, causing his skin to be roasted and his blood to flow at racing speeds as boiling molten iron!

Then in the next second, the scorching heat suddenly dissipated. In its place was bone-penetrating freezing chill that practically caused even his brains to freeze into an ice cube. He was completely unable to take a breath or think a thought!

He felt the blazing heat and the freezing cold alternate three times before it gradually faded away. Before Li Yao could even screech miserably, an electric current attacked his acupoints once more. It tore through his body, causing him to twitch involuntarily!

“This is the final magical ability of ‘Give Up’. It produces an illusionary attack of a blazing heat and a freezing cold every minute. Be at ease. This targets the deepest and most mysterious part of your mind — it’s all an illusion. It won’t cause harm to a single hair on your body. Instead, it tempers your mental strength by breaking open the depths of your mind. If one day you become a cultivator, it can also allow you to absorb greater amounts of spiritual energy, increasing your cultivation speed by many factors over other people.”

A trace of disappointment flashed on the old fogeys face when he looked at Li Yao’s painful appearance of rolling all over the floor. The old fogey laughed to himself and yawned. He said lazily, “Okay~ I’ve had my fun. Go ahead and change clothes. These clothes weren’t prepared just for you. All you need to say the three words ‘I give up’ and it will automatically remove itself from you. It won’t torment you any longer.”

“Give up?”

Li Yao lied on the ground for a long time. He breathed and breathed, gasping like whale stranded ashore.

At last, he got up inch by inch, like a rusted metal puppet. With extreme difficulty, he placed the barbell on his shoulders, stiffly raising 200 kg of weight. The high electric current and the illusionary blazing heat struck! He exploded out with his second squat rep!

“That’s two!” Li Yao howled out like a beast from the depths of his throat.

He had sounded this battle howl quite frequently in the depths of the Artifact Graveyard.

Sun Biao went “Yi?” in surprise. A trace of shock flashed from within his eyes. Immediately, he sneered, “You only did two reps. One set has exactly 10 whole reps!”

“THR… THREE!” Li Yao’s teeth were clenched, The sound of rusted metal against metal filled the spacious training room.

Four! Five! Six! Seven! Eight! Nine! Ten!

A whole 10 reps of squats while wearing this bizarre clothing “Give Up” caused Li Yao to use up the last of his strength. He pushed out 10 reps of squat with perfect form without a trace of slack!

“I… I did it!” Li Yao’s head was dizzy and his vision was faded. His pair of ears rang with tinnitus and blood rushed wildly from his entire body to his brain. His heart was beating incomparably violently, seeming to practically rip open his chest and leap out.

He lay sprawled under the squat rack, unable to get his body to make a single movement. He stared blankly at the dazzling crystal essence lights on the ceiling. He felt unable to control even a single finger.

Sun Biao’s figure emerged in the edge of his vision with a face of amazement that could not be concealed. The old fogey spoke with a sound that contained some shivering, “Kid, you’re good, right?”

“I, I’m good. I just need to rest for a bit. I still need to do… 9 sets!” Li Yao’s mouth hooked into a smile as he laughed with a laugh that was uglier than crying.

Sun Biao was silent for a moment. He shook his head as he said, “Kid, just give up. I’ve already said that these clothes weren’t meant for ordinary people to use. You can’t possibly wear it and complete 10 sets of squats… There’s still 90 reps to go! Come on then, say ‘I give up’ and have the clothes removed.”

Li Yao swept his gaze across Sun Biao, and he stared once more at the dazzling lights on the ceiling.

Under the refraction of his tears and sweat, those lights turned incomparably bright.

He suddenly realized why the name of this artifact was ‘Give Up’.

It’s because its greatest ability was not the ability to produce a gravitational field of several hundred kilograms, nor its intense electric current assault, nor the blazing heat or freezing cold mental illusions.

Actually, it was pretty simple, ordinary, and easy, stemming from the three words “I Give Up”.

All it would take is for Li Yao’s lips to touch and use the lightest of lightest sounds to say the three words, “I. Give. Up.” to be able to remove this set of training clothes. He would escape from the weight, from the electric current, and from the illusionary mental inhuman persecution. And…

He would lose the courage to wear this set of clothes — for all eternity.

Will… he give up?

The first set of squats had already depleted all the strength in his body. Every strand of muscle, every sliver of vein, every cell in his body was squeezed dry. He felt that he lacked the strength to even go take a piss.

He still had nine sets to go. A whole entire 90 reps of squats. He would have to endure through an onslaught of bearing 200kgs, electric assaults, and illusionary mental attacks. He would have to raise the 300 kg barbell and continuously squat down, get up, and straighten his back.

For a whole 90 reps.

This ought to be fundamentally impossible, right? Even if he grits his teeth and use all of his strength to complete the two sets with all his might, three sets, four sets, five sets, sixth sets, seven sets, eight sets. Any moment during those sets, he could completely collapse, forcing him to say the three words “I give up”.

And so since this is the case, why doesn’t he just give up now?

It’s so easy. All he would need to do is touch his lips together, with a light vibration of his vocal cords, and with a slight opening of his mouth. I. Give. Up. And half a second later, he would be free and relaxed.

“I… Give…” looking at the dazzling lights on the ceiling, Li Yao spoke each word softly.

But within the dazzling lights emerged forth a string of dazzling memories.

“These clothes… weren’t meant for ordinary people.” Sun Biao had said in this manner.

But am I… an ordinary person?”

“An ordinary person… would not carry memories from a previous life upon birth. They wouldn’t remember any sort of messy ‘earth’ affairs, right?”

“An ordinary person… wouldn’t possibly be able to wrest control from and survive against the tyrannical cultivator, Ou Yezi, of 40,000 years ago, and instead, engulf Ou Yezi’s memories, right?”

“These two events, whichever bastard would have one of these things happen to them would not be considered an ordinary person. As for me, I’ve experienced both phenomenon!”

“Then… am I going to… in the face of these training clothes that weren’t meant for the ordinary person…. Give up?”

Li Yao suddenly withdrew his line of sight from the ceiling lights, shrinking into the depths of his pupils, and transforming into a needle-sharp stellar glow.

“Teacher Sun… am I allowed to listen to music?” he suddenly spoke lightly.

“Listen to music?” Sun Biao never expected that Li Yao would ask this sort of question. He was distracted for a great amount of time before saying, “Sure, if you want.”

“Okay, give me 30 more seconds.”

Li Yao laughed lightly, closed his eyes, and stuffed the “Tone Bell” artifact crafted by the Sounds of Wonder Guild into his ears.

Lu Yinxi resounded greatly with a voice in his ears that seemed to be able to pierce through the entire galaxy. Her voice immediately vibrated within the depths of his soul:

“After the raging waves and stormy seas, I stagger onward with all my might!”

“My heart fears not the striking of thunder for the lightning shall illuminate the path ahead!”

“I am completely different from you!”

Li Yao abruptly opened his eyes.

The size of the needle-sharp stellar glow in his eyes had already disappeared. In other words… His pair of eyes were filled completely with the stellar glow!

And then, he said a sentence that caused Sun Biao to be at a loss for words: “I… am no salted fish…”

“What did you say?” Sun Biao thought he had misheard. What salted fish?

Li Yao didn’t hear the old geezer’s question under the bombardment of the wild music; he was completely immersed in his own world. He spoke in whispers, “Perhaps I was a salted fish in my dream since I had given up in various situations. I dried up. I withered. And gradually, I turned into a salted fish. Turning into an ordinary person.”

“But me. I am no salted fish. I… absolutely will not give up!”

Li Yao stood up. 300 kg of weight was on his shoulders. An electric current ran all over his body. A screaming freezing chill and a devastating magma ran through the depths of his mind.

Yet still, he griped onto the barbell. His strength was very great, for even the hard steel creaked under his palm.

“The second set of squats starts now!”

The cultivation field, covered with the dust of several years, resounded once more with roars like the raging waves and stormy seas. A boiling fervor surged in waves of heat!





Home  Forty Millenniums of Cultivation  Chapter 32
 

Chapter 32
 
Chapter 32: He’s a Monster!
Translator: Strivon, Ash  Editor: Geoffrey_, Lancent

Sun Biao had a somewhat dazed expression as he saw Li Yao act in this wild and crazed manner. The muscles in Li Yao’s entire body were torn with one rep after another. Sun Biao’s thoughts flew back to a time a dozen years ago; he sunk into old memories.


The reflection of Li Yao’s figure in the depths Sun Biao’s pupils seemed to gradually be overlapped by a tall, lofty figure, becoming a different person.

Only when a chirping sound came from the lower right corner of the hologram, accompanied by a faint vibration on his wrist, did the old fogey awaken from his thoughts. He swallowed some spittle, moistening his somewhat dried throat. He withdrew himself to a corner so that Li Yao couldn’t see him and he opened up the e-crane instant messenger function.

The image of a clear and elegant figure appeared, mixed with a chilling air, in the center of the hologram.

“Old Sun. Sir, I see that you have already taken that child away. I truly thank you sir for your actions this time!” Si Jiaxue expressed her gratitude with utmost sincerity.

Sun Biao chuckled saying, “My dear little Xue. You even went through your father to come seeking for this old geezer. What more can I say? However, in the end, what is the relationship between you and this kid? Why do you want to help him?”

Si Jiaxue frowned slightly. It seemed that she was very unwilling to be associated with Li Yao. She explained seriously, “Old Sun, there’s not even a trace of a relationship between me and this little scoundrel. There’s only the matter of me entrusting him, a few days ago, with the repair of an old model crystal processor left behind by my grandma. It was because of this that Helian Lie, the mad dog that he is, created a disturbance with this scoundrel. In the end, this matter came forth because of me. So of course, I should not allow him to be bitten by mad dog Helian Lie; otherwise, wouldn’t people have misgivings dealing with me?”

With the raising of his eyebrows, Sun Biao adopted a mischievous expression, “So it’s that simple eh? It’s not that dear little Xue has fallen for this kid right?”

“Him? Preposterous!” Si Jiaxue couldn’t help laughing.

Sun Biao did not expect this response. He said speechlessly, “Even this outrageous kid is not enough for you. My dear little Xue, your standards are uncommonly high!”

Si Jiaxue lightly laughed and changed the subject. The elderly and the youth chatted idly for a few sentences. Sun Biao cut off communications and raised his head once again, hearing Li Yao roaring himself hoarse:

boxn ovel. c0m
“THE SEVENTH SET. STARTS NOW!”

“This monster! It can’t be! Can he truly wear ‘Give Up’ and complete 10 whole sets of squats?” Sun Biao’s astonishment was enough to cause tingling in his scalp, scratching his head as he pondered. After a short moment later, he found a name from his address book and sent out an e-crane message.

Soon, a virtual crane flew out from the lower right corner of the hologram. Its wings extended and it transformed into a projection of a clear 3D figure of a person. To be exact, it was Fiend Blade Peng Hai.

Peng Hai was lying down in a relaxed comfortable manner in a bathtub. A large plate of fruit floated in front of him. Peng Hai was in utter pleasure as he soaked in his bath.

Peng Hai laughed as he said, “Old geezer, I was just about to ask if you wanted to grab dinner tonight and ask about a certain person in the meantime. Do you know if our Crimson Nimbus Second has had any sort ‘Monster-level’ student graduate within the past few years?”

“Monster-level? There weren’t any sort of special saplings in the past few years. Everyone was pretty normal and ordinary. I need to really think about this! Oh! Let’s put this matter on a hold for now. I want to tell you some explosive news… Do you still remember the clothes I specifically crafted for you a dozen years ago? ‘Give Up’?” Sun Biao rubbed his hands, wanting to give Peng Hai a scare.

The muscles on Fiend Blade Peng Hai’s face twitched as he recalled back to the unbearable memories of past events. He said with rage through gritted teeth, “Of course, I remember! You dead old geezer! You actually crafted such a vicious artifact! No wonder you were formerly known as the ‘Degenerate of the Cultivators’, you scum!”

Sun Biao laughed mischievously as he was actually quite fond of this nickname. He said impatiently, “This set of clothes has been tossed in the corner and laid there ever since you graduated. I never used it at all. But today, there has been a student who put it on!”

“What?”

Fiend Blade Peng Hai really was shocked into paralysis. With an expression that didn’t know whether to laugh or cry, he said, “Dead geezer, you have a way too mischievous heart. This type of thing isn’t something that you should give someone to wear willy-nilly. This is something that will torture someone into having a mental breakdown!

Sun Biao was somewhat embarrassed. He grumbled, “At first, I saw the kid running too wildly. I just wanted to knock him off his high horse and give him a little taste. After two minutes, he would cry for his mom and dad and remove the clothes like a good boy, right? Who would have imagined that once this kid had a taste of it, he still wanted more! Not wanting to remove it after wearing it! And he also did 7 sets in a breath of time… That’s not right, it was eight sets of 300 kilogram squats!”

Fiend Blade Peng Hai asked astonished, “Crimson Nimbus Second actually has this kind of cultivation genius? How come I didn’t know? Don’t tell me he’s not a third year, but a first or second year?”

Sun Biao extended a finger, lightly swaying it. “Nope, he’s not a cultivation genius.”

“Not a cultivation genius?” Peng Hai frowned.

Sun Biao squinted his eyes and said in complete seriousness, “Think back to those times when I crafted ‘Give Up’. You were only 14 years old, but your Actualization Quotient had already hit 100%! You were able to connect to the essence of heaven and earth and draw spiritual energy into your body. You had a strong body, and your mental strength was firm. So, you were able to cross this ordeal of ‘Give Up’!”

Sun Biao paused, breathing in and out. It seemed that even now he dared not believe the sight he’d seen. Sun Biao continued, “And this kid will already be 18 years old this year with a maximum Actualization Quotient of 60%. And his fleshly body is still completely that of a child’s. He’s using his fleshly body paired with his monstrously thick level of mental fortitude to forcefully withstand ‘Give Up’! Your kind is a cultivation genius that can hardly be seen once every hundred years. But this kind of person can only be described from head to toe as… a monster!”

Fiend Blade Peng Hai was moved. He never thought that his teacher would hold this kid in such a high regard. He was also interested. “Old geezer, send me a recording to watch?”

“No problem. Oh, that’s right. I have a recording of a fight he just had. I’ll send them both for you to watch. Although from a strength perspective, he’s still at the fighting level of a child, but in regards to his battle awareness and his usage of his surroundings… Hehe. I’ll say something that will make you mad. It seems that he’s more suited than you for inheriting my title of the ‘Degenerate of Cultivators’!”Sun Biao laughed vulgarly as he sent over a few videos.

“Why would I be mad~? I currently walk amongst the circle of cultivators, and I’ve never dared to be recognized as the succeeding disciple of the ‘Degenerate of Cultivators’. Otherwise… I fear that every minute there will be a group of justice seeking, demon beheading, devil exterminating, knights coming to cause harm to the circle of cultivators. I’m exactly looking for someone who can really inherit your legacy!”

Peng Hai giggled as he received the videos. He opened them indifferently.

The more he watched, the straighter he sat, and the more astonished his expression. A wisp of cheer flashed in the depths of his eyes.

“How is he? Not bad right? I don’t have any impression on any sort of monster-level graduate you’re looking for. Anyway, in the past dozen years, the only small monster that’s been able to shock me into stupefaction is precisely this one kid! Why don’t you come over if you’re interested and chat with this little bastard?” Laughed Sun Biao.

“No need. You go and chat without me. Later, I will ‘talk’ with him all night long and chat until daybreak!“ Fiend Blade Peng Hai said, beaming with smiles. His smiling expression was extremely vicious.





Home  Forty Millenniums of Cultivation  Chapter 33
 

Chapter 33
 
Chapter 33: A Night of Unbearable Pain
Translator: Strivon, Ash  Editor: Geoffrey_, Lancent

Li Yao was still struggling against the steel barbell inside the squat rack. He bursted forth with all his energy to do the final set.


He didn’t know that from the start, behind him in the dim corner of the room, an old bastard called the Degenerate of Cultivators and a fiendish bastard expert known as Fiend Blade were whispering to each other. They were discussing details on strength training for Li Yao with things escalating the more they discussed.

Finally…

“I did it! 10 sets of squats!” Li Yao roared like a wild beast. His two eyes turned white as he fell straight back to create a “bang!”. The sweat around his body formed a large human figure on the ground!

With a fuzzy mind, he felt Sun Biao head towards him and feed him a medicinal pill the size of a small baby’s fist. When the pill entered his mouth, he didn’t have the chance to chew before it transformed into an incomparable spicy, hot liquid that flowed down his throat into his belly.

Irritation. The irritation was too much. It was more irritating than eating an entire bowl of mustard. The spice caused Li Yao’s eyes to overflow with tears that splattered everywhere. Suddenly, he leapt from the ground, jumping a meter high, “Water! Water! Get me water fast!”

“Kid, how do you feel at the moment?” Sun Biao asked with a beaming smile.

“Huh?” Li Yao blinked his eyes. He felt his body from head to toe and discovered something weird. The exhaustion and spent feeling in his body had actually been swept out, although his mouth was still filled with the incomparable, irritable spiciness. Every single part of his body contained an abundance of strength. His physical ability was restored back to his maximum state!

“Today was just the opening appetizer. The true training begins tomorrow. Is there a problem~? Student Li Yao?” Sun Biao snapped his fingers lightly, causing the training clothes on Li Yao’s body to automatically be shed like the molting of a snake.

Li Yao was like a startled bunny, running to the entrance of the warehouse with only three steps. Only then did he look back and answer through gritted teeth, “Of course, it’s not a problem. I’ll still come back here tomorrow morning. You just wait!”

“Sure~!” Sun Biao laughed nastily. He then spoke to himself in a low voice, “The only thing is… I fear that you won’t even be able to get out of your bed tomorrow morning, you little monster!”

boxn ovel. c0m
……

8 PM. Li Yao arrived at the Militant Wolf Slayers Gym right on the dot. He was overflowing with confidence towards tonight’s three minute spar.

What a joke! He was able to grit through the pain and endure through that sinister, deceitful, despicable, shameless, cruel, and brutal ‘Give Up’. It can’t be that he wouldn’t to be able to endure through 3 minutes of the smiling clown’s assault, right?

Only… Looking at the strange smiling expressions that covered the smiling clown and bald gym owner’s faces caused him to feel a bit of nervousness in his heart.

These two good friends, with their smiling faces, were like two hungry wolves with rumbling stomachs. They looked at Li Yao as if he were a clean washed rabbit slathered with sauce. This look, in the eyes of Li Yao, caused Li Yao to feel that there was a gargantuan conspiracy being covered by their smiling expressions.

“Is your belly hungry? Do you want to first eat a grand buffet? Look and see! There’s so many high-calorie military MREs. Go ahead and eat to your heart’s content!” laughed the bald gym owner.

“After you finish eating, you can also use the strengthening drug bath! And you can also get a massage from a master masseur! This way, your stamina will be restored to your peak state!” said the smiling clown.

“You guys… What are you plotting?” Li Yao had cold sweat trickle down his forehead, feeling his danger senses tingling.

The smiling clown and the bald gym owner glanced at each other. They laughed involuntarily, saying, “It’s nothing! There’s absolutely nothing going on! How could we ever be plotting something? All we wanted was just to make sure you’re brought to your best condition so that you can spar for a good five minutes!”

“Five minutes? The contract obviously says three minutes!” Li Yao suddenly jumped up.

The smiling clown raised two fingers as he said, “Twenty grand. All you need to do is endure through 5 minutes and I will give you twenty grand!”

……

The night… felt absolutely endless.

The Ghost Market was a dozen or so kilometers from the surface. The Upper Eastern District extended to include the villas on the artificial lakes. In the basement of one of the luxurious villas was…

“Bang! Bang! Bang! Bang!”

A lash ripped through the air and deeply embedded itself into someone’s back. The sound of a whip striking was enough to cause one’s hair to stand on end.

A giant with exploding muscles and dark hair all over his body gripped a whip that contained special pain-causing drugs. One whip after another lashed out ruthlessly, seemingly seeking to flay the still-living Helian Lie dead.

The wooden bar within Helian Lie’s mouth had already been bitten into a pulp. Surprisingly, Helian Lie had yet to scream even half a squeak. His gaze remained fixed ahead.

In front of Helian Lie was an enormous hologram. It played, over and over, the entire fight between Li Yao and Zhao Liang that had happened during the day at the 9th gym.

Helian Lie’s expression was that of a wolf and tiger. He wished with all his hate to be able to jump into the screen and eat Li Yao whole.

“Do you know why you’re receiving this family punishment?” the towering iron giant spoke coldly behind Helian Lie. His voice was both sharp and piercing, a complete contradiction from his thick and buff body. It was a stark contrast.

“According to father, it’s my fault. I shouldn’t have stirred up trouble in public, causing our Helian family to lose face!” Helian Lie snorted indifferently.

“Nonsense!”

Helian Ba’s rage flared! A kick flew out that actually caused the torture rack to forcefully split, sending Helian Lie flying into the wall!

This powerful and heavy kick contained absolutely no mercy. Helian Lie’s skull collided directly into the wall, forming a crater in the granite adorned wall. Helian Lie fell to the ground. Blood spurted wildly from his mouth, even bringing three white thick teeth out of his mouth.

Helian Ba didn’t even glance at Helian Lie while he walked over with large strides. His leather boots crushed, with strength, onto his son’s face. He said each word with a stomp, “Although it’s true that your father doesn’t like you causing trouble in public, it’s because even though you stirred up trouble, you still lost that badly in that manner! I dislike that even more! A lion facing a rabbit still must use all his strength. Even if you were facing a piece of trash from the Common Class, you, a genius of the Important Class, should not have lowered your guard in that fashion. Keep in mind that any person who becomes your enemy is qualified for you to use all your strength. Do you understand yet?”

“Under… understand. I won’t underestimate any opponents. I will absolutely get my revenge!” Helian Lie’s skull echoed with creaks under his father’s military boots. Helian Lie howled with all his strength.

Helian Ba gave a cold snort, “Think it over before doing anything. That old fart Sun Biao pulled the kid out of trouble. Be peaceful for this period of time. Don’t give me any more trouble!”

Helian Lie’s eyes suddenly bulged open as he cried out, “It can’t be that we’re letting it go like this? Dad, you’re a board member of our school. Don’t tell me that you’re scared of that dead, retired old geezer Sun Biao? True. I’ve heard that in his younger years, he was quite a fierce cultivator in the circle, but he’s made too many enemies. He suffered a critical injury from an attack a dozen years ago. The strength he has left is no more than 1% of his peak, so he was forced to hide in Crimson Nimbus Second and act as an ordinary teacher. And right now, he’s so old with many plaguing ailments. He could die any moment now! Do we really need to be this scared of him?”

Helian Ba scowled. The weight of his foot increased by several factors. With a deep shout, he said, “What do you know? A cultivator, in the end, is still a cultivator. Even if he only has 1% of his strength, even if he only has 1 second left to live, as long as he’s not completely dead, we cannot lower our guard! What’s even more is, that this undying old man has said that he won’t dedicate his life protecting the kid. He just wants us to give him a month of time. After a month, he will stand aside and do nothing… It’s a far too unspeakable action if I don’t show him this tiny bit of face; after all, I am only a board member, not the chairman. Even if I am the chairman, I would still need to follow proper conduct as a cultivator of the circle. Otherwise, hatred may be born between me and another cultivator, one that will last until one of us dies. Death would be looming over my head every minute!”

“A month of time… Fine! I will wait a month then!” Helian Lie’s handsome face was warped and twisted under the military boot. It was an expression of incomparable enmity.





Home  Forty Millenniums of Cultivation  Chapter 34
 

Chapter 34
 
Chapter 34: A Savage Beast Emerges From its Cage
Translator: Strivon, Ash  Editor: Geoffrey_, Lancent

From that day forwards, Crimson Nimbus Second had a new legend spread around campus.


“Hey, did y’all hear about ‘that’?”

“Of course~ It really was way too scary, too terrible, and too brutal!”

Lunch time in the school’s dining hall, several girls were whispering among themselves. Fear lingered in their hearts.

“What ‘thing’ are y’all talking about? How could it frighten y’all to shivers?” one of the duller girls asked puzzled.

A school girl, with a face full of freckles, looked left and right before saying in a low and secretive voice, “You didn’t hear? There’s someone in the third year called Li Yao. He’s a screwed ghost! I don’t know how he offended Helian Lie, but he even beat one of Helian Lie’s underlings down to the ground. So, Helian Lie’s been provoked into a giant rage! It’s become even worse; he tortured Li Yao! Those who’ve been tortured by Helian Lie don’t resemble people anymore. Their ghosts don’t resemble ghosts!”

“Dear god, Helian Lie! My prince charming! So in the end, how did he torture Li Yao?” asked the dull-witted girl in surprise.

The freckled girl promptly covered her mouth and said, “Be a little bit quieter! How can we talk about something like this loud and screaming? Obviously, we haven’t personally seen the details of the torture. But all you need to do is to take one look at Li Yao and you will know just how miserable people become when they offend Helian Lie!

“She’s right. I’ve heard that Helian Lie locked Li Yao into the school’s warehouse, torturing him day in and day out. I passed through the alley behind the warehouse one time. I heard blood-curdling screams going “AHHHHHHHHHHHHHHH” coming out from the warehouse. Those screams seemed to come straight from the depths of hell! I don’t want to talk about how terrifying it was. It scared me out of my mind! Even though I’d left my shoe behind, I was too scared to go back to get it!” verified another chubby girl.

“Is it as exaggerated as you all say?” asked the dull-witted girl in doubt.

Right at this moment, a boy with a bloody nose, swollen face, haggard appearance, and a completely exhausted body, walked past the girls, trembling and swaying, staggering and stumbling, with an unsteady gait. The moment his buttocks hit the chair, his entire body slumped over onto the table as if he were made of mud.

boxn ovel. c0m
“Look! That’s Li Yao right there!” The freckled girl’s eyes shined while she poked the dull-witted girl without delay.

The dull-witted girl turned around and looked. She couldn’t help let out a gasp of surprise, “Dear god! It’s even worse than you say! His entire face has turned into a pig’s head! Hurry, look! He’s shivering non-stop all over his body! There are bloody blisters all over his hands and they’re still bleeding! How horrible!”

Right as she spoke, Li Yao suddenly went into a violent twitching fit. His head even jerked up from the spasms.

“You see it, right? Those are the symptoms of being beaten into epilepsy,” whispered the freckled girl.

And opposite of Li Yao came his bro for life Meng Jiang, carrying lunch. In total, there were 10 sausages each as thick as an arm, 20 giant meatballs, a giant wooden bowl of rice, and 10 MRE biscuits meant for military consumption.

“Little Devil, don’t lie to me. Are you really getting special training from Sun Biao? You’re not getting beat up by Helian Lie’s henchmen are you?” Meng Jiang asked once again, his eyes full of doubt.

Li Yao’s mouth pulled back into a laugh that was uglier than crying. He lacked the strength to even talk.

“If you knew it would be like this earlier, it might have been better to just take a beating from Helian Lie!” Bro for life Meng Jiang let out a deep sigh.

From not too far away, the girls continued their conversation in whispers.

“How can he eat so much! He’s simply a monster!” said the dull-witted girl.

“I know the answer to this!”

The chubby girl said with some pity, “According to psychology, when one’s mental pressure becomes too strong, one would involuntarily get an insatiable appetite and would eat an enormous amount of food to relieve their stress. Personally, I have to manage depression all day due to my parents fighting at home, so I can’t help but eat more and more. However…”

The chubby girl glanced down at the two sausages, three giant meatballs, and one large ball of rice on her plate. She looked once more at the giant mountain of meat piled in front of Li Yao, coming to a conclusion, “From the way he eats, he must be at a terminal stage. He’s on the verge of a mental breakdown!”

“That’s so sad!” The dull-witted girl saw Li Yao’s figure twitching from time to time. Her expression was full of pity.

“So that’s why people say that in our school, you can mess with anyone… just as long as it’s not Helian Lie! Even if you offended Helian Lie by accident, you need to beg for forgiveness immediately! By all means, do not go against him. Otherwise… you will end up as screwed as a ghost!” said the freckled girl in all seriousness.

Upon seeing Li Yao’s “Tragic Experience”, this was the common conclusion of every student in Crimson Nimbus Second.

However, Li Yao was described in a totally different image within the e-crane messages between Sun Biao and Peng Hai.

Day Seven of Special Training. Sun Biao’s and Peng Hai’s chat logs.

Sun Biao: “He’s not human! It’s impossible that this kid’s a human! It’s only been the seventh day of special training, yet he increased the gravitational field of ‘Give Up’ to 400kg and completed the whole workout! I even increased the intensity of the training program by 20%, yet that’s still not hard enough to stop him! How about you? Ol’Hai, how goes it on your end?”

Peng Hai: “Needless to say, he sparred with me for a full ten minutes last night. There were many times where I was nearly hit by him. Even if I only used 3% of my true power, this type of feeling truly… puts me in a bad mood! Anyway, I was finally able to make huge improvements on my strength control capabilities under his pressure!”

…

Day Thirteen of Special Training. Sun Biao’s and Peng Hai’s chat logs.

Sun Biao: “This kid squatted 500 kg of weight and completed two days worth of workouts! Oh that’s right, his Actualization Quotient increased by 4% to 62% in a short three days. Does this even count as being human? Hey Ol’Hai, talk to me! Why aren’t you saying anything!”

Peng Hai: “He managed to hit me with a punch last night in the stomach.”

Sun Biao: “……”

Peng Hai: “……”

Sun Baio: “Hahahahahahaha! If I’m the Degenerate of Cultivators, then that simply makes you the Disgrace of Cultivators! You were actually hit by an ordinary person!”

Peng Hai: “I only used 3% of my true strength! I wasn’t just restricting down to 3% of my physical strength, but I was also restricting my hearing, sight, smell, speed… Everything was restricted down to 3%! It’s perfectly normal to be accidently hit by him! No, this won’t do. Tonight, I will use 4% of my true power!”

Sun Biao: “Then what will happen to your ‘Strength Control Special Training’?”

Peng Hai: “F*ck my strength control special training. This senior needs to first let out some steam!”

…

Day Twenty-Five of Special Training. Sun Biao’s and Peng Hai’s chat logs.

Sun Biao: “I’ve already raised all of Give Up’s magical abilities to their limits! It’s basically the equivalent of your training difficulty back in the day, yet this kid still can forcefully squat that barbell! It’s way too horrifying! Even I’m a bit scared of looking at his expression when he grinds his teeth with rage. What do you think… .Should I draw some of his blood to get some lab tests done?”

Peng Hai: “Lab tests, why?”

Sun Biao: “This kid absolutely has some Demon Beast blood lineage running inside him. He’s 100% a savage beast!”

…

The Final Day of Special Training. Sun Biao’s and Peng Hai’s chat logs.

Peng Hai: “Isn’t it the final day? In a few hours, it will be the ‘Hour of Intense Battle’. Over a thousand Third Year students will fight for the 10 tickets. So how is he? How’s the kid’s situation?”

Sun Biao: “I’m not sure how to say this, but I’m a bit scared to let him go out.”

Peng Hai: “Why is that?”

Sun Biao: “I’m scared that when this savage beast emerges from its cage, it will cause the entire school to explode into the heavens!”





Home  Forty Millenniums of Cultivation  Chapter 35
 

Chapter 35
 
Chapter 35: The Hour of Intense Battle
Translator: Strivon, Ash  Editor: Geoffrey_, Lancent

April 12th. Light showers with a slight breeze. 61 Days 13 Hours 22 Minutes and 45 Seconds remain until the university entrance exams!


Today was Crimson Nimbus Second’s annual ‘Hour of Intense Battle’. All the first and second years have the day off, leaving the campus to be a battlefield for the third years. The third years will strive over 10 tickets to the “Youth Limit Challenge Competition”, fighting to the bloody end!

The rules are simple. First, 10 seeded competitors will be chosen out of all the Third Year Students via lottery fashion. Each of these students will receive a ticket to carry on their bodies and each of these students will be dispersed around the campus. It was up to the student to decide whether to go into hiding or to form a group. Anything goes, as long as the student doesn’t leave campus.

And the other students can use any methods, any strategies, and any objects found within the campus to attack these 10 seeded competitors and seize by force their tickets.

All the admission tickets were sealed in special artifact boxes. Every half a minute, these boxes will send a ripple of spiritual energy to notify every student’s handheld crystal processor of the positions of these tickets. So, the students needn’t worry about a ticket holder hiding in a dark corner, camping despicably until the contest was over.

The fierce battle begins at 10 in the morning and ends at 3 in the afternoon — a total of 5 hours. Only the students who still held onto the tickets to the end will receive the qualifications to participate in the Federation’s Youth Limit Challenge!

Early Morning, 8:45

One by one, fluffy puffy balls of flesh opened their round and plump eyes. They were of every color imaginable, like bright colors of the rainbow, and used all their effort to flutter their flabby wings. They flew through the air crying “Puji puji puji”, dispersing around campus.

This was an artificial Demon Beast whose scientific name was Flying Piglet Eye. Experts from the Beast Guild used the blood of piglets, bunnies, and various flying creatures to create this amalgamation. This new species was created after cross-breeding several dozens of generations.

Special crystal camera chips were even installed in the bodies of these Flying Piglet Eyes. Whatever is seen by these Flying Piglet Eyes can be transmitted to crystal processors nearby.

These sorts of things were originally engineered with the purpose of being floating security cameras.

boxn ovel. c0m
However, due to their fluffy shape, chubby body, and the laughter-like “Puji puji” sounds they made while flying in the air, they soon became popular among every household. They became an extraordinarily hot household pet and were called “Puji Critters” by the masses.

A thousand Puji Critters spread to every nook and cranny across campus, getting into position for surveillance. Over a thousand real-time videos were broadcasted to gigantic holograms installed in three VIP lounges.

The first VIP lounge was set up in gymnasium number 1. It was extremely large and was meant for the family heads to come watch their children. A thousand family heads had already gathered inside, creating a cauldron of voices that clamored loudly.

The second VIP lounge was set up in the school’s assembly room, providing footage of the fights to the teachers and elite students of various sister schools within Floating Spear City… This sort of school exchange was extremely common. Crimson Nimbus Second also sends their elite students and teachers to other high schools to exchange and learn from their admission ticket competitions.

The third VIP lounge was set up directly in the headmaster’s office. All those present were either of school administration or board members.

However, at this moment, the headmaster, head instructor, supervisors of each grade, and even the board members, whose positions exceeded the rest, gathered around a single person like stars cupping the moon. With great reverence and respect, they circled around an extremely scholarly middle-aged man, who’s temple hair has gone white.

This refined and scholarly middle-aged man was called Zhou Yin and was a cultivator of the Building Foundation Stage. He was the elder responsible for nurturing new admittees to the Crimson Nimbus Guild and was the immediate supervisor to the administration of Crimson Nimbus Second!

Zhou Yin was graceful and elegant, lacking completely the air of arrogance. He said with a completely cordial laugh, “We have made much improvement in our education’s quality this year for Crimson Nimbus Second, producing some good saplings. Speaking of which, I’ve heard that a Helian Lie and also a Si Jiaxue are some decent new talent. Oh, that’s right! I remember that Helian Lie is Board Member Helian’s only son, right?”

“Yes. I never thought Elder Zhou would know of my unaccomplished son!” Helian Ba’s entire face glowed red, shining with a smile.

“As long as one has talent, I would remember them without a doubt. The future of the Crimson Nimbus Guild belongs to them~! Alrighty then! It’s exactly 9 o’clock! Begin the games!”

With a wave of his hand, Zhao Yin’s face suddenly turned serious with an expression like an unapproachable stranger; he had entered into his business mode, changing into a different person entirely.

The hour of intense battle — officially begins!

A sharp, beautiful bell rang throughout campus. A thousand third-year students, with bloodshot eyes, leapt out from various nooks and crannies within the school buildings. Each of these students had their head lowered, looking at their micro crystal processors.

Soon, they discovered the 10 ticket bearers among the crowd — their targets.

“Found one. He’s over there! Eliminate him quick!”

The 10 seeded competitors were chosen at random, so their strengths weren’t necessary strong and oppressive. With a blood-curdling shriek, they were engulfed by the tide of people.

Several dozen medical flying shuttles circled endlessly in the sky to be readily available at all times. Doctors and nurses from the nearby major hospitals were temporarily hired and stationed on these flying shuttles. They, along with several healing-specialized cultivators, would put an end to any accidental mishaps from occurring.

Since the fighting will last until three in the afternoon before coming to an end, the students who emerged first weren’t necessarily the ones with the strongest power. For example, practically none of the students of the Important Class has made a move so far. They rested with closed eyes in incomparable luxury within their classroom.

The students currently participating in the fighting were doomed with no chance of holding onto a ticket until 03:00 PM.

However, that was not a problem since the school had something to motivate these students. They specifically set up incentives of every level. As long as a student seizes a ticket for a moment, no matter if it’s 5 or 10 minutes, they will receive a prize.

And so, these students of the Ascending and Common Class also fought with their lives at stake. Even though their power weren’t that special, the hair-raising rage and blood-bath attitudes they exhibited caused the scenes of fighting to be quite lively.

“AHH! DIE!!”

A student who held a ticket in his pocket leapt down the stairwell and was trampled with a kick to the sternum by another student hiding in the corner, who then seized the ticket away.

And once this student discovered that there was nobody in his surroundings, he connivingly hid himself away into the girl’s restrooms. Only to be raided by a male student who had hidden himself in ambush at an earlier time within a bathroom stall. The admission ticket changed hands again!

Similar scenes played out in the various nooks and corners around campus. Every now and then, heads were broken and blood flowed, muscles snapped and bones fractured. These injured students were lifted into the medical treatment shuttles.

Within the third VIP lounge, the VIPs commented one after another on the scenes displayed on the giant hologram.

“This student’s speed is very fast! His reactions are extremely quick! The only problem is his attacking power; it’s a little bit weak. Otherwise, he may be able to enter into the Important Class!”

“I’ve heard that Crimson Nimbus Second has, over the years, introduced several ex-military combat experts to their school. You all look! When their students fight, they bring forth a hint of military killing techniques. It looks likes Crimson Nimbus Second has large ambitions. Who knows what eruptions they will bring at this year’s university exams!”

The second VIP lounge.

Behind a placard written with the words ‘Phoenix Ridge Second’ was a person in deep sleep. This person snored loudly, covered under a school uniform that permeated with the air of alcohol.

To the side of him, a young female teacher from Phoenix Ridge Second wrinkled her brow. She prodded him without batting an eyelid and said, “Big Dong, you pestered the school cause you wanted to come over and watch the fight. Why is it that once you came here, you started sleeping again, snoring loudly?”

A voice filled with discontent grumbled out from beneath the uniform. After some time, a puffy, swollen eye opened up and a fat face snaked out. The head was oily and the face covered with makeup — it was clear that this person engaged in excessive debauchery. He squinted his eyes in the fashion of a cat and gazed indifferently at the hologram. He yawned once again, digging back under the uniform.

Zheng Dongming’s voice came lazily out from under the uniform, “Don’t be noisy. The person I want to see still hasn’t appeared yet.”

“Are you waiting for Si Jiaxue? Or are you waiting for Helian Lie?” asked the young female teacher.

A chuckle came from under the uniform. “If it’s just those two, why would I ever crawl up from my bed with 7 beauties on it and come to this damnable place?”

The young female teacher asked baffled, “Si Jiaxue and Helian Lie are both widely known to be Crimson Nimbus Second’s strongest. If even they don’t have the qualifications to attract you here, then who are you waiting to watch?”

The uniform was still for a moment. A fat wily hand suddenly extended out, groping towards beneath the young school teacher’s skirt. The female teacher’s body trembled with a shiver, and she nibbled with her pearly white teeth. But, she didn’t resist.

As Zheng Dongming groped, he spoke lazily, “The one I’m waiting for is not the strongest, but the fiercest!”





Home  Forty Millenniums of Cultivation  Chapter 36
 

Chapter 36
 
Chapter 36: Li Yao Enters the Field!
Translator: Strivon, Ash  Editor: Geoffrey_, Lancent

Noon at 12 O’clock.


The second batch of people with average strength had spent all their energy fighting. Practically half of these people retired from injuries, lacking the ability to continue fighting.

Only now did the students of the Important Class leave their classroom. They warmed up their bodies and started to join in on the scramble.

They entered the field, causing the intensity of fights to increase by several factors. 10 admission tickets fell quickly into the hands of the Important Class of students. The battlefield had turned into a civil war amongst the Important Class.

01:30 PM. Aside from Helian Lie and Si Jiaxue, all the students of the Important Class took the field!

02:10 PM. Si Jiaxue slowly opened her beautiful eyes and entered the fray!

02:15 PM. The king of Crimson Nimbus Second, Helian Lie, walked out of the classroom, donning a domineering aura like a suit of armor, officially entering the war!

Helian Lie and Si Jiaxue had true strength that was clearly above at a different level than the other students. The gap between them was something that could not be closed simply by relying on the dominance of numbers.

In under a minute, these two each seized an admission ticket. Soon after, they fended off an assault from an encirclement of 7-8 students, even beating six students straight to the medical shuttles.

So therefore, there was no one who dared to try seizing the tickets held in their embrace…. In the end, there were still 8 other admission tickets. It wasn’t necessary to seek death under the hands of these two monsters.

“Helian Lie, Si Jiaxue… The last time Crimson Nimbus Second produced such great saplings was 3-5 years ago!” The Crimson Nimbus Guild Elder’s face, which had been fixed in a serious expression for half a day, revealed a faint trace of a smile at last.

boxn ovel. c0m
“How boring. I should have known they would only come out now. I wasted my entire morning for nothing!” In the second VIP lounge, Zheng Dongming lay comfortably on the plump and firm thighs of the female teacher, sleeping. Occasionally, he would lift his head to glance at the hologram. Giving a smirk, he soon quickly lowered his head back to sleep.

02:30 PM. In the depths of Crimson Nimbus Second, within the school’s warehouse, in the middle of an old Cultivation Field.

Li Yao’s two index fingers were stabbed deeply and firmly into the wooden floor. His head was to the ground and his feet in the air. Using only the strength of his index fingers, he was doing a handstand with perfect form.

The two feet, separated to the extreme, did not have shoes on them. With toes as nimble as his fingers, he lifted a dumbbell unwaveringly with each foot. The weight of each dumbbell was 100 kg!

“*ZZZzzzz…*ZZZZzzz…”

While under this state, Li Yao’s nose emitted utterly strange snores. His pair of eyes were slightly closed and a bit of saliva trickled from the corner of his mouth — he was actually sleeping!

Suddenly…

“BEEP! BEEP! BEEP! BEEP!” The micro crystal processor on his wrist vibrated violently and alarmed.

With a flicker of his body, “Bang! Bang!” sounds rang out, like two sparks of flint flying through the darkness. Something was sent flying into a wall that was over thirty meters away, creating another pair of loud “Booms!”.

The two 100 kg dumbbells were actually sent flying over 30 meters by Li Yao with a kick, deeply lodging themselves in the wall.

The entire face of the wall was full of holes. These were all craters left behind from a bombardment of dumbbells. The surface was like that of a meteor; it was a devastating sight.

“Little monster, I’ve already lifted the restrictions of ‘Give Up’. Quickly remove those clothes and join in on the fighting. You still have half an hour!” laughed Sun Biao.

“You don’t have to remind me. How annoying,” yawned Li Yao. He scratched his shaggy bird’s nest hair and walked to the exit indifferently.

02:32 PM. Li Yao emerged within the campus. He walked with sleepy and drowsy eyes to the student assembly grounds where the battle was taking place. His image quickly appeared on the giant holograms in the VIP lounges.

Everyone felt curiosity towards this last student entering the field.

According to normal practice, such students who enter the field at such a late stage had the utmost confidence in their true strength. But all the cultivation geniuses of Crimson Nimbus Second have clearly already appeared on stage. Who the hell is this bastard? Could it be a weakling student who has already given up on the competition?

In the second VIP lounge.

Dong Zengming abruptly jumped up from the female teacher’s thighs. His entire self turned incomparable sharp in a flash. He was like a war blade extracted from a drinking house. The air of alcohol dispersed, giving birth to an air of murder.

“He’s the one you wanted to watch? Will he be even more ferocious than Helian Lie?” The female teacher was absolutely astonished. It had been a long time since she seen Zheng Dongming act so serious.

“Helian Lie is obviously stronger than him. But If I had to choose an opponent, I would rather just choose Helian Lie. I wouldn’t want to choose this guy.” Zheng Dongming stared fixed at Li Yao.

“Why is that?” The female teacher didn’t understand.

“Because he and I are the same type of people.“ With a laugh, Zheng Dongming’s humble face revealed shallow dimples.

02:34 PM. Li Yao walked inside… Dining Hall Number 2!

“What the hell is he doing? There’s nobody in the second dining hall!” The numerous VIPs were discussing and clamoring.

At this time, most of the fighting had come to an end. Quite a few students sat on the ground, panting for breath. The ones worthy to watch on screen are few. The somewhat strange actions by Li Yao naturally drew everyone’s attention to Li Yao.

02:35 PM. Li Yao carried an entire tray of meat buns out of gymnasium number two. He ate as he walked, devouring a dozen fist-sized meat buns in half a second.

“Did he come here to fight, or did he come here to eat!?” The VIPs stared blankly for quite some time. After confirming that their eyes were fine, they couldn’t help but laugh with tears in their eyes.

Just a moment ago, they thought that this bastard was the secret weapon of Crimson Nimbus Second, some deeply hidden unexposed expert. They never thought that this bastard was actually a rice tub with an astonishing capacity for food!

And even within the campus, there were quite a few students who saw Li Yao.

“Look you guys, look! Even screwed ghost Li Yao has come!”

“Huh? He actually doesn’t have any injuries, how can he be so healthy and lively?”

“He must have been secretly hiding away just now and hasn’t participated in the fighting. That’s why he’s still lively like a dragon and a tiger.”

“Hey, Li Yao. Don’t go another further ahead. The students of the Important Class all gathered there. They’re all still fighting intensely and desperately. Be careful not to get accidently hurt!”

As Li Yao gnawed on a meat bun, he looked down to see his micro crystal processor, turning a deaf ear to everyone’s comments. Only when a student with good intentions warned him did he lift his head and give a smile of thanks. Right after, he continued to walk forward.

“It can’t be that his head’s been beaten retarded right?” the student who warned Li Yao commented to his companion with some pity.

The 10 admission tickets emitted special ripples of spiritual energy every half a minute, marking their positions on a virtual map. Soon, Li Yao was able to lock onto a ticket!

……

Na Lanying was leaning her back on a giant tree. She was gasping and panting for breath. The alert expression in her eyes was like a sharp blade that swept in all directions.

She was unperturbed about the trace of blood still left in the corner of her mouth. The thought of licking it never crossed her mind.

She had to breath in the greatest amount of air in the shortest time frame to maintain a clear mind for as long as possible, so as to restore her combat strength.

This was because on her body… was a precious admission ticket!

Na Lanying was ranked 21st among the Important Class. Her Actualization Quotient was at 65%. To be able to seize an admission ticket was simply a gargantuan fortune for her. She completely lacked the confidence to be able to hold onto the ticket until 3 pm.

Fortunately, her lucky stars shined bright today. A few experts in her class had gone to jointly attack Helian Lie and Si Jiaxue and had received serious injuries; they were eliminated from the competition.

The remaining students went to go fight over the other admission tickets. There were no threatening existences with extreme strength in her surroundings. At least, not at the present.

Na Lanying had been letting her imagination run wild in her mind when she suddenly felt a stab of pain in her sternum. It was as if someone stabbed a stake of ice ferociously in her heart!

The young girl let out an “ah”. Every hair on her body stood on end; she was like a started white bunny. Her body instinctively reacted, disregarding everything and fleeing 7-8 meters automatically.

Na Lanying had a certain feeling that if she had stayed there, she would already have been torn to shreds!

Standing seven to eight meters behind her, in sloppy clothes, was a completely ordinary youngster. If there was something that must be said weird about him, it would be the fact that his cheeks were stuffed full of buns. Without stopping, he kept on chewing… and chewing… and chewing…

“Li Yao?”

Na Lanying simply didn’t dare to believe her eyes… Screwed ghost Li Yao was the most famous person in Crimson Nimbus Second, the man of the moment. Obviously, she wasn’t mistaken.

“It’s actually him? Why was it that when my back was towards him, all my hairs stood on end? It was like I was facing a terrible Demon Beast. I couldn’t raise even half a thought of resistance in my mind. My only thought was to flee in desperation!” Na Lanying’s heart beat like a drum. Her bosom slightly swelled up and down in undulations. She simply couldn’t calm down.

Li Yao chewed his meat bun indifferently while walking over to her.

Na Lanying’s scalp was frying. She felt a sense of crisis becoming more and more intense. She could not stop her entire self from trembling. No matter how much she tried taking deep breaths, it was no use! ”I’m was completely suppressed to paralysis by the pressure of his aura. I can’t even move a single finger at all. How can this be happening!?” screamed the young lady in her mind.

“What the hell is she doing? Why doesn’t Na Lanying beat down this bastard with a move?” The VIPs saw this scene and were at a loss. They were discussing animatedly amongst themselves.

“This kid is the screwed ghost of Crimson Nimbus Second. I bet Na Lanying thinks it’s below her to take care of him.” There were some people who finally asked and became clear on Li Yao’s identity. They talked with complete certainty.

Li Yao walked one step at a time until he reached in front of Na Lanying.

With a tilt of his neck, he swallowed down the last meat bun with some difficulty and gave a burp. A smile oozed all over his face, showing his contentment. In the eyes of Na Lanying, Li Yao’s appearance was just like tyrannosaurus rex swallowing down a ton of bloody meat. Traces of bloody sinew seemed to be embedded between his teeth,

“You. Don’t you come over…” Na Lanying said weakly from her heart. She was on the verge of crying.

“Hello, you must be fellow student Na Lanying. I would like to ask if you’ve seen fellow student Helian Lie and where he is?” Li Yao chuckled, asking in a refined and courteous manner.

Na Lanying stared blankly at him for quite some time. Then with a wavering hand, she pointed in the direction of the school’s sports field, “I- I don’t know. He’s probably at the sports field.”

“Okay. Thank you, fellow student Na Lanying.” Li Yao nodded with thanks, paying zero attention to the young lady’s admission ticket. He brushed past Na Lanying’s side and walked towards the direction of the sports field.

Na Lanying’s pair of legs weakened, and she nearly collapsed to the ground. She watched with shock and astonishment at Li Yao’s back as he gradually left. The back of her school uniform was soaked with sweat. Her delicate body was shivering and she had a sinking painful feeling in her stomach. Her mind was filled with the thoughts of her luck and new lease at life!





Home  Forty Millenniums of Cultivation  Chapter 37
 

Chapter 37
 
Chapter 37: Treading Tiger Strike 7 Murdering-Hit Combo!
Translator: Strivon, Ash  Editor: Geoffrey_, Lancent

Within 5 minutes, Li Yao found a total of 4 ticket holders.


Anyways, his luck today has been nothing special. Helian Lie was not one of the four, so he still hadn’t raised a hand. After giving these four people an enormous amount of fright, he continued heading over to the sports field.

“LI YAO, DON’T YOU WALK AWAY FROM ME!”

02:44 PM. A piercing shout exploded into Li Yao’s ear. A figure, weaved with killing intent, blocked him from moving a step forward.

It was Zhao Liang, the person whom’s knees he broke a month ago!

Zhao Liang’s legs had been restored back to normal long ago, and in this month’s time frame, he went through some bitter training. His entire person’s temperament changed completely. His malice and ferocity increased. He was like a blade painted black, absorbing light.

Zhao Liang’s face was warped and twisted, deforming into a horse’s face. He said as he laughed nastily, “I need to thank you properly, fellow student Li Yao! I still remember vividly in my mind what you did to me a month ago. It’s fresh in my memory, appearing every night in my dreams! I pay you my respects. In this month, I went through a crazed kind of training. The pain I bore is a pain unimaginable for you! HeHeHeHe. Finally, in a month’s time, I went from being ranked 41st in class to being ranked 33rd! I’m no longer the last place student! Today, I will say goodbye to you by using the ‘Treading Tiger Strike Three Murdering-Hit Combo’ I’ve trained in. I don’t know if this time, you still have an iron plate tucked in front of your sternum!”

Li Yao lifted his wrist to take a look at his micro crystal processor; there wasn’t even a hint of a reaction. Zhao Liang did not have an admission ticket.

“You don’t even have a ticket, yet you’re still shooting off! Do you think we’re in a debate competition!?”

With a glare of his eyes, Li Yao shouted suddenly with force. His entire body squatted down and his pair of legs seemed to swell twice in size in a flash. They were like thick coiled springs stored full of energy!

“Whoosh!”

boxn ovel. c0m
In a flash, Li Yao’s silhouette vanished without a trace, appearing right in front of Zhao Liang half a second later. His brutal aura locked completely onto every hair on Zhao Liang’s head. Zhao Liang could not react at all to Li Yao’s unusual incomparable speed!

The moment when an expression of astonishment appeared on Zhao Liang’s face, Li Yao seized Zhao Liang’s skull with his pair of hands, like a walnut being clenched by enormous metal pliers. Zhao Liang was totally unable to free himself!

Li Yao’s right knee ferociously rammed into Zhao Liang’s body like an artillery shell!

The strongest technique of the Thirteen Forces of the War Beasts… Treading Tiger Strike!

“Boom!”

Zhao Liang’s lower body half flew up. His entire body curled up into a ball, looking like a small shrimp. Blood spurted wildly from his mouth. The back of his school uniform was torn to shreds!

Li Yao had no intention of stopping. Just when his right leg had fallen, his left knee burst forth. The two knees struck one after another in succession. Boom! Boom! Boom! Boom! Boom! Boom! Boom! His knees struck with great power seven times in a row. Each bombardment was stronger than the last by a bit. The final strike, with a knee as hard as iron, directly exploded onto Zhao Liang’s face!

Zhao Liang’s entire face caved in deeply. It was like he was smashed ferociously by a giant iron hammer. He flew several dozen meters, fiercely smashing into the ground. He didn’t even have the chance to let out a blood-curdling scream before he completely passed out!

A killing technique used by the military — the Thirteen Forces of the Warbeasts, Treading Tiger Strike 7 Murdering-Hit Combo!

“Yi!” In the third VIP lounge, the room was filled with noise and clamor just a second ago, buzzing with activity. The next second, the room turned into absolute silence. A deathly stillness… No one ever expected that an elite student of the Important Class would be eliminated in a flash by a mishmash of the Common Class!

“Ah!” In the second VIP lounge, the female teacher of Phoenix Ridge second shouted in surprise. She looked at Zheng Dongming to the side of her. Zheng Dongming’s mouth hooked into a smile, displaying an expression that contained no surprise.

“Hmm?” In the first VIP lounge, Zhao Yin’s eyes flashed with light and soon returned to their original state. With a wave of his hand, he called his secretary. After exchanging a few words, the secretary left in a hurry.

The current time is, 02:53 PM!

Li Yao didn’t even glance of Zhao Liang. He stepped over Zhao Liang’s body, considering Zhao Liang to be a piece of trash.

The noise of the fight between these two also drew the attention of several neighboring students. Li Yao didn’t even walk far before he was surrounded by three arrogant students of the Important Class. They glared at him with complete vigilance.

These three students all witnessed Li Yao finishing off Zhao Liang with a single move. Naturally, they wouldn’t lower their guard. They considered him to be the most fearful of threats.

“You’re Li Yao? I never thought that you weren’t being tortured by Helian Lie for this month, but were actually hiding in training. You actually possess a power this strong! However, it’s useless. We top 20 students of the Important class are on a totally different level than the sort of bastard Zhao Liang is!” a student of the Important Class said sneering.

“And in addition, us three have been training in joint assault techniques together ever since we entered the third year. You are no match for us!” the second student of the Important Class stated.

“Therefore, if you’re an intelligent person, you would be a good boy and beat it! Go fight over other people’s tickets. We don’t want to suffer injuries on our side as well,” the third student of the Important Class concluded the conversation.

Li Yao looked at his micro crystal processor and discovered that they were indeed carrying three admission tickets on their bodies.

The true strength of these students lingered around rank 20 in the Important Class, oscillating up and down. They knew it would be hard to rely only on oneself to seize a ticket, so they planned early on to team up to fight. They spent most of the year painstakingly working on their joint assault technique into becoming perfected and exquisite. Indeed this time, several ranked top 15 students in the Important Class were defeated under their hand, seizing three of the precious admission tickets!

Li Yao didn’t necessarily know this information. However, there were only seven minutes of time remaining. He feared that there wasn’t enough time to find Helian Lie.

He carefully sized up the three surrounding students of the Important Class, analyzing and calculating at lightning speeds. He had no choice but to recognize that his opponents were formidable opponents on a higher level than Zhao Liang.

He examined his micro crystal processor once more. He found, to his dismay, that other than these three people, the remaining seven ticket bearing students were far away from him. It was likely that some hid inside the complicated, maze-like buildings. And most of them were moving around at high speeds. It would be very hard to catch them.

“Helian Lie, there is a veil between us. I’m forced to wait until the Youth Limit Challenge to slowly conclude things between us!” Li Yao squinted his eyes, withdrawing his gaze from the three students of the Important Class. In a slow and unhurried fashion, he took off ‘Give Up’.

“What the hell is he up to? It can’t be he wants to fight one on three?” Everyone was at a loss in the VIP lounges.

“Student Li Yao defeated Zhao Liang in a single move. Although his true strength is unconventional, he wants to fight three students, who clearly surpass Zhao Liang, as his opponents. It should be too much for him right?” The teachers were discussing animatedly.

And in the first VIP lounge, the smiling expression in the depths of Crimson Nimbus Guild’s Elder Zhou Yin’s eyes grew richer and richer.

Li Yao squatted down and folded ‘Give Up’ neatly and tidily. He placed ‘Give Up’ carefully to the side.

He was wearing a completely ordinary sports tank top and shorts. He had worn these clothes for a long time, all throughout his big torturous workouts. They were thin like a cicada’s wing, revealing faintly the lines of the muscles underneath clearly.

His stature was completely ordinary and his muscles weren’t considered anything too extreme.

But the encircling three students of the Important Class didn’t know why, but they all simultaneously felt a deep chill. When Li Yao took off his exterior clothes, a severe icy air also seemed to accompany the action, permeating and diffusing through the air. He was like…

A velociraptor that transformed in a flash into a tyrannosaurus rex!

“Bang!”

Li Yao stamped one leg to the ground, shredding his sports shoes into pieces! His speed had increased unexpectedly by a factor when compared to the recent moment when he murderously bombarded Zhao Liang. In the lifetime of a flint’s spark, he flashed to appear right in front of the opposing student of the Important Class. The Treading Tiger Strike combo was unleashed once more like a hot knife through butter!





Home  Forty Millenniums of Cultivation  Chapter 38
 

Chapter 38
 
Chapter 38: Slaying the Way to Devil Dragon Island
Translator: Strivon, Ash  Editor: Geoffrey_, Lancent

The three students in the Important Class never thought that Li Yao would actually take the initiative to attack. Even more so, they never thought that his offensive would be this fierce and violent. In a flash, they turned pale with fright!


However, their reaction speeds were clearly faster than Zhao Liang’s by a measure; the student of the Important Class facing Li Yao crossed his arms to defend. His waist bent in a strange manner. A “Bang!” rang out. He had barely defended against Li Yao’s knee strike. A groan was stifled in his mouth, and there was an expression of unbearable pain on his face… The bones of his pair of arms were broken by a single strike of Li Yao’s bombarding knee!

The other two students of the important class unleashed their assault from behind, trying in vain to keep Li Yao pinned down.

“Bang Bang!”

Li Yao did not duck or dodge. He forcibly took on the assault of the two behind him. The two students of the important class kicked his back with ferocity, but it was like kicking a giant sandbag filled with iron shavings. Li Yao’s muscles immediately rippled in a strange manner. The energy was dispersed and eliminated in a flash!

“His physical resistance capabilities are this strong!?”

The blood of the two students of the Important Class ran cold. They were aware of the strange rippling movement of Li Yao’s muscles. They were clearly aware that this was an extraordinary high-class, energy-dispersion technique. Under the special guidance of a military expert, the body is struck repetitively with powerful strikes in order to grasp the technique.

“Did we make a mistake? This guy’s absolutely a monster! There’s practically no different in true strength between him and Helian Lie. How is he a mishmash of the Common Class? Are all the teachers in our school blind to this extent!?”

The three students of the Important Class glanced at each other, all seeing fear in the depths of each other’s eyes.

Li Yao had no interest in the offensive launched by the two people. His pair of knees, like tigers setting off a mountain, exploded forth violently! In under a second, he exploded out with 11 knee strikes that were so insane it seemed to be of magic!

The students of the Important Class ahead could not withstand it any longer, collapsing to the ground with a blood-curdling scream.

boxn ovel. c0m
It was an unimaginable scene. Shouts of surprise came and went in waves in the VIP lounges. None of the spectators had ever thought that an encirclement formation of three students of the important class would actually be broken by a mishmash of the Common Class, using only the sort of brute force method of pure strength and physical ability to force the formation open!

Li Yao sneered. He strode over with large strides like a tiger pouncing on a lamb. He was chasing down the broken-armed students of the important class to continue his relentless assault!

The manner of his attacks was unspeakably exquisite. Every single strike bombarded straight down. None of his strikes contained anything deceptive or had any unpredictable variations. The three students of the Important Class could all anticipate the trajectory of his next attack.

However, they were unable to find a way to break through his technique. This was because Li Yao’s absolute striking strength was way too astonishing, and his physical resistance capabilities were way too strong as well.

Li Yao clearly staked it all on his body. Three vs. One. You may strike me thrice, but I will strike you once. That’s the way it was!

…Li Yao was accustomed to facing against the devilish-level expert, Fiend Blade Peng Hai. According to Li Yao, the attacks of these three Important Class students were nothing more than tickles. And Li Yao’s fists, even if they only brushed against their cheeks, was enough to make them cry tears of pain!

A short time later, the three students of the Important Class looked at each other and suddenly let out a whistle. At the same time, they split running in three directions to escape!

Three students of the Important Class had actually chosen to flee in desperation when facing a student of the Common Class.

“They spent several months specifically practicing these tactics. They were meant to be used against Helian Lie, but they actually employed it against a student of the Common Class. This truly is…”

Within the VIP lounge, the coach of the three students had a complicated expression on his face. The three aptly employed the battle tactics appropriately. This caused the coach to feel quite happy, but he felt far more emotions of shame and shock.

Li Yao, without any hesitation, chased unwaveringly after the first student of the Important Class. Each step he took could pull the distance closer by nearly half a meter. Soon, they were only separated by the thickness of a string. The fleeing student of the Important Class in front of him was on the verge of crying.

The other two students of the Important Class turned around, without hesitation, from the side, to cause Li Yao some trouble from behind.

This time, the manner in which they fought was clearly different. They no longer targeted Li Yao’s vital parts, but instead focused on pinning Li Yao down with harassing attacks. They wanted to stall for time; their purpose was to allow the first student to pull some distance.

When Li Yao’s patience was running thin, when he would turn around to attack someone, that person would turn and flee without hesitation.

And when Li Yao gave chase, unwilling to let his target escape, the other two students of the Important Class would change their roles. They would become the harassers!

“Us three may not have the strongest true strength in the Important Class, but our minds are the most intelligent and clear-minded of the Important Class. This set of ‘Escape-Harassment’ battle tactics, when put fully to use, would be hard for even Helian Lie to overcome. You. How can you find the answer to break out?”

The coach of the three Important Class students stared fixed at the hologram, murmuring to himself. He also looked at the time displayed on the hologram. His throat was a bit dry from talking too much.

“You don’t have much time left remaining, student Li Yao!”

At present, the time is 02:59:30 PM. There was only half a minute until the competition official ends!

Will a miracle… happen?

All the VIPs no longer paid any attentions to the other scenes. Their sights were totally focused on Li Yao’s 1 vs 3 on the hologram. Everyone was racking their brains, with no success, trying to figure out if Li Yao could make a reversal out of this predicament. Everyone was excited and looking forward to the outcome. They were awaiting a miracle!

27 seconds… 26 seconds… 25 seconds …

The speed of the three Important Class students had reached their hurricane-like limits. They ran with faces red from exertion. Their mouths and eyes were twisted. They completely lacked the aura and elegance of a heaven’s chosen, looking like three stray dogs instead.

13 seconds… 12 seconds… 11 seconds…..

The three people were forced to draw their entire strength, down to their bones! They rushed madly, rushed frantically, they ran like mad! Li Yao chased them unrelentingly, causing them to wretchedly foam at the mouth. Their tongues were flapping as they continued running in crazily without end. It was as if the most vicious, vile, and persistent of Demon Beasts was chasing closely behind them.

7 seconds… 6 seconds… 5 seconds…..

The pathetic worm being chased by Li Yao suddenly had his legs weaken and drop from under him. He rolled about on the ground clutching his leg… He had run too much and overtaxed his body, causing a cramping in his leg!

The remaining two let out a battle cry simultaneously. The threw themselves into the air and tenaciously held fixed onto Li Yao!

3 seconds… 2 seconds… 1 second…..

With a violent roar, the muscles of Li Yao’s entire body swelled, forcefully sending the two Important Class students flying. They dropped flat on their backs.

The time is precisely 03:00 PM. The competition was over. The crisp beautiful sound of a bell rang throughout campus.

“We won!”

“We held on to the bitter end!”

The three students were surprised at first, but soon they jumped around wild with joy. They hugged each other laughing and crying. It was like the opponent they had faced just then was not a student of the Common Class, but rather a campus king like Si Jiaxue or Helian Lie!

“I managed to get a ticket!”

The first student took out a wrapped treasure from his bosom, a small box engraved with glyphs. He waved it energetically and roared loudly.

“I managed to get a ticket!”

The second student also hefted up his own admission ticket. His face was full of hope after a storm, an expression with tears of joy.

“I… where’s my ticket?”

The third student felt all over his clothes in confusion. He could not feel out anything. He thought, distracted, and seemed to have realized something. He looked towards Li Yao as his face suddenly turned deathly white.

Li Yao sat cross-legged on the ground. His head was tilted while he carefully examined the artifact box held in his hand with great detail and discovered that there was a semi-translucent crystal card that was as thin as a cicada’s wing lying inside.

Devil Dragon Island was one of the locations of this year’s Limit Challenge Competition.

Li Yao let out a soft whistle as he took out the ticket from the box and channeled the ticket with his mind. A Puji Critter rushed through the air and laughed brightly.

In the VIP lounges was a wave of uproar!

“He… When did he grab the ticket? How did I miss it?” Most of the household heads looked at each other in dismay. They dared not to believe their eyes.

In the first VIP room, Yin Zhou could not hold back a light laugh, nodding his head, “Not bad. This kid’s body is quite powerful, like those body tempering specialists from the Northwest Continent who cultivate in the path of body refinement. And, his fingers are so adept, to be able to snatch away a ticket without anybody noticing. Those fingers are very much suited for crafting and repairing artifacts; they’re simply the hands of a refiner! In these times, what the Circle of Cultivators lacks the most are these sort of multi-talented geniuses. Really, this kid’s not bad!”

At this time, his secretary walked in and stooped down to his ear, saying a few words.

“Oh, so there’s this sort of thing going on?”

Zhou Yin’s gaze drifted, like a gentle stream, towards Helian Ba, “So, word has it that your esteemed son and this student Li Yao have some misunderstanding?

Helian Ba’s eyebrows rose up; his face was filled with an expression of disbelief. “It can’t be, right? I’ve never heard Small Lie mention this before? Although, kids can be quite hot blooded. It’s quite common for them to fight with each other, and often a friendship is born from the exchange of blows. Aren’t many bro-for-life bonds born from rivalries and fights? Or it’s quite possible that these two really have a misunderstanding. That’s also not a big deal. Who would still take it personally?”

Zhou Yin gradually nodded his head, “Then that’s fine. Your esteemed son is also a genius that’s quite hard to come by. His strength is superior to Li Yao’s by a factor. Both of these two have promising futures. It’s not worth getting mad over such small matters!”

Helian Ba nodded his head over and over. He spoke with utter sincerity, “Yes. Yes. What Elder Zhou says is absolute! Oh, that’s right. Headmaster Zhao, I’ve heard that student Li Yao’s family circumstances aren’t too good. Doesn’t our school have a dedicated fund to sponsor students in poverty? I propose to withdraw 100,000 credits from this fund, and I will also contribute 100,000 myself for a total of 200,000 credits as a form of a scholarship to give to student Li Yao in praise of his wonderful display in this fighting competition… Elder Zhou, sir, what do you think?”

Zhou Yin chuckled. “These are all matters regarding your school; I don’t want to get involved. In short, this student’s basic potential isn’t bad. I’m quite pleased. Headmaster Zhao, Board-member Helian, and all the guests sitting with me today, everyone has done a great service.”

When the speech concluded, Helian Ba’s heart returned, once again, stuck in his throat. He felt he had just been fished from the bathing room; his back was full of cold sweat.

“LI! YAO!” A terrifying glow flashed in the depths of Helian Ba’s eyes as Helian Ba committed this name to memory.

……

At the main stage of the first school building, Helian Lie and Si Jiaxue stood on opposite sides onstage. They opened their microprocessors to produce holograms in order to find out the names of 10 ticket holders.

“We caused several of the stronger students in our class to suffer from heavy injuries and retire from the competition. We don’t know who the other 8 people are going to be, the lucky ones who can come with us to Devil Dragon Island.” Helian Lie laughed with his head lowered.

Their smiling expressions froze in a flash, like their faces were covered with a mask of botched human skin, and like their faces were beaten viciously.

An expression of faint doubt flew up on Si Jiaxue’s face. Giant question marks rippled in the depths of her clear-water eyes.

“Li Yao?” the two read the name silently. Their tones and implications were as different as black and white.





Home  Forty Millenniums of Cultivation  Chapter 39
 

Chapter 39
 
Chapter 39: The World Of Cultivation, Is as Vast as the Skies and Seas!
Translator: Strivon, Ash  Editor: Geoffrey_, Lancent

10 days later, on the east coast of the Federation, at the Far East Ocean.


It was early morning. The rising sun filled the day and the red clouds filled the sky. A myriad of golden fish-scale dots glistened and dazzled in an ocean that stretched as far as the eye could see. It was a scene from a fairytale.

Countless schools of fish and oceanic Demon Beasts leapt and fluttered about over the golden sea’s surface, creating quite a vitalic sight to behold.

“*HUMM! *HUMM!”

Eight large antigravity spiritual-energy-powered ships were stuffed full of the young geniuses of Floating Spear City and its neighboring dozen towns, carrying them over and looking like eight large sea turtles. They leisurely swept over at an altitude 200 meters above the sea’s surface. Their mysterious and complex glyph were vibrating endlessly, radiating all the colors of the rainbow brightly. The turbulent waves of spiritual energy surged and rippled. The ripples spread endlessly, colliding into the sea, creating explosions that sounded like the thunderous roars of large Demon Beasts, and creating white waves of froth.

Li Yao was standing at the edge of the front deck. He clung to the railing, looking downwards.

In the midst of the golden ocean, several dozen fishing boats were cruising lazily all over, scattered and fragmented.

Suddenly, an extremely strange “water bubble” swelled on the surface of the sea not too far away. Soon, a small piece of an utterly-sharp fin emerged, splitting the sea without a sound. It headed towards the several dozen fishing boats at high speeds, attacking.

When the fin reached nearly a 100-meter distance from the fishing boats, the “water bubble” suddenly expanded. A 100-meter long giant monster fish exploded out from the water bubble, leaping suddenly into the air and soaring several dozen meters high. It headed forward with reckless abandon, pouncing towards the fishing boats.

The skin of this monsterish fish was bumpy and full of scabs and was covered in growing coral of five different gorgeous colors. It looked extremely devilish. There was a tumorous growth on its head that formed the face of an incomparably ugly baby. There was even a thick tentacle, on the tip of which was a ball of meat, growing from its forehead. “*Pop” “*Pop” The ball of meat crackled as it shot explosive blue lightning in arcs.

“*WAUM! *WAUM!”

boxn ovel. c0m
The monsterish fish gaped open its mouth, letting out a strange cry like that of a child. It’s mouth was strangely and incomparably large. The mouth actually split all they way to the middle of its body, and jagged teeth filled to the brim within its gaping mouth. The corpses of rotten oceanic beasts were even seen pierced on top of several dozen of the razor-sharp jagged teeth!

Li Yao did not have the time to yell in surprise. In a flash, it seemed that all the fishing boats had awakened from stupor. They moved at a speed comparable to lightning, splitting in all directions. The enormous, monsterish fish flung itself into the air. It’s body, weighing over 10,000 pounds, smashed against the sea once again, creating a giant, sky-towering wave.

The fishing boats that had just been fleeing turned their helms one by one, faintly forming an encirclement. The enormous monsterish fish tried to escape through the air once more but was met with the fishing boats suddenly shooting balls of nets.

These nets appeared to be artifacts crafted and refined by cultivators. They hooked and coiled together mid-air, forming an 8-pointed star pattern that glowed with splendor and radiance. It was an eye-catching and dazzling glyph that soon transformed into a giant net that blotted the sky and covered the earth. It came crashing down, bolting straight towards the cranium of the gigantic monsterish fish!

All of a sudden, the gigantic monster fish thundered with a roar that contained both shock and fury. It’s body twisted and rocked wildly, creating raging and storming waves. The still tranquil and peaceful surface of the sea had transformed, in a flash, into a surging battlefield with the aura of death.

But no matter how much the monster fish struggled, it was unable to free itself. Who knows what crafting materials this fishing net was made of, but as soon as it made contact with the ocean’s water, it shrunk at lightning speeds to deeply embed itself into the body of the gigantic monster fish. The net bound tightly to the skin, causing the skin to split and chap. The blood that subsequently flowed was a dark green, polluting a large area of the sea’s surface, and emitted noxious fishy fumes.

Even Li Yao, at a distance of several hundred meters in the air, was affected by the smell of the noxious fumes, causing his eyes to go faint and his head to be dizzy. He faintly felt a loss of consciousness. It seemed that the blood of this gigantic monster fish contained a natural and terrifying ability to cause people to lose consciousness.

“Swish! Swish! Swish! Swish!”

The several dozen fishing ships launched gigantic harpoons simultaneously, piercing deep into the body of the monster fish. With the additional pain, the monster fish went even crazier. The fish thrashed and tried to flee, causing the steel rope that was hooked to the fishing boats to go taut and straight. Several dozen fishing boats were being dragged, rushing forward.

The monster fish rushed several hundred meters, dragging several fishing boats with it and causing them to tip to extreme angles, almost to the point of capsizing. From one of these ships flew out a cultivator suited in a light blue crystal-powered mobile armor that hefted a giant sword on its shoulder.

In a blink of an eye, this cultivator flew to appear right in front of the monster fish. A dangerous arc of lightning flashed across the tentacle on the forehead of the monster fish. With the giant sword in hand, an image of a sword-strike flashed out. The tentacle was actually cleaved cleanly at the base, falling down to the sea!

“TSSSS!…”

The monster fish could not hold back a sharp, blood-curdling cry.

Without waiting for the fish to respond, the cultivator sheathed the sword once again behind his back. His left hand grasped the hilt, while the palm of his right hand faced the forehead of the gigantic monster fish. A ball of light, like a miniature sun, formed in the palm of his hand and expanded at lightning speeds.

“Boom!”

When the ball of light expanded to a size larger than the cultivator’s head, the fingers of his hand spread open. He pushed forcefully, sending the ball of light into the blood gaping wound on the monster fish’s forehead, entering the brains of the monster fish in a flash. Only a world-shaking sound was heard. A geyser of blood spouted a hundred of meters into the air from the blowhole on the top of the monster fish’s brain. Its entire brain had been mashed into a pulp!

The eyes of the monster fish turned to an ash-gray in a flash. It stopped struggling, flipped belly up, and floated without strength on the surface of the sea.

The countless parasitic octopuses, crabs, and tiny Demon Beasts living on its body dispersed, fleeing without direction towards the ocean floor in panic.

“So awesome!”

Li Yao watched with wonder… This was an encirclement hunt that was planned early on. First, the fishing nets and harpoons were used to exhaust the monster fish’s physical strength and life force. Then, the cultivator cleaved its tentacle to create a wound as a weak point. Finally, a fatal strike was sent through the wound into the brain of the monster fish!

“The world of cultivation… really is incomparably vast and filled with unlimited awesomeness!”

Li Yao gazed far into the distance, to his limits. Bottomless red clouds were scattered across the horizon. A red disk of a sun did its best to break through the sea’s surface, to shoot to the sky.

This was a spectacular scene of the vastness and forces of nature, something that Li Yao did not experience often living life in Floating Spear City. He was at peace and relaxed, and his thoughts were like the image seen by his eyes — they flew to the ends of the ocean, towards the sun.

“One day, I will also be a cultivator, like this one. My hand will be holding an awesome military weapon that I personally crafted. I will rush to the great ocean, slaying Demon Beasts and wrestling with the stormy seas!” The tides of Li Yao’s heart moved up and down, heating his blood.

Everyone on this anti-gravity ship was a youth from Floating Spear City. Quite a few people were like him. In twos and threes on the deck of the ship, they were also admiring the wondrous marvel of nature unfolding before their eyes. They had seen the cultivator below slay the Demon Beast, and they cried out, one by one, in surprise.

However, Li Yao understood clearly that he was different than the others within this flock of people. What he displayed in the fight for the ticket was too much of a shock. And, he was someone who was willing to offend people with rich and powerful backing, like Helian Lie. Other people did not dare to wantonly go up and talk to him.

Li Yao enjoyed the peacefulness. He looked down at the exceptionally beautiful marvel, the reflection of the sky on the ocean. His memories flew back to the time in his dream of grandeur. Specks of detail become clearer. No matter what he remembered, no matter how useful it was, he recorded it all to his crystal processor.

This was his secret training technique that he thought of only recently. People’s ability to remember will always have its limits, say nothing of remembering the details of dreams. Li Yao feared that once some details became clear, upon awakening, everything would be forgotten completely.

The memories of Ou Yezi were undoubtedly a precious treasure trove equivalent to the wealth of an entire nation. No matter how mottled any shard of memory recollection was, each shard was capable of providing great benefits.

These days had gone by with Li Yao racking his mind away. He managed to recall many things. He was able to fumble around in the depths of his mind and discover what seemed to be a giant sealed sliding door. He was even able to hear sounds coming inside, the twinkling sounds of a treasure trove.

All he needed was one step, one small step. Then, he would be able to inherit all of Ou Yezi’s memories!

It was right at this time when the faint air of alcohol assailed his nostrils. A chubster with cat-like eyes and splendid clothes leaned against the railing next to Li Yao. This youngster said, “This view really isn’t bad. Isn’t that right, fellow student Li Yao!?”

Li Yao’s pupils suddenly contracted. Nonchalantly, he revoked the hologram of his crystal processor. Filled to the brim with caution, he said, “Aren’t you Zheng Dongming, a friend of Helian Lie?”





Home  Forty Millenniums of Cultivation  Chapter 40
 

Chapter 40
 
Chapter 40: The Different Types of Cultivators
Translator: Strivon, Ash  Editor: Geoffrey_, Lancent

“Nope, I’m not Helian Lie’s friend. I’m his swine friend.” Zheng Dongming’s nostrils flared as he chuckled in reply.


“Is there a difference?” Li Yao stared blankly.

“To be partners in decadence means… that Helian Lie can find me if he wants to dine food, drink alcohol, race in shuttles, play with girls… Basically, anything that brings pleasure is totally fine. But if it’s to help him beat someone up, especially someone who’s true strength has increased by leaps and bounds in a month, and whose Actualization Quotient increased by several dozen percents, this sort of damn awesome person… Then Helian Lie overestimates our friendship way too much!” Zheng Dongming chuckled, nudging over a step closer to Li Yao’s side.

Li Yao calmly pulled some distance away from him. “So, you’re not here to stir up some trouble with me?”

Zheng Dongming nudged over once again. It seemed that he didn’t pick up on Li Yao’s cold attitude. With a composed expression, he said, “Do you know just how many different types of time-established fine wine are in the Federation? Just how many restaurants far and near? Just how many girls have entered into the entertainment industry?”

Li Yao blinked his eyes. He felt that he could not quite keep up with Zheng Dongming’s tempo of speech, “Nope, so what’s the answer?”

With a flick of his finger, Zheng Dongming enumerated a list of numbers, “According to my statistics, the Federation has a total of 1,300 different time-established fine wine, over 300,000 critically acclaimed restaurants that are worth trying… and just last year, counting every new female actress of every major entertainment company, female idols… etc… There are at least 500,000 of them!”

Zheng Dongming paused for a bit to let out a sigh, “You should know that I am the child of rich and power parents with money in explosive amounts. There are that many kinds of alcohol waiting for me to taste. That many fine delicacies for me to eat. That many stunning and devastatingly beautiful women… all I need to do is to cough lightly… and they become like succubi, stripping on their own… stripping myself and pushing me on the bed… What do you think? Why would I give up alcohol to taste, give up delicacies to eat, give up girls to f*ck. Why would I waste my precious time to come cause you trouble?”

Li Yao squinted his eyes, examining Zheng Dongming for half a minute. Suddenly, he started laughing.

Just as Zheng Dongming was interested in Li Yao, at this moment, Li Yao also became a bit interested in Zheng Dongming.

Li Yao shrugged his shoulder. “Sure, you’re not here to stir up trouble. But what did you come here for? Do you want to team up with me? To fight hand-to-hand together on Devil Dragon Island?”

boxn ovel. c0m
Zheng Dongming said, “That was only my first objective. The primary objective was that I wanted to chat with you. Just simply a conversation. If I were to use terms from the Ancient Cultivation World to explain, then I would say I came here to ‘Plant a Seed of Karma’. Nothing more!”

“You’re rich and powerful. I’m damned and poor. We aren’t people of the same world. What could we possible chat about?”

“Plenty man~ For example, you are quite a talented individual, fellow student Li Yao. I’ve heard you also have quite some skills in Artifact repair. Then what will it be? Have you thought over which school you want to test into? Which type of Cultivator you want to become?”

“What do you mean ‘type’ of Cultivators? There are even many different types of cultivators?” Actually, Li Yao had never heard of such things. He still believed that there was only one type of Cultivator… and that was those who soared through the skies on flying swords, going around killing. Only that type of Cultivator.

Zheng Dongming had a certain “If you don’t know, then come. Let’s sit down and listen to young master Zheng slowly explain” expression on his face. With utter pride, he glanced an eye at Li Yao. He cleared his throat and said, “In the Ancient Cultivation World of 40,000 years ago, obviously, cultivators weren’t separated into types. There was only one kind of cultivator. At most, there were those who cultivated in the path of demons, the path of fiends… but those don’t count — only the sources of their spiritual energy were different! And 40,000 years later to the Modern Cultivation Era, society has separated different types of jobs more and more finely. Cultivators have also been separated into a total of six major types.”

He extended out his chubby right hand, spreading open his fingers. He wriggled his thumb and said, “The first type is also the most common, the most ordinary, and that is the battle-type cultivator. The battle-type cultivator is the type most inline for the average person’s traditional view of what a cultivator is like. More or less, they fly on flying swords. They travel unhindered all around to fight hand-to-hand with Demon Beasts. You have to know of this type of Cultivator. I don’t need to explain more, right?”

Li Yao nodded his head. Obviously, he understood what the battle-type cultivator was. It’s just that he never thought that there were actually 5 different types of cultivators outside of the battle-type cultivator.

What kind of mysteries… do these other five types of cultivators possess?

Zheng Dongming curled his index finger, continuing, “The second type is the ‘admin-type’ of Cultivators. This type of Cultivator may not possess the strongest of spiritual energy, but they possess the best computational ability. They can, in the time it takes for a flint’s spark to flash, do several million, even several tens of millions, even over 100 million of telepathic calculations. From a ginormous endless stream of information, they can discover hidden patterns and structures and even predict the direction of how things will play out. They make the most optimum decisions… I’m sure you won’t understand from the way I’m talking. Let me give you an example. The mayor of a major city with a population of ten million people. A general who commands an entire army. The chief of a large corporation. The head leader of a guild. They all need someone to make grand strategies and run administration. The admin-type Cultivator is most suited for this job.”

Electricity coursed in Li Yao’s mind. Soon, he responded by automatically nodding his head.

There are specialists in business. Someone with battle strength is different from someone who commands a large army. Being able to level a mountain with a single explosive fist is not representative of the ability to become a capable guild leader.

The admin-type cultivator really does have its own value for existence.

Zheng Dongming supplemented with more words, “At present, the person with the highest position in our Star Glory Federation is the Chairman of the Congress, Xu Haoran. He’s an admin-type Cultivator who reached the Yuanying Stage. It’s said that his brain underwent enormous development. When his spiritual energy courses through to its utmost limit, he can process over 80 million thoughts telepathically every second! He can be said to be a super-crystal processor in human form! Only with this sort of calculation prowess can one lead an enormous nation such as this!”

Even Speaker Xu Haoran was an admin-type cultivator? Li Yao was forced to have a whole new level of respect for this type.

However, he understood himself unequivocally; he knew he wasn’t made for this. Soon, he returned to being himself and asked, “Then, what’s the third type?”

Zheng Dongming swayed his middle finger and said, “The third type is the research-type cultivator. Just as the name implies, this type of cultivator is similar to the admin-type cultivator, possessing extremely high computational abilities. They are capable of processing tens of thousands of telepathic thoughts in a flash. However, their abilities aren’t as extensive; they like to concentrate on a specific subject… The research-type cultivator often becomes a doctor, lawyer, university professor, and various scientific advisors in the industry. They are highly respected by the masses.”

Li Yao went “Oh.” When compared to the admin-type cultivator, the research-type cultivator seemed a bit weaker.

Zheng Dongming saw through his disappointment and said seriously, “Don’t feel that the research-type cultivator is useless… The powerful research-type cultivators can compute and run a simulation of a star. They can tell when it will explode and thereby absorb the energy of the star’s explosion for cultivation. They can also deduce the combat style of a powerful ancient demon beast from several billion years ago, just from inspecting a few shards of fossils. Those in love with medicine can fuse man with Demon Beast — to engineer a Beast Soldier with tyrannical strength! Of course, this is illegal in the Federation, but in some of the lawless areas outside of the Federation, there are research-type cultivators with this sort of true strength. They simply exist on the same level as a god!”

Zheng Dongming paused with a sorrowful laugh. In a low voice, he said, “If this is not enough of an explanation for you, think of it this way, 40,000 years ago in the past, the cultivator who did the R&D of the Demon God Virus, causing Spirit Beasts to evolve into Fiend Beasts… He could be considered a research-type cultivator. What do you think? Are you scared yet?”





Home  Forty Millenniums of Cultivation  Chapter 41
 

Chapter 41
 
Chapter 41: The Flagship, The Distant Expanse!
Translator: Strivon, Ash  Editor: Geoffrey_, Lancent

Li Yao’s mind went blank; he felt an indescribable chill in the air.

There really was a cultivator who developed the Demon God Virus 40,000 years ago, leading to the rise of the Demon Beast civilization. Humanity was forced to enter into a 30,000 year long Great Dark Age.

Research-type cultivators were certainly existences on the level of devils and gods!

Composing himself, Li Yao continued with a question, “Then what’s the fourth type?”

“The fourth type is the creation-type cultivator. This type has their spiritual energy and computational ability in opposing equilibrium.They also need to have a dexterous pair of hands with bold and unconstrained imagination. In this way, they become experts in fabrication! Actually, this type of cultivator is also seen quite commonly. For instance, the most popular profession in the world of cultivators, the Master Refiner, is precisely a creation-type cultivator! Legends say that the most powerful of creation-type cultivators can craft a warship bigger than the moon, encompassing the starry skies! They can also craft the ‘Star Pulverizing Cannons’ that contain boundless power! One shell can flatten the entire continent!”

Li Yao’s eyelids twitched. Finally, he knew what his own path would be — to be a creation-type cultivator!

Zheng Dongming spread open his five fingers and curled with his pinky, saying, “The fifth type is the culture-type cultivator. Both their spiritual energy and computational abilities may not necessarily be the most outstanding, but they possess the most profound and mysterious of mental powers. At any point in time and space, they can influence someone by their side by enveloping them into their own mental world. Honestly, the culture-type cultivator is the most mysterious type of all. No matter how much the expert researchers tried studying this type, they were all unable to break open the mysteries of this type’s mental powers. Often, the culture-type is found to be the best poet, artist, novelist, and musician!”

Li Yao nodded his head thoughtfully. “Artists? Novelists? It sounds like they don’t have any combat strength!”

Zheng Dongming laughed strangely. “That’s not necessarily true. The common culture-type cultivator may not be the greatest expert in combat, but there are a few utterly terrifying culture-types different from the norm. So much so that no one would dare provoke them rashly, as they are existences with absolute strength! For a rare example, within the cultivator-types, there is a special kind of profession called the Grand Illusionist. Normally when you look at one, you only see an ordinary author, with nothing weird about him. But once he gets angry, his mental world tears and explodes through to reality. He can pull others into a fiction marble of his own creation! Just think about it. The complete laws of nature within that domain field are all created by him. They can call the wind and summon the rain. They’re omnipotent! Even cultivators several stages higher than the Grand Illusionist, once they are caught and forced into the fiction marble, will have great difficulty escaping unharmed.”

“The world of cultivators really is filled with all sorts of fantastic marvels. So there’s this many awesome jobs!” Li Yao thought deeply for a moment and was forced to admit that a Grand Illusionist would be a completely difficult enemy to deal with.

When compared to the most mystical of cultivators, the most ordinary battle-type cultivator could simply be considered a domesticated and harmless upright citizen.

boxn ovel. c0m
Zheng Dongming’s fingers pinched together, forming a fist. He said, “The six type is the hybrid-type. They possess the characteristics of several different types, allowing them to assume many different important roles. They are rare geniuses known as jack of all trades. Anyways, the world of cultivators is vast and boundless. The more one studies in a subject, the harder they find to master it. The hybrid-type cultivators, who are able to cross over to other realms, are actually few in number. They appear once in awhile, and when they do, the major guilds will always fight over them. And they become major stars that no one dares to approach for fear of getting burned.”

Li Yao’s heart yearned. He felt that he possessed both the potential of being a battle-type and a creation-type. He had the chance to become a hybrid-type cultivator.

However, it’s still early to think of these things at the present. It’s better to concentrate on dealing with the Limit Challenge Competition for now.

When Li Yao was lost in thought, the levitating ship vibrated lightly. It’s speed slowed down gradually.

The surrounding students let out gasps of surprise.

Li Yao gazed as far as he can into the distance. The view ahead was completely different from the dead calm of sea with the golden scales of fish in the ocean.

It was unknown when the ocean’s surface turned black, but there were several dozen terrifying gigantic maelstroms up ahead. They cried with ear-splitting roars of thunder. They were like dreadful sea demons opening their dozens of mouths, revealing jagged canine teeth.

And surrounded by layers of these maelstroms was a series of twisted archipelagos, long and twisted. It looked like a flood dragon in the middle of the ocean, thrashing with all its might in the raging waves and stormy seas.

This was their destination, Devil Flood Dragon Island. Arena No. 571 of the Limit Challenge Competition!

…What caused the numerous students to gasp in surprise wasn’t the figure of Devil Flood Dragon Island, but rather the demonic maelstroms that spun around the island, and even more so, the black ocean with its raging and bellowing waves.

And floating calmly above all this… was a gigantic crystal battleship half covered by the clouds!

This was a completely old, out-dated, dilapidated, yet awe inspiring, super heavy-class crystal battleship that radiated profoundness. It’s total length was over 7,800 meters, weighed over 63 million tons, and was manned by 132,510 active duty navy personnel. And manning the critical position of handling the ship were 300 refinement stage cultivators. It was only in this way that this ship was able to operate without issues.

It looked like this crystal battleship had been dealt heavy damage from its appearance. It was riddled with scars and was full of holes. There were marks of explosions and corrosion left on its exterior. Quite a few places were mottled, fragmented, and in pieces. Of special note was the forward deck and bridge at the front of the battleship. It was smashed through even more thoroughly, exposing a terrifyingly enormous gaping hole. It gave off a feeling of a regretful giant bellowing towards the skies with a giant open mouth.

It had already lost its propulsion power, so it had been floating here for a very very long time. Enough time for the ocean wind to erode its armour, leaving the traces of a countless number of years. Even it’s original shocking gaping wound had become a part of it. It had become a fossil, a monument, a gravestone.

Only… On some different mental plane, in a spiritual world unseen by the naked eye, it was quite like an awe-inspiring ferocious tiger, a giant dragon soaring over the highest of heavens. It gave of a unapproachable radiance of coldness!

“It’s the Federal Army’s eternal flagship — the Distant Expanse!” Even Li Yao was stunned by the majestic aura of this crystal battleship. His breath was stifled involuntarily.

The Distant Expanse was born 500 years ago in the Federation. The Federation mobilized practically their entire Cultivator work force to craft this master battleship!

500 years ago during the Great Blood Ocean War, the Distant Expanse acted as the flagship for the Federal Army. It fought in the fierce battle against millions of Demon forces of the Far East Demon Kingdom at the Far East Ocean.

The fate of the Federation depended on the outcome of the Great Blood Ocean War. Because they were able to secure victory in this war… Because they were able to annihilate the Far East Demon Kingdom… The Star Glory Federation was able to obtain ultimate-supremacy in the Heaven’s Origin Sector. The fate of the nation grew more prosperous with each passing day!

However, even though the Distant Expanse was able to sink the enemy Heaven’s Field, it also suffered critical damage and fell into the ocean. It was only 80 years ago that the Federation was able to salvage it to the surface; however, it unable to be used as a battleship.

The Federation took this crystal battleship and renovated it into a war museum and a patriotic education base. It would float forever atop the battlefield in which it fought.

However, popular legends say that although the Far East Demon Kingdom was annihilated, the Demon Emperor did not actually perish. He hides still, deep in the depths of the endless ocean. He continues to gather the souls of his Demon Soldiers that perished on the battlefield as a futile attempt to one day launch a counteroffensive, to come back even stronger.

And so, this was the reason why this area of the ocean has turned into a place where evil winds blow with fury. A place covered with maelstroms. A ghastly and terrifying sheet of deathly darkness… This was all caused by the Demon Emperor on the ocean floor wanting to create havoc.

So, the Federation took the Distant Expanse and had it hover in the air where it had fought back in the day. Year round, tour groups of hot-blooded youngster came and toured around, stimulated with vigorous thoughts of war and valor. These thoughts condensed into an Immortal National Spirit of Star Glory Federation, which would suppress the Demon Emperor for eternity and extinguish the millions of Demon Souls completely.

“Everyone, quickly look! There’s something in the air!” a student cried in astonishment.

============================

Author’s words:

Under everyone’s directions, I saw many friends in the comment section suggest that I add a some postscript to the end, to interact with everyone more.

Teacher Cow did think of this before, but after some deliberation I felt that this method of chasing more readers every day, would probably not make a difference. From the perspective of the general reader, if I were reading and am engrossed in the chapter, then suddenly the author jumps out with some gibberish and nonsense… I think this would have some influence on the reading experience. So Teacher Cow will still continue to keep comments/statements in this work to a minimum.

Everyone, if there’s any comments, just leaving them in the review section is fine. Teacher Cow has seen them. When I have time I will exchange words with everyone for sure.

Today I mainly want to give everyone an update. At the present, my current release schedule is not very fast. Actually, Teacher Cow’s speed can be considered so-so. I can write 8000-1000 and even 12,300 words in a day when I’m inspired.

However, my current energy has been allocated to the overarching story behind the scenes, delicate outlines, and also supporting framework, in preparation to bring together into a rough draft. So, when I don’t have any suggestions, I have no choice but to control my writing speed. This is also for the sake of the overarching framework, so that it can explode forth often. I hope everyone can understand.

Teacher Cow is a newcomer. This book may not be as dazzling and flashy as the top most popular books on the ranking list, but our comment section here is quite lively. There are quite a few friends who have offered valuable suggestions. Teacher Cow is deeply moved. I will earnestly write a good book for sure. Of course if you can everyone, hit the recommend button and etc. But, what’s still important is to make reviews in the review section often. Teacher Cow will look at every comment. Everyone communicate with Teacher Cow, and Teacher Cow will be very satisfied as well. This time I thank everyone for the support. Teacher Cow also wishes for the day when the over-arching framework is completed, and open an all-fire bombardment!

(My novel, Forty Millenniums of Cultivation, contains a lot of new content on the official Wechat platform~ There’s also a 100% lottery with big prizes for everyone! Open Wechat and hit the upper right ‘+ Friend’ button. Search for public ID ‘qdread’ and follow! Speed is of the essence!)





Home  Forty Millenniums of Cultivation  Chapter 42
 

Chapter 42
 
Chapter 42: Rising Dragon of the Nine Stars!
Translator: Strivon, Ash  Editor: Geoffrey_, Lancent

Li Yao stared as far as he could into the distance and was met with only the gradual projection of a gigantic hologram amidst the furious rolling waves of clouds. The hologram expanded in all directions at lightning speed. Soon, it had spread to a length of dozens of kilometers!


On the hologram appeared a blood-like setting sun, stormy winds and thunder, and a thousand crystal battleships interweaved and amongst each other. They mutually collided, tore apart, and were engulfed in explosions in a bitter battle!

“It’s 500 years ago during the Great Blood Ocean War!” Li Yao’s spirit was shaken.

The hologram soon displayed upon its screen. The stirring and tragic scene of the Distant Expanse fiercely ramming into the Wild Heaven.

Wild Heaven was the Far East Demon Kingdom’s flagship. Rumor has it that the skeletons and corpses of a hundred of giant Demon Beasts from the bottom of the ocean were catalyzed by demonic techniques to condense and refine into the incomparably large skeletal battleship.

Its total length exceeded 20 kilometers and its weight reached 190 million tons. It was simply an ugly, levitating mountain peak. It gave off a feeling of indestructibility and dread.

Even the Distant Expanse was like a dingy boat when compared to the Wild Heaven, disintegrating with only a slight bump.

But when faced with this powerful enemy, the Distant Expanse increased its speed with no thoughts of turning back. It went faster and accelerated constantly towards the hardest front deck of the Wild Heaven, bursting with all its strength.

Clearly, the Wild Heaven discovered the intentions of the Distant Expanse. The countless acid sacks on its body, demonic energy cannons, and flaming poison glands all charged up. They fired out hundreds of acidic liquids, poisonous juices, and demonic lasers. They cleaved and struck, bombarding against the spiritual energy force fields of the Distant Expanse.

The Distant Expanse was on the brink of collapse from the bombardment; its spiritual energy force fields went dark. The ship could break into pieces at any moment.

In response, quite a few of the surrounding battleships of mankind leapt forward one by one with reckless abandon for the sake of holding off the attacks on the Distant Expanse by the Wild Heaven.

boxn ovel. c0m
The weights of these crystal battleships were rather small in comparison, and their defenses were weak. Most of them corroded completely after eating a few acid shots and poisonous juices, falling into the ocean and taking its entire crew and the whole ship to death.

But even more of humanity’s battleships blotted the sky in valiant defiance against death, as if they were all crazed. They formed the strongest shield to protect the Distant Expanse!

Finally…

The Distant Expanse and the Wild Heaven were less than 500 meters apart. For two battleships of this caliber in size, it was like a distance of a hair!

The Distant Expanse no longer powered their spiritual energy force fields. All spiritual energy were diverted into driving the propulsion arrays. The back of the battleship exploded forth with a violent red glow. The ship’s speed increased to another level, and the ship rammed into the demonic energy force fields of the Wild Heaven!

“TSSSSSSSSSSSSSSSSSSS——”

Like a meteor breaking into the atmosphere, the friction between the Distant Expanse and the demon force fields of the Wild Heaven created great amounts of radiation and heat. A scarlet red glow enveloped the Distant Expanse. The Distant Expanse had turned into… a radiating spear!

It was too late!

No matter how the Wild Heaven would dodge, it would be too late!

No matter how much firepower the Wild Heaven would pour onto the Distant Expanse, it would be too late!

On the bridge of the Wild Heaven, no matter how much the Far East Demon Emperor bellowed in rage, no matter how much he roared in fury, no matter how maliciously he cursed against the crazed elite of humanity in front of him, it was too late!

With its sky-piercing aura, the radiating spear stabbed fiercely into the forward deck of the Wild Heaven. The Distant Expanse pierced two-thirds deep into the body of the ship before setting the propulsion array at the back of the ship to overload. Bright balls of light exploded forth like fireworks. It was the final moment of the Distant Expanse.

What followed was a world-shaking series of chain reaction explosions.

The awe-inspiring and world-dominating Wild Heaven was like a body that lost its soul. Fumes of smoke were going off all over. Fire leaked out everywhere. The skeletal structure of the warship began to collapse, and the broken pieces fell one by one into the ocean.

……

As the battle ended, the projection gradually faded away The blood-stained ocean turned into blue skies and white clouds once more.

In the final scene shown by the hologram, the setting sun and blood gradually condensed into three paragraphs of scarlet red words:

In this battle, the 13,250 crewmates, including 300 Refinement stage cultivators, 50 Foundation Building stage cultivators, and the Core Formation stage cultivator who served as captain, all perished. Not one survived!”

“And there were an additional 110,000 crewmates and 4352 cultivators who perished with them!”

“What they created would forever be a powerful nation of humanity… The Star Glory Federation!”

And in this context, a red flag of monumental importance drifted carefree in the wind. It unraveled slowly, revealing a giant golden dragon that bared its fangs in the middle of the red flag. The giant dragon was seated upon a translucent crystal ball, and in this pearl were nine glistening and dazzling five-pointed stars.

The National Flag of Star Glory Federation… The Rising Dragon of the Nine Stars Flag!

The nine stars represented the first nine cultivator guilds that founded the Federation. The giant dragon represented human civilization’s stand against the river of stars — their great ambition to conquer the cosmos!

When they saw these three paragraphs, when they saw the dark-red blood-like national flag, the hearts of all these youths became stirred, overwhelmed by emotion. Their blood fired up heatedly, and someone unknown first shouted:

“Long live the Federation!”

“Long live cultivators!”

“The human race shines bright! We contend for the sea of the stars! Long live mankind!”

“We humans are the strongest battle-race in the endless sea of the stars! We will forever be the masters of this cosmos! There are no existences capable of stopping us! We will fight those who dare hinder us to the bloody end!”

“Long live the Federation! Long live cultivation! Long live the human race!”

All the youths on the eight anti-gravity ships had stirred into patriotic cries in just a moment.

As if feeling the purest of fever and willpower from the youths, the once grave-still Distant Expanse lightly trembled all of a sudden, and its entire body bubbled forth with a faint gold glow, transforming into a golden spear that stabbed fiercely towards the Devil Dragon Island below!

“Whoosh!”

Just when the golden spear pierced the “head” of Devil Dragon Island, the entire plane of the black ocean let out a weak jolt. It seemed that fragmented miserable shrieks could be heard coming from the ocean. And the maelstroms that dotted around Devil Dragon Island also seemed to freeze all of a sudden.

He wasn’t sure if it was his imagination, but Li Yao felt the air become a bit fresher and cleaner.

“Born to become a dragon. Died to become a monument. Forever defending the gate to the nation. Forever guarding the rivers and mountains!” These words had emerged in Li Yao’s mind.

“Looks likes the legends are true. This flagship of the Federation, the Distant Expanse, really has been refined into a gigantic artifact. To forever tower at the shores of the Far East Ocean, suppressing the destiny of the Far East Fiend Kingdom!”

Seeing the sight of the Distant Expanse becoming bigger and bigger, Li Yao felt a sort of calling indescribable from the bottom of his heart.

“At first I didn’t know what a Master Refiner was supposed to be. But, now I know. Only when one can craft a national treasure on the scale of the Distant Expanse can one truly be recognized as a Master Refiner!”

“If I can craft such an artifact with my own hands… Even if I’m just helping out by doing some simple maintenance… It would be of the highest glory for a Refiner!”

“I want to become this sort of Refiner. To be able to craft artifacts like this!” A torrent of emotion surged in Li Yao’s heart. He gripped so rigidly to the railing that his hands began to sweat. It seemed as if even the palms of his hands were on fire!

Author’s words:

(My novel, Forty Millenniums of Cultivation, contains a lot of new content on the official Wechat platform~ There’s also a 100% lottery with big prizes for everyone! Open Wechat and hit the upper right ‘+ Friend’ button. Search for public ID ‘qdread’ and follow! Speed is of the essence!)





Home  Forty Millenniums of Cultivation  Chapter 43
 

Chapter 43
 
Chapter 43: Sky Fantasia Academy
Translator: Strivon, Ash  Editor: Geoffrey_, Lancent

“Thump”


The eight anti-gravity ships gradually moved into the docking bay of the Distant Expanse, like tinner fleas jumping on the back of an ocean turtle. The difference in size between the two was enormous.

Li Yao was still in a revering state of mind when he jumped onto the Distant Expanse.

The present day Distant Expanse had already been remodeled into a war museum. As soon as he stepped on the front deck, Li Yao saw an enormous bronze statue, engraved upon which was a navy officer having the expression of resolute determination. One hand was on a long sword, while the other hand pointed to a distance. He seemed to be in the middle of a battle roar.

Even though it was just a statue, there was an absolute aura of courage from that of bloody battles. Li Yao could even faintly hear the crackle of lightning and roaring of thunder coming from within the bronze statue:

“Heaven’s Field has been sunk!”

This was the first, and the last, appointed captain of the Distant Expanse. A statue of the Core Formation stage cultivator — Ping Yuantao.

There were even nine words engraved at the base of the statue, a famous quote said by this Ping Yuantao.

Legend has it that Ping Yuantao entered a cultivator guild when he was a kid. During those days, the Heaven’s Origin sector was still a paradise for Demon Beasts. Humanity could only live a bitter life full of struggles in the towns and cities controlled by the cultivator guilds. The Star Glory Federation had just been founded, and so nobody really took the Federation for a real nation. For the sake of mutual convenient communication, the nine cultivation guilds established a lax organization.

At that time, Ping Yuantao and a bunch of other youths entered together into cultivator guilds. The elders of the guilds asked them according to convention, “Why do you want to cultivate?”

The youths chatted and bustled lively. They chatted with vigor. Some said they wanted glory, riches, and beautiful women. Some said they never wanted to grow old, to be free and unconstrained for all eternity. Some said they wanted to learn a hundred magical abilities, a thousand transformations, so that they could do whatever they want and move freely within heaven and earth. There were also some who wanted to slay and destroy the Demons and Devils, to protect their friends and family.

boxn ovel. c0m
And when it came to be Ping Yuantao’s turn, he said nine words:

“I cultivate so the Federation can rise and tower!”

A hundred years later, Ping Yuantao gave up his life for the sake of these nine words, resulting in a glorious and splendid ending. And these nine words become the motto of countless cultivators in the Star Glory Federation, encouraging them to pursue and manifest destiny, slay Demon Beasts, and make the Star Glory Federation the strongest human nation in the entire Heaven’s Origin Sector!

“Way too cool!”

Even though he had learned of Ping Yuantao’s story from textbooks on more than one occasion and had heard of these words before, when he saw these words on the Distant Expanse, he couldn’t help feeling excited. It’s said that these words were written personally by Ping Yuantao here. And so, the significance was obviously different. Quite a few students were stirred into shouts and cries. They continuously came over to take a selfie with the bronze statue of Ping Yuantao as a souvenir, posting the picture to the web to show off to their friends.

Li Yao also wanted to take a selfie, but Zheng Dongming actually dragged him away, walking directly inside, saying that he wanted to take him to check out some commotion.

“The statutes right here won’t run away. We need to attend the big occasion early. If we’re late, we won’t be able to squeeze in!”

“What big occasion?”

“Every time before the Limit Challenge Competition, the Nine Elite Universities will hold a conference outside of the arena, an ‘Interactive Exchange Convention’. The intention is to show off how awesome the Nine Elites are to the exam candidates and to attract the interest of self-candidates of genius cultivators. There is a total of nine booths where cultivators from the Nine Elites will directly exchange words with the exam candidates. The occasion is quite chaotic. We need to get in quick!” Zheng Dongming said, being familiar.

“Cultivators from the Nine Elites?” Li Yao’s eyes shined with a bright light. He didn’t need Zheng Dongming to drag him, suddenly increasing his own speed.

They entered the first holding of the ship. That large space was packed with over a thousand students. The bustling of human voices was in the air, creating a lively atmosphere.

The entire hall was into nine separate areas, and atop of each area hung the names of each university in the air.

Zheng Dongming looked left and right before pulling Li Yao to walk towards the area of the Sky Fantasia Academy.

“Why do you want to go to Sky Fantasia Academy’s booth first? Is their comprehensive true strength the strongest?” Li Yao didn’t quite understand. It looked like Sky Fantasia Academy had the most people crowded by their booth.

“Who gives a damn if their true strength is strong or not! Sky Fantasia Academy is the only school of the Nine Elites to specialize in educating culture-type cultivators. They produce large amounts of beautiful women! The quality of their women is good, and they all are super cultured!” Zheng Dongming swallowed a mouthful of saliva. His two eyes glittered with light.

The two people had just entered the crowd with extreme difficulty when they were met with Sky Fantasia Academy’s extremely plain booth. A few written works were hanging on all sides of the walls. One corner to the side had a few university students squinting their eyes, shaking and swaying their heads, being immersed in a world of music. The other side even had a youngster with unkempt hair and stubbled beard trembling all over; he was in the middle of reciting a poem.

And in front of them was someone wearing a white robe. Her black hair reached her waist to form an image of a classical beauty. She was in the middle of pouring her heart into a painting.

Li Yao watched, following her sparkling, jade-like fingertips. He discovered that her painting style was completely different from that of a goddess. The strokes were painted in an utterly violent and sharp manner. She painted out a raging sea with stormy waves, in which a small dilapidated fishing boat was struggling against an eight-clawed ocean monster.

“The painting’s not bad~…”

Although Li Yao didn’t understand the fine arts, he still felt a hair-raising aura coming from this scroll painting. He nodded lightly, and he heard the faint sound of waves coming from the corner of his ear.

The sound of waves?

Li Yao blanked out. All of a sudden, he found himself standing on the front deck of a violently shaking small fishing boat.

In his surroundings was a berserk ocean that stretched as far as the eye could see. Li Yao raised his head and saw the mountain-like skull of the eight clawed ocean monster just above the boat. A pair of blood red monster eyes stared rigidly at him. Those eyes seemed to give off a soul-sucking aura!

“AHH!”

Li Yao’s hairs stood on end, and he could not hold back a scream.

This scream seemed to shatter the illusion. His mind returned to his body that was already covered in overflowing cold sweat, waking up from a different world.

He looked to his side. Zheng Dongming was also pale and his two legs were trembling.

“You should know just how fearsome culture-type cultivators are now right? This beautiful woman did not have bad intentions, and the painting is only half completed, yet it was able to pull us into a terrifying illusion. If she were to actively attack and were to use a completed painting, do you feel like you can still escape?” said Zheng Dongming with a trembling voice.

Li Yao let out a long sigh of relief and thought back to the moment inside the illusion. The scene where the eight clawed ocean monster glared fixed at him.

Even now, he didn’t believe that the cause of this terrifying illusion was actually from just a half completed painting.

Indeed, culture-type cultivators are extremely terrifying existences.

“*Sigh… Although there are plenty of beautiful women, all these culture-type cultivators are lunatics. We cannot tease them rashly. We can only gaze from afar. We can’t disrespect and toy with them! Horrible. Just look at the bastard reciting poems over there. His face is flushed red with excitement. He’s reciting to the point of forgetting his surroundings. When his mental powers explode, who knows what sort of terrifying illusion he will create. Let’s get the hell out of here. It would be bad if we get pulled into his illusion. I really don’t want to enter the mental world of an ugly guy.” Zheng Dongming dragged Li Yao, squeezing out of the crowd. They arrived at the second booth of the universities.

(My novel, Forty Millenniums of Cultivation, contains a lot of new content on the official Wechat platform~ There’s also a 100% lottery with big prizes for everyone! Open Wechat and hit the upper right ‘+ Friend’ button. Search for public ID ‘qdread’ and follow! Speed is of the essence!)





Home  Forty Millenniums of Cultivation  Chapter 44
 

Chapter 44
 
Chapter 44: A Collision of Essence Particles!
Translator: Strivon, Ash  Editor: Geoffrey_, Lancent

When compared to Sky Fantasy Academy’s booth, it was quite obvious that there weren’t as many students congregated here. The sign written on their booth read the words “Star Nebula University”. A white ashen, bearded old man stood next to an enormous model artifact. In high spirits, he faced several dozen students to explain as his spittle flew all over:


“Each and every student here is an elite youth of the Federation, people who are determined to become cultivators! What is most important you may ask? In the eyes of a cultivator? And that is, of course, to absorb and refine the spiritual energy from the heaven and earth! Whether everyone knows or not, the spiritual energy we speak of, what is it? Fundamentally? I’ll tell everybody. The fundamental nature of spiritual energy is that it’s an elementary particle called a ‘spiritual energy particle’. We, Star Nebula University, are the sole and only university who are doing research on the spiritual energy particle, the strongest in the Federation! Each and every student, please watch this demonstration!”

The white-bearded old man pointed towards the model which had quite a strange and bizarre shape. Its core was a large tube in the shape of a ring, sealed from beginning to end; it looked like a metal tire.

After a short period of time, a glowing ball of light came into being at different times from the opposite sides of the ring. They headed to the center at the speed of a flint’s spark. They collided violently together with a “Bang”. Thousands of flaming stars set off like fireworks; it was dazzling to the extreme.

The white-bearded old man was extremely proud as he spoke:

“This is the ‘Spiritual Energy Particle Collider’ crafted by our Star Nebula University. The spiritual energy generators on both ends, in theory, can simulate the strikes of two Yuanying stage cultivators using all their strength. The two colossal energies collide directly with each, creating a large explosion, making it highly probably for a few discrete Spiritual Energy Particles to leap forth for capture in the end. Soon, we will be able to unlock the mysteries of spiritual energy! What do you all think, students? If you want to crack open the final mystery of spiritual energy, then apply for our Star Nebula University!”

“So it was like this all along! All this time, spiritual energy is fundamentally a type of elementary particle!”

“A spiritual energy particle collider! It really is amazing! I want to apply for Star Nebula University!”

All the students were in awe of the lecture given by the bearded old man, and so they discussed amongst themselves heatedly.

Even Li Yao had a ripple of emotion stir in his mind. He felt that choosing Star Nebula University would not be a bad choice.

Right at this moment, an ear-splitting voice came ringing ferociously from behind him. “Each and every student, do not be fooled by all means by the words of this old geezer. They’re all completely false!”

boxn ovel. c0m
A tall silhouette parted the crowd, walking on stage.

This person was eight feet tall. His skin was tanned and dark. His hair was grizzled. And on his sternum, he wore the crest of the “Federation’s First Military College”.

Immediately, the face of the white-bearded old man went scarlet with rage. “Zhao Tiange, why aren’t you staying at your school’s booth like a good boy!? What the hell did you come to our Star Nebula University for!?”

Zhao Tiange snickered and his tiger gaze swept over the many students. He said, “Zhong Boya, I could not stand to watch you use these preposterous fanatical and absurd words and demonstrations to lead these people astray. What do you mean that the fundamental nature of spiritual energy is the spiritual energy particle? Simply ridiculous! All students! You all must not be misled by his words. There still hasn’t been an authoritative accepted theory for the fundamental nature of spiritual energy in the circle of academia! However, I can tell everyone here with absolute certainty that spiritual energy is not a particle, but an inseparable wave! Spiritual energy particles do not exist! It’s spiritual energy waves that do exist!”

“How absurd! How laughable! You’re simply the biggest laughingstock under the heavens! Zhao Tiange. If you want to spew out rubbish, go fart in your own booth. Don’t fart at my place!” the white-bearded old man Zhong Boya seemed to have a violent temperament as he had howled back in rage.

Contrary to his military background, Zhao Tiange was not indignant and did not rise to anger. He said composed, “In rational debates of logic, there is no need to insult the other person. Professor Zhong Boya, you spoke so heatedly just a moment ago. Why don’t you show these students just how many discrete spiritual energy particles were captured by your Star Nebula University’s Spiritual Energy Particle Collider?

As soon as these words were spoken, Zhong Boya’s expression was like that of a chicken whose neck was stuffed and choked; he was immediately struck speechless. The wrinkled old face turned deathly pale. He hemmed and hawed for a period of time before saying, “At present, we have not captured any discrete spiritual energy particles, but according to our analysis, this is because our Spiritual Energy Particle Collider is not at a high enough level; the Yuanying stage strikes it emulates does not create a sufficiently powerful explosion. As soon as we can simulate the strikes of two Spirit Transformation Stage experts giving their all, the resulting collision will produce the discrete spiritual energy particle with absolute certainty!”

“THAT’S ENOUGH!”

Zhao Tiange glared with his eyeballs. The complete iron blooded aura of a military personnel burst forth as he shouted, “For the sole sake of crafting this Spiritual Energy Particle Collider to be able to emulate the strikes of Yuanying stage experts, just how much funding did your school ask and receive from the Federation? To cause our few military colleges to live on scraps for several of years! And now, you even say that your Spiritual Energy Particle Collider needs to emulate the strikes of Spirit Transformation Stage experts at their full strength? Then I’m afraid that even 10 years of the Federation’s budget won’t be enough for you! This much money is enough to craft the military several main battleship forces, or to craft several tens of thousands of crystal tanks and arm several battle platoons to flatten the Fiend Beast Wasteland! The Federation gave you this much money, and you can’t even capture a single fart particle. Yet, you still dare to beg for more money? Indeed, the money would have been better off going to feed our military Spirit Beasts. At least they can look after and protect our yards!”

The shame and humiliation caused the white-bearded old man’s face to be flushed red. With his loss of face, his anger was at its peak. And the imposing aura of Zhao Tiange further antagonized him. The white-bearded man suddenly exploded. Veins leapt up and beat wildly all over his body. His entire body expanded, in a flash, by a fold. With violent palpitations, he said, “Zhao Tiange! Any further words are pointless! It would be better for us to go outside to settle this!”

Zhao Tiange retreated a step, staying away from the burning imposing aura of Zhong Boya. With a sneer, he said, “Zhong Boya, aren’t you a professor of Star Nebula University? Do you think you’re a barbarian of the Ancient Cultivator Civilization of 40,000 years ago? Academic disagreements, debates, and arguments are a truth that will always exist throughout eternity. What’s the point of destroying my fleshly body? Even if you crush and grind my bones to ash and shatter my soul so that I will be unable to reincarnate for eternity… Spiritual energy… will always be a wave! Never will it turn into some bullshit particle!”

These words were like a bolt of lightning that struck Zhong Boya motionless in a flash. Only after much time passed did his entire body crumble and shrink down, like leaking ball of air. With a wave of his hand, he said, “Fellow Daoist Zhao, what you said is absolutely correct. Arguments about the truth have nothing to do with the physical strengths of both parties. It was my fault. I nearly fell into madness! My loss of self-control just now was due to my lack of self-cultivation and maturity. It has nothing to do with the path I persist in. Spiritual energy is a type of elementary particle for certain. In the end, we of Star Nebula University will prove it! Each and every student, if you approve of my theory, then you can stay behind and we can discuss it some more. If you feel that Fellow Daoist Zhao’s words are correct, then you can go walk along with him. Walk to the booth of the First Military College and listen to his lecture.”

“I have no sort of lecture. The Federation’s First Military College emphasizes practical application. We don’t have excess resources to go research the mysteries of the Spiritual Energy Wave. All we can do is slay Demon Beasts and defend our nation! Each and every student, if you’re willing to come stand side to side with me on the battlefield to slay Demon Beasts, then you might as well come with and join our cause for defending the nation! We need hot-blooded men!”





Home  Forty Millenniums of Cultivation  Chapter 45
 

Chapter 45
 
Chapter 45: Debating on the Grand Dao
Translator: Strivon, Ash  Editor: Geoffrey_, Lancent

Finishing his words, Zhao Tiange faced Zhong Boya with a nod and turned around to leave.


The vast majority of youths followed Zhao Tiange. Only a small portion of students was enraptured by the Spiritual Energy Particle Collider. They stayed behind to ask Zhong Boya more deeply.

“That was close! I even thought that these two might start a fight!” This contention was largely outside of Li Yao’s realm of expectation. His face was covered in a cold sweat. Fear still lingered in his heart when he had spoken.

These two university professors were at least at the Building Foundation stage. They broke out with all their strength to produce an imposing air that was absolutely frightening. This was not something that Li Yao could bear.

“Who said this wouldn’t happen! 修真者, Cultivators, Daoists. The character 真 has the meaning of Truth. Every Cultivator pursues their own Truth. If truths are different, to the extent of being completely opposite, then of course there will be a collision of truths with sparks flying everywhere. There is an absolute need to demolish the opposing party! Fortunately there’s a lot of people here today; both sides were able to control themselves. If this was a different situation with no one around in all directions, the two parties will really go and have a bout. This is trivially common!” Zheng Dongming said with utter sorrow.

“They would be this extreme? They would go so far just for a theory?” Li Yao smacked his tongue.

“Of course they would go this far. Cultivators, or ‘修真’, means to Cultivate ‘修’ in the Truth ‘真理.’ To explain in terms from the Ancient Cultivation World, this ‘Truth’ is our Dao-Heart. Our heart’s path. When our Truth becomes refuted by others, when doubts arise in our hearts, then our hearts become swayed and becomes an ‘Unguarded Dao-heart,’ making it easy to fall to madness. The cultivation of the self is then halted. In serious cases, their world collapses, their cultivation falls wildly, and they become cripples! Legends say that there once was a strong Monad cultivator who debated with others on the Dao. His opponent brought out an irrefutable fact, thoroughly demolishing the Truth he persevered in. The Monad exploded! And his heart became unguarded! An external demonic influence took advantage of the opening and entered his heart, transforming him on the spot into a demonic cultivator! And this demonic cultivator quite nearly caused a great calamity! And so, when cultivators debate over the Truth, it’s more like they’re debating over the greater Truth, the Great Dao. Only the brave can forge ahead and press forward. They cannot shrink back by even half a step!” said Zheng Dongming with utter graveness.

Li Yao looked pensive as he nodded his head.

Indeed, today his world has been broadened. He received so much knowledge on the world of cultivators, but there was a bit that he still did not understand.

“Oh, that’s right. At the end, Zhong Boya addressed Zhao Tiange as Fellow Daoist Zhao. What does that mean? After Zhao Tiange heard this, I saw his attitude become gentler. He even sent his regards to Zhong Boya with a nod before he left. It seemed that he wasn’t that hostile anymore.”

Zheng Dongming explained, “Fellow Daoist is an honorific used in the world of cultivators. The meaning is, ‘I may not agree with your concept, but I recognize that you and I are the same. We both pursue the truth and advance forward on the Great Dao. Our truths may be different, but we both have the same kind of heart — the kind that pursues the truth. Therefore, we are friends, though ones who walk alone on our respective Great Daos’. And that is the ‘Fellow Daoist’. It is a very formal address! When Zhong Boya addressed his opponent as a Fellow Daoist, he gave goodwill on his own accord. Zhao Tiange also did not want to escalate the matter, so he naturally went with the flow and walked off the stage.”

boxn ovel. c0m
Zheng Dongming, upon seeing Li Yao muttering to himself and not speaking up, laughed and asked, “What is it? Are you interested in Star Nebula University?”

Li Yao thought seriously to himself. He shook his head while saying, “It looks like Star Nebula University’s expertise lies more in the underlying theory in their academic subjects. I have never received a proper education, so my fundamentals are on the weaker side. Also, I am not interested in theory. Is there a university that focuses more on practical applications?”

“Focuses more on practical applications? Of course there is. Let’s go have a look at Empyrean Capital School of Medicine!”

The two walked to the next booth — to the Empyrean Capital School of Medicine!

All who appeared here were doctors wearing white gowns and surgical masks. The air was also filled with a faint acidic smell of disinfectant.

A large glass chamber was placed in the middle of the booth. Confined within was a tiger shaped Demon Beast. It was unknown what sort of secret technique bound it down, but the Demon Beast continued to maintain a frozen state; it could not wag its tail even by a tiny bit.

Its eyeballs whirled and turned chaotically, flickering occasionally with a glow that contained both great panic and savage brutality. This was the only thing that showed that the Demon Beast was a living creature.

A few nervous white-gowned doctors were bustling in front of the console. After a short time later…

A white-gowned doctor lifted his head. With a bright voice, he said, “All students, please watch!”

Thousands upon thousands of traces of dazzling sword flashes flickered in an instant within the glass chamber. Everyone was incited to the point of tears. Quite a few people were even forced to take small steps back.

When everyone was able to see the glass chamber again, they discovered that the savage aura within the tiger-shaped Demon Beast’s eyes had already been frozen.

“Whoosh! Whoosh! Whoosh! Whoosh! Whoosh!”

From head to tail, several dozens! Over a hundred! Over a thousand! Thin red lines appeared on the Demon Beast’s body. It was crazy! Incorporeal blades of air had cut the Demon Beast into several thousand pieces!

A white-gowned doctor spoke unenthusiastically, “What is currently going on is our Empyrean Capital School of Medicine’s ‘Demon Beast Slicing Research Project’. We take a Demon Beast and slice it into 0.01 millimeter thick sections. We then use telepathy to scan each section. From this, we are able to clearly determine the composition of the Demon Beast’s body. Taking this data and uploading it to a crystal processor, we are then able to create a complete simulation of a virtual Demon Beast.”

“By going through this process, we are able to know the Demon Beast’s habits, characteristics, and battle strength like knowing the back of one’s hand. And, we are also able to conduct all the various test we could ever want in the Great Illusionary Land without fear of being injured or killed by the Demon Beast.”

“At present, we already have 98 major classes, consisting of 1352 different types, of Demon Beasts in this Demon Beast Slicing Research Project. All students, if you’re interested, then you can apply for our Empyrean Capital School of Medicine… Our mission isn’t simply to help the dying and heal the sick — it’s primarily to exterminate demons and Demon Beasts!”

Zheng Dongming met Li Yao with a wink. “What do you think of this one? But first, I want to remind you. The minimum required score for the Empyrean Capital School of Medicine is very high. It’s pretty much the highest required of the Nine Elites. Even I have no guarantee to test in.”

Li Yao scratched his head, having some hesitation.

There were so many universities, each with their own world shocking miraculous marvels and exterminating techniques. But when compared to the university of his dreams, it seemed that there was still just that small difference in feeling.

“Within our Federation, is there a university that focuses heavily on creating Artifacts? I’m not talking about Artifacts such as the Spiritual Energy Particle Collider, but rather for military use. For example, flying shuttles, flying swords, crystal rail cannons, crystal-powered mobile armors … These sorts of War Artifacts.”

“Of course, there is. Just ahead is the Deep Sea University. In the Federation, they are the strongest in the field of crafting and refining. That place is known as the ‘Refiner’ Holy Land!’ Zheng Dongming pointed to a booth not too far away.

“The Holy Land for Refiners!”

A flame ignited and blazed within the depths of Li Yao’s eyes, transforming into a myriad of fiery serpents that danced wildly.

Like with all the other booths, the Deep Sea University’s booth had a bunch of people crowded together. It looked like the vast majority of students were extremely passionate about this university which had more of a focus on practicality. Li Yao could barely squeeze into the crowd.

In the middle of the booth was actually the enormous model of a city. It had mountains and it had rivers. It had skyscrapers and it had mansions. The sky even had flying shuttle passing by occasionally. It was small but was complete in every detail. It was crafted to be a perfect imitation.

Right at this moment, a dozen or so metal-crafted miniature Demon Beasts suddenly flew from one end of the booth, bringing with them an ear-splitting and piercing whistle. They charged into the miniature city.

At nearly the same time, over a hundred pentagonal metal balls rose abruptly from all around the city. The cubes spun rapidly in the air to form a giant net that blanketed the sky. They tangled around and held the invading flying Demon Beasts at bay, immobilizing them.

After a burst of “Ding Ding Dong Dong” sounds of fighting, all the flying Demon Beasts were intercepted by the pentagonal metal balls. The Demon Beasts were sucked and firmly stuck to the surfaces of the metal balls by an indescribable force.

“All students.”

It was a man whose hair was as white as a crane’s and whose complexion was as rosy as a child’s. This purple clothed man was full of hale and hearty vigor. With beaming smiles, he said, “The model you all just saw was the ‘Anti-Demon Beast Defense System’ that our Deep Sea University has researched, developed, and crafted. It has already been purchased by the military for use in every strategic city in the Federation. It can withstand a simultaneous attack of up to 1500 Demon Beasts and can even repel the flying swords of the strong Demonic Cultivators. With this kind of Artifact, it doesn’t matter if it’s a powerful Demon Beast or a demonic cultivator. As soon as they enter the airspace of our Federation, they become gifts with their hands tied, waiting to be taken prisoner!”





Home  Forty Millenniums of Cultivation  Chapter 46
 

Chapter 46
 
Chapter 46: The Refiners’ Holy Land
Translator: Strivon, Ash  Editor: Geoffrey_, Lancent

The purple-clothed old man paused for a moment. Then, a dozen dark, dull, and completely ordinary flying swords floated and emerged from behind his back. They spun and circled randomly above the numerous students’ heads. From time to time, the flying swords would perform maneuvers at rapid speeds within a small area. They dove, they turned, and they flipped, causing the observing students to cry out in surprise over and over.


With a laugh, the purple clothed old man spoke, “All students, if the recent demonstration of the Anti-Demon Beast Defense System was not enough to satisfy you, then look at the latest ‘Unmanned Autonomous Flying Swords” crafted by our Deep Sea University. These flying swords come in two models. The Alpha Model can be controlled through a dedicated crystal processor remote control system, allowing for operation of the Flying Sword at a distance over 10,000 miles away from the cultivator controller. And these Beta Models you see here are completely and thoroughly unmanned and autonomous. There are absolutely no cultivators controlling these flying swords!”

“If there’s no one to operate them, how are they able to fly by themselves?” There were students who could not hold back from asking questions.

“In the Master CPU in these types of flying swords, we employ a completely new type of glyph array architecture. We are able to input several hundreds of thousands of telepathic commands in advance to simulate all the possible situations that may arise in battle, and have it run the proper pre-installed combat programs in response. This is our miraculous Unmanned Autonomous technology! Of course, to actually research and develop this technology is not as easy as I described. The Unmanned Autonomous Flying Sword was just recently created; it still contains many problems. All students, if you’re interested then you might as well apply to our Deep Sea University. Together, we can research, develop, and perfect miraculous artifacts such as these!” the purple-clothed old man said beaming with smiles.

Li Yao watched the unmanned autonomous flying swords fly about through the air. He felt his heart stir and automatically thought of Black Wing.

Black Wing also flew about without Li Yao issuing commands to it. It even lies in front of the hologram projector, humming and buzzing, singing and dancing. It simply didn’t seem like an artifact, but rather an actual living being.

When compared with these Unmanned Autonomous Flying Swords, Black Wing’s “Intelligence” was clearly on a much higher level.

Anyways, his old man had once said that Black Wing was a relic found in a historical ruin in another Greater Thousand World. An entire lifetime of research and study was not enough to crack Black Wing’s architecture. He even couldn’t crack open Black Wing’s shell.

His old man had speculated that Black Wing should be the product of a different Cultivator Civilization on a higher level.

It’s already amazing enough that Deep Sea University was able to craft these kinds of flying swords that didn’t need cultivators to control them!

Right at this moment, an unmanned flying sword suddenly flipped around and swept past over Li Yao’s head. Li Yao felt an itch in his mind. He instinctively reached out with his hand, wanting to grasp the flying sword by its hilt.

boxn ovel. c0m
As soon as his fingers were about to make contact with the hilt, the flying sword vibrated chaotically to create an azure blue glow. Like that of an electric eel, an electric arc flashed and struck Li Yao’s fingers.

“IT HURTS!”

Li Yao pulled back his hand; his fingers had turned black. He looked once more at the flying sword that continued to circle above his head. From time to time, the sword exploded maliciously with azure electricity.

With his tongue stuck out from fear, Li Yao contracted his neck. He no longer dared to be so reckless.

The purpled-clothed old man chuckled as he walked to be in front of Li Yao. He said, “This student, you should now know just how amazing the Unmanned Autonomous Flying Sword is. Fortunately, in time, the flying sword will be able to figure out your identity of being a civilian. If it had recognized you as a Demon Beast or a Demonic Cultivator, then you would have long been beheaded! Come, let me look at your hand. To see if you’re injured.”

As Li Yao obediently reached out with his hand, his mind was actually revolving with interest. He did the utmost to figure out a method to break the Unmanned Autonomous Flying Sword.

“Huh?”

The purple-clothed old man’s faced leaked out a trace of an astonished and happy expression. His smiling expression intensified. “This student, do you often do Artifact maintenance in your free time?”

Li Yao stared, stunned he asked, “How do you know?”

“I can feel that your hands are different from the common person. This kind of pliable and tough feeling should be from the growth of calluses that are later worn away. Then grown again. Then worn away. This must have happened over and over for at least a dozen times to produce your hands. Additionally, the muscles of your palm produce subtle responses. It’s impossible for other people to have these hands, only experienced Artifact technicians have these kinds of hands. How about it? Do you want to apply to our Deep See University?” the purple clothed old man asked being completely cordial.

Li Yao took a look at the Anti-Demon Beast Defense System. Then, he took a look at the Unmanned Autonomous Flying Sword circling over his head. With a forceful nod, he said, “I have a dream that one day I will become a Refiner — to craft the most powerful Artifact of the Federation!”

“Of the top ten Master Refiners in the Federation, seven of them graduated from our Deep Sea University. Deep Sea University is the Holy Land for Refiners! My name is Xie Tingxian. I’m a scout for our Deep Sea University in Arena 571. You’re pretty good. I’ll pay special attention to you during the competition, so be sure to give a good performance!” The purple clothed old man patted Li Yao on the shoulder. In the blink of an eye, he was surrounded by a blob of different students.

“Wow!”

From outside the crowd, Zheng Dongming cried out quite exaggeratedly, “You actually met Deep Sea University’s scout! He’s very influential and probably has some authoritative power for special admittance. As long as he chooses you, you won’t even need to take the entrance exams. You can be admitted directly into Deep Sea University! I should have known to let the flying sword shock me too just then!”

“You still need to be chosen in order to get in!”

Although Li Yao spoke without thinking, his heart was actually beating wildly. He was nervous, excited, happy… various feelings were tangled into a complex knot. It caused his emotions to be stirred to the peak.

Deep Sea University was the ideal university in his mind. He absolutely needed to give a good performance during the Limit Challenge Competition to make this Xie Tingxian sit up and notice him!

Having already determined his number one goal, the other universities no longer appealed as much to him. Li Yao and Zheng Dongming circled around the ship’s hold, completing a circle. They didn’t pay particular attention to the remaining universities and were preparing to leave. At this time, they suddenly discovered that there was still a small exhibition hall in the deepest corner.

The other universities had decorated their areas to be quite lavish; their setup featured state of the art technology. When comparing the exhibition halls that drew in people, this hall was really extremely unpresentable. There wasn’t even a single student taking a look inside. There was only a lonely staff member sitting in the depths of the hall.

Li Yao raised his head to look. On top were the written words “Grand Desolate War Institution!”.

“Is this also one of the Nine Elites? Why is this place so abandoned? No one wants to apply to this school?” Li Yao asked with utter curiosity.

Zheng Dongming glanced at the sign and couldn’t help laughing. “The Grand Desolate War Institution has the worst internal resources. Their overall true strength is the weakest, and they’re located in the nastiest of places, the Demon Beast Wasteland…. But these factors aren’t enough to make this hall this abandoned. The main reason lies in their ‘Combat Department’ that the Grand Desolate War Institution is most famous for. They are experts in educating people who temper their bodies to walk the martial path, the Body Practitioners. It is said that the most extreme Body Practitioners even forego all Artifacts. They believe that the body is the strongest and is the sole and only Artifact. They rely purely on their fists to fight Demon Beasts. They’re simply a group of lunatics!”

Li Yao, upon hearing his words, also agreed considerably with him.

He was born in the Artifact Graveyard. He was an expert at taking any item he can get and use it as a weapon. It was beyond stupid to rely solely on his two fists to fight hand-to-hand against his enemies.

Zheng Dongming continued, “The cultivation philosophy of the Grand Desolate War Institution has a bit of logic behind it. Because of the environment around the Grand Desolate Region is of the worst quality, resources are in short supply. Quite a few powerful artifacts with precise architectures are excessively worn-out due to overuse after using them a few times in such a bad environment, to never be used again. This kind of extreme environment is what fostered those who relied purely on their fleshly bodies, the Body Practitioners! But in the South East Region, all cultivators specialize in using Artifacts. These types of martial art methods are very unpopular here. And in addition, tempering the body is incomparably painful. Traversing the Path of Body Tempering means to endure eighty-one torments for even a slight chance of success… What do you think? Among us South-Easterners, who would rack their brains deciding to walk the Path of Body Tempering?”

Pausing for a bit, Zheng Dongming suddenly thought of something. He tapped his head saying, “I almost forgot. Your Crimson Nimbus Second produced a cultivation genius Fiend Blade Peng Hai. He decided to go with the Grand Desolate War Institution. He’s not an extreme Body Practitioner though, he’s a Sword Cultivator.“

“This is the university that Fiend Blade Peng Hai studied at?” A light flashed in Li Yao’s eyes. A strand of interest towards the Grand Desolate War Institution was born in Li Yao.





Home  Forty Millenniums of Cultivation  Chapter 47
 

Chapter 47
 
Chapter 47: Ding Lingdang
Translator: Strivon, Ash  Editor: Geoffrey_, Lancent

“Since they were able to rise up into the Nine Elites, they must have something that sets them apart from the norm! Let’s go over and take a look!” Li Yao spontaneously strolled towards Grand Desolate War Institution’s booth.


“The Grand Desolate War Institution is full of barbarians with well-trained bodies, but simple minds. What possibly is there to see? It would be better for you to come with me to go back to Sky Fantasia Academy to see if there’s a chance to find a few female seniors to eat dinner with. Together, we can discuss literature~! Hey. If you’re not coming, I’ll go by myself. Don’t say that I didn’t consider you a swine friend~!”

Zheng Dongming shouted a few times behind Li Yao’s back and was met with no reaction by Li Yao. Zheng Dongming then rubbed his nose, took out his micro crystal processor, and set it to “mirror” mode. He spread open his hand to comb his hair to the side. After letting out a whistle, he headed walking towards Sky Fantasia Academy.

As soon as Li Yao entered Grand Desolate War Institution’s exhibition hall, Li Yao felt his footsteps go heavy all of a sudden. It was as if a 1000 lb boulder was pressing on his shoulder. Even the air turned somewhat more viscous.

“An artificial gravity field?” Li Yao became interested.

This exhibition hall was set up in a rough and wild cultivation gym.

Dumbbells, barbells, sandbags, and other cultivation equipment were placed all around in a chaotic mess.

To the astonishment of Li Yao, most of the cultivation equipment weren’t actually made from metal but rather crafted and created from rock and Demon Beast remains. It gave one a course, barbaric, but blood-heating feeling. It made the muscles of his entire body, from head to toe, itch to give the equipment a try.

As he made his way inside, Li Yao recalled the month when he spent his utmost effort, shedding sweat and youth in the school’s warehouse.

He could not help walking up to a squat rack, hefting a barbell onto his shoulders.

This barbell on the squat rack was made and crafted from the spine of a Demon Beast. When grasped in his hand, he felt the extremely fine knurling. The feeling in his hand felt extremely good. The barbell plates, made from polished obsidian stone, had the perfect weight to them.

boxn ovel. c0m
Li Yao took a deep breath. His toes dug into the ground. He sent power to his hips, squatting steadily down.

……

Ding Lingdang was restless.

She sat upon a dumbbell bench. Gripped in each hand was a 100 kilogram skeleton dumbbell. As she destroyed, ravaged, and tormented the dumbbells, she sent e-crane messages to the head instructor of Grand Desolate War Institution’s Combat Department thousands of miles away. Complaining loudly, she said, “Teacher Xia. Can we of Grand Desolate War Institution really recruit students from this pussy-ass place? The arms and legs of the people here are delicate and thin. The people are weak to the extreme! I fear even a mere sneeze can topple them! And these pussies even look down upon our Grand Desolate War Institution. It’s already been half a day and only a few little kittens came in to take a look so far. And, each of them had an extremely strange expression as they looked at me from top to bottom, as if they were looking at a combat madman. So unfair! It’s really was mean of them!”

She waved with some effort and creaking noises rang out. The dumbbell had actually been squeezed bent.

Ding Lingdang went “Oh no!”, stuck out her tongue, and tossed the bent dumbbell to the side… Seven to eight dumbbells were piled up in the corner. There were hand marks clearly imprinted on each of the handles of these dumbbells.

On the hologram was a buff dude who was over 2.2 meters tall, with muscles as hard as a rock, and with scarlet red skin. The buff dude said helplessly, “Small Ding, don’t take things so personally. It’s been three years since our Grand Desolate Institution has recruited any new students from Arena 571. Everyone’s used to it. Otherwise, we wouldn’t have let you, a recent graduate and new faculty member, come and act as a scout here… We just came here to get in on the action and expand our influence. It doesn’t matter whether we recruit people or not. Anyways, in our Grand Desolate Region, there’s been plenty of cultivation geniuses trying to enter our school!”

“From what I’ve seen here, I agree. Everyone here’s a pretty boy; not one is suited to be a Body Practitioner… Hold on, Teacher Xia. I think I’ve found a target!” Ding Lingdang happened to raise her head. She saw Li Yao doing squats, causing her two eyes to glow all of a sudden.

“Really? How’s his potential?” The giant red-skin dude in the hologram was a bit astonished.

The fellows who can be considered “targets” by Ding Lingdang are few even in the Grand Desolate Region.

“He’s fairly decent. Those biceps. Those pectorals. Those lats. Those quads. Those glutes. Tsk tsk tsk tsk. Every muscle in his body is flawless and beautiful. It makes one unable to hold back from giving a few pinches~! What a natural young talent! He’s simply just made to walk the path of body tempering. Enough talk. I’m going to go over now…. to capture him!”

Ding Lingdang rubbed her hands together as her face filled with excitement. With a step, she scurried just behind Li Yao.

“Little brother, you’ve trained your pecs quite well~!”

Li Yao felt only a ferocious and vicious hurricane sweep over from behind his back. A powerful oppressive aura, nearly on the exact same level as Fiend Blade Peng Hai’s, appeared behind him!

The only difference was that… Fiend Blade Peng Hai’s aura was earth-shattering in form of ebbing tides and waves. This aura was as if a tyrannosaurus rex had come crashing from afar, fiercely and viciously. A strong air of terrible beasts was mixed in the aura!

All Li Yao felt was the tip of a spear pressing against his back. He could no longer bear the barbell, so he directly rolled forward, utterly miserably, to avoid the “terrible beast” assaulting from behind. He spun around like lightning with a strength that nearly broke his waist, automatically adopting the tightest defensive guard!

Cold sweat rained from his forehead. His wild beating heart nearly ripped open his chest!

“Who’s aura could be so overbearing!? It’s simply a tyrannosaurus rex in the form of a human!” Li Yao gasped for breath with a gaping mouth. He was trembling with fear as he sized up this “Human-shaped T-rex.”

What appeared behind his back was beyond his expectations — it was actually a woman. An absolutely young girl.

At most, this girl was 3-4 years older than him; she appeared to be just over 20.

She had a very tall stature, so much so that she was taller than him by just a little bit. Her figure was extremely healthy and beautiful with broad shoulders, a strong and flexible waist, and a slender pair of legs. Her plump thighs were bulging and bursting; they were exceptionally buff. They caused one to dream helplessly about her other bulges, wondering what sort of beautiful sensations would arise from coping a feel.

She wore the bare minimum of clothes: just a tank top and shorts, exposing a succubus-grade beautiful figure to the air.

She wasn’t the sort of classical beauty that had flesh so tender and white it seemed like congealed oil. Her skin was a color of honey-like amber, glistening and shining under the light, looking to be as smooth as velvet.

After having just done some exercise, her amber skin glistened faintly with sweat, making her skin appear sparkling, translucent, and gem-like.

Her looks weren’t considered exceptionally pretty, but that was due to her having coarse eyebrows, overly large eyes that contained too much spirit, a nose that stuck out too much, lips that were too thin, and ears that stuck straight out like a monkey’s, kind of like jug ears.

To describe her in a single sentence: she was too outstanding, too straightforward, and too forceful. Her invasive personality was too strong. There was completely no trace of the cool tenderness that most guys liked in a girl.

However, it looked like she completely didn’t give a damn. She continued being like a small sun, spreading heat and radiance absolutely without restraint.

The weirdest thing was the object on each of her beautifully contoured ankles, an ankle bracelet comprised of faded red string connecting three-four tiny bells.

Logically, she should have made some “Ding-ling-dang-lang” sounds as she leapt over here in large steps, but Li Yao didn’t even hear the tiniest of noises. Those eight strings of tiny bells seemed to be rusted to death and were tied firmly above her beautiful feet.

Li Yao gasped inwardly in surprise. This girl had already reached the peak in regards to the fine motor control of her leg muscles. She made her muscles vibrate continuously throughout the entirety of her high-speed movement, superimposing and canceling with the vibrations of her movement; through destructive interference, she was able to keep the tiny bells from moving.

“My name is Ding Lingdang. You can call me Sister Ling. You can also call me by my nickname, “Ding-ling-dang-lang”. You’re quite strong and buff, little brother~! You were able to do quite a few squats under five-times gravity without breaking a sweat. And you were able to sense me dashing over here. Your intuition is quite sharp. You’re good material. Come! Let’s get to know each other!”

Ding Lingdang reached out her hand at lightning speed. She grasped Li Yao’s right hand and gripped firmly, leaving no chance for Li Yao to resist.





Home  Forty Millenniums of Cultivation  Chapter 48
 

Chapter 48
 
Chapter 48: Invitation from Grand Desolate War Institution
Translator: Strivon, Ash  Editor: Geoffrey_, Lancent

“*Inhale…..”


Li Yao felt like his palm was gripping a piece of red-hot coal. Even though he had endured a month of torment with “Give Up”, he was caught off guard and was forced to take a deep cold breath in pain!

“Your grip strength isn’t bad. I squeezed the hands of seven or eight students a moment ago. All of them cried tears of pain on the spot! One had even wet his pants… You Southeastern students are far too weak, not being able to take a single strike, you’re actually an exception!” Ding Lingdang withdrew her hand as she spoke, being completely pleased.

Li Yao shook his hand. He was pained to the point of being speechless.

He finally realized, at this time, why there wasn’t anyone who dared to come look around at the Grand Desolate War Institution’s booth.

If he had known of this earlier, it would have been better to go along with Zheng Dongming to Sky Fantasia Academy’s booth and gaze at the classical beauties…..

While his mind was running wild with imagination, a fragrance of earthly nature assaulted his nose all of a sudden. Ding Lingdang had moved closer to him abruptly. Two lips faced each other, two noses faced each other, and two pairs of eyes faced each other. Two female, beast-like eyes were staring wide and large. Those eyes were fiercely gazing fixed at Li Yao from a hair’s distance away.

“What, what are you up to?”

Li Yao was completely stupefied. His entire back was covered with cold sweat. This female beast was way too bold and straightforward. What she has done so far was simply unimaginable.

However, Li Yao was not your typical kind of person. He grew up in the Artifact Graveyard. What sort of weirdo has he not seen?

This kind of “always being led by the nose” feeling really was a bad feeling. Ding Lingdang’s aggressiveness completely awakened Li Yao’s core and fundamental nature — the vicious Vulture.

boxn ovel. c0m
He no longer retreated. Rather, he strove forward to face her, refusing her even an inch of ground.

“If you glare at me, I’ll glare at you too. It’s not like that you would eat me under the sun in broad daylight!”

If he was face to face at hand’s reach with a different girl, like the painting classical beauty from a moment ago, this would have been an extremely alluring and exciting moment.

But from Li Yao’s perspective, he did not feel the least bit of attraction to the opposite sex coming from Ding Lingdang.

This was because of the far too violent and fierce expression coming from this girl. It was like a shining blade. The unconcealed murderous aura bubbled forth, ferociously stabbing into Li Yao’s eyes. The aura drove constantly inside Li Yao’s mind. Rushing across and crashing directly, it bombarded recklessly without reason against Li Yao’s central nervous system.

It was 10 seconds. A short 10 seconds of confrontation and it was as if Li Yao had engaged endlessly in direct combat!

Right when his two legs grew weak, when he was unable to hold on any longer, Ding Lingdang suddenly retracted her gaze. She grinned, exposing two pure-white canine teeth.

Her mouth was very large, as were her eyes, nose, and ears.

Her smile seemed to possess a peculiar charm, like the splendid sun that appeared suddenly after days of rainy clouds. It made one forget about their troubles in an instant, making one feel crisp and bright.

“Little brother, you’re quite amazing… Even in the Grand Desolate War Institution, there aren’t that many students of the lower grades who dare to face eye-to-eye with me for so long! Not bad! Not bad at all! You possess strength and spirit rarely seen in a high-school student. And your awareness is incomparably sharp. Most importantly, you will still able to resist while being enveloped by my strong killing aura. Good. This is really good! I’ve waited so long and I finally ended up with you!”

Ding Lingdang waved her fist with strength, suddenly causing air the circulate around.

Li Yao’s head was covered in a cold sweat. It seemed that the other person had misunderstood something. But if he were to say that he just came here to play around willy-nilly… wouldn’t he be beaten to a pulp of meat?

Ding Lingdang patted Li Yao’s shoulder, causing Li Yao to grimace in pain. Paying no mind, she said, “Little brother, these two eyes of senior sister have never been mistaken before… You are the real deal! A man of steel! Those dazzling flying swords, artifacts…. They’re all used by pussies. Real men of iron should become Body Practitioners by tempering their own bodies to become powerful artifacts. Use a body filled with blood-racing heat and a pair of iron fists to strike open a giant land under the heavens! Come then! Come to our Combat Department of our Grand Desolate War Institution! Here lies the paradise for hot-blooded men. We’re completely different from those pussy-ass universities!”

Li Yao summoned the courage to speak, “I’m terribly sorry. Miss… Sister Ling. My dream is to become a Refiner, so I’m preparing to apply for Deep Sea University!”

“What? A Refiner?”

In a flash, Ding Lingdang’s eyes bulged to twice their size. Not caring about anything else, she roared and thundered, “With this good of a body, with this great of willpower, you don’t want to be a Body Practitioner, but rather some Refiner? This is simply a reckless waste of talent!”

Li Yao’s head hurt as if he had been hit. He retreated to the edge of the booth without batting an eyelid. With a humble gesture, he said, “I’m truly sorry, Sister Ling. Everyone has a different understanding of the road of cultivation. Maybe in your eyes, a refiner is not a powerful profession. But where I was born and raised, everyone would seize tools and weapons for the sake of survival. They racked their heads to assemble weapons from scrap… In our hands, even if it’s half a glass bottle, even if it’s a piece of paper, they can all be crafted into fatal weapons! Those who know only to use their fists do not live long. Only those who can seize materials and craft them into weapons can continue living on! It’s precisely because of this that I feel Refiner is an extremely incredible profession. To become a Refiner is my dream. I cannot apply to your school’s Combat Department. I thank you for your certainty in me.”

With a slight jump, he leapt out of Grand Desolate War Institution’s booth. He turned around and was just about to leave.

“Hey…!” Ding Lingdang suddenly shouted, freezing him.

Li Yao’s body went rigid and his heart thumped… This female T-rex wouldn’t come chasing after him right?

Fortunately, Ding Lingdang did not have the intention of chasing after him. She stepped one foot onto a barbell bench. Extending a finger, she said, “Little brother, don’t make this decision so rashly. Go back and think it over carefully. You can ask around and see what the circle of cultivators think about our Grand Desolate War Institution. As everyone knows… the Federation has a total of Nine Elite Universities. Eight of them breeds Cultivators. Grand Desolate War Institution… is the university that only breeds warriors!”

Li Yao was stunned. He gave her a quick nod and turned around to squeeze into the crowd.

Looking at his back, Ding Lingdang licked her lips. She spread open her hands and then squeezed tightly. The air in the palm of her hand exploded with a “Bang!”.

“Let’s wait and see. You’re this strong and buff. You’re just made to be a part of our Grand Desolate War Institution. I, Ding Lingdang, will capture you for sure!”

……

In order to leave a deep impression of the Nine Elite Universities on the exam takers, the Exchange Convention lasted for the entire day. The hold continued being brightly lit and filled with a bustling atmosphere all the way until 9 PM,

Anyways, Li Yao had already chosen the university he most aspired. After blazing and ravaging a meal at the affiliated Buffet in the Distant Expanse, he returned early to his assigned single room to rest.

On the way back, all that appeared in his mind was Ding Lingdang’s face that was full of vitality. This girl, who couldn’t be considered that pretty, was the type to leave a deep impression on a person in just a mere half a second.

However, even if her behavior was special and her words cause one’s blood to heat and boil, it was still impossible for Li Yao to apply to the Combat Department of the Grand Desolate War Institution.

His path had already been determined — and that is the Refining Department of Deep Sea University!

“Tonight, I’m going to get a good night’s rest so that I can put on a good performance at the competition tomorrow. I will win over people by blowing their minds with my brilliance. I will catch the eye of Deep Sea University’s scout, Xie Tingxian!” Li Yao made a resolution to himself in his heart.





Home  Forty Millenniums of Cultivation  Chapter 49
 

Chapter 49
 
Chapter 49: Small Ji, the Crystal Beast
Translator: Strivon, Ash  Editor: Geoffrey_, Lancent

A facial recognition glyph array was drawn on the door of the cabin. A red light swept across Li Yao’s face, ringing twice with “Beep Beep” sounds. With a “*click”, the cabin door opened.


The room inside was very simple and plain; there was only a bed and a tiny bathroom. There wasn’t even a desk placed anywhere.

Li Yao actually knew that this was special treatment given to them.

On a crystal battleship, only officers can enjoy the benefits of having a personal room. The average enlisted sailor lived in four-people, six-people, or even eight-people rooms.

Li Yao grew up in the Artifact Graveyard. He was able to sleep perfectly fine even in a pile of garbage. The environment here was luxurious in his opinion. He walked in with large strides, tossed his luggage into the corner, and smashed himself ferociously onto the bed, letting out a sound of satisfaction.

“Puji puji. Puji puji. Student Li Yao, hello. I’m your personal Puji Critter, Puji Critter Number 2899. You can call me 2899, or you can call me Small Ji.”

A chubby, plump, and charmingly innocent Puji Critter had squeezed out from under the bed with great difficulty, giving Li Yao a scare.

The white Puji Critter laboriously flapped its wings to fly into the air, speaking, “Starting from now all the way until the end of the competition, Student Li Yao will always have Small Ji at his service. Small Ji will explain the rules of the competition to you, answer your questions, help you get in touch with scouts from the Nine Elites, and shoot pictures and videos of every action you do in the competition, which will be transmitted to our monitoring center. If you encounter some sort of mortal crisis, Small Ji will even yell for cultivators to come save you! So contrary to my dull-witted appearance, I’m actually Li Yao’s good assistant in this competition!”

Li Yao stared unwaveringly at the white Puji Critter for a long time before asking suspiciously, “Small Ji, are you speaking of your own accord? Or is there someone controlling you from behind the scenes?”

The white Puji Critter began flying, orbiting around his head. It spoke cheerfully, “Small Ji isn’t saying these words by himself, and there is no one controlling me from behind the scenes. It’s that Small Ji’s body has been installed with the latest CPU system. 100,000 telepathic functions were programmed in advance so that Small Ji can perform the proper response in real time towards certain sorts of situations. Small Ji is the product of a joint R&D collaboration between Deep Sea University and the Empyrean Capital School of Medicine. I’m not your ordinary Spirit Beast! I’m the most advanced ‘Crystal Beast’ — a Spirit Beast controlled by a Crystal Processor!”

“Oh, so it was like this all along! You’re quite advanced. So they increased the intelligence of Spirit Beasts in this fashion. This way, they don’t need to worry about losing control over Spirit Beasts like with Demon Beasts!”

boxn ovel. c0m
Li Yao’s resolution to enter into Deep Sea University hardened even further. He continued asking, “Then Small Ji, please explain to me the rules of the Limit Challenge Competition.”

“Sure thing.”

The hair on top of the Puji Critter’s head shook to and fro. A meaty pink antenna extended out, and on the tip of the antenna was a flickering and shiny synthetic crystal stone.

A beam of light shot out from the crystal, forming into a large 3d hologram right in front of Li Yao. With a flare of spiritual energy light, the holographic image of Devil Flood Dragon Island appeared in front of Li Yao’s eyes.

“The Limit Challenge Competition is a time-honored traditional competition of the Federation. Its purpose is to allow the Nine Elites to select young talent gifted in cultivation. At the same time, it also gives the opportunity for students whose expertise are more focused on practical use rather than theory to show off their talent.”

“The annual Limit Challenge Competition has always been held two months before the university entrance exams. The entire Federation is divided into nearly 1000 different exam regions with each area containing 3000 competitors.”

“Floating Spear City and its surrounding area are Cultivation Cities in the Federation. Quite a few cultivation geniuses have emerged from here. So, exam region 571 has an extremely vicious environment, gaining the nickname as an ‘Exam Region of Death’.”

“Three thousand competitors must do their best to find a way to survive for five days on Devil Flood Dragon Island along with the rampaging Demon Beasts… Student Li Yao, try not to underestimate Devil Flood Dragon Island. Back in the day, this was the location of the final battle between Star Glory Federation and the Far East Demon Kingdom. Countless corpses are buried in the depths of the ocean. Demonic aura permeates the air!”

“The Demon Beasts of Devil Flood Dragon Island absorbs this aura year round. The Demon Beasts here are far more vicious than those in other places.”

The white Puji Critter flew to face Li Yao. It shook its stubby wing, speaking completely cheerfully, “The five days of the Limit Challenge Competition are divided into two parts: the preliminaries and the finals. The first three days are the preliminaries, and the last two days are the finals.”

“Tomorrow morning at 9 AM, three thousand competitors will be tossed together into Devil Flood Dragon Island. You will be wearing the most plain of clothing: a sports tank top and shorts that contain no defensive capabilities whatsoever. You won’t have weapons. You won’t have food. You won’t have water. You won’t even have shoes! Each person will only have a single Puji Critter.”

“And what you must do is survive for three days under the attacks of countless Demon Beasts.”

“Of course, you won’t always be unarmed and defenseless. Several dozen ‘supply points’ are scattered all around Devil Flood Dragon Island. Large amounts of artifact parts and supplies are prepared there. If you have the ability, you can assemble the artifacts yourself to use to fight against the Demon Beasts.”

On the hologram, Devil Flood Dragon Island was being zoomed in without end. The hologram turned transparent, and concrete coordinates of several dozen supply points appeared.

The white Puji Critter continued speaking, “In the competition, the most important thing to keep in mind is your ‘total points’. Your final ranking is determined solely by your total points.”

“You can get points by killing Demon Beasts. The stronger the Demon Beast, the greater the number of points.”

“In order to test the competitor’s overall ability, many methods were incorporated for the competitor to earn points. For example, if you specialize in artifacts, you can repair and assemble artifacts as much as you want. If you’re gifted in synthesizing drugs, you can discover all sorts of herbs in the forest. To summarize, as long as you demonstrate a gift in an aspect of cultivation through an action you do on Devil Flood Dragon Island, you will receive points for it.”

“And another important thing to keep in mind is the ‘Trade System’. This is a rule that is set up for competitors who aren’t fighting specialists.”

“In this competition, you can use your accumulated points to perform trades. For example, say you are gifted in crafting artifacts. You assemble and craft a dozen flying swords at a supply point. You can trade these flying swords to a competitor who is a fighting specialist. As long as both parties make an oral agreement on the price, the Puji Critters will automatically conduct the point transfer. You don’t need to worry about being cheated by a competitor. This way, it’s fair for non-fighting specialists in this competition.”

Li Yao raised his right hand, putting out a question, “Let me interrupt you for a moment. I want to ask something… In regards to the non-fighting competitors who play a supportive role, when they gather resources on Devil Flood Dragon Island, will their lives be endangered?”

The white Puji Critter shook its small furry tail, “Student Li Yao, please do not worry. When the competition begins, there will be over twenty cultivators patrolling in the air above Devil Flood Dragon Island, and inside Small Ji’s body is a specially refined gel sack. As soon as a competitor is about to receive life-threatening injuries or the accumulation of his injuries reach critical status, Small Ji will automatically belch out the gel to envelope the competitor in a stasis, and Small Ji will notify the patrolling cultivators in the air.”

“This gel is a super amazing artifact. It can protect the competitor to completely guarantee his safety. It’s impossible for the level of the Demon Beasts on Devil Dragon Island to break through the gel. Just relax already!”

Li Yao nodded his head. The Limit Challenge Competition has been held over a hundred times. They had adopted perfect protective measures long ago. He was just overthinking things.

Thinking for a bit, he asked again, “You just talked about the preliminaries… What rules are there in the finals?”





Home  Forty Millenniums of Cultivation  Chapter 50
 

Chapter 50
 
Chapter 50: The Codes of an Refiners
Translator: Strivon, Ash  Editor: Geoffrey_, Lancent

The Puji Critter spoke, “After the three days of preliminaries, the 600 competitors with the highest ranking in points will then be able to enter the finals!”


“The rest of the competitors will be evacuated and brought back onto the Distant Expanse.”

“The biggest difference between the finals and the preliminaries is… the release of super powerful Demon Beasts locked in caves underground on Devil Flood Dragon Island. The strength of these Demon Beasts is not something that the typical high school student can deal with!”

“If you’re able to kill these Demon Beasts, you will receive far more points than from killing normal Demon Beasts!”

“In addition, the six hundred students will be separated into two teams, red and blue. The two teams can attack each other however much they want. When an opponent is eliminated — that is, when the opponent’s Puji Critter is forced to spout out their protective gel — all the points of the opponent will be given to you!”

“In other words, not only do you need to kill Demon Beasts, but you will also have to fight with competitors!”

Li Yao’s heart stirred as he suddenly felt an excitement indescribable.

Just being able to reach the finals means that these competitors will have accumulated a great number of points. Rather than go laboriously slay Demon Beasts, wouldn’t it be better to launch attacks on enemy competitors? As long as a competitor was eliminated, it would be the same as killing several dozens, or even over a hundred, Demon Beasts.

With these type of rules in place, the raging desire for battle will undoubtedly be satisfied in these youths. These competitors will be able to show off their complete potential!

Small Ji continued, “So, that’s pretty much all the rules. After two days of finals, the last remaining surviving students will have their points fixed and be ranked. The higher your ranking, the higher the likelihood of being chosen by a scout of the Nine Elites. The excellent ones won’t need to take the university entrance exams when they’re directly admitted. So Student Li Yao, work hard!”

“Direct admittance!”

boxn ovel. c0m
Li Yao’s throat went somewhat dry. He licked his lips, asking, “Small Ji, how many students were chosen for direct admittance in the past few competitions?”

The white Puji Critter tilted its head to think as a buzzing sound came from deep within its body.

Li Yao could tell from hearing that this was the sound of a crystal processor running at high speeds. Small Ji was probably gathering the data right now.

A moment later, Small Ji answered, “In the past three annual Challenge Competition in Arena 571, each year on average had 51 students be directly admitted to the Nine Elites. There was also the possibility of getting on the Preferential Score admittance list should one not be directly admitted.”

“Preferential Score admittance list? What’s that?” Li Yao delved deeper, asking.

“I’ll give you an example. Say you possess some aspect of a gift for cultivation, that you’re extremely suited for a certain university. But, your overall actual strength isn’t strong enough such that your final points end up ranking you in the hundred or two-hundred range. Or even if you encountered an extremely strong Demon Beast at the start of the competition and were forced to retire!”

“All these things don’t matter. As long as you’re selected by a scout of the Nine Elites, he or she will sign a contract with you for a preferential score that reduces your score requirement on the exam by 5 points, 10 points, or even 20 points!

“That’s awesome!”

Li Yao became truly excited at this moment.

The entrance exams. The entrance exams! The competition is like an army of thousands trying to cross a single log bridge. “Scoring a point higher means to crush a thousand people!” This is no exaggeration!

If all of a sudden he was favored by a dozen or twenty points, then the odds of being admitted to Deep Sea University will increase greatly!

“Excellent! Even if I can’t beat 3000 people, enter into the top 50, and receive the qualifications for direct admittance… As long as I demonstrate my brilliance and manage to win 5 points or even 10 points of score-reducing preferential treatment, coming here won’t be a waste at all!”

Li Yao’s mouth was dry from talking so much. His excitement could not be described. He only felt a boundless energy coming from his body. He was heated up and could not wait until tomorrow morning to begin fighting at once.

“This won’t do. I need to calm down and go to sleep asap. I need to conserve my energy and stamina. Tomorrow morning is the time that will decide my fate!”

Li Yao was lying down on his bed, his pair of hands formed a pillow behind his head. He tried forcing himself to go to sleep, but no matter what he did, he couldn’t fall asleep.

The scene of Fiend Blade Peng Hai piloting the Mystic Bird Battle Shuttle through the skies filled his eyes.

That sort of freedom, that field crushing domineering aura was deeply branded in his mind. It would take a long time for him to forget that scene.

“I… Do I have the chance to become the second Peng Hai?”

Li Yao opened his eyes and saw the splatter of rust on the ceiling. He tossed and turned, causing his single bed to creak with pressure.

……

Right at the same time when Li Yao was tossing and turning on his bed, in another single room two floors above his, Si Jiaxue was in the middle of receiving a very special guest.

“Professor Xie, I’m truly indebted to you. I never thought you would come here personally.”

Si Jiaxue spoke extremely respectfully. She was welcoming the Artificing Expert of Deep Sea University, Professor Xie Tingxian.

“Calling me Grandpa Xie is fine, little girl. You don’t need to be so polite with me. After all, your grandfather and I are old friends of nearly a hundred years. I remember back in the year when you were born, I held you with my own hands. Hahahaha.”

Xie Tingxian chuckled as he spoke, then soon changed the subject. “Little girl, you’ve called Grandpa Xie here. Is something the matter? To clarify things, if it’s in regards to the competition, Grandpa Xie can’t just cut you some slack!”

Si Jiaxue giggled. “Grandpa Xie, my specialty lies in data calculations and analysis. I’m afraid that I will walk the path of being an admin-type cultivator in the future. The Deep Sea University is most known for their Artificing Department. I fear that it’s not suited for me… So don’t worry, I won’t cause you any difficulties.”

Xie Tingxian’s old face reddened. “Little girl, don’t blame Grandpa Xia for being petty. Being a scout causes all sorts of relationships to become complicated. Sometimes, I have to mention the dirty talk first.”

Si Jiaxue nodded her head and withdrew a crystal processor from her backpack, handing it over:

“I understand, Grandpa Xie. I called you over this time is mainly to ask for your help to inspect this crystal processor… This is an heirloom left behind by my grandma. It’s an antique of over a hundred years ago and it broke a few days earlier. I found someone to fix it and it’s working now; there are no major problems when I use it. But, I don’t know if there are some latent defects. So, I wish to ask you to inspect it. I don’t know if this is convenient for you?”

“Oh, so it was like this all along. It’s a piece of cake for me.”

Xie Tingxian let out a breath of relief and his expression became lively. His vision swept across the crystal processor and he went “huh”. His eyes radiated with light full of interest.

“It’s the Heavenly Zither Sect’s Vast Tomb 7 tube-type crystal processor. A product from 144 years ago. It’s an extremely rare antique. You’ve maintained it quite well. Not bad. Not bad. You said you’ve asked someone to fix it? Nowadays, people who are able to fix these sorts of antiques are far too few. I need to take a good look at this. If the internal components are damaged, it would be such a pity!”

Si Jiaxue did not see Xie Tingxian cast any spell, but with a wave of his right hand, the crystal processor flew into the palm of his hand, spinning and whirling around. It looked as if it was being controlled by an invisible hand as one component after another separated away from the artifact to float gracefully in the air, exposing the profound and complicated internal architecture of the tube-type processor.

“This…”

He saw that the heat sink with clear traces of the cooling system used in modern CPUs that was integrated seamlessly with the classical style of the tube-style crystal processor. Xie Tingxian stared, distracted.

“How is it, Grandpa Xie? Is there any problems with it?” Si Jiaxue became nervous.

“Little girl, you’re wrong on this count~~~~” Xie Tingxian dragged out his tone.

“Me? What’s going on?”

Si Jiaxue was stupefied and was completely lost. A trace of suspicion emerged on her delicate cute face.

Xie Tingxian glanced at her and saw that she really was clueless. He frowned, saying, “Little girl, this processor of yours. You’ve clearly had it repaired by an expert.”

“This expert completely redesigned the heat sink structure. His reasoning is exceptionally exquisite, and his installation technique is perfectly skillful. He not only guaranteed the stability of its structure and heat dissipation efficiency but also left behind space for future upgrades such that another heat sink can be added using the same method, to form a heat sink system with higher efficiency. This way, the performance of your crystal processor can increase by over 10%!”

“To have such a deep understanding of antique processors and to have such brilliant techniques, it must have been a Refiner right?”

“You should know that each Refiner has their own code of honor. They have the utmost confidence in their works. You chose someone to fix this, but then you brought it to me for inspection. Your lack of confidence in him is the greatest insult to him!”

“Once he knows of this matter, not only will he have malice towards you, but he will even take some anger out on me! He might even come challenge me to a duel! To see if, in the end, I’m qualified to inspect and fix his work!”

“It’s this serious?” Si Jiaxue said in fright.

“You’re not a Refiner, so it’s natural that you don’t know codes of the circle. Each piece of work from a Refiner is his heart’s blood — it’s like their child. They absolutely won’t allow other people to mess with them! In a situation like this, you needed to at least notify the other person and receive his permission. Then, I can go ahead and exam it. Have you discussed it with the other person yet?”

Si Jiaxue was completely bewildered as she shook her head.

“Uh oh, I was also careless. I had assumed you just found a random person to repair this. I never thought it was actually an expert. This time, there’s going to be some trouble,” Xie Tingxian spoke somewhat frustrated.

“But… But I really did randomly find someone to fix it. I found a classmate,” stammered Si Jiaxue.

“What!? Your classmate… A highschool student?”





Home  Forty Millenniums of Cultivation  Chapter 51
 

Chapter 51
 
Chapter 51: The Blades of Human Civilization!
Translator: Strivon, Ash  Editor: Geoffrey_, Lancent

Xie Tingxian went wide eyed all of a sudden and every wrinkle on his face began to tremble. He drew an arcane glyph with his right hand and a purple beam of light enveloped the crystal processor.


Every single breath of remnant memories from the previous repair was drawn from the artifact. A long time passed before Xie Tingxian slowly nodded his head.

“Keeping what you said in mind, I telepathically scanned this artifact again for careful analysis. I was able to sample a few places that weren’t done quite skillfully. There were a few joints that were a bit conspicuous and rough. But for a high school student to be able to reach this kind of level, it’s already quite amazing.”

“I don’t quite understand. He’s just an ordinary high school student whose Actualization Quotient can’t possibly be more than 70%. Is he that amazing?” Si Jiaxue could not help asking.

“It’s precisely because his Actualization Quotient doesn’t exceed 70% that he was able to complete a work as refined as this. This makes him even more extraordinary! What’s the name of this classmate of yours? Is he participating in this competition?” Xie Tingxian asked filled with interest.

“His name is Li Yao. I have some information here about him. Grandpa Xie can take a look.”

Si Jiaxue pulled out some videos from her crystal processor.

“Oh, so it’s this small fellow?”

Xie Tingxian stared blankly once again, and a smile continued to unfold from inside his heart. He nodded his head over and over. “This small fellow is very interesting. It seems like I need to keep an eye on him in this competition.”

……

Early morning the next day at 8:30 AM, three thousand students were congregated on the afterdeck of the Distant Expanse.

boxn ovel. c0m
The spacious deck was packed tightly with three thousand hot-blooded youths. They created a clamor of noise so loud that it seemed the deck was about to tip over.

After experiencing yesterday’s Interactive Exchange Convention, everyone now understood the strengths and details of the Nine Elites and were looking much more greatly forward towards world of cultivation filled with its endless mysteries.

“KILL KILL KILL. I will kill to my heart’s content on Devil Flood Dragon Island. I’ll rise above the other three-thousand students, attract the interest of the Federation’s First Military College, and become a glorious military student!” a youth with a tall figure and a face covered with pimples roared in the crowd.

“What I’m most proficient in is medicinal synthesis. I’ve heard that that there are over 10,000 different types of herbs and medicinal plants on Devil Flood Dragon Island. Just let me demonstrate my skills and show off to the scout of the Empyrean Capital School of Medicine!” at his side, a girl with tanned skin and a pretty face spoke with the utmost confidence.

“I had an ambition since I was growing up — it’s to become a great general, to command a great army! If I make it to the finals, those who are in the same team as me will be quite lucky. I will certainly coordinate everybody with me to fight just like the way the Federal Army does. The enemy will be beaten to complete defeat!” This third youth was short and small, but his aura was strong as he spoke.

These 3000 youths were heavenly-blessed carefully chosen from a dozen cities. It didn’t matter how strong their actual strength was, their confidence was at its absolute peak.

The scouts from the Nine Elites, military representatives, and the teachers of numerous students came from the two sides of the ship’s hold. They came one by one, congregating together, and revealed smiles when they saw the exploding confidence in these youngsters; they were deeply moved.

“One year after another, and yet another year has gone by. Time really does go by quick. As soon as I saw these young fellows, I remembered back to that year and day when we participated in the Limit Challenge Competition ourselves. The us back then… we sure were young~!”

“Yeppers. The only reason why Star Glory Federation is able to to become stronger and stronger under the onslaught of Demon Beasts is due to the plenty amount of new blood that flows in every year!”

“Who knows how many young talents will be able to burst forth from this year’s batch of students and receive the qualifications to walk the road of cultivation? I want to get this out of the way. Teacher Zhang, I’ve already chosen exam candidate 2087. Do not, by any means, fight over him with me!”

“Haha. Number 2087? Then I’ll have to pay special attention to him later. If he really is some good talent, then depending on everyone’s resources, let’s see who can bid the highest!”

Li Yao stood calmly in the corner of the deck during this boiling and rumbling day. The white Puji Critter was very content to lay perched on his head. Its head was tilting back and forth, it seemed that it was snoring.

Last night, Li Yao was restless and was completely unable to fall asleep. So he just got up half-way through the night to study the rules in the competition. Li Yao had somewhat bloodshot eyes, but he was still energetic from being a bit too excited.

It was because he discovered what seemed to be a loophole within the rules of the competition. Perhaps in other words, it was an ‘opportunity’ that only he could exploit.

He just didn’t know if the battle tactics he formulated from focusing on the “loophole” would be effective.

If he was successful, he would seize a 90% chance of storming into the top 50 of the finals!

While he was mulling things over in his mind, the lighting in his vision turned dark. A tall silhouette had suddenly appeared, towering over looking down at him.

It was… Helian Lie!

“Fellow Student Li Yao, Devil Flood Dragon Island is a very large place, yet at the same time, it’s also very small. I hope you retire from the competition as soon as possible. You wouldn’t want to run into me on Devil Flood Dragon Island,” Helian Lie paused after each word, firmly squeezing out a somewhat sinister smile.

Li Yao looked at him unperturbed. After sometime later, he fished out a pair of earbuds from his ears. Wild music was blasting out from the earbuds.

“Huh? Fellow Student Helian Lie, what did you say just now? I’m terribly sorry, I was listening to music. I couldn’t hear you clearly. Could you repeat that again?” Li Yao said somewhat perplexed.

Helian Lie’s face reddened. With a cold snort, he turned around to walk away and merged into the crowd.

Li Yao watched Helian Lie’s back with special attention and then chuckled. A trace of the malevolent “Vulture” could be faintly seen in his smiling expression.

“Actually, I really look forward running into you on Devil Flood Dragon Island too~ Fellow Student Helian Lie!”

Right at this time, a large hologram flared at the front of the deck.

As if carved by a blade, a weathered and experienced face appeared in the center of the hologram. The pair of eyes set deep in their sockets seemed to contain the entire universe. 100,000 stars flickered with radiance in those eyes.

“It’s Xu Haoran. It’s the Federation’s Chairman, Xu Haoran!” Quite a few students let out cries of excitement.

“Each and every student, we have reached yet another year of the Limit Challenge Competition. Today, you all are baby hawks having yet to spread their wings and soar in the sky. You all have yet to step onto the road of cultivation!”

“But soon in the future, you will become pillars of our nation. You will defend our homeland, defend our Federation, and defend the hopes, dreams, and sanctity of our Human Civilization!”

“Therefore, struggle and fight! Fight for yourselves, and fight for the future of the Federation! The future of the Human Civilization!”

“Remember this. Humanity is the strongest race of war in the endless sea of the stars. And Cultivators… are the dazzling blades of Human Civilization! These blades will slay fiends and purge demons. Break mountains and topple temples. Exterminate nations and raze countries. Expand our borders and enlarge our land until we conquer the entire cosmos!”

“I hope that you all will become cultivators like these. To become the blades of the Human Civilization. I wish you all every success!”

The Federation’s Chairman, Xu haoran, stood up from behind his office desk. He retreated a step and, with a solemn expression, performed the official military salute towards the 3000 youths.

Demon Beasts ran rampant in the Heaven’s Origin Sector. Star Glory Federation was founded based on martial might. The highest leaders are also military personnel. The military salute was the most majestic of etiquettes, representing unsurpassable respect.

“Federation Chairman Xu Haoran actually performed the military salute to us high school students?”

“For the sake of the Federation’s future… For the sake of Human Civilization’s Future… Do we… Do we have that much power?”

“Of course we do! Right now, we may be ordinary high school students, but think about those Core Formation Stage cultivators, those old Yuanying Stage monsters… Which one of them didn’t start from elementary school, to middle school, to high school on their road to being a cultivator? Who can possibly become a Yuanying Stage monster as soon as they’re born! If they can be what they are, then obviously so can we!”

“There will be a day when I will become a great cultivator whose power shakes and radiates everywhere. To slay Demon Beasts. To defend our Federation!”

“Slay fiends and purge demons. Break mountains and topple temples. Exterminate nations and raze countries. Expand our borders and enlarge our land. And conquer the entire cosmos… Too awesome. This is precisely the path I wish to walk. This is precisely the destiny of cultivators! I really can’t wait much longer!”

The entire atmosphere was ignited with a single salute by Xu Haoran, causing three thousand youths to all enter into a state of zealotry.

Similar scenes could be seen simultaneously at the other exam regions. The blood of countless youths were heated to the utmost boiling point!

An officer dressed in black with the emblem of the skull of a Demon Beast on his shoulders stood on the upper deck. He saw how the morale was already excited to the highest point and announced in a loud voice:

“The 137th Annual Federation Youth Limit Challenge Competition officially begins now! All competitors, prepare yourselves!”





Home  Forty Millenniums of Cultivation  Chapter 52
 

Chapter 52
 
Chapter 52: A Dense Fog and the Delusion Vine
Translator: Strivon, Ash  Editor: Geoffrey_, Lancent

“*Vrrrrrr!”


A large hole thirty to forty meters wide opened up in the front of the deck. A biting freezing wind was drawn suddenly into the deck and hold of the ship, causing the youths, who were only wearing sports tank tops and shorts, to feel a bone-piercing coldness.

“All competitors…. Jump down!” the officer in black pointed to the large hole as he spoke expressionless.

As soon as these words were spoken, quite a few student’s faces went white.

The Distant Expanse was floating several hundred meters above sea level. Devil Flood Dragon Island was right beneath it. If they were to jump off from here, even if they fall into the ocean, they would simply be falling to their death. There’s no need to say what would happen if they landed directly on the island.”

“Whats wrong? Is no one brave enough to jump? Well, that’s fine too. You can still retire from the competition; it’s not too late. The Limit Challenge Competition wasn’t made for cowards!” The officer dressed in black laughed with disdain.

These words incited the bravery of quite a few students. The red pimpled youth who first said that he wanted to apply for the First Military College pushed through the crowd. He bellowed, “If you’re going to jump, then jump! What are you scared of? If you’re scared of death, then you can’t become a cultivator!”

His pair of legs stepped forward, his pair of arms opened wide, and he jumped down the open hole. The throat-ripping battle cry of the pimpled youth was torn and silenced by the biting wind in a flash.

With someone taking the lead, people started going continuously close behind. Actually, everyone knew that something had to be deployed down there to make sure that they don’t fall and die in vain. They just had to overcome their mental blockade.

Li Yao was mixed in the crowd and soon was nudged to the edge of the hole. He looked down while the cold wind rushed at him and saw that the previous thousand youths who had jumped earlier still had yet to hit the ground.

They were stuck in a giant transparent net hanging midair, causing their falling velocity to be extremely slow.

boxn ovel. c0m
“A Slow Glyph Array?”

Li Yao smacked his lips. The Slow Glyph Array was absolutely a necessary type of Glyph Array for those who flew on flying swords. In the case where enemies attack them, causing them to fall, all they would need to do is activate the Slow Glyph Array. Then, they can slowly float to the ground. They probably wouldn’t instantaneously die from a fall.

However, the average Slow Glyph Array only covers an area of three-to-five meters. This Slow Glyph Array actually covered a diameter of several thousand meters; it really was drawn to be extremely large.

Li Yao no longer hesitated and grabbed his white Puji Critter. He leapt forward and jumped down from an altitude of several hundred meters!

The wind screamed by his body, birds flew below his feet. This sort of feeling, like surfing the wind on flying swords, was way too awesome for words!

However, Li Yao enjoyed this feeling for less than two seconds before he felt a white light flash all around him. His body felt sluggish as soon as he was caught within, like he had sunk into a soft ball of cotton. His speed had suddenly slowed to the minimum.

After several dozen seconds of being in this transparent cotton ball, his body loosened and his normal weight and velocity were restored. The wind started to scream in his ears yet again.

And this time, not even two seconds had passed before he entered into a second ball of “transparent cotton”.

He looked several hundred meters below where several hundred competitors were flapping their arms and legs as if they were in water. Li Yao was deep in thought; he finally understood the mysteries of the Slow Glyph Array.

A dozen or so Slow Glyph Array layers were set up in the air space between the Distant Expanse and Devil Flood Dragon Island. Every layer had a cushioning effect.

This way, the competitors are able to safely arrive on Devil Flood Dragon Island by going through the layers of cushions.

This usage of this kind of large-scale glyph array was of the utmost ingenuity. Li Yao let out a sigh of admiration in his heart, having discovered that the things he needed to learn still numbered a lot.

And from the depths of his mind came the flickering light and passing shadows of Ou Yezi’s memories; they emerged numerously and chaotically.

Until finally…

After passing through 10 layers of the Slow Glyph Array cushioning, Li Yao managed to safely reach a height of a dozen or so meters above Devil Dragon Island. A verdant and lush dense forest was as far as the eye could see. Quite a few students had already landed on the ground.

The howls of Demon Beasts and the thundering of competitors came in waves through the depths of the dense forest.

Within the first second, intense close quarter combat unfolded completely.

Li Yao suddenly opened his eyes. His blood was completely boiling, like when he would wait for the garbage ships in the Artifact Graveyard.

His pair of legs landed lightly on a branch. Using the last of his falling force and borrowing the elasticity of the branch, Li Yao changed his direction and fled into the forest, moving like a nimble black panther. He landed steadily on the ground.

He took a deep cold breath suddenly.

While he was falling and observing below him, all he felt about Devil Dragon Island was the fact that it was a strange shaped narrow island with black smoke swirling around it. He didn’t really feel anything too scary from it.

But as soon as he stepped foot onto Devil Flood Dragon Island, he discovered that actually the entire island was covered with gargantuan trees that blocked the sky and shielded the earth.

Lifting his head looking up, all he could see was the faint gray fog curling around in between the black tree branches. It was practically impossible to see the blue skies and white clouds. No matter how intense the rays of sunlight were, when shone through the gray fog, the rays turned a blurry, faint yellow.

A faint green miasma permeated through the air as far as the eye could see. It caused Li Yao to only see a distance of 3-5 meters clearly in his surroundings. Any further than that, all he could see were the gray outlines of crisscrossed canine teeth. The twisted giant trees were like corpses of Demon Beasts brandishing their claws as they swayed in the wind.

Just a moment ago, he could hear the sounds of close quarter combat. Right now, it was as if the miasma had cut them off from him. Even the howls of Demon Beasts turned vague and indistinct. One second, the howls seemed to come from the horizon, and the next second, the howls seemed to murmur in his ears. It was as if a terrible Demon Beast were hiding behind his back.

The three thousand competitors landing on Devil Flood Dragon Island were like three thousand grains of sand entering the ocean, disappearing without a trace.

It seemed like Li Yao was the only person left in this world, staying in this island inhabited by dreadful Fiend Beasts.

Li Yao was leaning his back against a large black tree covered in knobs. He warmed up his arms and legs in a calm yet not slow manner, carefully observing his surroundings.

There weren’t any pre-defined paths or roads on Devil Flood Dragon Island; mud and decay ran underfoot. If one wasn’t careful, one would step onto the skeletal fragments of Demon Beasts, causing the soles of one’s feet to be stabbed very painfully. The green miasma released fumes that were somewhat irritating. The smell was quite similar to that of the Artifact Graveyard.

“Hsss. Hss. The Demon Emperor won’t let you all go…”

An extremely minute and warped shout came suddenly from behind the black tree.

Li Yao was terrified and frightened. He turned around to look and saw that the knobs on the tree were actually twisting and squirming. They converged together, condensing into an incomparably ugly face of a Demon Beast.

This face spoke with a nasty grin, “Just wait and see. The Demon Emperor has already amassed a Demon Army numbering a million forces on the Far Eastern Ocean floor. Soon, he will assault the coast, engulf the Federation, annihilate all the males, and eat all the females and children completely. Tss! Tss! Tss! Tss!”

Li Yao sneered, speaking calmly and composed, “I’ve already carefully examined the introduction to Devil Flood Dragon Island. It said that the island is covered with a type of Demon Plant called the Delusion Vine. It releases a mild green hallucinatory miasma day in and day out that’s capable of hypnotizing people’s minds, causing people to see and hear visible and audible hallucinations. You’re just an illusion, you can’t trick me!”

The Demon Beast’s face suddenly froze and shattered into pieces, transforming back into tree knobs and fading away without a trace.

Li Yao let out a breath of relief. But right when he was about to leave, the black tree started to tremor. The bark wiggled and was actually pried open from the inside. A half-rotted human figure climbed out in a complete stiff manner. It lifted its head and chuckled at Li Yao.

Its body was already half-rotted. Its flesh was mangled, and it’s organs were fused with the roots of the black tree; they were blended together. The left side of its face was covered with large chunks of bark and moss. Only the right side of its face was vaguely recognizable.

It was actually… the form of Ou Yezi!

“Did you think that it would be that easy to engulf my memories? One day, I will completely possess this body! To be reborn in Cultivation Era Year 40,000!”

Ou Yezi laughed evilly as he spoke. A branch that had transformed into his arm swayed and lifted, heading to grab Li Yao over to him.





Home  Forty Millenniums of Cultivation  Chapter 53
 

Chapter 53
 
Chapter 53: Instant Kill!
Translator: Strivon, Ash  Editor: Geoffrey_, Lancent

Li Yao’s heart froze in an instant! But he recovered in the next second; he was still intoxicated in the illusion produced by the Delusion Vine.


Biting down ferociously on his tongue, he awoke from the stimulating pain in a flash. Then he felt a gale blasting at his face!

Li Yao did not have time to dodge, forming a fist instead that bombarded against something unknown. The enemy let out a shrieking cry, pushing Li Yao five-to-six meters away with a strange force and causing Li Yao to crash into some shrubs.

After shaking his head, Li Yao glared ahead. Ou Yezi’s illusionary form had disappeared without a trace. In front of him was an enormous, green-covered ape with bizarrely long arms hanging from the giant tree.

There was a mutation growing on the forehead of this ape — a strange eye with a dirty-yellow iris that flickered with fiendish glow.

“Three-Eyed Ape!”

Li Yao searched at lightning speeds in his mind and quickly found the data on this Demon Beast.

The three-eyed ape was one of the more difficult of the low-level Demon Beasts. Besides its nimble body and its expertise in jungle hunting, the third eye on its forehead can discharge a special mental attack to cause its prey to have splitting headaches and give birth to a cluster of illusions.

However, today, this ape had chosen the wrong opponent. Although Li Yao’s true strength wasn’t considered to be spectacular, in the mental realm, his mind had undergone the tempering of Ou Yezi. His mind was incomparably strong and unyielding. A typical mental attack would have absolutely no effect on him.

That was why he was able to awaken from the illusion this quickly.

“HSS!”

boxn ovel. c0m
The three-eyed ape let out an ear-piercing hiss. The third eye on its forehead suddenly opened wide, and the eye’s color also turned bright in an instant, like a piece of iron heated until it was red. And Li Yao felt a piercing pain burrow deep inside his mind.

Li Yao knew that this was the mental attack from the three-eyed ape. He let out a blood-curdling shriek on purpose and was trembling all over in an “uncontrollable” manner.

The three-eyed ape let out squeaking shouts, as it thought that its trick was a success. The ape swung on the branch a circle, borrowing the elastic force as it rushed and pounced at Li Yao. Its pair of arms opened up, leaving it wide open.

It hadn’t noticed that early on Li Yao had his right leg thrusted deeply within the spongy rotten growth below, clenching the bone of a dead Fiend Beast.

When the ape approached near, Li Yao’s right leg kicked out like lightning and the bone pierced straight into the ape’s third eye!

This bone was probably the fibula of a certain Demon Beast; it was incomparably hard. The bone delved inside in an instant, without resistance, through the third eye and pierced the brain of the ape.

A giant mass of brain matter shot out suddenly from the hollow bone.

No matter how powerful the three-eyed ape was, it would die on the spot if it took critical damage to its brain. The massive and strong body suddenly trembled, collapsing over. After a fit of unusual twitching, it ceased moving completely.

Similar scenes of slaughter occurred simultaneously all throughout Devil Flood Dragon Island. The portion of cultivation geniuses with resolute willpower awakened from their respective illusions one by one. They unleashed their terminating techniques, proceeding with bloody slaughter.

Quite a few of the youths’ had bad luck though. They were not able to shake the illusion in time and were targeted by Demon Beasts.

The instant the Demon Beasts unleashed what would be fatal attacks, the Puji Critters spouted giant blobs of pink gel like that of jello. The gel safely encased the youths within while the attacks of Demon Beasts were unable to do any damage whatsoever.

At the same time, the sky patrolling cultivators flew over at lightning speed. They took these failed competitors out from Devil Flood Dragon Island.

In the annual Limit Challenge Competition, the first 10 minutes was the hardest. A large portion of competitors were dazed in the illusion and forced to eat defeat.

This year was the same. Within the first 10 minutes, 725 competitors left Devil Flood Dragon Island with broken hearts and returned to the Distant Expanse.

And at the monitor center within the Distant Expanse were scouts of the Nine Elites, teachers of the various high schools, and high ranking military personnel. They were all gathered together here and were staring fixed with great interest at the incessantly flickering holograms.

To the side was also a large flickering list of names that displayed the top 100 ranking competitors in order.

Li Yao killed a three-eyed ape in an instant, receiving quite a few points, and had actually slaughtered his way into the top 100. At the present, he ranked number 98.

“The quality of this year’s batch of new talent is quite decent. Only 720 people left the island within the first 10 minutes. I remember last year that over a thousand people failed within the first 10 minutes!” a high ranking military personnel laughed as he spoke.

“Magnify the top 100 competitors. We need to observe them very closely,” said a scout.

A hundred holograms metamorphasised immediately, transforming larger, clearer, and brighter. And flame decals were now on the perimeter of the holograms’ frame.

“Huh?”

The Artificing Expert from Deep Sea University, Xie Tingxian, went slightly blank. He saw the entire sequence of events of Li Yao slaying the three-eyed ape.

He never thought that this youth who possessed such a high gift for artificing would actually possess such a proficiency for battle.

“I knew it! My eyes weren’t mistaken!”

The scout from the Grand Desolate War Institution, Ding Lingdang, waved her fist in excitement!

“But, what the hell is he up to now?”

On the hologram, Li Yao performed a bizarre action that caused Xie Tingxian and Ding Lingdang to simultaneously have a feeling of bewilderment emerge in their hearts.

As seen on the hologram, Li Yao did not leave after killing the three-eyed ape, but instead he removed the Fiend bone from the ape’s forehead. Using the bone as a blade, he cut the neck artery of the three-eyed ape in a completely skillful fashion and smeared the incomparably noxious Demon Beast blood all over his body.

He smeared the blood completely even all over him, not even missing a single toe for exposure. And in the end, he even soaked all the hair on his head in the blood before he clapped his hands in satisfaction. He grabbed the Fiend bone with his mouth and leapt onto a branch.

Li Yao took a deep breath, and it was as if he had returned to the Artifact Graveyard.

The crisscrossing tree branches formed narrow pathways and were quite similar to the narrow pathways among tottering towers of garbage in the Artifact Graveyard.

Sweeping a glance at lightning speed, Li Yao unleashed his calculating ability to the limit. And emerging into his mind were countless coordinates, wind vectors, and digits. An incomparably clear and transparent pathway appeared and spread before his eyes.

“Small Ji, help me locate the closest supply point!” Li Yao spoke to the Puji Critter on his head.

A moment later, the translucent map of Devil Flood Dragon Island was cast before his eyes, clearly marking his present location and the positions of several dozen supply points.

Chuckling lightly, Li Yao jumped from branch to branch lithely, shooting towards the closest supply point.

Swish! Swish! Swish! Swish!

Li Yao passed unhindered between the branches through what seemed to be dead ends. It was as if Devil Flood Dragon Island was made just for him — a corridor in the air that let him move as fast as lightning!

It wasn’t that there weren’t any Demon Beasts encountered on the way there. It was that every time he felt the existence of a Demon Beast, Li Yao would stop at once. He would enter into a state of deep concealment on the branch.

The Demon Beast blood on his body let out a strong Fiend Aura. And in addition, he was used to concealing himself since young in the garbage heaps of the Artifact Graveyard. He was unable to be discovered and distinguished by all the other Demon Beasts.

Sometimes, Demon Beasts would even attack amongst themselves. But presently, there were several thousand new arrivals of fat, tender, and extra-juicy “small fresh meat” on Devil Flood Dragon Island. So all the Demon Beasts were busy hunting for the smell of humans; they had no intention of eating the bitter and stenchy meat of their own kind.

Li Yao used this sort of method to arrive at the supply point, traumatised but unharmed.

His strange behavior also excited the curiosity of numerous cultivators in the monitoring center on the Distant Expanse. Everyone was making conjectures on his intentions.

“The movement technique of this competitor is quite nimble. It seems that he grew up in the mountains and woods. And his aura concealment skill is on a rather high level. Come look. Two Demon Beasts who were 3-5 meters away from him already went past him, not discovering him in the least.”

“You’re right. This competitor possesses an abundance of actual battle experience, not at all like a newbie entering the battlefield for the first time. And his mental strength is also very strong to be able to let Demon Beasts pass by him without actually moving a single whisker. Even his eyes didn’t even blink. This piece of material, after going through some education, can become an outstanding assassin!”

“However, why doesn’t he lift a finger? There were clearly several opportunities for him to kill a few Demon Beasts with little to no effort and receive a great amount of points. Why did he cock his bow, but not release the arrow? What’s he up to?”

Other than killing the first three-eyed ape, Li Yao had not dealt with any beasts for half an hour. His ranking was dropping down, soon entering the end of the 2000s ranking.

It should be known that the competitors that still remained on Devil Flood Dragon Island had killed 3-5 Demon Beasts on average by this time. Some of the experts with tyrannical strength were able to slay over a dozen Demon Beasts in a single breath.

At the moment, the name placed number one in the rankings was… Helian Lie!

“Small fellow, so you want to be the first to reach a supply point to show off the artificing side of your talents? Okay then. I will pay close attention to you. To see in the end what sort of tricks you have up your sleeve!” Xie Tingxian chuckled as his pair of eyes glistened and brightened.

With a light leap, Li Yao jumped into the supply point.





Home  Forty Millenniums of Cultivation  Chapter 54
 

Chapter 54
 
Chapter 54: Three Major Killing Weapons
Translator: Strivon, Ash  Editor: Geoffrey_, Lancent

The supply point was a piece of flat empty ground amongst the forest. An offensive glyph array was set up encircling the surroundings. As soon as a Denib Beast enters within, the Demon Beast would be assaulted relentlessly by the glyph array. After time passed, Demon Beasts would no longer come here seeking their own deaths.


Piled up in the supply point were some food and water. There were also several dozen camo green weapon crates as well.

Li Yao swept his gaze in a circle. He opened a weapon crate first and took out a set of jungle camo battle clothes.

He did not even consider the battle boots due to the excessively complicated environment of the forest. Wearing boots would get in the way of attacking; it would be better to go barefoot.

He opened the second crate and discovered several dozen alloy blades glittering like snow inside.

As if facing a pile of garbage, Li Yao kicked the crate away in disdain.

He opened the third and the fourth crate in succession. They were packed full to the brim, loaded with artifact parts.

Li Yao examined the crates for a moment and discovered that the rest of the crates were filled with artifact parts, save for a crate containing first aid drugs and etc.

He went ahead and opened all the crates, sending the parts toppling out and forming a small mountain.

“What is he up to?”

Cultivators whispered to each other’s ears in the monitoring center.

boxn ovel. c0m
The artifact parts in these supply points are for competitors to assemble their own artifacts. It tested the competitor’s degree of familiarity and manual dexterity with these artifacts.

However, most people would open at most one or two weapons crates and extract parts for a set. It was enough to assemble one or two artifacts.

“This little fellow took all the artifact parts and mixed them all together. Can he distinguish them clearly from one another? I mean, they are the most rudimentary of artifacts, but there would be several thousand different components when added all together. To be able to find matching sets of components would be hard. Hard. Way too hard!”

A high ranking military officer disapproved and shook his head.

Artifact Assembling Competitions were quite popular within the military. Soldiers were required to assemble complete artifacts in the shortest amount of time.

Some experts were even able to assemble artifacts to completion with their eyes blindfolded.

But these sorts of competitions used components of the same kind of artifacts. Nobody would take components of several dozen different kinds of artifacts and mix them together. How would one distinguish parts from one another?

Even though Li Yao’s ranking was falling lower and lower, the interest that these cultivators had in regards to him was growing stronger and stronger.

Li Yao didn’t know that numerous cultivators were paying careful attention to his performance from the Distant Expanse.

He was neither tense nor slow, instead moving at his own pace in this match.

He first picked out a crystal cell for the part heap. Then, he picked out some artifact parts and coiled them around the crystal cell, creating an ugly and peculiar small device.

After doing this, he took out approximately 20 more crystal cells and coiled the artifact parts around them following the same pattern. Finally, he connected them in series.

“What is this?”

The cultivators in the monitoring center were puzzled and confused. Everyone’s gazes fell towards the Artificing Expert Xie Tingxian.

Xie Tingxian looked to be deep in thought as he spoke, “Crystal cells are the cores for the most low-level of artifacts. They are responsible for providing essence energy to artifacts as an energy source. But what this competitor has made and created using crystal cells isn’t your standard artifact. At most, one can say that this is a device that carries some artifact capabilities.”

“Professor Xie, what sort of uses does this device have?” a military officer could not help asking.

Xie Tingxian thought to himself for a time. “It’s a kind of explosive device. It can disrupt the Stabilizing Glyph Array within the crystal cells to cause the powerful spiritual energy contained within the crystal cells to rupture in an instant and give rise to a great powerful explosive force.”

“Could it be that he wants to make over a hundred explosive devices and bombs his way as he goes?”

“That can’t be right. He set up 20 of them crystal cells in series. With that big of a mass, it would be impossible to carry around. Don’t even mention about going out to bomb Demon Beasts, it would be impossibly lucky of him to not be caught in such a big explosion.”

The military officer wrinkled his eyebrows having sunk into deep thought.

After making a small and a large crystal cell bomb, Li Yao did something unexpected by changing his style completely.

His dexterity increased abruptly in a flash. His pair of hands transformed into two trailing shadows as he plucked out several hundred components from the pile at lightning speeds.

A crackling exploding sound rang forth as a long sawtooth-edged sword began to form at lightning speed.

“Such fast hand dexterity!”

The monitoring center was in an uproar.

Assembling artifacts was a basic skill of cultivators. Every cultivator had some understanding of it.

But at their level, they long since ceased using their hands and instead used spiritual energy to manipulate the components.

For an ordinary youth whose spirit root had yet to awaken, possessing hand dexterity as demonically fast as these means that he had absolutely gone through long, difficult, and unsurpassed amounts of practice!

“Such solid fundamentals!”

Xie Tingxian nodded his head over and over, faintly feeling that he was about to snatch up a diamond this time.

The other cultivars could only see that Li Yao’s hand dexterity was demonically fast. With the eyes of an expert, only he could tell that Li Yao was maintaining a super high speed while also maintaining a pair of steady hands. Li Yao ensured that every component was assembled firmly and accurately. Even breathing did not cause the slightest hint of disruption.

The only thing was…

Xie Tingxian blinked his eyes. He had discovered that the assembling sequence Li Yao went through differed somewhat from the standard military greatsword assembling procedure.

At first, he thought that Li Yao had made a mistake. But a moment later, he found out that Li Yao was modifying the architecture in the most inconspicuous place. There he added a little “something”.

“Interesting. This really is interesting.”

Xie Tingxian did not expect that Li Yao, a high school student, would actually take these classical artifacts with finalized designs and go on to modify them.

Although he had yet to figure out what the small modification would entail, he was already made to nod his head over and over, firmly increasing his resolve to pay close attention to Li Yao.

Not five minutes had passed when Li Yao completed assembling the first artifact.

This was a military standard chainsword nicknamed the Tiger Shark!

It was a two-handed broadsword exceeding 1.5 meters long. A sawtooth ring crafted from super-alloy steel revolved around the exterior. Powered by crystal cells, the sawtooth ring was able to revolve at super high speeds. As for its killing power, it can easily chop through a giant tree with a girth that one could not wrap his arms around. No matter how hard the shell and bones of low-level Demon Beasts were, they were no use when faced with this sword.

“Four minutes thirty-nine seconds. This speed already exceeds that of several veteran military personnel,” the officer from a moment ago cried out.

Strictly speaking, assembling artifacts in this manner was only taking pre-crafted artifact components and assembling them together. Technically, it wasn’t real “artificing”.

But when adhering to the standards of a typical eighteen year old, Li Yao demonstrated an absolutely praiseworthy virtuoso performance.

What followed was…

Contrary to the expectations of most of the cultivators, Li Yao did not heave the Tiger Shark Chainsword out to go slaying around with it. Instead, he put it aside. He picked out a great amount of components once again and began to assemble his second artifact.

The components he picked out this time were completely different than those from last time. The style increased in crudeness, ferocity, and wildness, giving it the appearance of a war blade.

Soon, a somewhat shorter, but broader and thicker, strangely shaped blade looking like a dog’s leg was born in Li Yao’s hands.

“Thunder Blade?” the military officer shouted involuntarily.

It was also one of the most fundamental and rudimentary of artifacts. But the thunder blade and the chainsword designs were completely different in reasoning. This blade relied on the Jolt Glyph Array engraved on both sides of the back of the blade. The array generates high-frequency vibration ripples, causing the blade to produce over 10,000 oscillations per second. This way, the killing power is increased.

Each time the blade chops down, the internal organs of the Demon Beast will be completely disintegrated by the vibrations. Among the rudimentary artifacts, this was one of the most fierce!

These two types of designs had completely different logic behind them, creating completely opposite artifacts. In Li Yao’s hands, they were so easy due to experience, as if he had known these artifacts since birth.

“This little guy is really quite the monster!” muttered the military officer.

And this wasn’t even the end. After completing his second artifact, Li Yao was engrossed once more with the pile of parts. He selected components that were of completely different styles than that of the first two.

Again, he used another five minute interval. It was powerful and heavy. One look at this giant battle-axe caused people’s scalps to go numb as it formed in Li Yao’s palm.

Li Yao grasped the Drive Glyph Array on the handle tightly and slightly brandished the axe.

The numerous engraved glyph arrays on the surface of the battle-axe suddenly shined. The edge of the axe turned orange, like an iron heated red!

This was a heat-axe known as the Burning Sky. Its combat design was different again from the other two artifacts.

The large amounts of spiritual energy bursting from the crystal cells wasn’t transformed into a form of mechanical energy but was directly transformed into a super-high temperature flow of heat through the use of it’s glyph arrays.

When this axe descends, the internal organs of Demon Beasts will be all burnt to ash!

Three completely different styles of rudimentary artifacts with polarizing different designs were assembled in only a short 20 minutes.

There was no trace of sorrow nor happiness on Li Yao’s face. It was as if he had completed something small that wasn’t worth mentioning. He went and took a sip of cool water, splashing some onto his hands, carefully rubbing them to cool them down.

It was only now that everyone discovered his pair of hands were already burning hot, a sheet of crimson red, from the long duration of high-speed movements.





Home  Forty Millenniums of Cultivation  Chapter 55
 

Chapter 55
 
Chapter 55: Trading Artifacts
Translator: Strivon, Ash  Editor: Geoffrey_, Lancent

Trading Artifacts


“There’s someone with this kind of gift for artificing among today’s high school students? How extremely rare! Deep Sea University must desire this sort of genius, right?”

“Why did he assemble three completely different artifacts? The techniques required to use the Chainsword, the Thunderblade, and the Heat-axe are completely different. Can it be that he’s proficient in all three types of artifacts? He would simply be a monster then!”

“Even if he’s proficient in all of them, there’s no need to make all of them. These three artifacts are all heavy weapons. If he were to carry them all on his body, his speed would greatly reduce. This is of no benefit when fighting in the jungle; instead, it becomes a burden.”

While every cultivator discussed amongst themselves, a second competitor had arrived at the supply point.

This youth was tall and his temperament was completely vicious. Beneath his chin grew stubble all around, giving him a mature appearance.

When he saw Li Yao resting and sitting to the side, he clearly became distracted for a moment.

But as soon as he saw that there were actually three artifacts displayed on the ground, he became immediately overjoyed. He walked up to them in all smiles and grabbed the Burning Sky Battleaxe in his hand. He swung it vigorously a few times and continued to shout with excitement.

“Today is my lucky day. I never thought that there would be preassembled artifacts in the supply points. With this Burning Sky Battleaxe, I can kill a hundred Demon Beasts in a day!”

The vicious youth hefted the battle-axe. But right when he was about to leave, a voice rang out unexpectedly from behind him.

Li Yao called lazily, fixing him in place: “Hey, fellow student. I just assembled this battle-axe a moment ago. I’ll sell it to you for 200 points. Since you’re my first customer, I’ll give you a 5 percent discount for a price of 190 then.”

boxn ovel. c0m
The vicious youth went blank, following immediately with a laugh. “So it was you who crafted these. Then I truly need to give you my thanks. I’ll treat you to dinner when I have time!”

With absolutely no intentions of trading, he hefted the battle-axe and turned around to leave.

Li Yao had foreseen this happening early on. He shouted after the youth without a change in expression “Fellow student, hold on. Please take a look at this!”

Upon speaking, Li Yao gently unfolded his arm, ferociously tossing the first crystal cell bomb he assembled far into the forest.

“BOOM!”

A large sound suddenly rang out from within the forest. A ball of smoke rose gradually into the air. Flickers of a malevolent flame were mixed within the smoke. A surging wave of heat assaulted their faces.

The vicious youth was frightened by the large sound. The color of his face changed as he turned around to stare fixed at Li Yao. “What do you mean by this?”

Li Yao held a large bomb comprised of over 20 crystal cells connected in series. He giggled while saying, “I don’t mean nothing. It was only the powerful explosion of a crystal cell bomb just now. You saw it~~~ I still have over twenty crystal cells hooked in series in my hands. If you’re not willing to trade and you want to walk away with my Burning Sky Battleaxe for nothing, then you leave me no choice but to activate the glyph array, ignite the crystal cells, and blow the both of us out of the competition then~”

“You…”

The vicious youth was suddenly struck dumb. He never expected that Li Yao would play this hand.

Li Yao chuckled, saying, “If you don’t want to buy, that’s okay too. There are quite a few ordinary swords over there. You can take any you please. It doesn’t matter if you take all of them away, but please relinquish my Burning Sky Battleaxe.”

The vicious youth squinted his eyes and saw the ordinary swords scattered all around the ground. A color of disdain was revealed in his irises.

Had he not tried out the Burning Sky Battleaxe, using ordinary swords may have been fine for killing Demon Beasts.

But he already had a taste of the Burning Sky Battleaxe with its truly ecstatic feeling of being of the highest quality. He was somewhat unwilling to return and choose an ordinary sword.

Li Yao continued speaking, “Killing one low-level Demon Beast will net you approximately a dozen points. If you purchase this Sky Burning Battleaxe for 200 points, you can increase your Demon Beast killing efficiency greatly. How many dozens of Demon Beasts can you kill within three days? You can probably make back the points in half a day!”

The color of the vicious youth’s face was dark and unclear. He was in complete hesitation.

After all, the competition had only just begun. None of the competitors had many points; 190 points seemed to be all he had in his possession.

If he went ahead with the trade, his ranking would drop to the very bottom.

But what this fellow said was correct! If he had this Burning Sky Battleaxe, his Demon Beast killing efficiency would greatly increase. The rate of earning points would increase by at least two fold!

Li Yao was smiling from ear to ear. Like a business shark, he spoke with consideration for the customer out from the bottom of his heart, “Fellow student, think clearly. If you don’t buy this Burning Sky Battleaxe, later I will sell it to someone else. That person’s offensive strength will greatly increase over yours. He might rank higher in points than you later on. In this manner, you might suffer from not just a little bit of a loss.”

The vicious youth snorted coldly saying, “I admit what you say is true, but you’re not the only one who can assemble artifacts! I have taken the relevant courses in my school. I can also assemble a Sky Burning Battleaxe by spending a bit more time… What! How could you mix all the artifact components together? What a huge mess! You’re way too shameless, fellow student!”

Li Yao shrugged his shoulders, speaking indifferently: “Make up your mind already. Are you going to make the trade or what? If you’re not, then please relinquish the battleaxe. Thanks.”

“I don’t believe you’ll set off the bomb!” the vicious youth stared dead fixed in Li Yao’s eyes, grinding his teeth as he spoke.

“Sure then. I’ll count down from three and we will all retire from the competition. Anyway, my actual strength differs a lot from yours. I only came here to broaden my world. I never expected to enter the finals. Three… Two…”

Li Yao laughed a devilish laugh unperturbed.

Before he could count down to “one”, the vicious youth collapsed completely and let out a crazed howl, “STOP! STOP! I’ll trade! I’ll buy this Burning Sky Battleaxe!”

The two’s Puji Critters bumped lightly into each other in the air with a “ding” sound. The 190 points that the vicious youth earned from painstakingly killing Demon Beasts were transferred completely all to Li Yao’s name!

A glistening bright name suddenly faded away from the rankings and Li Yao’s name appeared once more in the top 100… He blazed to the 88th spot in a flash!

Depression filled the vicious youth’s face. He glared ferociously at Li Yao, hefted the Burning Sky Battleaxe, and walked away with his head down dejected.

“So from the beginning, he wanted to act mainly as an ‘Artifact Peddler’. To use this sort of method to earn points!”

Numerous cultivators in the monitoring center suddenly came to an understanding. One by one, a feeling of not knowing whether to laugh or cry grew in everyone.

In the past, there were also dozens of competitions who went ahead and traded artifacts. But, they would do this occasionally in between primarily slaying Demon Beasts.

The main reason was because there were too many loopholes within the trading rules. They were quite disadvantageous towards the artifact crafter. If the crafter was even slightly off guard, their artifacts would be easily snatched by other people.

They never thought this evil little fellow would think of a “mutual destruction” method to seal the loopholes in trading!

After completing his first trade, Li Yao threw himself into assembling a new artifact.

He was just like an untiring essence golem; his hands continued to operate at high speeds without showing the slight bit of tremoring for the next few hours.

During this period of time, several hundred competitors had already arrived at the supply point.

The majority of competitors possessing sufficient points walked away with an artifact under the influence of Li Yao’s glib tongue.

In other words, Li Yao just waited comfortably in this incomparably safe supply point and earned the equivalent of killing several hundred Demon Beasts outside, if not a thousand Demon Beasts!

He was soaring up on the ranking board, managing to blitzkrieg into the top 10. There was only a one hundred point different between him and Helian Lie!

Every competitor can check the ranking board through using their Puji Critters.

Obviously, when Helian Lie saw Li Yao’s name, he was shocked, astonished, and stupefied!

“This mishmash was clearly a rotten piece of trash. Piece of Trash. PIECE OF TRASH! How the hell did he blitzkrieg his way into the top 10? To have such a small difference between us? This is completely impossible!”

Helian Lie’s eyes were bloodshot. His anger was exploding incomparably! No matter how he racked his head, he could not find an answer to what Li Yao did to reach here in the end!

Soon, all the artifact parts were consumed bare by Li Yao and all assembled artifacts were traded for points.

Li Yao chuckled and then whistled. He took the big explosive and put it in his military pack. He was setting out towards the next supply point!





Home  Forty Millenniums of Cultivation  Chapter 56
 

Chapter 56
 
Chapter 56: First in the Rankings!
Translator: Strivon, Ash  Editor: Geoffrey_, Lancent

First in the Rankings!


He did not have as much luck at the second supply point. Quite a few competitors had already arrived and snatched stuff first.

Several weapon crates were already opened. Some artifact components were already used by other competitors; however, most of the weapon crates were still relatively intact.

Afterall, when compared to fighting prowess, there weren’t that many youths who possessed a gift for artificing.

Although the majority of youths had studied the basics of artificing knowledge, the extent of that knowledge only covered a few dozen rudimentary artifact compositions and assembling procedures. They did not have Li Yao’s abundance of hands-on working experience.

Modern artifacts differ from ancient artifacts. Even the most rudimentary of cold weapons would be composed of over a hundred parts.

When assembled by a novice, aside from the slow assembling speed, whenever a part wasn’t carefully installed, there would likely be problems arising during battle. Best case scenario, the artifact would suddenly fail. Worst case scenario, it would explode on the spot, causing the spiritual energy to backfire from the inside, creating an incomparably dangerous situation!

Therefore, the majority of youths who weren’t good at crafting still chose to use ordinary swords to fight.

Li Yao began doing procedures, starting the second round of crazed assembling!

In the beginning, the trading went rather well at this supply point. But after selling his 20th artifact, Li Yao finally hit an iron wall.

“If you want money, I have none. If you want life, I have one. I’m gonna take and walk away with this Burning Sky Battleaxe. Go ahead and set off the explosion. The worst thing would be mutual defeat!”

boxn ovel. c0m
It was a male youth with dark skin, the height of a cow, and the size of a horse. He looked to be a demon as he spoke fiercely.

Li Yao had somewhat of a toothache.

“Fellow Student, don’t be so stubborn. I already gave you 10% off. You can buy such a great battleaxe for only 270 points! It’s simply a blood-spitting price reserved for family! Or does it mean that you really don’t believe I will set off the bomb?”

“You’re correct. I was stubborn since birth. Other people call me ‘The Stubborn Bull’ at school.

I just don’t believe it. If you have guts, then just set it off!”

The tanned male laughed loudly, hefted the Burning Sky Battleaxe, and turned around to leave without looking back.

Li Yao sneered as he looked at the male’s back. A trace of ferocity exuded from Li Yao’s eyes.

Before the tanned male could walk outside the supply point, a gale of wind blasted suddenly against his back. Without even the time to react, his body turned wet from a blob of pink gel that bound him firmly.

The tanned male was encased in the pink jello with an expression of shock and grief as he sadly left the competition!

“That’s what I’m talking about. This kid is suited to be an assassin. Think about it. He doesn’t need to be supplied with weapons when he hides behind enemy lines. He can craft and maintain any sort of artifacts himself. This kind of fellow is an existence that will cause headaches for the enemy no matter where he’s placed!”

A cultivator could not help speaking out in the monitoring center.

“How ruthless and merciless. It’s true that there’s nothing preventing competitors from attacking each other in the preliminaries, but to use this kind of deathly back-to-the-head sudden attack means that he has a strong mental fortitude. That kind of fortitude isn’t typical of a high school student. He’s good. He’s really good!”

A cultivator with a shriveled, skinny figure and cold eyes also chuckled, nodding his head repeatedly.

The competitors like the Stubborn Bull, with a block-headed behavior/one-track mind of walking towards doom, are few in number. Most of the competitors straightforwardly chose to trade with points after weighing the pros and cons.

As the competition went on, the number of Demon Beasts slain by everyone grew larger and larger. The competitors with stronger strength had over a thousand points each.

Even though Li Yao played things by ear when increasing his prices slowly, his prices were still quite fair. Most of the competitors did not want to get caught in hassles, for it would be much more delightful and easier to kill Demon Beasts with a better weapon.

The second supply point was swept clean in no time. And once again, Li Yao headed out towards his third supply point.

It took a full two days for him to sweep all of the supply points on Devil Flood Dragon Island clean. He had assembled several hundred rudimentary artifacts in succession to trade with other competitors.

Later on, he even sent a message through his Puji Critter on the public channel meant for communication between competitors. He broadcasted an advertisement:

“Great amounts of Chainswords, Thunder Blades, and Burning Sky Battleaxes are available for sale. They are mighty and very powerful. Their quality is solid. The prices are cheap. They are essential treasures for slaying Demon Beasts and earning a great amount of points. If you wish to buy, please come post haste to ‘so and so number’ supply point.”

Li Yao killed a total of four Demon Beasts. One was from the three-eyed ape in the beginning. The others happened when he had accidently revealed some tracks when moving around, so he was forced to kill three Demon Beasts.

But when the competition entered its 49th hour, Li Yao’s name had actually inconceivably appeared in the first place spot on the rankings, even placing above Helian Lie’s name!

This was unprecedented in the history of the Limit Challenge Competition.

But top place ranking lasted briefly; it’s hard to be sustained for long.

This was because all of the supply points on Devil Flood Dragon Island were swept clean by the end of the second day.

At his first supply point, there were a lot of artifact components for him to assemble.

But after all, there were still quite a few people among the competitors who knew how to assemble artifacts. All the artifact components in the last few supply points were already consumed and exhausted.

Additionally, quite a few competitors who dealt with Li Yao earlier suffered from fatal attacks later and were forced to retire. Great amounts of Chainblades, Thunder Blades, and Burning Sky Battle Axes were lost in the forest and found by other competitors… This was something that Li Yao was utterly unable to prevent.

By the end of the second day, Li Yao’s business had already become very difficult to maintain.

Li Yao didn’t give a damn. He chose a rather warm and dry supply point and began… Sleeping!

While the other competitors were battling endlessly in the forest, being soaked in blood, gaining scars all over their bodies, and using up all their energy, Li Yao snored in deep sleep. He was conserving every last ounce of precious strength.

His name fell, sliding down on the ranking board. By noon of the third day, his name had dropped outside the top 100.

By the end of the third day, his ranking fell all the way down to 293rd.

Li Yao still didn’t give a damn… As long as his ranking was within the top 600, he would still enter the finals.

He was waiting for the finals to put on a good show!

“Pop!”

Li Yao opened a pressurized tin can in the supply point and ate big mouthfuls of food that he chewed over and over.

“BZZ! BZZ! BZZ!”

A strange vibration spread all throughout Devil Flood Dragon Island. Powerful restriction arrays had been initialized. The once vicious and fearsome Demon Beasts seemed to go fixed like statues. All of them turned rigid and motionless.

“Congratulations, Student Li Yao. You have entered into the final stage of the Limit Challenge Competition!”

“Please rest for three hours. All Demon Beasts will be shackled during this time period, they won’t attack you.”

“The finals will begin in three hours. There will be even more powerful Demon Beasts released onto the field during that time. At the same time, you will have 300 competitors as enemies and 299 competitors as allies. Good luck!”

The white Puji Critter orbited around Li Yao’s head dancing elegantly. It seemed to be happy for Li Yao.

A thousand or so beams of light rose from Devil Flood Dragon Island, flying towards the Distant Expanse.

Li Yao knew that those were the competitors who ranked below 600th place. None would have a chance at the finals.

The remaining 600 competitors on Devil Dragon Island were the powerful who managed to survive for three days and slew countless Demon Beasts!

The true battle just started from this moment!

Li Yao chuckled, keeping his head down and eating without a single worry in the world.

Right at this time, Small Ji’s pink antenna at the top of his head swayed slightly, casting a 3D figure in front of Li Yao. It was someone that Li Yao was familiar with.

“Headmaster Zhao!”

Li Yao was struck dumb. Appearing in front of him was the Headmaster of Crimson Nimbus Second, Zhao Shude, who was also a core member of the Crimson Nimbus Guild, a high-level Foundation Stage cultivator.

This ordinarily mysterious bigwig headmaster had a kind expression piled on his face. He repeatedly nodded his head as he spoke, “Student Li Yao, your performance has been outstanding. Speaking of which, have you thought about which university you want to attend?”

“Many thanks for the concern Headmaster Zhao. I’ve already made up my mind. I want to apply for Deep Sea University and become a Refiner!” Li Yao puffed up his chest.

“Deep Sea University is quite good. However, Star Nebula University also has quite a decent Artificing Department. Are you interested? If you want, I can represent the Crimson Nimbus Guild and have you sign an “Entrusted Education” contract. You won’t need to go through the entrance exams. You can directly enter Star Nebula University!”

Zhao Shude had spoken astonishing words.





Home  Forty Millenniums of Cultivation  Chapter 57
 

Chapter 57
 
Chapter 57: Three Options
Translator: Strivon, Ash  Editor: Geoffrey_, Lancent

Li Yao’s eyes bulged wide. “Entrusted Education?”


After Headmaster Zhao explained for a moment, Li Yao knew the gist of it. “Entrusted Education” is a special collaborative effort between the cultivator guilds and the universities.

Simply speaking, if Li Yao signs this contract, then he would be considered an official member of the Crimson Nimbus Guild upon graduation from high school. Then, the Crimson Nimbus Guild will entrust him to a university for his education.

The Crimson Nimbus Guild will assume all responsibility for tuition fees and living expenses during that time. And once he graduates from university, he’ll directly get a job with a corporation of the Crimson Nimbus Guild.

This kind of education process for talented students can be said to be streamlined. As long as Li Yao signs the contract, he would live a life without worries and walk a road full of future promise!

Zhao Shude smiled as he spoke, “Our Crimson Nimbus Guild just established a new company last year called the Crimson Nimbus Real Estate. They specialize in developing new towns and cities on the frontier of the Federation. Building a single new city generates several times in profit, up to 10 times!”

“But Demon Beasts run wild on the frontier. It’s not necessarily safe. And since the area is desolate, it’s hard to bring in supplies.

“Therefore, we need hybrid-type talented people who possess great battle prowess and understand how to craft and maintain artifacts to respond to safety issues during periods of construction.

If you sign this contract, when you graduate, you will get a high-ranking position in the Crimson Nimbus Real Estate. It won’t take years before you become the second ‘Peng Hai’!”

The second Fiend Blade Peng Hai!

Li Yao’s heart surged and he was in high spirits, feeling his mood floating past the highest clouds.

boxn ovel. c0m
Zhao Shude chuckled and continued speaking, “You’re very lucky, Student Li Yao. Did you know that even Elder Zhou of the Crimson Nimbus Guild considers you of complete importance? It was precisely under his arrangement that you are able to receive this ‘Entrusted Education’ Contract.”

“He’s a real bigwig. If you enter the Crimson Nimbus Guild, you will become one of Elder Zhou’s men. Your future will be boundless!”

“However, there’s no need for you to answer in a rush. Your performance has already stimulated the interest of several universities. There should be more people looking to contact you later. You might as well weigh the offers so that you won’t blame me for not giving you any options. Hahahaha!”

Zhao Shude waved his hand without waiting for Li Yao to respond and said, “In a word, give a good performance in the finals. Elder Zhou and I will be watching you. If you have any other conditions, there’s no harm in bringing them up. Crimson Nimbus Second won’t treat any genius unfairly!”

After speaking, the image flashed and Zhao Shude’s translucent figure changed to a white glow, disappearing in a flash.

Li Yao then took a deep haggard breath.

Oh MAN! He never thought he would actually attract the interest of the major players of the Crimson Nimbus Guild. He had the chance to step into the skies!

Is he going to agree to them or not?

While he was still hesitating, Small Ji’s antenna started to sway lightly to form a second virtual image. And this second image caused Li Yao’s heart to beat even faster.

“Professor Xie!”

Li Yao bowed to the virtual image of the purple-clothed old man with the utmost respect… Opposite from him was the Artificing Expert of Deep Sea University, Xie Tingxian!

Xie Tingxian chuckled.

“Student Li Yao, congratulations. You may not have the highest point ranking in this year’s competition, but you are the one who attracted the most eyes. I’ll get straight to the point. I’ve already sent competition recordings of you to our admissions office of Deep Sea University. What I’ve requested from our Admissions Office is for you to be specially enrolled as long as you enter the top 50 rankings in the finals of the competition! If you enter the top 100, then I’ll give you a preferential score treatment of 20 points! If you enter the top 200, then I’ll give you a preferential score treatment of 10 points! How is it? Doesn’t this count as good faith?”

“Really, I’m far too grateful, Professor Xie. I will do my best and fight my way to the top 50!” Li Yao spoke loudly.

“Good. Right now’s the critical moment. I won’t bother your resting. Do your best to maintain a tranquil state of mind. Fight and bring out your best!” Xie Tingxian nodded towards him, chuckling as his figure faded in the hologram.

The instant Xie Tingxian faded away, another virtual image appeared with a jerk, seeming hotheaded and itching to get on with things. It forcefully squeezed into Li Yao’s line of sight.

“Ding… Ding Lingdang?” Li Yao went blank. It was that female T-rex.

Ding Lingdang sized Li Yao up and down with utterly scorching eyes. She spoke sternly, “Student Li Yao, you appear to have somewhat of a misunderstanding about the Grand Desolate War Institution… It’s true. Our school’s Combat Department is the strongest in the Federation!”

“But, we don’t have just empty handed ‘Body Practitioners’ in our Combat Department. We also have experts in bladed weapons and melee artifacts — Sword Cultivators. You come from Crimson Nimbus Second so you ought to know of a famous senior ‘Peng Hai’. He entered our Grand Desolate War Institution after graduation from high school and specialized in training in the usage of various melee artifacts. Later, he even won the nickname ‘Fiend Blade’. It’s okay if you don’t want to become a Body Practitioner. It would also be great if you can come to our Grand Desolate War Institution’s Combat Department to become a Sword Cultivator!”

The two words “Peng Hai” caused Li Yao to be stupefied for a second. A flame ignited in his eyes.

Upon seeing that Li Yao hadn’t immediately refused, Ding Lingdang became more lively as she spoke, “In brief, I feel that it is in your nature to become a battle-type cultivator. You’re extremely suited for the Combat Department of our Grand Desolate War Institution. As long as you can fight your way into the top 300 of the finals, I can give you special enrollment. And, all tuition fees will be waived and you will receive a giant scholarship! What do you think? Consider it over then, Student Li Yao!”

……

Even until after Ding Lingdang’s virtual image faded in the air, Li Yao was still dazed. His heart undulated with emotion. It took a long time before he could calm down.

Three gold-paved roads unfolded before his eyes, extending completely straight. Each road led to the supreme apex of the world of cultivators.

In the end, which school ought he choose?

Li Yao sat cross-legged and calmly thought over the pros and cons of each of the three options.

Of the three options, the invitation from Ding Lingdang was clearly the most sincere.

With Li Yao’s actual strength, as long as he brings out his normal strength, fighting his way into the top 300 of the finals shouldn’t be that difficult. And, Fiend Blade Peng Hai graduated from the Combat Department of this Grand Desolate War Institution. Obviously, they did not just specialize in educating Body Practitioners, but also in Sword Cultivators. It matched with his own strengths.

However, after careful consideration, Li Yao still eliminated Grand Desolate War Institution first from his choices.

He promised his long-passed Old Man that he would become a Refiner for sure. Becoming a simple battle-type cultivator would be deviating from his dream.

And Headmaster Zhao’s conditions better align with his ambitions.

Although Star Nebula University’s Artificing Department wasn’t ranked as high as Deep Sea University’s, they were still able to craft treasures like the Spiritual Energy Particle Collider. Clearly, they had their own originalities.

This quite suited Li Yao’s liking, and all expenses would be covered by the Crimson Nimbus Guild. After graduation, he would get a job in a large company controlled by the Crimson Nimbus Guild. After a certain number of years, he would be able to experience a life of new cars, beautiful women, and luxurious villas. It was simply a path of instant success.

However, everything has their negatives. After dinner comes the reckoning. Once he signed the contract with the Crimson Nimbus Guild, he would become an official member of the Crimson Nimbus Guild. Any cultivation courses he would take would be determined by the Crimson Nimbus Guild. His future path of development would also be limited. He would be unable to have his own characteristics.

Since the Crimson Nimbus Guild is paying for everything, he will certainly be educated to be a concentrated cultivator that’s specialized for a certain job. Like being a cog in a big artifact machine. He would always be on board the Crimson Nimbus Guild’s chariot.

This was something Li Yao could not stand.

After considering everything over, Li Yao still resolutely settled on his initial aspiration. He will bring forth everything in the finals to fight his way into the top 50. He will attain special enrollment into Deep Sea University!

Even if he was unable to fight his way into the top 50, at least he would fight for that 20 points of preferential treatment, so that he would have a big advantage in the Entrance Exams.

Deep Sea University is his only choice!

“Let the finals begin! I can’t wait to get started!”

He watched the muddy yellow clouds above get snatched up by the giant bird-like Distant Expanse. Li Yao licked his lips and punched hard to the sky with a fist.

“Just wait a moment, and I will let you experience just how fearsome a shameless Refiner can be!”





Home  Forty Millenniums of Cultivation  Chapter 58
 

Chapter 58
 
Chapter 58: A Commander Appears
Translator: Strivon, Ash  Editor: Geoffrey_, Lancent

At the moment, the Distant Expanse was bustling with unusual noise.


There were cultivators in the monitoring center and 2400 defeated competitors in the hall outside.

These youths were only upset for a short while before they fixed their attention raptly onto the giant hologram, waiting for the finals to begin.

After all, they would receive benefits to their future cultivation when witnessing numerous experts radiate like burning stars during exchanges of blows.

Three hours passed quickly under the gaze of the large crowd. The Limit Challenge Competition… Officially began!

“BOW! BOWOWOWOWOW!!”

The restriction arrays that covered Devil Flood Dragon Island were released. The Demon Beasts who had been restricted for three hours impatiently jumped forth. They used the craziest of snarls to vent the rage coming from the depths of their hearts.

“ROAR! ROAR ROAR!”

Responses came from underground, shouts mixed with tyrannical strength like muffled thunder.

Upon hearing the howls, the just-before majestic Demon Beasts began to reveal expressions of utter fear on their faces as their necks shrank.

At several hundred hidden points all around Devil Flood Dragon Island, countless transmission arrays began to flash.

boxn ovel. c0m
Under the flickering radiance, powerful Demon Beasts with larger bodies, fiercer appearances, crueler expressions, and more violent auras were set free!

They stuck their heads out, observing their surroundings. Their noses shook as they took in the fresh meat scent in the air, the smell that soon caused them to go wild. They shook their heads and wagged their tails, bore their fangs and brandished their claws, and threw themselves into the depths of the forest!

And in front of each of the 600 competitors, their respective Puji Critters listed the 600 names of those who entered the finals.

The 600 people were divided into teams — Red and Blue. A blue or red glow also curled around the Puji Critters to show the teams.

At the same time, the communication channel of the competitors promptly changed. From this moment on, they can only send messages to their own team.

Li Yao skimmed through the 600 names at lightning speed and discovered that he was on the Red Team.

And that Helian Lie and Si Jiaxue were divided into the Blue Team. Surprisingly, the fellow Zheng Dongming had become his teammate.

“Helian Lie. Per your own words, Devil Flood Dragon Island is quite large and is quite small at the same time. I hope we won’t encounter each other!”

Li Yao did final a inspection on his artifacts and laughed with utter confidence.

He was equipped with two short Progressive Daggers. They were smeared with sludge to form a blackness that won’t reflect light. They were like the fangs of a demon.

After sticking the daggers on his waist belt, he examined the myriad of improvised artifacts in his military pack. With a light leap, Li Yao entered the forest and faded away amongst the branches.

The intensity of the finals was a hundred times greater than that of the preliminaries!

Besides the several hundred powerful new Demon Beasts lurking in the forest, quite a few competitors were resting in groups together before they were suddenly split into two teams. The Puji Critters turned either red or blue.

Under each other’s’ gazes, the opposing team members turned into “giant sacks of exp” filled with great amounts of points!

The just-laughing cheerful students engaged in bloody close handed slaughter in a flash!

In a short 5 minutes, 37 competitors were ejected from the competition, and their points were robbed by the competitors who “slain” them.

In the ranking board shown in the monitoring center, the top 100 names seemed to be changing every second!

“Everyone, don’t panic. We should organize ourselves and fight like the Federal Army! My name is Gao Ye and I come from a family of military. I’ve followed my father and uncles since young, learning the commander tactics of special forces. I possess extremely powerful computation and commanding abilities. Everyone, listen to my commands. Group onto my position! If you’re far away from me, group with the teammates by your side. Assemble into small battle squads!”

A sound suddenly rang out from the Blue Team’s communication channel.

The voice was somewhat hoarse but contained great confidence and powerful inspiration within. It caused people to automatically believe in those words.

Quite a few of the members of the Blue Team slightly hesitated, then subconsciously moved closer to Gao Ye’s coordinates.

“The commander for the Blue Team has appeared!” All the cultivators were in high spirits in the monitoring center.

600 students were divided into two teams in the finals. A competitor’s individual combat ability was actually not the most crucial thing. The most crucial thing was for everyone to assemble together in the shortest time frame, form into battle squads, and fight against Demon Beasts and the enemy team.

It can be said that in this battle, whichever team has an expert commanding admin-type talent first appear will seize the initiative. They would very likely seize the final victory!

In the previous competitions, often it took at least several hours, or even a day, of strife and a bitter price to pay before a “Commander” was born.

It was very unexpected for such a gifted commander talent to appear in this competition. The chaos of the Blue Team had been dissolved in a mere five minutes.

In the Blue Team’s comm channel, Gao Ye issued commands after commands, coolly and calmly, giving no chance for anybody to refute his commands.

Although there were people who questioned his strategic decisions, Gao Ye would justify himself and refute them within several seconds. They opposition were left dumbstruck and everyone accepted Gao Ye’s commands willingly.

Under his command, the remaining 280+ competitors on the Blue Team gradually grouped together, forming a standard-like battle formation.

A dozen or so competitors even formed a hunting squad, killing a powerful Demon Beast that had just walked through the transmission array!

On the other hand, the Red Team was in a bad situation. They did not have an organizing admin-type genius among their 300 competitors. Voices were clamoring in their communication channel. If you’re noisy, I’ll be noisier. Voices were talking over one another. It was like the special bargain sale time at the supermarket.

“My Actualization Quotient is at 75%. Let me be the commander for the Red Team. Everyone, convene onto me! Convene onto me!”

“Who gives a fuck if your Actualization Quotient is at 75%. My Actualization Quotient is at 77%. I can kill two Demon Beasts with a single strike. But, I know myself. I don’t have the makings of a commander. Kid, you should just stay where you belong!”

“You… You’re this arrogant? What school are you from. Don’t you dare going back after the competition!”

“Everyone quiet! First, let’s quickly think of a way. I saw that the Blue Team has likely assembled themselves already. Our side is completely suppressed. They have seven to eight people fighting our two or three. AHH!”

“Not good. A powerful Demon Beasts appeared in my position. My coordinates are… Someone come and help!”

“No go. We’ve been intercepted by the Blue Team here. These goddamn bastards. How is it that the Blue Team has people everywhere! Red team. Where the hell has Red Team gone!”

Li Yao’s body was smeared all over with sludge. On top of the sludge was an entwined layer of weeds, sticks, and vines. He concealed himself deep inside a shrub and waited calmly.

Even Small Ji was smeared in the same fashion of camouflage. He turned down the voice mode of the comm channel, skimming over the words in the comm channel with the weakest brightness.

Looking and looking, Li Yao let out a sigh somewhat helplessly.

He did not expect a genius level commander to appear on the opposing team while his own team was a mess. The situation seemed to be a bit disadvantageous now.

Li Yao knew himself. His skill was in crafting, not commanding the battlefield. And he didn’t have the ability to charismatically sway people with a few words. The ability to be revered and be saluted to. He did not have the makings of being a commander.

Even if he does enter a squad, he would be laughed at and ridiculed by his teammates.

“Maybe it’s about time to use my ace in the hole!” Li Yao fondled a hard and stiff object in his embrace.

It was a simple artifact that he made at the first supply point… It was a remote control.





Home  Forty Millenniums of Cultivation  Chapter 59
 

Chapter 59
 
Chapter 59: Paralyzed!
Translator: Strivon, Ash  Editor: Geoffrey_, Lancent

The situation was within Li Yao’s expectations. Victory was cast slanted towards the Blue Team.


It could be seen clearly through the giant hologram in the monitoring center that the Blue Team had completely assembled together in under three hours.

They formed into small combat units with sizes of 3-5 competitors each. The members of a single unit were mostly from the same school and area; they were familiar with each other, so their attacking and assisting teamwork were well coordinated. They attacked and defended as one entity.

The distance between each combat unit was perfectly adjusted. Together, the combat units faintly formed a large circle, enclosing Gao Ye in the center. A dozen competitors with administrative talent provided support to Gao Ye to form a command center!

The command center was the brain and all the combat units were fists. The Blue Team came from the north side of Devil Flood Dragon Island and moved south, sweeping everything in their path.

The two teams were created from choosing random competitors, so their actual strengths as a whole hardly differed. When one side organized as a battle squad went to fight against non-organized scattered sand, the non-organized side was simply massacred!

Whether it was Demon Beasts or members of the Red Team, it seemed neither beings were capable of withstanding the Blue Team Battle Squad.

Even if there were several Red Team members with tyrannical strength who were able to resist for a while, they would immediately find themselves surrounded by tree or four, or even five or six combat units of the Blue Team. Under the endless attacks from cleaving blades, members of the Red Team were gelled off and expelled from the competition!

Not even half the first day had past and the Red Team had suffered a loss of over one-hundred-and-twenty competitors. They were routed and stunned by the Blue Team, ending in complete defeat.

On the other hand, the Blue Team only suffered a trifling loss of 30 or so competitors, and they were getting more and more proficient in coordinating with each other. The Red Team’s sphere of influence was being suppressed step by step. The battle losses between the teams further grew in difference.

“There’s no suspense. If things go on like this, it won’t even take a day and a half before the complete annihilation of the Red Team!” Several experienced military officers concluded with sure confidence.

boxn ovel. c0m
The numerous cultivators sighed one after another. They never thought that a god-like commander genius would actually appear on the Blue Team to allow the Blue Team to achieve an overwhelming victory with ease.

It really wasn’t quite fair in regards to the ordinary competitors of the respective teams.

Nevertheless, this was reality. Sometimes, luck was more important than strength on the real battlefield.

Xie Tingxian and Ding Lingdang watched with tightly furrowed brows in the corner of the monitoring center. They also did not expect the occurrence of such a one-sided situation. The Blue Team had control of great influence. No matter how strong Li Yao’s individual ability was, it was probably no use.

Fearfully, it would be very difficult for him to fight his way into the top 300.

“Li Yao. What are you still waiting for?”

Two people had their eyes gazed fixed together onto the red dot representing Li Yao on the large hologram.

Li Yao’s red dot could be seen on the map to be unmoving all this time on a dark corner on the north side of Devil Flood Dragon Island. It had been motionless all this time.

Even when a great number of blue dots steamrolled in front of him, he did not have the least bit of intention of jumping out.

Right now, Li Yao was behind the Blue Team’s rear line.

All around him was emptiness. All the members of the Red Team in the area were slaughtered, save for him. All that was left were four Blue Scout Groups who continued to roam around, patrolling.

A pair of eyes opened leisurely from within the depths of a dark shrub. Within them blossomed radiance.

It was as if a stomach-rumbling hungry vulture had discovered the fattest lamb.

“Swish Swish, Swish Swish,” rocked the shrub. Li Yao threaded his way out calmly, but not slowly.

He examined the footprints on the ground and gouges on the trees. Then, he moved flowingly up a large tree like a large python.

Li Yao moved between the branches without a sound. His speed was even faster than his crazed ground speed.

Soon, a Blue Team Scout Group that was formed from three competitors appeared in his sight.

As expected, these three competitors were all holding melee artifacts that he assembled.

Li Yao chuckled. This situation was within his calculations.

He had assembled several hundred artifacts during the preliminaries. There were only 600 people who entered the finals, practically each person had one.

Additionally, the Red Team had lost a portion of their manpower. Their artifacts must have been snatched by the Blue Team.

“The Artifacts you’re holding are all assembled by me… And you still want to fight with me!?”

Li Yao stomped powerfully with his pair of legs, causing the branches below his feet to split with a “*Crack.”

And just like a giant owl, he descended from the sky, throwing himself towards the Blue Scout Group!

“Enemy attack!”

The Blue Scout Group had gone through half a day of coordination, so they long fostered somewhat of a tacit understanding. They did not lose their heads from Li Yao’s ambush.

In practically a tenth of a second, the three activated the Initiate Glyph Arrays on their artifacts.

The Chainsword rumbled. The Thunder Blade vibrated. The Burning Sky Battleaxe’s edge turned orange in a flash!

But within the next tenth of a second, a stabbing pain was felt in each of these three’s hands. It was like a piercing electric current had surged into their arms from the grip of their weapons, then the current flowed all the way to ruthlessly stab into their hearts!!

“AHHH!”

The three scouts let out blood-curdling cries simultaneously! Their bodies locked rigidly against their wills for a second!

In this short flash of a second of being paralyzed, two flowing black rays of light flashed past their necks. Just before the light touched their skin, three Puji Critters immediately belched out gel, securely protecting these three Blue Competitors and cutting off their hopes of advancing in the competition!

The three Blue Competitors were judged as losers and ejected from the competition!

“Swoosh Swoosh Swoosh Swoosh!”

The points under their names were immediately transferred under Li Yao’s name. Li Yao shot up by over 30 places on the ranking board!

“What’s the matter?”

Quite a few cultivators had seen this brief sneak-attack scene from the monitoring center.

They were bewildered by the obviously clumsy performance exhibited by the three Blue Competitors.

Have these three Blue Competitors gone retarded? Why did they all stop all of a sudden? Had it not been for that one second of stun, even at a small price, they totally can finish off this Red Competitor!”

“Huh? This Red Competitor seems to be the crafting expert who assembled several hundred melee artifacts during the preliminaries. I never thought he would survive until now and even eliminate three Blue Competitors in a flash! His actual strength is this strong!?”

“Nope. There’s something weird. There’s something wrong with the artifacts of the three Blue Competitors!”

Some cultivators with great insight saw through the ins and outs in a flash. Everyone threw their gazes at Xie Tingxian.

Xie Tingxian had been observing Li Yao’s brilliant performance with wide open eyes all this time. He waited until Li Yao faded into the darkness before he let out a long breath and revealed an expression of revelation.

Xie Tingxian chuckled and spoke to the people around him, “Fellow Daoists, don’t be baffled. This Student Li Yao did a few small modifications when he assembled each of his artifacts. He implemented a small spiritual energy loop capable of having each artifact receive remote commands from a short distance. The spiritual energy is overloaded in a flash, causing essence force to overflow. This causes a small ripple of essence force to be released.”

“This ripple is weak, so it does not have too much killing potential. At most, it causes the victim to be paralyzed for one or two seconds. That’s it.”





Home  Forty Millenniums of Cultivation  Chapter 60
 

Chapter 60
 
Chapter 60: A Crazy Backdoor
Translator: Strivon, Ash  Editor: Geoffrey_, Lancent

The entire room was in an uproar as soon as these words were spoken.


A second or two of paralysis!? That’s what he calls “not having too much killing potential”?

One second was enough to kill an enemy a hundred times over in the world of cultivation!

“Well, did he make the same modification on all his artifacts?” a cultivator asked with bulging eyes.

“Yep.” Xie Tingxian chuckled.

Numerous cultivators turned their heads to glance at the giant hologram. They discovered that it didn’t matter whether it was the Red Team or Blue Team, seemingly every competitor’s melee artifact was an artifact created by Li Yao. They carefully rethought the outcome and simultaneously gave a cold shiver.

This kid is really way too despicable, too shameless, too fearsome!

“That’s truly remarkable! He’s already learned the practice of ‘Opening the Backdoor’ of the Refiner circle at such a young age!”

A cultivator had muttered to himself and somewhat unintentionally swept his gaze at Xie Tingxian.

There was an unspoken practice within the circle of Refiners. A great deal of Refiners were used to leaving behind some super tiny special structures on their artifacts when crafting artifacts for their customers. Ordinary cultivators were completely unable to see these marvelous structures. But in the eyes of the Refiner himself, having these structures allows him to seize the “life-gate” of the artifact.

When the need arises, they can go through the life-gate to control the artifact.

boxn ovel. c0m
In the circle, this kind of move was called “Opening the Backdoor”.

Initially, this was a method used by Refiners only to protect themselves and to prevent others from holding artifacts they crafted and conveniently silencing them right away.

After all, when compared to battle-type cultivators, the fighting capacity of Refiners are often weaker.

Anyway, these kind of practices became more and more common as time went on. It seemed that it became an open secret within the circle of veteran Refiners; it turned into an “unwritten rule”.

There was only one way to prevent the backdoor from opening in an artifact… To craft your own artifact!

But, the present was different than the old days. In the Ancient Cultivator Civilization of 40,000 years ago, all kinds of artifacts were utterly simple in nature. There were merely flying swords, throwing knives, and spatial pouches or so. An artifact like the Heaven Upheaval Seal would be considered complicated. Cultivators were certainly able to craft these themselves.

But as time progressed into the modern era, the social division of labor became increasingly specialized and divided. The architectures of artifacts became more and more complex. The subject of Artificing became a giant can of worms, a mysterious and profound subject. It was an extremely difficult subject to succeed in without spending over dozens of years of effort. And if one doesn’t have a gift for artificing, it would require twice the work for half the outcome, spending countless hours of bitter blood. Even then, one may not necessarily comprehend the mysteries of Artificing.

It was improbable for a common battle-type cultivator, who didn’t have a hint of a gift for Artificing, to spend several dozens of years to study Artificing… Otherwise, when would they have time to fight?

Therefore, after considering the matter, they could only pinch their noses and endure through the clearly known artifact loophole. Or they could find a trusted Refiner to craft their artifacts. Or after having an artifact crafted, they could find another Refiner to crack the backdoor.

The offensive and defensive battle between the installed backdoor and the backdoor cracker was also a “battle” that was completely common to see in the Artificing circle. After going through several typical battles, every Refiner sought the honor of installing an uncrackable backdoor, or even an undiscoverable backdoor. The most glorious of all was to be able to discover and crack the backdoors left behind by others.

Of course, no Refiner would admit to any backdoors installed on his artifacts.

Xie Tingxian curled his beard. He shook and swayed his head, saying, “Man! Although Student Li Yao’s methods are effective, in the end, they go against the professional ethics of Refiners. It’s somewhat inappropriate! If he enters Deep Sea University, we will certainly properly educate him. How could he leave backdoors on his artifacts willy-nilly!?”

“Come on!”

Quite a few cultivators scowled at Xie Tingxian… Deep Sea University was the Holy Land for Refiners. At the same time, it was one of the headstreams of the loathsome behavior of “Opening the Backdoor”. It would be a wonder if they were to “properly educate him”. If Li Yao really did enter Deep Sea University, he would be just like a fish back in water. It wouldn’t take years before he became a backdoor expert!

Right when everyone was simultaneously speechless, another four blue dots, representing a scout group, strangely perished on the north side of Devil Flood Dragon Island.

What replaced them was a tiny red dot; the dot flickered tenaciously.

The second scout group had fallen into Li Yao’s evil clutches!

Besides the cultivators in the monitoring center, even the 2400 competitors in the hall outside all paid attention to Li Yao’s existence at this moment.

Despite the majority of the Blue Team charging through and slaughtering all around the middle section of Devil Flood Dragon Island, the two ambushes situated behind the back lines seemed to spell the arrival of a small change in circumstances.

“Who is this fellow!? He’s actually this awesome!? He took out seven Blue Team competitors in succession!”

“Something’s fishy here. It looked like the seven Blue Team members went somewhat retarded. They simply extended their necks, waiting to be killed. Can it be that this fellow is an expert in mental illusionary attacks? That he launched mental attacks against his opponents?”

“I know why. This fellow is from my school. His name is Li Yao. Although he looks ordinary and mediocre from the outside, in fact he’s actually a super ferocious person. Even Helian Lie can’t do anything to him!”

“He’s this amazing? Then I really need to pay good attention to him!”

Helian Lie had quite the fame in Floating Spear City and even in the surrounding few cities and towns. In this Limit Challenge Competition, his points ranking was always within the top 10. He was a renowned expert.

To be considered Helian Lie’s opponent, it was clear that Li Yao was not your typical sort of person.

“Ah! Again! He slaughtered a third scout group. These fellows are really too retarded. Come on and fight back! What are you all frozen for!? Are you waiting to be killed?”

“Hey you guys, do you think that this kid will continue slaughtering everything in his path? Will he bring forth a gargantuan counter attack?”

“That’s impossible. When teams face off, a single person alone is not enough. The Blue Team has the commander genius Gao Ye. They’ve already hold great influence. They won’t be rocked that easily. You guys look. Gao Ye has noticed that something’s off. He’ll make a response soon!”

The contents of the Red and Blue Teams’ communication channels were shown in real time on the hologram, so these retired competitors were also able to see the commander tactics of Gao Ye.

Gao Ye discovered that it has been a long time since he was able to contact the backline scouts in the communication channel. He determined that there was a valiant Red Team squad or a powerful Demon Beast behind the Blue Team’s backlines.

He commanded the majority of his army to cease attacking on the spot. He ordered them to be on alert and be on standby.

At the same time, he ordered the eight strongest combat units to combine by twos, to form a new scout group, and to completely sweep the backline for the fish that escaped the net.

“Everyone must be on high alert. Don’t let this temporary victory get to your heads. Until we completely annihilate the last of the Red Team, there’s still a chance of them making a comeback! Right now, there’s most surely a great enemy within our backlines. We must understand clearly what we’re dealing with. Let’s first eliminate this big enemy before we steamroll over the defeated enemy to the front!”

Gao Ye made his decisions quickly. His voice was calm and unhurried. He had quite the bearing of a general!

His tactics were quickly shown to be effective.

After annihilating the last scout group roaming around the north side of Devil Flood Dragon Island, Li Yao became tangled with a new scout group!

This scout group was formed from seven competitors. Each of them was as tall as an bull and as large as a horse. Their eyes were filled with vigor and energy. Their temples swelled and bulged. Their actual strength was incomparably powerful and daunting.

And leading the group was Li Yao’s acquaintance… Helian Lie!





Home  Forty Millenniums of Cultivation  Chapter 61
 

Chapter 61
 
Chapter 61: Where’s Li Yao
Translator: Strivon, Ash  Editor: Geoffrey_, Lancent

“Fellow Student Li Yao, Devil Flood Dragon Island is quite a large place. I never thought we enemies would meet face to face!”


At first, Helian Lie was stunned. But soon after, the muscles on his face twisted gradually into an evil grin.

“He’s a classmate of yours? How’s his actual strength?” The several Blue Team competitors did not dare to be careless. They adopted defensive stances and had asked filled with caution.

“His actual strength is very powerful!”

Helian Lie gritted his teeth in acknowledgment. “Not only is his strength very powerful, his methods are underhanded and despicable. He’s shameless and vulgar. He’ll do anything for victory. He’ll go to any length. He’s the most fearsome of opponents!”

“No wonder he was able to kill four of our scout groups in succession on his own. Everyone needs to be careful dealing with him. I don’t want to give him a shred of an opportunity!”

The seven Blue Team competitors raised their awareness to the max. One of them retreated to contact teammates in the area.

“Helian Lie, Devil Flood Dragon Island is quite large, yet it is also quite small… This sentence shall also be said by me to you. There really is some animosity between us. If you still consider yourself a man, come fight me one on one. Let’s settle this once and for all!”

Li Yao’s pair of hands crossed, pulled out the black Progressive Daggers, and licked the corner of his mouth.

Helian Lie laughed involuntarily. His expression was actually tranquil. He spoke unhurriedly yet not slowly, “Li Yao, you don’t have to goad me. I won’t be fooled. Right now, we’re in a competition. In accordance with the rules, I will use my greater numbers to bully your few. It will be several dozen versus one! If you want a duel, I will honor it anytime after the competition!”

“That’s fine! Just you wait!”

boxn ovel. c0m
After speaking viciously, Li Yao blinked his eyes and jumped lightly back. Like a large ape, he leapt into the undergrowth and faded away without a trace.

He actually ran away!

Helian Lie and company were stupefied for a moment. They never thought that this kid would, in a blink of an eye, actually slip away faster than a mud fish after speaking such righteous and revering words.

Helian Lie suddenly grew angry. He felt that he had been toyed with savagely by Li Yao. His handsome face swelled deep red. He stepped forward, seeking to give chase. But Gao Ye’s voice sounded from the communication channel, “Helian Lie! Pay him no mind! The opponent’s goal is to infuriate you! To break your formation! Then, he will attack you one by one… Don’t be fooled by all means!”

Contained in Gao Ye’s voice was an indescribable authoritative power. Even the wild and unruly Helian Lie had his raging fury suppressed. Helian Lie took a deep breath and spoke through gritted teeth, “Gao Ye, what you said is absolutely correct. What do we do now?”

It took a moment before Gao Ye’s voice sounded out. It seemed that he had gone through some meticulous calculations. “Helian Lie, this person is your classmate. In the end, how is his actual strength?”

Helian Lie hesitated before speaking, “A month ago, he was just a piece of trash with mediocre strength. But through some unknown fortune, he flew ahead boldly in a month’s time. Right now, he should still be beneath me, but the difference is minute. I just don’t know if he’s still concealing some strength or not.”

He paused a moment and continued, “Right, this kid grew up in the garbage dump. His circumstances growing up were extremely complicated. He possesses an extreme abundance of actual combat experience!”

Gao Ye cooly and calmly said: “Okay, let’s assume his actual strength is higher than yours, even to the point of being 1.5 times yours and that he’s an expert in jungle warfare… It’s still impossible for him to slay four of our scout groups in a flash without making a single sound. There is something weird with this matter!”

“According to my calculations, he holds some sort of secret weapon unbeknown to us in his hands!”

“Without first completely understanding his trump card, I do not propose launching an attack on him. That would just be feeding him one by one!”

“Right now, I will command all combat units to raise their alertness, consolidate their defensive lines, and be on standby. As soon as the enemy appears, do not take the initiative to attack. Rely solely on defense and immediately notify combat units in the vicinity!”

“As for Helian Lie. return with your scout group back to the command center immediately. I want to know all the data and information on this Li Yao and analyze what ‘cards’ he’s been holding in the end!”

“Okay! Let’s let him run wild for a while then!”

Helian Lie did not hesitate for even half a moment. He led his scout group and left in a hurry. After going through half an hour of trekking, he returned to the Blue Team’s command center set up within the forest in the center of Devil Flood Dragon Island.

Half an hour later.

A male with a somewhat short stature and a pair of eyes burning with life that constantly radiated light sat cross-legged on the ground. Looking lost in thought, he pounded a tree stump.

He was the commander genius, Gao Ye.

“Gao Ye, according to all my information, as well as the traces of battle we surveyed, what kind of judgment can you produce?” Helian Lie asked somewhat flippantly and hot-tempered.

Gao Ye’s eyelids closed a moment. A glow of energy glistened in his eyes. He was like a crystal processor operating at its maximum computational capabilities.

A moment later, he spoke perfectly composed, “The problem should stem from the Artifacts. The enemy is an Artificing expert. The artifacts we possess are all crafted by him. He must have installed a backdoor in them… This is a very common technique used in the battlefield. I never thought this would actually appear among common folk. This Li Yao… is really amazing!”

“It’s the Artifacts?”

Helian Lie was stunned for a moment, then he promptly tossed the Chainsword in his hand to the side, like he was shaking off a viper.

Gao Ye chuckled and spoke unperturbed, “You don’t need to be so anxious. According to my calculations, this type of backdoor doesn’t have too much killing potential. At most, it can make someone locked and rigid for a split second. Its effective range is also not that large. It can’t be controlled remotely from long range.”

Pausing for a moment, the energetic glow in Gao Ye’s eyes blossomed. “We don’t need to have all our people relinquish their weapons. We just need to choose a few elite troops to carry ordinary swords and form a small hunting squad. They will hunt down Li Yao… After he’s been slain, then we can use Artifacts without worry!”

Helian Lie frowned. “Then, we must have sufficient numbers. Too few would be suicide.”

Gao Ye nodded his head. “Relax. I won’t underestimate any opponent, especially someone as fearsome as this. I will specifically plan some tactics to hunt him. Not a hair of detail will be missed!”

Helian Lie pressed, “Gao Ye, according to your analysis, where is he hiding now?”

“Let me calculate for a moment!”

Gao Ye closed his eyes. His eyeballs trembled at high speeds beneath his eyelids.

Thirty seconds later, he suddenly opened his eyes and muttered, “I’ve analyzed with a 47% probability that Li Yao is concealing himself in the swamp region on the north side of Devil Flood Dragon Island. That area is covered with sludge and marsh. It’s disadvantageous for a large army to advance there. It’s the greatest place for guerilla warfare!”

“Other than that, there’s a 33% probability that he’s already passed through our defensive lines to return to the Red Team’s army on the south side of Devil Flood Dragon Island!”

“There’s still a 19% probability that he’s concealed himself in the large waterfalls on the west side of Devil Flood Dragon Island. He’s prepared himself to remain concealed all the way until the end of the competition, to rely on the points he had accumulated in the early stages, and obtain a decent ranking!”

“Finally…”

A ripple of astonishment emerged on Gao Ye’s expressionless face, like a clay sculpture suddenly splitting a small crack. “There’s still a 1% probability that he’s right on top of us!”

Before his voice had died away, a pitch-black metal ball dropped suddenly from the branches over his head. “Bang!” A ball of flame more dazzling than the sun suddenly exploded!

Everyone’s vision suddenly turned to boundless whiteness. They were completely unable to see anything!

“It’s a Flash Glyph Array!” someone shrieked miserably, covering his eyes.

At practically the same time, a gale of wind blasted from the skies. An unstoppable force headed straight for Helian Lie.

“Helian Lie, your life is mine!” Li Yao hissed and his daggers transformed into two black streaks of lightning!





Home  Forty Millenniums of Cultivation  Chapter 62
 

Chapter 62
 
Chapter 62: One Move Ahead
Translator: Strivon, Ash  Editor: Geoffrey_, Lancent

“Don’t be fooled! I’m his true target! It’s absolutely not Helian Lie!”


Gao Ye shrieked. His short figure curled up into a ball and rolled backwards on the ground in a completely sorry manner.

Upon hearing Gao Ye shriek, several large and strong Blue Team competitors immediately threw themselves towards him, disregarding their own safety.

Gao Ye had long since calculated the possibility of the Red Team executing the “Beheading Tactic”, thus he had his teammates practice Anti-Beheading Tactics since the start.

In less than half a second, a sturdy and robust meat wall appeared in front of Gao Ye. Seven to eight ordinary blades danced vigorously, crisscrossing to form an unstoppable blade formation!

And sure enough, Li Yao had stopped and changed directions in an utterly strange fashion while in the air, as if he had fiercely stomped on a transparent wall of air to throw himself towards Gao Ye, ignoring Helian Lie.

It seemed like Li Yao did not foresee Gao Ye reacting so quickly. He suddenly crashed into the blade formation!

Fortunately, the Blue Team competitors had yet to recover from their dazed state caused by the Flash Glyph Array. Their visions were blurred and unclear, and all they heard were “Ding Ding Dang Dang” sounds of colliding swords. Li Yao shouted a blood-curdling shriek and threw himself back into the forest to fade away without a trace.

He left behind only a sentence: “Just y’all wait. I’ll be back!”

Three seconds later, every Blue Team competitor recovered from their dazed state. Each of them had deathly pale faces, were sweating like pigs, and looked at each other in dismay. They all saw panic in the depths of each other’s eyes.

“What a fearsome fellow. He actually tailed us without making a single noise and infiltrated our command center, all without being discovered!”

boxn ovel. c0m
A Blue Team scout member had spoken traumatized. He could not hold back from looking at the crisscrossing branches above, as if Li Yao was still concealing himself in the darkness amidst the branches.

“However, he’s still no match for Gao Ye. In the instant, he threw out the Flash Glyph Array, we all thought his target was Helian Lie. Only Gao Ye still maintained a clear head, forcing Li Yao to fail in the end. Gao Ye, you sure are a natural commander!”

A different male had spoken cheerfully.

Gao Ye’s expression was incomparable grave as he spoke, “This is an extremely formidable opponent. He does not possess as strong computational abilities as I do, but he possesses a certain innate beast-like keen intuition. He knew for certain the difference between himself and Helian Lie. He knew that even an ambush may not have instantly killed Helian Lie!”

“What’s more…Although Helian Lie possesses tyrannical combat strength, he is not someone who is key for determining victory and defeat. Even if he slays Helian Lie, he would be beheaded from the competition a second later by our numerous blades. It would have been a mutual defeat between him and Helian Lie!”

“This… was something he absolutely did not want to happen!”

“I’m different, however. I follow the road of admin-type cultivators and my expertise lies in my computational and analyzing abilities. My combat strength is ordinary and mediocre. It would be very likely for him to slay me in a single blow!”

“And once I’m out of the competition, the Blue Team would be reduced to a sheet of loose sand. Chaos would emerge for certain shortly. If the Red Team was able to seize this opportunity, they may have been able to turn the tides!”

“This fellow figured this out, so he purposely used Helian Lie as his pretense. He made it appear that there were personal grudges between him and Helian Lie on the surface, so he recklessly tailed behind to settle things. Actually, his true target had been me from the start!”

“Even more, I truly doubt this was all deliberately planned from the time when we first found him. I’m certain that once he first discovered Helian Lie from the shadows, he took the initiative to show himself for the sake of discovering the location of our Command Center!”

“Formidable! This fellow is way too formidable! If it weren’t for my computational abilities computing a move ahead, finding out his plan in the last minute, he might have successfully pulled this off!”

Gao Ye had spoken with lingering fear. His forehead was drenched with sweat.

“However, he’s still no match for you, Gao Ye. The layers of tricks that he schemed with all his might were all seen through by you. He’s already lost the initiative. Now, we’re the hunters and he’s the prey!” a Blue Team competitor had shouted with excitement.

Gao Ye forced a laugh and spoke, “That’s true. Today, things have gone this way, but our comprehensive strengths are still on par with each other. Today, I was just lucky. If it were another battlefield, I can’t say for sure whether he would successfully slay me or not.”

Helian Lie remained silent and unspeaking to the side. Shame and anger were mixed in his heart; he felt the greatest humiliation and disgrace!

Li Yao’s target from the start hadn’t been him all along!

Li Yao absolutely did not pay a single ounce of attention to him. Li Yao only took him to be a pretense — to be bait!

Only Li Yao and Gao Ye were the opposing striving players in this chess match. He was nothing more than a mere chess piece being controlled!

Even if Li Yao was no match for Gao Ye, Li Yao still exceeded Helian Lie, a chess piece, by leaps and bounds. If Gao Ye had not laid things out clearly, he would have absolutely been unable to guess what Li Yao’s plot was. Just then, he even retardedly adopted the tightest defensive stance!

It was as if Li Yao had ruthlessly slapped the proud and arrogant Helian Lie across the face. Helian Lie’s anger caused his eyes to turn bloodshot and his teeth to clench tightly. He wished with all his hate to tear and consume Li Yao’s bloody flesh bite by bite.

Through gritted teeth in anger, his voice hoarsely sounded, “Gao Ye, then what are you waiting for!? Let’s mobilize ASAP! And hunt down Li Yao!”

“WAIT!”

Gao Ye’s entire face was entwined in a complicated knot. He looked as if he was considering every angle. He muttered, “Strange. I’ve factored in every detail in my calculations. I also succeeded in fending off his attack. Why do I still feel restless? It’s like I missed something… WHAT’S THAT!?”

Gao Ye’s expression changed and he pointed to a military pack amidst the center of everyone, letting out a shriek.

This military pack’s surface was smeared all over with mud, and even a few weeds and moss. It had been casually tossed in the core area of the command center.

It was like a rock at first glance. None had noticed when this pack had appeared.

“How is there a pack? Whose is it?”

All the Blue Team competitors were at a loss. They looked at each other with dismay. It seemed that none of them had ever carried a pack such as this.

In the eyes of Gao Ye, this commonly found pack transformed into a large demon egg, as if an incomparable fearsome existence was about to break through the cocoon and burst forth. Gao Ye’s face warped and he shrieked, “Do you all still remember when dealing with Li Yao? He would hold an explosive device composed of over twenty crystal cells connected in series. He would say its might is tremendous, enough to flatten an entire supply point, and he would threaten us with mutual destruction.”

When these words were spoken, everyone’s faces underwent enormous changes. They all remembered!

“We’re f*cked!”

Gao Ye’s, Helian Lie’s, and several dozen Blue Team competitor’s pupils shrank simultaneously to their minimum!

500 meters away in the forest.

Li Yao had his back leaning against a large tree. He stood unmovingly and extended 10 fingers. One by one, they bent down: “9… 8… 7… 6… ”

“Who is it!?”

Two Blue Team competitors had suddenly emerged from the forest. They never thought a Red Team competitor would actually appear in a location so close to their command center. They could not help but be shocked.

Li Yao glanced an eye at them faintly and didn’t reply. He continued being engrossed in his countdown: “5… 4…”

“There’s something weird with this fellow. I think he’s that Li Yao that the communication channel was talking about just now. Let’s quickly drop our artifacts, use ordinary weapons instead, and notify the command center!”

The two Blue Team competitors were on high alert as they maintained a distance of 10 meters between themselves and Li Yao. They gave not a hair of opportunity to Li Yao.

Li Yao continued as before doing what he was doing. He counted down leisurely: “3… 2… 1!”

When the number “1” was spoken from his mouth, a loud earth-shaking rumbling boom exploded 560 meters behind him in the forest!

The entire forest shook and swayed, and a large gigantic white mushroom cloud gradually rose. A surging heatwave rolled and spread at high speeds, soon reaching out over 500 meters.

The two Blue Team competitors’ pupils were captured by this mushroom cloud. The hair on their heads was roasted and scorched by the heatwave. Broken branches and crushed rock were mixed in the shockwave, cleaving onto their craniums and smashing onto their bodies!

In a flash, the two were stunned and covered in dirt and grime, becoming like two clay statues.

Static came from the communication channel. Not a single person was still capable of answering their shouts.

“What… What the hell did you do?” The two Blue Team competitors could not hold back from trembling.

“I’m terribly sorry. From now on, the Blue Team’s Command Center no longer exists.”

Li Yao slowly took out his black daggers and walked over to the two Blue Team competitors with a smile.





Home  Forty Millenniums of Cultivation  Chapter 63
 

Chapter 63
 
Chapter 63: Slaughtering Everything In Their Paths!
Translator: Strivon, Ash  Editor: Geoffrey_, Lancent

Over a hundred competitors were still noisy and in disorder within the Red Team’s communication channel. Each of them vented at, insulted, and complained at each other; it was extremely chaotic just like the clamoring noise of a market.


The sound of the giant explosion coming from the center of Devil Flood Dragon Island intimidated them all simultaneously into silence. No one spoke a word for a long time.

Only after a long time had passed did a lazy-sounding voice sound out.

“I’ve already ‘beheaded’ the Blue Team’s commander. The entire command center has been bombarded to the skies! Right now, they’re like a flock of dragons without a leader. It’s a great opportunity!”

“What y’all must do next is very simple. You don’t need to assemble, don’t need to form squads, don’t need to cooperate. All you need to do is tear your throat screaming the words ‘Gao Ye’s dead! The Red Team shall prevail!’ Scream as if you’re a pig about to be slaughtered. Then, wave your giant swords crazily and slaughter all in your path. And that will be fine. Understand, everyone?”

“Who are you? Why should we believe your words!?” it was silent for a moment until someone who was unconvinced had spoken.

“It’s up to you if you want to believe me. Anyways, I’m going to go mow some grass. Everyone, do as you please~ It’s best if you just stay where you’re at and not move. Let me take all the points alone. Hahahaha. Gao Ye’s dead! The Red Team shall prevail! Die Die Die Die Die Die Die Die!”

A pig-slaughtering howl came from the communication channel. From the incomparably arrogant laughter, everyone could imagine this certain fellow heaving a Chainsword to go around chopping down people in a mad slaughter, harvesting all the “heads” he wishes.

“Look, the opposing Blue Team is acting a bit strangely. They haven’t made a movement in a while. It’s like they’ve gone retarded!”

Two Red Team competitors whispered in each others’ ear at the corner of Devil Flood Dragon Island.

“Damn it! It’ll be a dead end if we keep being suppressed like this as the battle goes on!! F*ck it! Gao Ye’s Dead! The Red Team shall prevail!”

boxn ovel. c0m
Two Red Team competitors hardened their hearts. They heaved their giant swords and charged over like hungry wolves throwing themselves at lambs. They blazed and collided with the Blue Team’s combat unit!

“Gao Ye’s Dead! The Red Team shall prevail!”

“Gao Ye’s Dead! The Red Team shall prevail!”

“Gao Ye’s Dead! The Red Team shall prevail!”

Berserk battle howls rang simultaneously from far and near on Devil Flood Dragon Island.

The Blue Team competitors just found out the news of the instant annihilation of their entire command center by the enemy through their communication channel. They were shocked into panic from this astonishing news and were caught off guard by the crazed assault of the devils and fiends that are the Red Team competitors. Their ears were filled with the Red Team’s hellish demonic howls. They were completely unable to bring forth the least bit of intention to fight!

At first, the scales of victory were completely slanted towards the Blue Team. No one ever thought that Li Yao would take this scale and kick it to crap. The remaining Blue Team and Red Team competitors all sank into the ugliest, the most entangled, the most pestering of chaotic melees.

And relying on their high morale and excitement from this miraculous reversal, the Red Team actually began to hold the upper hand!

On the Distant Expanse, both inside and outside of the monitoring center was absolute silence. Everyone was dumbstruck. They were all completely shocked from the brilliant performance that Li Yao had demonstrated just an hour ago.

In the beginning, he had killed four scout groups of the Blue Team in succession. Then, he purposely showed himself in front of the new Blue Team scout group. Then, he tailed Helian Lie and company, infiltrating the Blue Team’s command center in utmost secrecy. And he even laid in wait in the command center in the branches above for an entire half an hour. Lastly, he continued with two consecutive attacks to distract all the Blue Team members’ attention. Upon success, he set up the explosive pack inside the Blue Team’s command center. After he safely evacuated the area, he blew the Blue Team’s entire command center up in the sky.

This was absolutely a brilliant, outstanding, smooth, textbook-like, and classic “Beheading Operation”!’

And from initial planning to actual execution, it was all actually done solely by Li Yao!

“Swoosh swoosh swoosh swoosh!”

Several dozen names suddenly faded from the ranking board, and Li Yao’s name was rising like crazy! Moving like a hurricane!

This was due to the sudden “explosive death” of several dozen Blue Team commanders and powerful members. An astronomical number of points had rushed to Li Yao. He directly blitzkrieged his way through to the number one ranking like a hot knife through butter. And his total points was actually over ten times greater than that of second place!

In the history of the Limit Challenge Competition, this was an unprecedented high score!

“Amazing. He’s too amazing! Let’s just focus on the efforts he made to increase the explosive power of his bomb. He filled the pack with rocks, metal artifact parts, and sharp Demon Beast bones to increase the power of the bomb by ten times! This is absolutely something an experienced military veteran would do! Our Federation’s First Military College will want talent as great as this! Who dares fight over him with us!?”

After a short few seconds of reticence, a straightforward howl had broken the silence in the monitoring center. Soon, every scout was discussing lively and bellowing simultaneously.

“On what grounds? This kind of genius should belong to our Star Nebula University!”

“Our Empyrean Capital School of Medicine also needs this type of young talent. I’ve already prepared a special enrollment for him. Your move!”

“Hmph! Special enrollment is nothing special. Our Star Nebula University can offer him an enormous scholarship in addition!”

Countless cultivators had flushed red faces and ears from vying for Li Yao. The scene was fiery to the extreme.

Only Xie Tingxian was smiling without a word in the corner, keeping a cool head in this tense situation. He held a victory contract calmly in his hands.

And sitting not too far away from him was Ding Lingdang firmly biting her lip. She walked to and fro fretfully and worried. She was like a bound female dragon that could erupt in flames at any moment,

“This kid. Why the hell is he bringing out such an outstanding performance? It’s over It’s over. With this many schools wanting to give him special enrollment, this kid certainly won’t choose our Grand Desolate War Institution! Can it be that I need to knock him out and directly carry him back to Grand Desolate?”

Ding Lingdang frowned and thought seriously for a second. Then she shook her head, rejecting this plan. “I can’t. With my fist being this powerful, what if I kill him with a single punch?”

In the hallway outside the monitoring center, Li Yao’s gorgeous performance set off even more stormy waves.

It seemed as if all the youths were shocked to the max. Quite a few of them rubbed their eyes with force. They did not dare to believe everything they’ve seen. Some people even let out strange cries.

“Mother of god! One person flattened the entire Blue Team’s command center? Isn’t this way too abnormal?”

“An evildoer. He’s one hundred percent an evildoer. He’s really way too dreadful!”

“Where did this monster come from? Floating Spear City? I’ve never heard of such an expert in Floating Spear City. I’ve only heard of Helian Lie and a Zheng Dongming. I never thought that even Helian Lie wasn’t able to withstand him and was directly screwed!”

“What a fearsome fellow. He must have come from some cultivator family. Compared to us ordinary rich and powerful kids, we’re not of the same world! We’re no match for him!”

Right when these competitors were wagging their tongues spiritedly, the ejected competitors of the Blue Team command center members who had just been blown to “death” by Li Yao also returned to the Distant Expanse. They entered the spectator area with faces filled with bewilderment.

Suddenly, they were surrounded in an impenetrable circle by the two thousand competitors.

In an instant, they, especially Gao Ye and Helian Lie, turned into the focus of attention of a great many people.

“Gao Ye, you’ve always been the pride of our East Harmony City. Everyone knows you to be a commander genius. I never thought you would actually be toyed with and be ‘beheaded’ by the enemy. You okay? How do you feel?” a person asked from within a crowd in a voice dripping with sarcasm.

Gao Ye faintly chuckled. Not even a trace of the prior defeat remained on his face. He spoke calmly and peacefully, “It’s really pleasant. Really. To be able to meet such an amazing opponent who made me realize that my own commander skills are too infantile. To know that I still have great room for improvement. If we encounter each other next time, I certainly won’t make the same mistake. I will absolutely hunt this Li Yao immediately!”

He paused a bit and looked around him in a circle. Gao Ye’s eyes finally focused on Li Yao’s figure within the giant hologram. He observed Li Yao for a long time before he spoke with complete seriousness, “However, I wish even more to fight side-to-side with Li Yao on the battlefield against Demon Beasts. I even can create several dozen different tactics with him being the core. I am confident that as long as we work together, with my commander abilities combined with his individual combat capability… Needless to say of high-level Demon Beasts, even if it’s the King of the Demon Race… Those powerful Demon Generals, Demon Kings, and even Demon Gods… They won’t be able to escape the palm of our hand!”





Home  Forty Millenniums of Cultivation  Chapter 64
 

Chapter 64
 
Chapter 64: A Torrential Storm Shower
Translator: Strivon, Ash  Editor: Geoffrey_, Lancent

Gao Ye was filled with the bearing of a general as he expressed himself, drawing quite a few students, especially the girls, to exclaim in admiration.

However, another fellow who desired to stir up trouble was disappointed by Gao Ye’s speech. His eyes turned, and he started to go after Helian Lie.

“Helian Lie, I’ve heard you and Li Yao are of the same school and that you have some personal beef with each other. Can you speak in detail what that’s all about?”

The majority of competitors were from the surrounding cities of Floating Spear City. They had no scruples about teasing Helian Lie. Onlookers would never be afraid of escalating the chaos. So there wasn’t much respect in the fellow’s words. Instead, he was doing the utmost to provoke Helian Lie.

Helian Lie’s face changed to white. His teeth were gritting deeply into his lips. His two fists were clenched rigidly tight. He felt indignant to the extreme!

He was silent for a good while before he squeezed out a stiff smile. He spoke reluctantly, “Li Yao and I previously had some misunderstanding; however, we’ve long since settled things. Li Yao has improved at lightning speed over the past month. He’s the pride of our Crimson Nimbus Second. I very much admire his efforts. Any personal grudges are simply complete nonsense! Apologies, please let me through. I need to go to the restroom.”

Without waiting for additional questions, Helian Lie pushed his way through the crowd of competitors. He seemed to be escaping, jogging his way to the restroom.

“UGH!”

Helian Lie could not hold himself up any longer in the stall. His stomach was overturning in a mess, causing him to vomit with large mouthfuls. He vomited until he was dizzy; it was as if he had vomited every last drop of stomach acid.

“Li Yao!”

Helian Lie lifted his head. His eyes were red from vomiting for a long time. His entire self looked to be haggard, withered, and crazed. He looked like a malevolent demon.

boxn ovel. c0m
“Li Yao, you piece of trash! You entrail waste! You better not give me a chance. Not even a hair’s worth of opportunity! When I get the chance, I won’t let you go. I will absolutely use all my resources to play with you till you die! Till you die!”

Helian Lie’s pair of hands dug into the wall of the restroom. He clawed powerfully, tearing the wall. He was imagining the wall to be Li Yao’s laughing face.

10 deep notches were dug out in the metal wall by him. Each notch flowed with crazed fresh blood!

……

The Li Yao who had just been bitterly cursed by Helian Lie was comfortably concealed in a supply point in the depths of Devil Flood Dragon Island.

He was checking his total points through Small Ji’s hologram.

He was firmly holding the top ranking position ever since the moment he blasted the Blue Team’s command center to the skies. It was impossible for his position to be rattled, save for the sudden sinking of Devil Flood Dragon Island!

To be honest, at the very beginning when Li Yao opened the backdoor on his artifacts, he did not think this far and profoundly. All he wanted was to seize and earn some convenient points.

But what followed was the emergence of the Blue Team’s genius commander, Gao Ye, and the Red Team was forced to a dead end in an instant. Desperate times calls for desperate measures, and so Li Yao was forced to go all in.

This Beheading Operation carried with it the highest level of risk. Luck had a huge role to play. It was a staggering risky gamble.

In order to preserve his own safety, the explosion of the crystal cell bomb was delayed by half a minute. If the opponents had discovered the bomb immediately, they would have time to throw the bomb far far away.

All that could be said was that luck stood by his side. Even the heavens gave him a helping hand. He was destined to enter Deep Sea University!

Li Yao was not pressed to go out and slay Demon Beasts since he has earned sufficient points. The remaining surviving competitors were few in number. The entire Devil Flood Dragon Island had transformed into a Demon Beast paradise. Quite a few Demon Beasts possessed strength at a super high, tyrannical level. Even Li Yao wasn’t sure if he was capable of slaying them.

He did not want to fail at the critical juncture, to capsize at a sure moment, to “die” at the hands of a Demon beast.

In addition… A torrential storm shower was coming.

Li Yao lifted his head and looked far into the distance. The hazy yellow sky had turned jet-black before he knew it. Purple snakes could be faintly seen struggling in the rolling black clouds, exploding out with muffled thunder.

Soon, bean-sized droplets of water hacked down in a skull-cleaving manner.

The weather above the sea changed in a flash. The clear and boundless sky had already changed to a stormy world with torrential downpours in just the blink of an eye. Black clouds rolled across the entirety of Devil Flood Dragon Island, like a myriad of black horses galloping onward. Boundless strikes of lightning tore through heaven and earth, shrieking with demonic wails. Together, they wreaked havoc with the ocean wind, appearing like a great number of swords ferociously pounding into Devil Flood Dragon Island.

Even though the sky-towering trees obstructed the weather, Devil Flood Dragon Island still experienced dark winds and angry howls. The torrential rain came down like a waterfall, beating down on people, causing them to be unable to lift their heads and open their eyes. Even the large thick trees were pulled from their roots. They blew chaotically towards the distance, sweeping away everything in their paths.

In the face of the powerful majestic might of nature, the Demon Beasts who had been baring their fangs and brandishing their claws turned tranquil. One by one, they searched for caves and slits in cliffs to hide from the weather.

“A violent storm just happened to pass through the skies of Devil Flood Dragon Island. I reckon this torrential rainstorm will last the entire night!”

The torrential storm caused the Distant Expanse to faintly rock and sway in the air. A cultivator levitated at the rear of the ship. He squinted his eyes and observed the skies, reaching a conclusion.

A bolt of lightning cleaved towards his skull. The bolt of lightning was stopped by an invisible wall an inch away from the cultivator and was transformed into 4~5 lightning serpents that coiled around his body, illuminating a rather handsome face.

The sky patrolling cultivators were having a hard time covering every nook and corner of Devil Flood Dragon Island under such berserk weather.

Additionally, the Puji Critters assigned to each competitor relied on connections between their crystal chips and the Distance Expanse. The telepathic link became unstable, and it was no longer guaranteed that each competitor’s situation was promptly monitored and that the protective gel would be spouted in fatal crisis.

The danger of the competition had increased greatly!

“Do we need to suspend the competition?”

As soon as this cultivator opened his mouth, the electric currents coiling around his body were consumed with a single bite. He licked his mouth as if wishing for more and returned at lightning speeds to the Distant Expanse towards the numerous cultivators to ask.

In the monitoring center, cultivators were whispering in each others’ ears for a moment before making a decision. The competition will continue as usual. The torrential rain would not affect the competition.

“In an actual battlefield, it is highly improbable for Demon Beasts to call an armistice with humanity over bad weather!”

A great officer dressed in black with a skull emblem on his shoulders had spoken icily with a face of steel.

“Correct. If they can’t withstand such a small torrential storm, how could they still want to be cultivators? Simply laughable!” a cultivator with a cross scar on his face sneered coldly.

While they were talking, twisted ripples and snowflake patterns formed on the giant hologram in front of their eyes.

This was the interference from the rainstorm affecting the connection between the Puji Critters and the monitoring center.

“Bang! Bang!”

A dozen or so holograms directly turned black. It was clear that the telepathic link had been severed.

This meant that a dozen or so competitors were no longer being monitored and were no longer protected.

“Dispatch twenty more cultivators to Devil Flood Dragon Island. Patrol in rounds. Ensure the safety of the competitors. Give them status equal to deceased Federal Army soldiers should any accidents occur and give their families reparations!”

The cultivators and officers negotiated for a while. Soon the made a decision…. This was inline with previous Challenge Competitions.

The Star Glory Federation was capable of occupying the most fertile land of the Heaven’s Origin Sector. This land was created from a slaying a myriad of Demon Beasts into mountains of corpses and seas of blood. Every inch of the Federation’s territory was dyed red with the blood of Federal Army soldiers and Cultivators!

Cultivators were the blades of human civilization. Those that wish to become cultivators must have a dying will and an utterly fearless sacrificial conscious!

Those who fear death won’t become cultivators!





Home  Forty Millenniums of Cultivation  Chapter 65
 

Chapter 65
 
Chapter 65: Ghost Dragon-7
Translator: Strivon, Ash  Editor: Geoffrey_, Lancent

The torrential rain came down harder and harder. It was as if all the rain in the entirety of the Heaven’s Origin Sector had concentrated overhead of Devil Flood Dragon Island, trying to smash this island of Demon Beasts completely into the ocean depths.


In the midst of the raging storm and torrential rain, a strange darkness began to flourish.

“*Pant *Pant. *Pant *Pant!”

A Blue Team competitor stumbled as he rushed into a narrow cave. He was kneeling on the ground, no longer capable of supporting himself. Then, he fell flat on his face. His face was deathly pale, lacking even an ounce of blood. His entire body was shuddering as if he was cramping.

An hour ago, he was being chased by three Red Team competitors. Fortunately, the torrential rain obscured the vision of these enemies, so he was luckily able to escape their encirclement.

However, the Red Team competitors were increasing in number. He didn’t know how much longer he would be able to last.

“DAMN! We were clearly about to win! How can things change so suddenly!?”

The pain of this Blue Team Competitor caused him to smash against the rock wall. He was extremely depressed. A dark glow began to congeal in the depths of his eyes.

He observed his surroundings from within the cavern. Squinting his eyes, he looked up towards the sky.

His Puji Critter was like a headless fly, orbiting chaotically around a large tree. It let out “Tszz Tszz” sounds as if it were out of control.

“The torrential rain and thunder both will interfere with the control crystal chip of the Puji Critter. Right now, my Puji Critter and the Distant Expanse have already lost connection. Things have sunk into a chaotic and crazy state. The monitoring center won’t be able to see anything I do!”

boxn ovel. c0m
The darkness in the eyes of this Blue Team competitor turned denser and denser.

The sounds of the Red Team competitors pierced faintly from all directions. Their encirclement was gradually shrinking. Soon, they would arrive at his hiding cave.

The darkness in the Blue Team competitor’s eyes turned malevolent.

He reached out his hand and bit through the skin of his fingertip. He used his fresh blood to draw an Arcane Glyph on the inside of his right leg.

A physical laceration of pain pierced from the inside of his right leg. It was like something wanted to tear through his bloody flesh and escape out of his body!

“Ughh…”

The Blue Team competitor gritted tenaciously. Immediately, the Arcane Glyph trembled slightly. A monstrous strength tore through the muscles of his inner thigh and a fluorescent blue drug floated from within the glyph array!

“I had only wanted to use this as my last resort. I did not want to cheat, but I’m already at an impasse. It was y’all who forced me to do this!”

“When injected into the bloodstream, this Ghost Dragon-7 Doping Drug will strengthen my body, increase my strength to a berserker level, and even strengthen my mental faculties in an instant. It will allow me to unleash one great powerful mental attack that will be enough to completely annihilate these damned hunters. I’ll be able to rush into the top 50 of the rankings!”

The Blue Team competitor had a nasty grin on his face. His expression was incomparably crazed.

Obviously, using Ghost Dragon-7 Doping Drug would have extremely heavy consequences, but when faced with the allure of special enrollment to a university, he was already prepared to ignore them!

He had used his body to block the line of sight of his Puji Critter and produced the synthesis glyph array for the Ghost Dragon-7 Doping Drug. Now, he was about to consume the drug into his body.

A bizarre laughter came from within the depths of the cave. Then, a strong malevolent wind came blowing over!

The Blue Team competitor’s vision turned into complete darkness before he could respond. He was no longer aware of anything!

His Puji Critter finally responded to his strange behavior, immediately spouting out gel. But what it enveloped was just a headless corpse.

Immediately, a monstrous force ferociously tore through the gel jello and a white streak of light shot forth at an incomparable astonishing speed, leaping into the air! A pair of hands seized the Puji Critter and tore with force!

The Puji Critter immediately split in two. It was a bloody scene incomparable!

Within the torrential storm, one out of three Puji Critters lost connection with the monitoring center in succession. This Puji Critter was one of them.

And so, the monitoring center had not discovered this event in time.

Bolts of lightning streaked through the skies, illuminating the dark forest to a snowy white from time to time.

Under the illumination of lightning, an over three-meter tall white ape stood on top of the tree tops. Its face was extremely similar to a human’s face, except for the incomparably enormous yellow devilish eye that grew on its forehead. It seemed to take up approximately half the ape’s face, pushing the two ordinary eyes all the way to the sides.

It’s appearance looked like a mutated fetus; it appeared incomparably eerie and terrifying.

This was a large-eyed ape, a one-out-of-a-thousand mutated form of the three-eyed ape. Not only does it possess outstanding intelligence, the strength of its mental attacks are ten times stronger than that of ordinary three-eyed apes. It was a Demon Beast only released during the finals and was one of the most fearsome Demon Beasts on the entire Devil Flood Dragon Island.

“Ka Ka! Ka Ka!”

In this midst of rolling thunder, the large-eyed ape let out a monstrous laughter. The Ghost Dragon-7 it held in its hairy palms emitted a demonic blue glow.

The enormous yellow eye on the forehead of the large-eyed ape spun in circles. Soon, it figured out how to use the drug, and, without hesitation, it stabbed the Ghost Dragon-7 doping drug into its thick neck. The entirety of the drug was injected into his artery.

“*ROAR, *ROAR *ROAR *ROAR *ROAR!”

A short moment later, the large-eyed ape was unable to restrain himself and shook all over!

Its flesh twitched in a strange fashion and its skin splitted in layers of cracks. The muscles drenched in blood appeared to be growing berserkly at an alarming speed. Even muscle buds began to grown in between its strands of muscle fibers. They continued to entwine, expand, blend, be filled with blood… Causing its build to suddenly erupt to two times its original size. It had turned into an incomparably malevolent ominous beast!

The sole eye on its forehead seemed to have transformed into a frozen blood-red!

“There he is. I found him!”

Right at this moment, the excited cries of Red Team competitors rang from a close distance.

A malevolent smile emerged in the large-eyed ape’s cherub, demonic face under the flash of lightning. It faced towards the source of the cries, shooting off like electricity!

Immediately following came the hysterical shrieks and sounds of bones grinding and fleshing ripping from within the depths of the forest.

……

Ten minutes later.

Li Yao sat cross-legged in a supply point. He was closing his eyes, resting. A chainsword laid on to the left of him and a Thunder Blade laid to the right of him. A Burning Sky Battleaxe was on his back. On his waist were his two black Progressive Daggers hanging in a cross. It could be said that he was fully armed. He could enter into battle mode at any time.

If an ignorant Blue Team competitor would enter this supply point, he would absolutely launch an attack without the slightest hesitation!

“There’s still one more day. It’s been some time since the torrential storm started and it shows no signs of stopping. I’m still first place in the point ranking. Nothing unexpected should occur.”

As Li Yao calculated in his mind, a relaxed smile emerged on his face.

Tremble Deep Sea University! For Li Yao, the Vulture, shall arrive!

Right at this time, his eyelids jolted up. An alarming sense of danger jumped in the depths of his mind.

“There’s something off. There’s the scent of blood in the air! What a dense bloody air!”

A well familiar figure leapt out from within the forest. As it howled like pig being slaughtered, it fled frantically over towards the supply point.

It was actually Zheng Dongming!

Li Yao was dumbstruck… Zheng Dongming was an exceptional expert of Phoenix Ridge Second. Rumor has it that his actual strength was on par with Helian Lie’s. He might even be a bit stronger than Helian Lie!

What could possibly scare Zheng Dongming into looking like he pissed his pants?





Home  Forty Millenniums of Cultivation  Chapter 66
 

Chapter 66
 
Chapter 66: Demonic Blood Cannon
Translator: Strivon, Ash  Editor: Geoffrey_, Lancent

The Zheng Dongming at this time lacked the usual magnificent, elegant demeanor of a young master. He was just like a stray dog with a broken rear leg. He ran gasping for breath and even his tongue was out in the air. He looked to be a few running steps away from frothing at the mouth and going into a seizure!


The moment he saw Li Yao, a ray of hope emerged in his eyes, and he dashed over consumed by joy. His last few steps were like that of a tiger pouncing on a lamb, soaring directly into the supply point!

“What’s wrong? Where’s your Puji Critter?”

Li Yao asked in utter astonishment. Every competitor on Devil Dragon Island would carry a Puji Critter with them. The Puji Critter not only counts points but also provides the means of a final life-saving safeguard!

“It was eaten!”

Zheng Dongming spread out his limbs and was sprawled on his back. He was lying down, his body completely spent. “*Pant *Pant *Pant” he gasped for breath. He looked to be lucky to have a new lease at life.

“It was eaten!? What could possibly be so powerful and fierce!?”

Li Yao was frightened. How could such a vicious Demon Beast exist on Devil Flood Dragon Island? They wouldn’t be taking the lives of competitors seriously if that were the case?

Before Zheng Dongming could respond, an earthshaking roar sounded close by. The explosive noise caused Li Yao’s ears to ring.

Several large trees swayed from side to side following the roar. An old tree simply flew up!

A monster with a height of four meters and lack of skin all over its body, as if it was directly formed from muscles, leapt out. It stomped heavily on the old tree, causing the old tree to snap with a *crack! And the speed of this monster blazed to another level. It crashed recklessly into the supply point.

boxn ovel. c0m
“What the hell is this!?” Li Yao stared flabbergasted.

Small Ji had introduced all Demon Beasts and Demon Plant Life on Devil Flood Dragon Island before the competition began. Li Yao did not recall there being such a tyrannical Demon Beast among them!

How could the organizers of the competition possibly release such a powerful Demon Beast? There’s no way a high school student can withstand this kind of vicious beast!

“D-D-Damned if I know. Be careful. This monster’s already killed seven competitors!” Zheng Dongming let out some astonishing words.

As if confirming his words, the monster ferociously crashed into the surrounding Defensive Glyph Array of the supply point!

Several dozen transparent Attack Arcane Glyphs appeared in the air. They surged with over a hundred currents of electricity and formed into a tight-knit and dazzling electric net, causing the monster to howl and burn with white smoke.

But this monster resisted the currents of this powerful electric assault, pressing onwards step by step!

The Defensive Glyph Array’s radiance flickered indefinitely between brightness and darkness. The electric net could be torn to destruction at any given time! To be smashed into pieces!

“Even the Defensive Glyph Array can’t stop it? Young Master Zheng, what the hell did you do to provoke this monster? To make it want to hunt you until death?”

Li Yao’s scalp was tingling over and over. This monster was really too fearsome. It was something he was absolutely unable to deal with.

“I was just trying to help and stabbed a sword at his butt is all. I didn’t know I would stab into his asshole!” Zheng Dongming sighed as he spoke very helplessly.

Li Yao was speechless for a time. He observed attentively at the faint bloody flesh in between the monster’s buttocks. Indeed, half a chainsword was swaying endlessly there.

The other half of the chainsword had completely entered into the monster’s body. It was a total of a meter deep and that wasn’t enough to kill it. This monster’s vitality is really too strong! Too astonishing!

Li Yao spat out with difficulty as he subconsciously looked back.

“Don’t even think of running. This monster should be based off the large-eyed ape. It will be far faster than us in the forest. We won’t stand a chance! Damn! Where the hell are the cultivators!? It’s been so long and they still haven’t come over to help us. It’s killing us!”

Zheng Dongming half sat up with great effort. He spat a mouthful of fresh blood with a bitter smile on his face.

Li Yao raised his head and glanced above. Small Ji’s pair of eyes lacked consciousness. It spiraled chaotically in the air. Everytime thunder rang out, Small Ji would violently shake and emit “Tszz Tszz” sounds.

Small Ji clearly lost control of its body.

“Damn it! Let alone the cultivators, even the protective gel won’t be spat out. And even if Small Ji could spit out the protective gel, it may not be enough to resist such a ferocious mutant Fiend Beast!”

Li Yao’s expression changed incomparably ugly in an instant.

“*ROAR!”

At this moment, the large-eyed ape howled towards the sky and tore a translucent arcane glyph with its claws!

A clear crack appeared in the electric net and the ape took the opportunity to take a large step through.

“Not good. The Defensive Glyph Array can’t hold it back completely. It can come slaughtering through at any moment!”

Zheng Dongming tottered as he stood up. He glared unwaveringly at the large-eyed ape. He spoke tensely, “Li Yao, I know that you’ve risen like a meteor. You must have had some sort of lucky encounter, so if you have any sort of hidden cards in the depths of your drawer, or if you have a god-like skill that you can use to transform yourself in a flash to increase your combat strength by ten fold and so on… Hurry up and use it! This is a critical moment, Fellow Student Li Yao! This is not the time for you to play as a pig to eat a tiger!”

Li Yao was dumbstruck and was silent for a moment before he coldly said, “I’m terribly sorry. This is already my most powerful state.”

“What? You can’t even transform?”

Zheng Dongming looked at Li Yao with utter disdain. He spoke through gritted teeth, “Fine. Then, only I’ll pull out my finisher!”

Li Yao barely held back from ferociously hitting this fellow in the head. “Since you have a finishing move, why don’t you use it earlier? What are you speaking so much rubbish for!”

Zheng Dongming’s expression turned utterly pained in an instant. His expression was utterly depressed. Through gritted teeth, he spoke, “What do you know? This is my ultimate killing move. It uses the spiritual energy of my lifeblood. It consumes the maximum out of my body when I use it. I would need three months to recover! To endure three months without debauchery!”

“Three months! A whole three months without touching a girl! Damned Demon Beast! I’ll dismember you to ten-thousand pieces and smash you to paste!”

Zheng Dongming’s expression turned incomparably malevolent in an instant. The fiery aura around his body expanded crazed, turning even more wild than that of the large-eyed ape.

He opened his arms and countless blood-red energies fiercely shot out of his pores. They formed over his head into a threatening blood mist.

Zheng Dongming muttered under his breath. He casted seals with his hands at lightning speed. In a flash, he casted over a hundred different hand-seals.

Where the seals were changing continuously, the blood mist above his head also underwent a bizarre transformation. From a chaotic blood mist, it gradually turned into a dragon, a tiger, a panther, a bear, an eagle, and etc. It changed between different forms of beasts of prey. Soon, it turned into a battle-armored warrior wielding a sharp blade. Finally, it became a three-headed-and-six-armed blood deity, breathing mist and blowing clouds!

Zheng Dongming was connected to this blood deity by countless blood strands. The blood mist endlessly absorbed his blood essence from his inner body. His originally rich figure was sucked into a figure as thin as a rake in a short moment. His prized dimbles faded and disappeared, and even his eye sockets became deeply caved. He looked just like a human skeleton.

At this time, the large-eyed ape tore through the final Defensive Arcane Glyph!

A “Bang!” rang in the air. The invisible wall shook and shattered, and the last bolt of electric current faded away without a trace.

The large-eyed ape howled and beat its sternum twice fiercely. It took one large step and faced directly in front of the two people!

Zheng Dongming took a deep deep, deep deep, deep deep deep deep breath.

As he breathed in, the blood deity was breathed into his body. His limbs and skull remained emaciated as before, though his skin inflated greatly like a ball inflated with air. His skin was stretched to transparency. A blood glow surged faintly underneath.

“DEMONIC BLOOD CANNON… AGHHHH!”

Zheng Dongming opened his mouth to the max. It seemed he even dislocated his lower jaw. A blood red mist shot violently from the depths of his throat and transformed into an incomparably ferocious blood pillar, smashing straight into the large-eyed ape’s sternum!

Boom!

Heaven and earth trembled! Li Yao could hear what seemed to be countless vicious beasts howling and spirits shrieking! A transparent hole had actually appeared running through the large-eyed ape’s sternum!

The blood mist possessed extremely powerful corrosive properties. It endlessly corroded the internal organs of the large-eyed ape with strange “Tszzz Tszzz” sounds, emitting an utterly putrid smell.

“Zhii! Zhii!” The large-eyed ape shrieked. It’s cherub face displayed an incomparably painful expression.

“Thump!”

With one attack of the Blood Cannon, Zheng Dongming looked to have spat out half his life force. He fell to the ground, decrepit. He lacked the strength to even get up.

And this doped up large-eyed ape with its strong vitality at the extreme peak, with a chainsword stuck in its ass, with a hole running through its sternum, and with its internal organs corroded by the blood mist, still actually staggered forward. Its long arms flailed wildly, trying to tear Zheng Dongming to shreds in vain!

Li Yao smacked his tongue inwardly. He pointed towards Zheng Dongming and shouted, “Big Bro Ape! We’ve never had grievances nor hatred with each other. The one who stabbed your asshole is him! You guys can slowly resolve things with each other. This brother will go ahead and leave first!”

He actually decided to slip away! To beat it!

“It can’t be! He can’t be this disloyal?”

Zheng Dongming was dumbstruck. He stared helplessly at Li Yao fade away into the forest with his tail between his legs. Zheng Dongming practically spat out another mouthful of blood in madness.

Out of the countless swine companions he made, Li Yao was absolutely the lowest of the bunch! Lower than a dog!

The large-eyed ape cackled with a devilish laughter. It seemed that it had long predicted Li Yao’s desperate escape. It looked down, towering over its prey, and raised its arm that was thicker than Zheng Dongming’s waist high in the air.

“Big Bro, I was wrong. Can you give me another chance?”

Zheng Dongming had a sincere expression all over his face when he saw the large-eyed ape’s cauldron-large fists. He spoke an apology out of the bottom of his heart.

The large-eyed ape sneered. Right when it wished to smash Zheng Dongming’s brain into paste with a fist, its body suddenly went rigid. An orange colored line appeared on his neck.

A flesh burning smell permeated through the air.

The orange line grew longer and longer, thicker and thicker. It crossed the entire neck of the large-eyed ape in a flash.

The large-eyed ape opened its mouth to howl, but it could not make a single sound. It’s body trembled and its huge skull fell to the ground and rolled around randomly. The strong carcass fell kneeling forward, collapsing to the ground!

Zheng Dongming gazed doubtfully behind the large-eyed ape.

Li Yao grasped a Burning Sky Battleaxe in his hands. He was still maintaining his beheading. The palms of his hands were bleeding because he used too much strength. He was drenched all over his body, as if he had just been fished out of a boiling pot of water. It was unknown if this was from rain or from sweat.

“Whew…”

Zheng Dongming let out a sigh of relief. His head was heavily smashed into the muck. He couldn’t even lift his pinky.

“Many thanks! My beloved swine friend!” the emaciated fatso had spoken sincerely.

“I did what I must. Swine friends are still friends.” Li Yao smiled bitterly. He walked slowly towards Zheng Dongming, dragging the Burning Sky Battleaxe.

“So next, you’re going to kill me right?” Zheng Dongming forced a laugh and asked calmly.

“Yep.” Li Yao sighed.





Home  Forty Millenniums of Cultivation  Chapter 67
 

Chapter 67
 
Chapter 67: The Armageddon Rebellion
Translator: Strivon, Ash  Editor: Geoffrey_, Lancent

“This was precisely the reason why I didn’t want to use my transformation. As soon as I transform, everyone will take me for a Demonic Cultivator. They will absolutely want to behead and exterminate me!” Zheng Dongming let out a sigh helplessly.


“Demonic Cultivator” These two words were like traceless and invisible spirits orbiting between these two. The surrounding temperature decreased to zero in an instant!

The smiling expressions on Li Yao’s and Zheng Dongming’s face were completely frozen. A hard-like killing intent surged from the depths of their eyes.

Demonic cultivators were those who were corrupted by beyonder demons. They relinquished cultivating in spiritual energy and instead cultivated in the dark side of spiritual energy… They cultivate in “Tenebrum Energy”. They were the archnemesis of human civilization and were a hundred-fold more fearsome than the Demon Race!

Legend has it that when the Big Bang of the Universe first began, from the very initial “starting point”, endless spiritual and Tenebrum energy surged forth. Spiritual energy gradually transformed into matter, constituting the vast and boundless sea of the stars and producing the first generation of life forms — the “Pangu Race”.

The Pangu Race had an obsession to create. They split Heaven from Earth and molded three thousand Greater Thousand Worlds. They took countless scorching interstellar matter to meld planets after planets capable of housing life.

And so, human civilization has recorded the Pangu Race to be known as the “Holy Ancients”!

And on the dark side of spiritual energy was Tenebrum. Tenebrum didn’t form into matter. Large masses and masses of Tenebrum solidified into a mysterious world known as the Demonic Realm. It was a plane beyond our known universe, an alternate dimension made of pure Tenebrum.

Within the Demonic Realm, Tenebrum endlessly tore, collided, pressed, and condensed to gradually possess intelligence and evolve into Beyonder Demons!

The Beyonder Demons were a type of life-form made out of pure energy. They did not know how to create; they only knew destruction!

Their strongest obsession was to tear through the obstructing wall between the human cosmos and the Demonic Realm. To descend upon the three thousand Greater Thousand Worlds where humanity multiplied. To invade into the minds of human civilization. To corrupt the consciousness of humanity. To corrode humanity’s determination. And to cause the human race to be lost in mindless slaughter, craziness, deception, and defilement of Tenebrum. To be reduced to dreadful Demonic Cultivators!

boxn ovel. c0m
Early on in the Ancient Cultivation Age of 40,000 years ago, before the Demon Race had even appeared, Cultivators and Demonic Cultivators were natural enemies until death.

There were even rumors that the cultivator who initially synthesized the Demon God Virus, creating the Demon Race, had actually been corrupted by Beyonder Demons long ago and had turned into a Demonic Cultivator!

And 30,000 years later when the Great Dark Age ended, when the Supreme Emperor emerged, when humanity was revived, when the Demon Race was on the verge of extinction, when the human race was about to proclaim themselves to be the rulers of the sea of the stars, it were the Beyonder Demons who engineered the “Armageddon Rebellion”, causing the world of cultivators to enter into a second civil war!

During the Armageddon Rebellion, the Star Ocean Imperium established by the Supreme Emperor collapsed in a great explosion. The links between each Greater Thousand World were severed. The raging flames of war engulfed the boundless sea of the stars once again!

Li Yao stood calmly five meters away from Zheng Dongming. His expression was as sharp as a blade. He sized up Zheng Dongming’s neck with eyes of a vulture.

Even though this fatso was weak and powerless like a sacrificial lamb to an altar, Li Yao did not dare to be the least bit careless.

His opponent was an extremely fearsome Demonic Cultivator. Who knows what sort of violent trump card he may still hold?

Zheng Dongming spoke with a bitter laugh, “So you’ve decided to take me for a Demonic Cultivator, an evil you must purge. Then why the hell did you save me just now? Wouldn’t it have been enough for the large-eyed ape to beat me to death?”

Li Yao shook his head and spoke, “You’ve misunderstood. I wasn’t saving you… I’ve heard that Demonic Cultivators are experts in close combat and quite a few of them know the demonic skill of consuming flesh and blood to restore their vitality! What if when the large-eyed ape approached you, you killed it and consumed its flesh and blood to transform further! Then I’d be screwed! I killed the ape to make sure it didn’t get close to you. I hoped to keep you in your weak and fragile state. That’s all.”

Pausing for a moment, he used his toe to draw a line in the ground and said, “Look here. I’ve maintained standing a distance of 5 meters away from you. I don’t dare to even get closer by even an inch! It’s because I fear that you might violently attack!”

As Li Yao spoke, a paragraph of information regarding the Armageddon Rebellion that he had once learned in a history course emerged from the depths of his mind.

10,000 years ago during the end of the Great Dark Age, the Demon Race’s rule over human civilization was like a candle flickering in the wind. It was definitely unstable and could go out at any time.

At this time, human civilization was rising like a raging storm with the strong appearing in great numbers.

In the southern region of the boundless sea of the stars, the Demon Race established an underground arena on the Ardent Gale Sector, a Greater Thousand World. A powerful human known as the Heaven Banisher Emperor emerged from here.

He was just a lowly Death Gladiator. He slaughtered those in his path and, in a dozen short years, became the “Battle God”. He called countless Death Gladiators to uprise and resist against the Demon Race.

Countless experts of the Demon Race were turned to pulp and transformed to ash under his giant sword and iron fists.

And in the Chaos Star Sector of the northern region of the boundless sea of the stars emerged another hero of humanity. He was known as the Star Ocean Emperor!

He started by seizing a Demon Race patrol boat and plundered around everywhere as a Star Space Pirate. Several dozen years later, he actually expanded to a human fleet composed of millions of crystal battleships. He changed from initially launching guerrilla attacks to launching grand and disciplined campaigns capable of squaring off against the Demon Race army. He defeated his enemies over and over.

And when the Heaven Banisher Emperor and the Star Ocean Emperor met for the first time, people finally knew…

That they were actually two incarnations of the same person!

Since then, the Heaven Banisher Emperor and the Star Ocean Emperor officially combined to a single entity. This entity possessed super outstanding military strategic capabilities and unparalleled combat strength. All of humanity addressed this entity as the Supreme Emperor!

Using only his own strength, the Supreme Emperor took human civilization out from the darkness and reinstated its glory. He led every powerful person to excavate the remains of countless ancient cultivator guilds. With the Ancient Cultivator Civilization as his foundation, he founded twenty Guilds of Provenance, and he split from his own soul twenty clones to rule these twenty Guilds of Provenance!

The strongest clone inherited the Supreme Emperor’s battle awareness and bloodlust. He was in charge of the guild with the strongest combat strength, the Blood God Guild. He was bestowed with the name Blood God!

And the countless slain Demon Race members preferred to call the Blood God as… Mad Armageddon!

When the Supreme Emperor established the Star Ocean Imperium, when he was busy rebuilding human civilization, the Blood God commanded the twenty guilds and the crystal battleship fleet. He ran wild and free through the boundless sea of the stars, banishing all Demon Race influence within every Greater Thousand World.

Within a dozen years, it seemed that all those of the Demon Race were banished to non-existence on each Greater Thousand World. The only thing that remained of the Demon Race was their old nest, the Myriad Demon Sector.

In order to completely vanquish the Demon Race, the Blood God assembled the cultivators possessing the strongest combat strength from the twenty Guilds of Provenance. He commanded seventy percent of the armed forces of the Star Ocean Imperium to form a matchless tyrannical expeditionary force!

The Supreme Emperor even split his immortal soul into two souls to temporarily be sent into the Blood God’s body, to increase the Blood God’s combat strength to rocketing heights, to be able to contend with the King of the Demon Race!

The epic Hundred-Million Light-year Expedition unfolded and surged forward!

Everyone believed that this would be the final war when the Expeditionary Forces went into battle. Humanity would forever end the suffering caused by the Demon Race. The Star Ocean Imperium would radiate with glory and blossom eternally for the next millions and millions of years!

No one ever foresaw that the Beyonder Demons were watching the Blood God carefully. With slaughter after slaughter, the Beyonder Demons endlessly enticed, corrupted, and corroded this Mad Armageddon!

When the war took a turn for the worst, when the Blood God suffered a serious injury from three Demon Gods, and when the Blood God was criticized from the back lines, the Mad Armageddon finally failed to guard his mind and fell to the Demonic Way. From a clone of the Emperor, the greatest of Cultivators, he fell into becoming the most dreadful Demonic Cultivator!

When the Mad Armageddon sank to become a Demonic Cultivator, he immediately led the Blood God Guild members to launch an attack on the other guilds.

And the Beyonder Demons took this chance to corrupt the other clones of the Supreme Emperor!

In the end, nine Guilds of Provenance fell to the Demonic Way, becoming Demon Gates!

Under the interference of the Beyonder Demons, Mad Armageddon and the Myriad Demon Sector reached a ceasefire agreement. They even formed a temporary alliance. They commanded the nine Demon Gates to launch a counterattack against the Star Ocean Imperium!

When human civilization still had not thrown off the shackles of the Great Dark Age completely, they sunk into a second Cultivator Civil War!

The bitterness of this war was not the least bit inferior to the first Cultivator Civil War of 40,000 years ago. The flames of war tore through the recently established Star Ocean Imperium. Even two of the Guilds of Provenance that remained on the side of humanity were completely destroyed within the incomparably cruel slaughter. They were forever lost in the boundless sea of stars!

In the most critical moment, the nine Demon Gates even forced their way into the Star Ocean Imperium’s capital, Empyrean Terminus. The Supreme Emperor was forced to show himself and engaged in a world-shattering decisive battle with the Mad Armageddon!

The Supreme Emperor stood at the peak evolution of humanity and was the immortal legend of cultivators!

The Mad Armageddon was the incarnation of the Supreme Emperor possessing supreme martial strength and the strongest bloodlust. He also possessed a split soul of the Supreme Emperor and even received the blessing from the Hundred Million Demon Monarch of the Nine Heavens and Ten Hells. The Beyonder Demons and Demon Kings all bestowed endless Tenebrum and Fiend energy upon him.

No one could describe just how heart shaking this decisive battle was. All anyone knew was that Empyrean Terminus was completely destroyed by these two raw people!

In the end, the Mad Armageddon’s fleshly body was completely smashed to pieces by the Supreme Emperor. All that remained was an injured soul, which brought the nine Demon Gates’ defeated forces to flee into Demonic Realm.

And the Supreme Emperor also received a critical injury. He was forced to escape to a Smaller Thousand World that he had created. He sank to a state between life and death, reborning and dying, a mysterious long rest.

The Star Ocean Imperium had taken heavy damage from this civil war. It had also lost the matchless guidance of the Supreme Emperor. Every Fiend and Demon took the chance to counterattack. The Star Ocean Imperium collapsed completely, and all links between each Greater Thousand World were severed.

The nine remaining Guilds of Provenance still loyal to mankind fractured into thousands upon thousands of smaller guilds. They dispersed into different Greater Thousand Worlds and continued to defend humanity — to battle to the bloody end against evil!

And amongst a few of these Greater Thousand Worlds, such as the Heaven’s Origin Sector, cultivator guilds established powerful nations. They led regulated armies to slaughter Demon Beasts, to fight against the Demon Gate, and to allow civilians to still live a peaceful and tranquil life.

In a few other Greater Thousand Worlds, humanity was evenly matched with the Fiends and Demons. They sank into a several millennia long blood war. Civilians were drawn into the flames of war as well, engaging in bloody slaughter as soon as they were born… all the way until death.

An extremely small number of Greater Thousand Worlds were completely overtaken and ruled by the Demon Race and the Demon Gate. The humans there lived a life not worth living that was miserable to the extreme!

If humanity wants to completely quell the flames of war, to proclaim themselves the rulers of the sea of the stars, to conquer the cosmos, they still had a long, long road ahead of them!

This event when Mad Armageddon set off a large armed rebellion became known in history as the Armageddon Rebellion. Ultimately, it was all engineered by the Beyonder Demons!

Obviously, when Li Yao discovered that Zheng Dongming was actually a degenerate who had been seduced by Beyonder Demons, a Demonic Cultivator who could control Tenebrum Energy, his heart was shaken just how intensely!





Home  Forty Millenniums of Cultivation  Chapter 68
 

Chapter 68
 
Chapter 68: To Silence or Not
Translator: Strivon, Ash  Editor: Geoffrey_, Lancent

“I’m not a Demonic Cultivator! You should have learned this from the school textbooks; ‘To enter Demonhood is to be Demon for life’. When one falls to the Demonic Way, when they’re purged with Tenebrum, one will lose their minds and become a puppet of the Beyonder Demons. An incomparably powerful aura of Tenebrum Energy lingers around their bodies. They absolutely won’t be like I am now!”


Zheng Dongming spoke suddenly at rocket speed, “Look! Other than when I shot my Demonic Blood Cannon, there isn’t any Tenebrum Energy lingering around my body. My mind is also quite clear, absolutely not that of one who fell into madness! I only… had some lucky encounter to be able to cultivate in both Essence and Tenebrum!”

“Oh?”

Li Yao’s expression remained unchanged and spoke seriously, “Young Master Zheng, you’re mistaken… I’m not going to kill you because you’re a demonic cultivator; I’m going to kill you because… I’ve inadvertently discovered your big secret. You will kill and silence me for certain when you finish recovering, in order to keep your identity and your fortunate encounter from being exposed. I want to save my own life, so I shall make the first move and seize the advantage!”

Li Yao took a moment to sigh. “I hope you can understand. There’s no private enmity between us two. Originally, it was still possible for us to become decent swine friends. But now…”

He shook his head and raised the Burning Sky Battleaxe.

Zheng Dongming’s expression changed as he urgently asked, “If you really want to protect your life, then you really shouldn’t kill me. Can you give me a minute of time to clearly explain to you why?”

Li Yao squinted his eyes as his eyes radiated with vitality. His telepathic mind spun at lightning speeds, blazing his computational power to the limits. He answered a short time later, “Thirty seconds!”

Without half a second of hesitation, Zheng Dongming opened his mouth and shot in rapid fire, “First, the reason why you want to kill me is because you’re scared that I’ll kill you later to silence you! But when you slayed this large-eyed ape, you can be said to be my life-saving benefactor. I, Zheng Dongming, may be a scoundrel, but how could I ever lay a hand on my life savior?”

“Bullshit! You still have twenty-five seconds!”

“Second, you assume that the reason why I would kill you is to protect my own secret of cultivating in Tenebrum — to silence you from divulging my secret! But it’s pointless to kill you since, right now, Fellow Student Li Yao placed number one in the ranking and has already garnered the reputation of being a rising star of hope. The Nine Elites will always have quite a few eyes observing you! And, you must certainly have had your own lucky encounter to have your actual strength soar at a rate that’s higher than mine. It wouldn’t be that easy to silence you. I would need to use large quantities of influence and resources for sure!”

boxn ovel. c0m
“Your Zheng Family… Don’t you have large quantities of influence and resources?” spoke Li Yao coldly.

Zheng Dongming forced a bitter laugh and spoke, “To mobilize large amounts of resources to kill you isn’t actually the problem. The problem is the justification, see? You’re right. My Zheng Family has several cultivators of the Refinement stage. We even have two powerful Foundation Building stage cultivators. But all these cultivators are my uncles or even grand uncles! If I ask them to come kill you, they would ask me for a reason. How should I respond? Should I simply say that you’ve discovered my secret? If I explain it like this, not only would they not get someone else to do the work, these cousins and grandparents will kick me out of the house! They’ll get rid of me!”

“Sounds reasonable. These words you’ve spoken have won you ten more seconds. Continue speaking!” Li Yao gripped the Burning Sky Battleaxe tightly; he did not relax in the slightest.

“Even if I was able to convince my relatives to come and get rid of you, it would be very difficult to not leave behind tracks and clues. Everyone knows of the secret special police unit of the Federation. They specialize in handling cultivator crimes. Quite a few of the secret police possess super powerful computation capabilities. It’s very rare for criminals to escape their investigation. What if they track things down to their roots all the way back to me? Wouldn’t I have overextended myself?”

Zheng Dongming had finished speaking using a single breath. He concluded by saying, “In short, to kill a ferocious person such as yourself wouldn’t be easy at all. Even if I’m successful, there’s still a 99% chance of being discovered. Rather than go down this route, I would rather place my bets on you keeping my secret. The chances of you keeping my secret is still greater!”

“You have a few reasonable points, but it’s still not enough to convince me. Do you have any more reasons? I’ll give you twenty more seconds,” Li Yao spoke without relaxing a single bit.

“I do!”

Zheng Dongming’s pale white face let out a red glow. He shouted himself hoarse saying, “You want to kill me because you’re scared that I’ll silence you when I recover. So you’ve decided to make the first move and seize the advantage. You just want to preserve your own life! But did you ever think about this? That after you’ve killed me you will leave behind some tracks and clues. What if my Zheng Family discovers that you’re the killer! Then you will be hunted and killed by Refinement stage and Foundation Building stage cultivators! Do you think you can escape death?”

Zheng Dongming paused before he reached a conclusion. “If you kill me, there’s a 100% chance that my Zheng Family’s Foundation Building stage cultivators will get rid of you! If you don’t kill me, you can still count on a 1% chance for me to have a conscious and treat you as my life-saving benefactor. As for the actual probability, you can calculate that yourself!”

Li Yao thought deeply for a moment before speaking, “Don’t you worry. I won’t leave behind any feasible evidence.”

Zheng Dongming blinked his eyes. “The secret police will need feasible evidence in their investigation. To avenge a cultivator, it would be enough for there to be a suspect!”

Li Yao’s eyebrows shook. “I can say that I purged evil. That I rid the world of a Demonic Cultivator. Would the Zheng Family dare touch me? They might even celebrate and send me a banner as thanks for cleaning the house of the Zheng Family!”

Zheng Dongming’s mouth pulled into a crafty smile. He spoke, “The Tenebrum I cultivate in has an extremely odd characteristic to it… Aside from the moment of stimulation, the Tenebrum won’t leave the least bit of trace. Even the most supreme of cultivators won’t be able to tell. If you don’t believe me, go ahead and look at the corpse of the large-eyed ape. Not even an ounce of Tenebrum energy remains!

Li Yao was shocked. He gazed unwaveringly at Zheng Dongming and swept a glance at the large-eyed ape from the corner of his eyes.

And sure enough, there was actually not a hair’s trace of demonic energy from the gaping hole in the sternum of the large-eyed ape reeking and dripping wet of blood. It was as if spiritual energy had blasted out that hole.

“Look, there’s no evidence at all that I cultivate in Tenebrum. Therefore, you can’t use this reason to wipe yourself clean. Of course, I’m not worried about you spilling my secret. Anyway, you don’t have proof, so I don’t have a strong enough motive to kill and silence you. We don’t need to take things so far where only one of us gets out of here alive!” Zheng Dongming spoke at lightning speed.

Right at this moment, a crackling sound rang from the air. Small Ji had finally struggled free from Zheng Dongming’s camouflage clothing. A stellar aura glowed from its eyes and it flew over above the two’s heads.

“Ha. Your Puji Critter seems to have had its connection restored with the Distant Expanse. Right now, every single movement is under the observation of countless cultivators. You really won’t make a move now right?” Zheng Dongming laughed with complete brightness.

Li Yao kept quiet for a moment before laughing. He tossed the Burning Sky Battleaxe to the side, walked to Zheng Dongming’ side, and sat down on his butt under the gaze of Small Ji. He covered his lips and whispered in a voice that only themselves could hear, “Very good. You’ve convinced me, but in the end, I’ve discovered your big secret. If one day you push your demonic cultivation to an exceptional level that you can get rid of me without leaving behind even half a speck of evidence… I believe you will still make a move!”

“That’s highly likely.”

Zheng Dongming also covered his lips as he spoke calmly, “Wouldn’t I have to worry as well? What if one day you miraculously make it big and you don’t fear the retribution of the Zheng Family? And what if you’re confident that you can escape the investigation of the secret police? And you worry that I’ll kill and silence you, so you will make the first move to gain the upper hand? To get rid of me as before?”

Li Yao pondered for a moment before laughing automatically. “The probability of this happening isn’t small.”

Zheng Dongming took his arms and rested them under his head as a pillow with great difficulty. He comfortably spoke with half opened eyes, “Anyway, right now, we are both meager weakling cannon fodder. It would be impossible for us to kill each other without being discovered by the Secret Police, so before any of us learns an exceptional god-like skill, we can still be friends, right? We might even be friends worth taking a knife for!”

“There’s no need to be friends worth taking knives for. I don’t like to go stabbing around with guys,” Li Yao spoke, “Being swine friends is fine enough. We can be light acquaintances like a pig and a dog.”

“Sure, my beloved swine friend. Many thanks for your kindness of saving my life. I’ll introduce to you beautiful girls to get to know. What’s your favorite type? Hehehe. Surely you’re not one of those upright people who won’t get close to a girl and only likes to cultivate, right?”

Zheng Dongming was beaming with smiles as he asked pervertedly.

“Of course not. I like a pure girl who’s slightly provocative. And within that tease, there would be a faint shyness to her, but she actually wants it under that shyness. And what she wants would be a mix of different kinds of unspeakable passions and desires.”

Li Yao spoke earnestly.

“Got it. You have before you a pure high-class woman who’s a beast in bed. Those are pretty common man~ I know a lot of those. When you have time come over to our school…”

As he spoke, Zheng Dongming’s voice trailed weaker and weaker. In the end, his head lay to the side; he had passed out.

He had forcefully used Tenebrum and so he had overtaxed his body too greatly. Then he used an enormous amount of mental energy in the battle of wits against Li Yao. His mind was practically spent. He was pushing his limits to hold on until now.

Li Yao rested for a moment, restoring his stamina by a bit. His gaze stopped and remained at Zheng Dongming’s neck artery for quite a while

“Student Li Yao, please remain in the supply point and don’t move. Cultivators are rushing over quickly!” Small Ji suddenly spoke.

Li Yao’s pupils shrank before he moved his gaze. He used a Chainsword to support himself and stood up.

A strand of curiosity had arisen in his heart. He staggered over to the front of the large-eyed ape’s head. And with a kick, the giant head flipped over.

The combat strength of the three-eyed ape actually wasn’t that powerful. Even the mutation of a large-eyed ape couldn’t possibly drive these two into such a sorry state.

What sort of oddity did this large-eyed ape possess to transform into this crazy state?

The large-eyed ape’s face was still frozen in this ugly grimacing state, only that mouth, with crossed canine teeth, would no longer puff out a putrid stench. The bizarre incomparably giant eye on its forehead was closed tightly. It was much nicer to look at.

Li Yao stabbed his sword into the mouth of the large-eyed ape, firmly securing the large head to the ground, and took his daggers. Only then did he feel at ease to squat down and examine it.

Right about the instant he squatted down, the bizarre eye on the large-eyed ape’s forehead opened suddenly, releasing an incomparably strong blood red glow. It was as if an extremely sharp blade had ferociously stabbed into Li Yao’s forehead, reaching to the deepest depths of his mind!

A split second later…

“Kid, how could you!?”

Li Yao felt his head be in incomparable pain. An aged scream came from the deepest depths of his mind. A transparent figure of a person with aged white hair exploded and disintegrated, transforming into countless shards. A handful of these insignificant shards continued fleeing towards every nook and corner in the depths of Li Yao’s mind. And the majority of these shards spun at crazy speeds, becoming a berserk vortex.

Li Yao’s consciousness was also dragged into this strange vortex of shards. He sunk into endless darkness!

The instant before he sunk into this darkness, Li Yao saw three cultivators flying on swords and leaping down from the cloud filled sky. They shot like lightning towards him and Zheng Dongming!

=============================

=====Author’s Notes from the original chapter=====

Friends have raised a question in the comments section:

“Since the competitors’ Puji Critters have lost connection with the monitoring center, how are they able to calculate points? Is there meaning for the competition to continue on?”

This question caused Teacher Cow to be blank for a long time.

Things are often like this when writing novels. Some things are considered logical by the author and do not need to be explained, causing the reader to feel the author hasn’t explained things clearly enough, that there are contradictions.

And so Teacher Cow has pondered on this for a long time and has decided to change some things in the previous chapters by adding a few paragraphs of explanation.

Puji Critters aren’t broken. They’ve only lost connection due to the thunder and torrential rain. While it is true that they aren’t capable of transmitting data to the monitoring center during a loss of connection, Puji Critter’s functions won’t necessarily receive too big of an effect. The most that would happen from the torrential storm is a “delay.”

This also means that most actions performed by competitors are still recorded down by the Puji Critters. When connection to the network is reinstated, maybe when the competition ends, all information can definitely be integrated into calculating the points.

In short, the Puji Critter still remains in operation. It just goes from network mode to local mode, losing some functionality. This is also the reason why Zheng Dongming first covered up the Puji Critter’s vision before he launched his Demonic Art.

This sort of method may not be a hundred percent fair. But a real battle was like this — it was filled with various variables.

……Actually, Teacher Cow isn’t really willing to have these explanations outside of the main story. This is because Teacher Cow believes that if the final written work doesn’t allow for everyone to understand what’s going on, then that represents a failure of the author.

But sometimes if every single detail is written comprehensively, although it increases the word count by a lot, it would be way too obstructive. It would lose that natural flowing feel.

To summarize, Teacher Cow will do his best to balance between these two sides and welcome everyone’s valuable insight.

Teacher Cow looks at the comment section everyday. Sometimes Teacher Cow doesn’t give a prompt response, Teacher Cow hopes everyone will understand.

Teacher Cow has to support both elderly and young people. He is normally busy with supporting the family. Time dedicated to himself is few. He usually gets up at 5-6 AM and goes to Kentucky Fried Chicken to write for two hours before he goes to work. After work if there’s nothing busy at home, he goes to Kentucky Fried Chicken to write for two hours. Sometimes he needs to take care of the old and young before he can find the time.

So most of the time Teacher Cow needs to concentrate his energy on writing. The time he has to talk with everybody is really not much.

Today Teacher Cow shall use this question by a novel friend to explain Teacher Cow’s circumstances with everyone. This is also an apology to everyone.

To summarize, everyone please leave more comments. Teacher Cow will certainly read them. Even if sometimes he can’t respond back, he will always remember them in his heart. Everyone’s support and suggestions is Teacher Cow’s greatest driving force in writing. He will certainly write this Forty Millenniums of Cultivation book to be a good book with the help of everyone.

Thank-you everyone!





Home  Forty Millenniums of Cultivation  Chapter 69
 

Chapter 69
 
Chapter 69: The Tree of Memories
Translator: Strivon, Ash  Editor: Geoffrey_, Lancent

In the deepest depths of Li Yao’s neural field. Within his sea of memories, an endless abyss.


A mass of countless memory shards formed an enormous crazy spinning vortex. It tore at Li Yao’s soul without end!

“My name is Ou Yeming. One day, I will become the Leader of the Hundred Smelting Guild!”

“I, Ou Yeming, swear to all the gods in all the realms and universes that I will take all the members of the nine Demon Gates and behead them one by one and exterminate their whole families, leaving not even their dogs and chickens!”

“Godsword Lithe, Warblade Carnage Dragon, Spear Soul Devourer. I’ve finally crafted these three masterwork weapons capable of slaying those old Spirit Transformation Stage monsters!

“Senior Ou Ye, Senior Ou Yezi. Please craft me an artifact. I’m willing to pay you 10 floating mountains as compensation!”

“BOOM!”

Time went by as a blur. Li Yao didn’t know how long he was stuck in the vortex of memories when suddenly he heard an earth-shattering loud noise that ruptured the entire vortex.

A bizarre object with the shape of a giant tree had actually formed in the depths of his neural field.

This “Tree of Memories” was formed from the countless pure crystal shards of memories. Each shard of memory flickered with clear scenes — they were the memory records of Ou Yezi’s life!

Starting from the tree top was the time when Ou Yezi entered the Hundred Smelting Guild, when he was reduced to a low-level worker. Memories of when he suffered the torment of the Titan.

boxn ovel. c0m
As time passed, the memory shards spread downwards, gradually changing to show the time when Ou Yezi became a Forge Worker. Memories of when he hammered and smelted day in and day out in the forging room.

Continuing downwards were Ou Yezi’s memories of when he crafted rudimentary flying swords.

What came next was the invasion by the Demons. Memories of bloody battles all around.

This continued all the way until the base of the tree, where the memories changed to when Ou Yezi became the Leader of the Hundred Smelting Guild, having won success and recognition. It was a scene where his might made the world tremble.

All the memory shards were separated into three completely different colors.

The earliest memories from when Ou Yezi entered the guild to when he made it as a forge worker were flowing with light and overflowing with color. They shined bright, appearing to be utterly vibrant and alive.

The memories when Ou Yezi acted as a forge worker in the forge room lacked brightness and vibrancy, but they were still of various colors.

These two sections of memories took up nearly 1/10th of the total number of memory shards.

The remaining 8/10ths of memories were only of two colors — black and white.

The final tenth of memories completely faded into a mass of black fog, blurry to the eye.

“What’s this?”

Li Yao’s consciousness floated over to be in front of the giant Tree of Memories. He was astounded to the utmost point.

He never thought that Ou Yezi’s entire life would unfold completely in such a bizarre manner before him, allowing him to see everything with just a glance.

“I understand now… Although Ou Yezi failed to possess me, his soul must be quite strong. He didn’t disappear at that time. He actually concealed himself in the dark within the depths of my mind to wait for a suitable opportunity and launch a second possession!”

“I just don’t know why, but when this mutated large-eyed ape launched an incomparably tyrannical mental attack it directly penetrated my neural field and completely shattered Ou Yezi’s soul, turning Ou Yezi into countless memory shards!”

“Yep. Yep. This mutated large-eyed ape possessed an extremely high-level of intelligence. After it was beheaded by me, its hatred was to the maximum. It saved the last of its vitality for this unstoppable mental attack. Clearly, it wanted to strike me dead or at least strike me into becoming retarded!”

“I didn’t expect it to actually cleave Ou Yezi’s soul. In the end, both these two monsters suffered a sorry defeat, allowing me to fish up some benefits!”

“But the thing is, how shall I properly utilize Ou Yezi’s memory shards?”

His heart stirred. Li Yao’s consciousness floated to the topmost portion of the Tree of Memories, carefully searching through the memories.

Soon, he discovered a memory shard of a certain day, right at the moment when the Titan passed on to Ou Yezi the One-Hundred-And-Eight-Hands Chaos-Gale Hammer Technique.

Li Yao gazed at this memory shard with rapt attention.

All of a sudden, he felt his conscious be drawn by a great force. His vision turned black and he appeared once more on the large training field.

It was precisely the day shown by the memory shard!

The devilish looking Titan stood right in front of him. His hands, the size of iron hammers, rocked as he roared, “You bunch of idiots! Listen carefully to your elder here! Today, I shall teach you all the 47th hand, the Heart-Piercer Hammer! The profoundness of this technique stems from the word ‘Piercer’. The key is to aim past the body of the target!”

“For example, if the enemy you’re attacking is standing a distance of half a foot away from you, then you will need to take him for standing an entire foot away from you. Aim behind his body and exert force! Release all your strength and explode forth past their bodies! Run their intestines through completely! Come come come and take a good look everyone. See how each strand of my muscle fibers moves!.”

Li Yao carefully observed the Titan’s demonstration with wide bulging eyes.

The Heart-Piercer Hammer was one of the more complicated moves of the One-Hundred-And-Eight-Hands Chaos-Gale Hammer Technique.

The last few times training in the Dream of Grandeur passed by like a blur; he had forgotten everything completely by the time he woke up.

Li Yao certainly wouldn’t forfeit this chance to watch this anew today.

The Titan went into a horse stance. With a howl, his aura thundered out to form a giant humanoid figure. The crushed rock beneath his feet splashed randomly as his feet stabbed deeply into the granite floor!

Meanwhile, the muscles all over his body bulged out like vipers scattering around. A strength like the tides rushed into his right arm. His fist pounded out and the air exploded forth with seven sounds of “Bang Bang Bang Bang Bang Bang Bang” in succession!

A series of seven circular ripples tore through the air as the fist pierced by!

“The Heart-Piercer Hammer can tear the air when it is trained to the limit, creating sounds of explosion. I can only tear the air seven times. The experts in our guild can tear the air 17~18 times with a single fist. Their strength can penetrate through even a giant boulder, turning the insides of the boulder into powder!”

The Titan had spoken with immense satisfaction. His eyes bulged open once again and faced Li Yao with a roar, “Ou Yeming, come over here! This senior will properly teach you!”

Li Yao’s heart jumped. He jolted telepathically and his body went light for some unknown reason. His soul had actually separated from Ou Yezi’s body and fled out, transforming into a semi-transparent humanoid figure that floated in the air. He watched Ou Yezi walk miserably in front of the Titan to suffer from abuse.

“So it was like this all along! This memory shard can already be used completely as I please! I can incarnate as Ou Yezi and personally experience scenes from his memories. I can also take on an observation role and admire his life leisurely!”

This discovery caused Li Yao to be greatly excited.

Below, the Titan exploded forth with a fist that shot like lightning. This was no training; this was an excuse to vent on Ou Yezi.

Li Yao watched with a frown and spoke in his mind, “These fists are too fast; I can’t see them clearly at all. How can I learn from this? If only I can go back in and use slow motion.”

He felt his vision change as this thought floated in his mind. Time had actually rewound back to half a minute ago, back to the moment when Ou Yezi was just called by the Titan to go up front.

And also, the movements of the Titan and Ou Yezi were abnormally slow. Every single explosive fist, every flowing movement of muscle fiber, were captured very clearly by Li Yao.

“That’s it. The muscles of the two legs follows the rotation of the body to create strength together. So this is the key to the Heart-Piercer Hammer. This Titan really doesn’t explain things clearly; it’s clear he’s keeping things to himself!”

Li Yao could not help but let out a whistle. He had discovered that this memory shard was completely under his control, causing him to be incomparably excited. He can freely manipulate the time speed and position.

Li Yao watched the scene in slow motion repeatedly for 7-8 times. In the end, he even merged with Ou Yezi’s body and experienced things from Ou Yezi’s point of view 3-4 times. Finally, he mastered this Heart-Piercer Hammer move through careful study. He had completely assimilated the technique down to his marrow!

“This memory shard has already been completely digested and absorbed. I will never forget it. But how do I exit from it?”

As this thought just emerged in his mind, the surrounding scene exploded and crumbled. Li Yao’s conscious appeared once more in front of the enormous Tree of Memories.

“Can it be? Are all these memory shards all accessible for observation as I wish? To study from? To digest and assimilate?”

Li Yao’s soul jolted fiercely. With a long whistle, he threw himself towards a middle stage memory of Ou Yezi in wild joy… The memory of Ou Yezi crafting the Godsword Lithe!

“As long as I learn how to craft a Masterwork weapon such as this, I’ll be able to walk arrogantly across the Federation… No, the entire Heaven’s Origin Sector!”

Li Yao yelled and crashed headfirst into the memory shard and a “Clang Dang” sound actually rang out. A black ripple emerged on the memory shard. His soul had nearly crashed into pieces. He tumbled rolling backward.

“What’s going on?”

The crash made Li Yao confused and lost. The pain pierced to his soul. He rubbed his head with a confused shout, “Why can’t I enter this memory shard?”

He was unwilling to give up, so he orbited to a few memory shards to the side, circling them for a few rotations. He tried carefully to enter several times, but he was completely unable to.

He tried to enter over a hundred memory shards before he discovered a common pattern.

All these memories were from Ou Yezi’s middle and late stages of life, which can also be referred as nine-tenths of the tree that are in the two colors white and black and the black mist memories.

These memories all include the remnants of Ou Yezi’s powerful soul. He wouldn’t be able to probe them easily.

Only the bright vibrant colored memory shards and the clear multi-colored memory shards were accessible.

Anyway, there are some differences between these two memory shards… The bright vibrant colored memory shards were already under his complete control. He can choose to take either a personal or an observational role for these shards. He can even increase or decrease the speed of time, to the point where he can replay the memories over and over.

And in the ordinary multi-colored memory shards, he can only take on the role of an observer to watch Ou Yezi’s memories pass by slowly. He lacked all control.

Li Yao pondered for a long time until it seemed like he figured out the principle behind all this.

“In the early stages in the life of cultivation, Ou Yezi was an only an ordinary person. His soul wasn’t that powerful, so I am able to freely probe his memories. But later on, his actual strength grew more and more powerful, and his soul grew stronger and stronger as well until the end when he became a grandmaster. The memories of that time contain an inexhaustible magical power. They’re something that the present me obviously can’t pry into as I wish!”

“However, as my actual strength slowly grows, my soul will also become more and more powerful. Eventually, there will be a day when I can take Ou Yezi’s entire memories. I’ll swallow his memories drop by drop until they completely turn into my memories!”





Home  Forty Millenniums of Cultivation  Chapter 70
 

Chapter 70
 
Chapter 70: Fiend Star Yao
Translator: Strivon, Ash  Editor: Geoffrey_, Lancent

After gobbling up about a dozen of Ou Yezi’s early memory shards, Li Yao discovered with complete astonishment that what had originally been a multicolored memory shard had become bright and vibrant colored — its radiance flickered brightly!


When his consciousness entered to probe this shard, he discovered that what had originally been an observer role only memory changed to become freely controllable, able to be observed repeatedly!

His resolution grew firmer upon this discovery. As long as his soul gradually grows more powerful, the memory fragments that were originally impossible to control would eventually change into delicious food. They’ll be completely swallowed!

From this moment on, Li Yao seemed to forget the passing of time.

He was like the greediest of thieves who had accidently discovered treasure troves containing the wealth of a nation. He stole with extreme joy, having infiltrated into this trove filled with gold, silver, and gems. The thought of leaving never crossed his mind.

The early memories of Ou Yezi were overturned completely upside down by him; they were wiped completely clean.

Again and again, he repeated the training of the One-Hundred-And-Eight-Hands Chaos-Gale Hammer Technique. It was deeply branded into Li Yao’s soul. He would never forget it.

And in the world of reality, time flowed by at lightning speed.

A week went by in the blink of an eye.

The accident that happened on Devil Flood Dragon Island led to nine competitors dying miserable deaths. One competitor received critical injuries and had entered a coma.

This was a rare tragedy in the history of Limit Challenge Competition in the Federation.

boxn ovel. c0m
The competition ended abruptly due to this tragedy, and an investigation was launched as well. Soon, it became clear that a competitor had violated the rules by bringing in a doping drug to the competition. Then a Demon Beast stole the drug and underwent an astonishing mutation after injecting it!

However, this competitor was killed at the first moment by the Demon Beast. He had used his own life to pay for his actions.

And the peddler who had sold this competitor the doping drug actually committed suicide after finding out about these matters. This whole matter ended on a completely unsatisfactory note.

Through careful investigation, it was discovered in the underground workshop of this peddler that the Ghost Dragon-7 Drugs he sold weren’t genuine Ghost Dragon-7 Drugs. They were actually mixtures made up of the remains of several different types of doping drugs and strengthening drugs. It was unknown what sort of composition the drug had had.

Only the tyrannical body of a Demon Beast could withstand the ravaging of this sort of knock-off doping drug. If that student had injected the drug, then he might even have exploded and died on the spot.

In this entire matter, what caused people to feel the most regret, aside from the deaths of the nine competitors, was the competitor who received critical injuries, the competitor who had sunk into a coma — Li Yao.

Floating Spear City Local News Media released a series of discussion articles titled “The Fleeting Fiend Star Yao.”

“Student Li Yao was originally a rising star. In the recent Limit Challenge Competition, he produced an unprecedented record, receiving the collective interests of the Nine Elite Universities.

“A young person such as this should have a future radiating with glory, but due to an accident, he lost the chance to tread onto the world of cultivators. His brain received a bizarre mental attack, ripping his pineal gland completely to shreds, dropping his Actualization Quotient down to 7%, to the level of a low-grade elementary school student. Even if he does regain consciousness, he might not be able to ever cultivate again!”

The article was written in a tone of utter regret.

And on the online forums, netizens were engaging in all sorts of discussions.

Quite a few people felt regret for Li Yao one after another. “What a shame. If this accident never happened, he probably would have already been specially enrolled in one of the Nine Elite Universities. It really is too cruel!”

There was also quite a large portion of people who took joy in his misfortune. They spoke with scathing words, “Who told him to be this arrogant? To flip the enter command center of the Blue Team? And kick several dozen people out of the competition? How awesome he was! And now you know what? This accident has just sent him back to where he belongs!”

However, to the majority of people, this was an extremely insignificant matter.

The gargantuan news only lasted with liveliness for three days in this explosive information era of today. Additionally, the entrance exams were coming up. Everyone was training and cramming to the very end. Who would still pay attention to the news of other people?

Wasn’t this just the downfall of a genius?

With the Federation being so large, there were quite a few of the powerful, a few geniuses who experienced all sorts of circumstances, fell into a Qi Deviation, were eaten by Demon Beasts, or were silently killed in guild infightings.

What was Li Yao worth when compared to them?

After a few days of liveliness, the accident that happened on Devil Flood Dragon Island soon sunk to silence. Li Yao, this fleeting Fiend Star, was also forgotten by everyone.

……

A week later. In Floating Spear City’s First Hospital. In the intensive care unit.

A giant metal medical treatment pod was engraved with circles and circles of arcane glyphs on the exterior, forming a giant glyph array.

Over a hundred creamy white crystals were embedded around the Glyph Arrays. They vibrated faintly, emitting ripples that caused one’s mind to be relaxed.

Li Yao laid motionless in the medical pod. The body that lay under the white bed sheets appeared extremely weak and shriveled. Tubes were stuck all over his body. A Soul Calming Talisman was stuck to his forehead.

His eyelids pulsed madly underneath the talisman. He was immersed in an incomparably intense nightmare.

Zhao Shude and Xie Tingxian stood next to his bed. They listened to a white gowned doctor explain Li Yao’s condition.

“Student Li Yao’s body hasn’t actually received much damage, but he is injured from a mental attack by a mutated large-eyed ape. His spirit root is completely lacerated. His neural field has entered into a state of incomparable disorder!”

“His body has automatically sunk into a state of deep sleep in order to protect his brain. Under this state, his brain is like a black hole that’s crazily absorbing energy from his meridians, limbs, and bones all over his body. Look. No matter how much of the strengthening drug and high-energy nutrient solution we inject into his body, it’s no use.”

“His mind can consume the equivalent of a month’s or even a year’s volume of energy for an ordinary person’s mind in a second!

The white gowned doctor spoke with admiration.

Zhao Shude asked with a deep frown, “Doctor Gu, from your experience, when will Student Li Yao awaken in the end? Also, his spirit root has been torn, leaving only an Actualization Quotient of 7% left. What are the odds of his spirit root recovering after he awakens?”

The white gowned doctor spoke with a bitter laugh, “Headmaster Zhao, I am truly ashamed. I have never encountered Student Li Yao’s circumstances in my many years since I entered the world of cultivators! The large-eyed ape who attacked him had injected a doping drug to mutate into a mutated form. But this doping drug is formed from a chaotic mess of inferior drugs. No one knows the specific composition, and no one knows how warped the mental attack of this large-eyed ape came to be. And what is even more unknown are the effects on the person’s brain… Under these circumstances, we can only wait!”

The gloominess on Zhao Shude’s face grew more and more concentrated. He spoke somewhat despairingly, “Doctor Gu, you are the number one Meditation Healer of Floating Spear City. You have great academic roots in the field of the mind. Even you are clueless?”

The gowned doctor spoke, “The brains of men are the most complicated and mysterious organs. The field of the mind is even more of a mysterious world incomprehensible by the ordinary person!”

“From the growth of Cultivator Civilization until now, we know the human body like the back of one’s hand, but the brain remains an uncrackable forbidden area!”

“I’ve tried to enter Li Yao’s neural field, but I’ve been obstructed by a wild power each time that nearly sent me to descend to Qi Deviation. It looks likes that doping drug is utterly ferocious to be able to strengthen the large-eyed ape’s mental attack to the peak!”

“No one knows when Student Li Yao will awaken under these circumstances. If his luck is good, he could wake up tomorrow. If his luck is bad, he might spend his entire life in this deep sleep. Nothing is certain.”

After pausing, he continued, “However, there are actually several hundreds of this sort of cases where a critical injury leads to the pineal gland to be torn and Actualization Quotient falling substantially in the past 300 years. The majority of those with torn spirit roots were completely unable to cultivate, becoming cripples. Only an extremely few people were able to recover. At most seven or eight I guess. Therefore, when you ask if Student Li Yao can continue cultivating, my answer is… the probability does not exceed 1%!”

Zhao Shude let out a long sigh. His despair was overflowing in that sigh.

He walked to the corner and turned on the micro crystal processor on his wrist. A cultured and refined middle-aged man appeared on the hologram. It was Crimson Nimbus Guild’s elder, Zhou Yin!

“So there’s no hope?” Zhou Yin could guess from looking at Zhao Shude’s expression. He asked calmly.

“Yea. The doctor also doesn’t know when he’ll wake up. Even if he does wake up, the chances of him cultivating again are less than 1%,” Zhao Shude spoke with complete pity.

Zhou Yin nodded his head and spoke without a change of expression, “It’s somewhat of a pity. However, there’s nothing to be done about it. The world of cultivation is cruel. There are countless geniuses born every second and every second there are countless geniuses who fall. To become a cultivator, one can’t do without having talent, diligence, connections, and luck. He’s a genius, but he lacked luck. Who could be blamed? From now on, all resources we were originally going to throw to him shall be revoked. I remember that your school has Helian Lie and Si Jiaxue who aren’t too bad. Take those resources and give it to these two then!”

“Yes. Your orders are my command, Elder Zhou. Oh right, this Li Yao and Helian Lie have created another misunderstanding on Devil Flood Dragon Island. Board Member Helian is really not happy. What if Li Yao wakes up and they…”

Zhao Shude asked probingly.

Zhou Yin laughed utterly moderately and spoke, “I originally looked upon Li Yao with favor because I took him for young talent worthy to be fostered. But at the present, he’s already become trash. What sort of connection does he have with me now? There’s no need to mention his matters with me anymore.”

“I see.”

Zhao Shude shut his crystal processor. He walked to the side of the doctor and spoke, “Since even Doctor Gu has explained as such, then I can only wait and see what happens. Doctor Gu, I’m going to leave then… Professor Xie, how about you?”

Xie Tingxian hesitated a moment before saying, “I’ll continue waiting.”

Zhao Shude nodded and headed outside.

The instant before he stepped out of the room, he turned around to take another look at Li Yao in the medical pod.

Crimson Nimbus Second’s Headmaster Zhao Shude’s expression turned incomparably cold — it was as if he was looking at a pile of trash.





Home  Forty Millenniums of Cultivation  Chapter 71
 

Chapter 71
 
Chapter 71: The Transformation of the Fiend Star Yao!
Translator: Strivon, Ash  Editor: Geoffrey_, Lancent

Two weeks later in Floating Spear City’s First Hospital.


Li Yao slept deeply like a baby in a medical treatment pod, except the eyeballs beneath his eyelids shook like crazy as before, showing that he was still continuing to cultivate in the Dream of Grandeur.

Xie Tingxian looked at Li Yao with a face of complete loss. In the end, he faced the doctor to confirm. “Doctor Gu, has there still been no signs of Student Li Yao turning around for the better?”

The doctor shook his head. “Professor Xie, you’re quite considerate. However, this type of heavy damage to the neural field where the spirit root has been torn is different from an ordinary illness. The passing of time won’t necessarily cause things to turn for the better! Look. This is the report of his most recent days. His brain waves are undulating in a bizarre motion. His Actualization Quotient has been fluctuating sharply. The highest it reaches is 17% and then 10 minutes later it falls to 4%. This shows that his neural field is becoming more and more unstable. Or in other words, his mind is in the middle of launching a more and more fierce storm. Even if a patient like this awakens, do you feel he will still be a genius that’s needed by your school?”

Xie Tingxian hesitated for a long time. He let out a long long, long long breath. He walked to the corner and turned on his micro crystal processor to contact Deep Sea University.

An utterly short and petite old woman, who wore an utterly old and strange gold threaded robe, appeared on the hologram. She seemed to be blind; her eyes in her deep sockets flashed with a purple flame. From time to time, the flames escaped the eyes, shooting out a terrifying radiance.

Xie Tingxian’s expression turned extremely respectful in front of this old woman. He spoke with great difficulty, “Dean Chu, is it possible to give me a week’s more time?”

“What do you say?”

Within the hologram, the blind old woman spoke dryly. Her throat seemed to have been slashed by a blade; it was incomparably hoarse and ear-piercing. “I admit that this kid you’ve taken a liking to is a genius, but now he has become like this. There’s no need for you to waste further time? We of Deep Sea University are the Federation’s strongest. Our university possesses the greatest of inner resources. Who knows how many young geniuses there are every year who sharpen their minds to want to enter our school. What’s the worst that could happen if we miss one genius? You have quite a few projects still within the school. They’re waiting for your direction upon your return. One of them is a major military collaboration project, pertaining to the newest Individual assault artifact… If all the Federation’s soldiers can use an artifact designed by our university… You should know how much that’s worth.”

“I understand. I’ll return today.”

Xie Tingxian’s eyebrows frowned into a knot. He closed his crystal processor and hesitated for a long time before he finally made a resolution. He faced towards the doctor and said, “Doctor Gu, if Student Li Yao wakes up, make sure the first thing he does is contact me. This is my e-crane number. Many thanks.”

boxn ovel. c0m
After finishing his words, the refining expert of Deep Sea University, Xie Tingxian, also walked out of the ward.

This time, he didn’t look back.

……

A third week passed.

Ding Lingdang let out a great, bored-to-death yawn. The yawn even caused tears to flow down. She glared like a tiger at the doctor by her side.

Cold sweat seeped from the forehead of Doctor Gu. He spoke stammeringly, “T-t-t-terribly sorry, Miss Ding. Although you’ve accompanied the patient in the hospital for three weeks, although everyone else has already walked off leaving only you here night after night, I can’t agree to your proposed treatment.”

“Why?”

Ding Lingdang crossed her fingers, cracking them to create pops. “Anyway, your conservative treatment methods are damn near useless. You might as well let me rip open this medical treatment pod, drag this kid out of there, and let me beat him up for a change. Who knows? He might be hit wide awake. This is precisely what’s called giving medicine to a dead horse!”

“Nope. No can do. Really it’s impossible. You better not mess around! Someone help!”

……

A fourth week passed.

In the depths of his neural field, Li Yao continued to cultivate madly around the clock. He engulfed Ou Yezi’s memories with incomparable savageness.

Having experienced thousands upon thousands of repetitions, he had already decomposed, swallowed, digested, and assimilated all of Ou Yezi’s memories of when he had sunk to being a low level worker in the Hundred Smelting Guild.

Most noteworthy was the One-Hundred-And-Eight-Hands Chaos-Gale Hammer Technique. He trained again and again, bringing it to perfection, to a point more skillful than the Titan.

Li Yao even changed the direction of Ou Yezi’s memories several times. In the spars against the Titan, he ferociously pounded the Titan to the ground, beating forth a blood nose and face, letting out some anger.

Fortunately, every memory shard was independent from each other. When one memory shard was changed, it wouldn’t affect the direction of the next memory shard.

After swallowing the entirety of the memories of being a low level worker, Li Yao was still not satisfied. He continued engulfing Ou Yezi’s memories of when Ou Yezi was a forge worker.

But with the passing of time, his soul grew weaker and weaker. He was completely thin and withered. He had a feeling he could disappear at any time.

“Not good. I’ve been immersed in the depths of my neural field for this long. I don’t know how many days had past in the real world. Can a week have already passed?”

Li Yao’s soul violently trembled with this fear. It was as if a strange fish on the deep sea floor was rushing dimly towards a bright light, suddenly emerging to the surface.

Finally, on the early morning on the thirty-third day, Li Yao faintly opened his eyes on the hospital bed.

He woke up!

The first thing that entered his vision was the yellow paper talisman stuck to his forehead. Li Yao pouted his mouth and blew, lifting the paper talisman up.

He discovered that his body was contained in an enormous glass cover. On the inner chamber of the glass were over a thousand glyph scripts engraved and packed. The creamy white crystals surrounding him drove the glyphs, causing a faint resonance.

A ripple permeated through the void that caused one to feel utter comfort.

The faint scent of disinfectant medicine permeated through the air. He faced towards the windows and discovered that it was the greatest darkness right before the approaching dawn. A few stars were vaguely flickering in the darkness.

Li Yao didn’t know how long he had been lying down. His body was completely empty and lacked strength.

However, his brain was filled with a complete abundance of energy. His soul had solidified to have true substance. It was a type of indestructible feeling.

It was like…

A giant door had been forcefully pushed open. His neural field expanded to a limitless state. A new world had been born in the depths of Li Yao’s neural field. With every pulse, his mind was filled with an incomparably tyrannical strength!

This time, Li Yao’s five senses changed to become utterly sharp. His computational abilities rose to the utmost limits. He could recall trifling past events of memories from a dozen or so years ago. He could calculate out an utterly complicate math sequence problem. And, he could easily hear two nurses whispering outside the ward in the hallway.

“Hey did you know? The fellow who’s sleeping inside is that famous Fiend Star Yao!?”

“You’re saying that misfortunate Li Yao then. I know him. But why does everyone call him Fiend Star Yao?”

“Rumor has it that he was originally the rising star of Floating Spear City who had everyone’s attention. The Nine Elite Universities were scrambling over him. Everyone took him to be the second Fiend Blade Peng Hai. But due to an accident, his spirit root tore and he entered into a coma. His Actualization Quotient fell to the bottom — all that’s left is 7%. He’s practically become crippled. All of a sudden, the university who had all wanted to specially enroll him all retreated. He came from being a rising star to becoming a fleeting meteor. Mhm. An especially jinxed meteor. So they all call him the Fiend Star!”

“So that’s how it is. Now that I know all this, I think he’s quite pitiful. I’ve heard he’s the same as Peng Hai. They both were poor kids who came from the slums. You see. A destitute kid who was able to soar to great heights with a single step, like a fish becoming a dragon, who was looked by the Nine Elite Universities with favor, who looked to be destined to walk the road of cultivators and burst into the upper-class circle… Yet at the most critical point, he was beaten by an accident to his original state! If I were him, I would prefer to keep sleeping and never wake up. If I wake up and discover that I’ve fallen this far, I’ll absolutely commit suicide!”

“Who says that won’t happen. His Actualization Quotient fell to 7%. It’s impossible for him to cultivate… Even I have an Actualization Quotient of 21%!”

The two nurses laughed together.

Li Yao lay motionless on the bed. He listened silently, his eyes filled with doubt and ridicule.

“My Actualization Quotient fell to 7%!? What jokers! I feel that right now I’m great to the point of simply exploding!”

He looked around. There was actually a small balcony connected to this room.

Li Yao pulled off the tubes connected to his body and pushed open the glass cover. He quietly got off the bed and quietly tiptoed to the balcony, closing the door behind him.

Floating Spear City was like a sleeping beast that lay calmly within the darkness.

Occasionally, anti-gravity shuttles would streak through the night sky. Their thrusters created streaks of rainbows and were swallowed by the darkness in the blink of an eye.

The spirit root was the origin for every cultivator. It was closely bound with one’s five senses and thinking ability. Everyone would approximately fill out their own Actualization Quotient and figure out what level they were at.

“My five senses are much sharper than before. My mind has become clearer. I can even easily remember matters from the past. Even if I don’t feel a sprouting sensation on my forehead, my neural field has changed to be much more vast!”

“If my original neural field could be said to be the size of a small pond, my present mind is like a vast giant ocean that stretches as far as the eye can see. My spirit root is stronger than the past by over two-fold! My Actualization Quotient must have increased by at least 17~18 percent. How could it have fallen instead of rising? To the point of 7%?”

Li Yao laughed involuntarily.

A sudden drop in one’s Actualization Quotient would bring about an extremely intense reaction for sure! For example, their heads would hurt to the point of splitting, their thinking would become blurred, their memory faculties would decline, their five senses would drop, and they might even become a retard!

When compared to his crisp and clear mind of the present, in a state of boundless energy, it was completely different!

Li Yao’s first thought was that the hospital’s sensor machine made a bad measurement. But the probability of this happening is small.

Thinking about it, the greatest possibility was that he had used up too much of his mental energy when he was consuming Ou Yezi’s memories. This lead to his Actualization Quotient to drop temporarily.

But it was also because he swallowed Ou Yezi’s memories that he was able to break open his neural field. From today on, cultivation would absolutely be a flat ground where he could gallop straight across, covering a thousand miles in a single day.

Li Yao’s mouth hooked into a smile as he thought back to Ou Yezi’s memories.

His two legs split. A fist pounded forth randomly, and he actually heard three “Bang Bang Bang” explosions. Three air-tearing ripples had appeared on the tip of the fist in front of him.

“I actually succeeded in learning this Heart-Piercer Hammer move!”

“I don’t know how many days I lay in bed for. My body consumed enormous resources; I’m as thin as a skeleton! My body lacks strength!”

“I was able to strike out with three air-tearing ripples with a single punch even under this state. If I properly recover for several days and eat several hundred cans of the Giant Creatures of Starry Skies meat, my body will recover back to its peak state. It’s possible that I might even strike out with ten air-tearing ripples!”

As he looked at the morning star to the horizon, Li Yao’s heart was moving with great undulations. He simply wanted to howl loudly without a single care, to vent his heart’s feelings of pleasure as much as he wanted.

This awakening of deep sleep was completely different from last time with the Dream of Grandeur.

The experiences of the Dream of Grandeur was spotty and blurred, flickering and passing. The memories seemed to have vanished in the blink of an eye and were completely forgotten.

This time, he remembered every detail in the dream!

Ou Yezi’s memories were completed transferred and transformed into his own memories!

Li Yao’s eyes were bright and lively. The bones of his body crackled with explosive ringing. He stood on this small balcony using his fist as a hammer. He fully displayed the One-Hundred-And-Eight-Hands Chaos-Gale Hammer Technique, feeling it to be only flowing and natural. He went through the moves from top to bottom, linking them smoothly. The small balcony become shrouded by the tip of his fists. Circle ripples permeated through the air, causing his body to appear strangely twisted.

“A fleeting Fiend Star? Not bad, not bad. This nickname Fiend Star has quite the nice ring to it. It’s more suitable than the Vulture for the big stage!”

“There will be a day when the name Fiend Star will shake the Federation and spread through the whole Heaven’s Origin Sector!”

Right as Li Yao stretched his muscles to their limits, a shriek suddenly pierced from behind his back.

It was a nurse who had opened the door to come in and was faced with Li Yao standing on the balcony. Who knows what he was up to. Her fright caused even the tray she had held in her hands to fall to the ground.





Home  Forty Millenniums of Cultivation  Chapter 72
 

Chapter 72
 
Chapter 72: A Lizard Transforming to a T-Rex
Translator: Strivon, Ash  Editor: Geoffrey_, Lancent

Li Yao spent the entire day receiving a full-body exam in the hospital.

He didn’t know how many talismans were stuck to his body by the doctor. Then the doctor shoved him into 17~18 strange and bizarre machines. Then there still were four renowned mind-healing-specialist Meditation Healers who tried to hypnotize him in vain, to take a glimpse at his neural field.

Li Yao’s neural field broke through new ground having experienced Ou Yezi’s powerful soul. His mind had changed to be incomparably vast. The four Meditation Healers spent a hair-pulling half a day and were unable to find out why they can’t access his mind. They ended up concluding… Since his spirit root was torn, Li Yao had already lost the brain wave response that most ordinary people should possess.

To summarize, they tried over and over until 3:00 in the afternoon. Floating Spear City’s First Hospital issued a diagnosis report… There’s nothing majorly wrong with Li Yao’s body. Each of his organs was weak only because of his month long coma. Perhaps he needs half a year to a full year of time to recuperate for the functionality of his body to recover to normal.

Li Yao knew the actual cause. It was because consuming Ou Yezi’s memory shards took far too much energy.

As long as he used the Art of the Swallowing Whale to eat several tons of food, he would be able to recover back to normal in 3-5 days.

What do you mean a year to recover? That’s simply a joke.

Soon, a white gowned doctor with a grave expression walked to his bedside. The doctor explained with an expression of being in constipation for several years. The attack from the doped up mutated large-eyed ape caused his Spirit Root to be completely torn. His Actualization Quotient dropped to a state unrecognizable by any father or mother. Only 7% was left. The doctor estimated that he would have to say goodbye to cultivation for life.

Even though things were like this, the doctor still hoped for Li Yao to summon the courage to live life bravely. Though his body was ravaged, he should maintain an unyielding will. Don’t give up hope. And so on and so forth.

Li Yao browsed his diagnosis report meticulously. He compared pages after pages of diagrams and charts of his neural field. Li Yao used his substantially-enforced computational abilities to calculate to the limits. His thoughts coursed with electricity and surmised at lightning speed everything that had happened.

Soon, his pair of eyes flickered and shined. He had thought of a possibility.

boxn ovel. c0m
“I have an approximate understanding why my Spirit Root had suddenly torn and why my Actualization Quotient has fallen to the bottom!”

“Suppose that a 1.8 meter 50 kg thin person expanded to be 2.5 meter 150 kg in a short day’s time due to strange circumstances. His muscles would explode to the peak and he would become a super buff guy… His skin, muscles, veins, and bones surely won’t be able to support him. They will tear over and over until they catch up with the growth of the body!”

“With every tear, he becomes a degree buffer!”

“And my soul grew at incomparable crazy speeds when it was engulfing great amounts of Ou Yezi’s memory shards. Can it be as simple as being a hundred pound skinny guy turning into a three hundred pound super buff dude?”

“My soul simply was a small lizard transforming into prehistoric Tyrannosaurus Rex!”

“My soul grew stronger too quickly. It was impossible for my pineal gland to keep up with the growth of my soul. It could only tear over and over!”

“And when this small lizard had just transformed into a T-Rex, its muscles and skin tore all over its muscles. It looked to be drenched in blood. It would naturally appear incomparably frail before eating large amounts of prey. It would appear to have received a critical injury at first glance! To be dying!”

“But as long as I can find enough prey…”

Li Yao’s eyes flickered with a devilish, stellar light. The corner of his mouth hooked into an arch containing a trace of slight savageness.

“Therefore, everyone else believes that I’ve received a critical injury, that I’m weak to the extreme, that I’ve become trash!”

“But no one knows that I’m actually not weak. I’m actually… Powerful to the point that my body can’t withstand itself!”

Li Yao’s slightly bizarre smile seemed somewhat stupid and dull in the doctor’s eyes.

Doctor Gu was actually under the impression that Li Yao was shocked by the news, that Li Yao was incapable of accepting it in this time period… This was very normal. What sort of cultivation genius can bear to hear the fact that he’s suddenly turned into an invalid?

This was not something that could be comforted with just a few words. He could only hope that time would slowly heal the wound in this fiend star’s heart.

Doctor Gu sighed a breath. He patted Li Yao on the shoulder and left the room.

A moment later, a resolute and unhesitating pair of footsteps sounded from outside. They were like two iron hammers alternately smashing the ground.

“Stomp! Stomp! Stomp! Stomp!”

A military uniformed man wearing black walked with large strides inside.

“What’s a retired military member come here for?” Li Yao was somewhat curious.

This middle aged serviceman wore a well-ironed black military uniform. He lacked an insignia of ranking on his shoulders. It’s a standard attire for retired soldiers.

There were several maimed injuries all over this man’s body. His right hand and left leg were essence prosthetics. Even his left eye was sculpted from jade. Several hundred arcane glyphs were engraved on this eyeball to form a complete Glyph Array, faintly emitting a red light. It was somewhat terrifying to look at.

“Student Li Yao, I have come here as a representative of the Federation’s Disabled Servicemen Association to declare the compensation provided for you by the Federation!”

The disabled servicemen drew his legs together and stood at attention with a “bang”. He gave Li Yao a standard military salute of the Federal Army.

“Compensation?”

Li Yao was stunned. But soon he came to.

Although he knew that he hadn’t received critical injuries and his spirit root wasn’t trash, other people didn’t know.

The Federal Army was the major organizer for the Limit Challenge Competition. The accident at this time had led to the casualties of numerous competitors. Of course, the army would distribute compensation.

And, this accident was caused by a competitor breaking the rules by bringing a doping drug into the competition. The organizers of the competition weren’t able to discover the doping drug ahead of time. It could be said to be negligence on part of the Army.

Therefore, to make up for their negligence, they had to distribute quite a compensation. It might even be an astronomical compensation!

After the serviceman had done his introductions, Li Yao discovered that he was right. Devil Flood Dragon Island’s accident had already entered the military’s highest level of inspection.

Aside from tracking down the main culprit, the important thing was the method in compensating the student casualties.

The accidental student deaths were rather easy to manage. Financial support and compensation were distributed to the families at the standard of a Federal Army soldier sacrificing his life.

But for Li Yao, this victim, the circumstances were somewhat a mess.

This was because his injury can’t be said to be light nor heavy.

Arguing for a light injury, one could say that he didn’t lose a single hair on his body. If he goes through rehabilitation for about a year, he would go back to normal. He would be as healthy and active as before.

But arguing for a heavy injury, one could say that he was originally a cultivation genius who one day was likely to become cultivator with boundless outlooks. But because of this accident, he had completely lost his hope for cultivating.

To the many people obsessed with cultivation, receiving this sort of injury is worse than death.

These two opinions were disputed without end. Rumor has it that in the end, the high ranking military officers observed Li Yao’s battle video on Devil Flood Dragon Island.

Or maybe they were moved by his brilliant performance and decided to give him compensation standard to that of Class 1: Disabled Serviceman of the Federation.

“Class 1: Disabled Serviceman of the Federation!”

Even though Li Yao was prepared, he was still shocked by this exceedingly high status.

The Star Glory Federation faced the invasion of the Demon Beasts year round. The flames of war burnt for 500 years, never completely stifling. The status of servicemen was of the utmost sublimity.

It was precisely due to relying on countless servicemen of the Federation on the front lines casing their heads, bathing in blood, resisting the never ending waves of Demon Beasts that the common citizens behind the front lines could live a peaceful and auspicious life.

So ordinary people had the utmost respect, reverence, and adoration towards servicemen!

And amongst servicemen, needless to say of those who sacrificed their lives, those who received critical injuries and disabilities on the battlefield received the same veneration by society!

Disabled Servicemen were divided into four classes.

“Class 1: Disabled Serviceman of the Federation” was second only to “Special Class Disability”. Those of “Class 1: Disabled Serviceman of the Federation” must be like the serviceman before Li Yao, to be missing a hand and a leg, and even an eye. Only then one would be considered Class 1 Disability.

After retirement, not only will the nation distribute a high pension every month, but all public services like the Underground Crystal Rail Train, the High-Speed Crystal Rail Train, the Public Antigravity Ship, and so on were all free for lifetime!

Aside from this, a large majority of restaurants, dining halls, hotels, and stores will give a different discount specifically for disabled servicemen.

When a restaurant owner discovers a Class 1 Disabled Serviceman dining in his restaurant, he might even give a big wave and refuse to receive a single cent. This was quite a common occurrence.

The Star Glory Federation relied precisely on the officers and soldiers to fight with their lives at stake on the frontline, fearless of death. And the common citizens behind them had warlike, military embracing, and unyielding worshiping spirits. Only in this way could the Federation exist in the Heaven’s Origin Sector where Demon Beasts ran rampant. Only in this way could the Federation grow endlessly stronger and reign supreme!





Home  Forty Millenniums of Cultivation  Chapter 73
 

Chapter 73
 
Chapter 73: Explosive Kill with One Shell
Translator: Strivon, Ash  Editor: Geoffrey_, Lancent

“Student Li Yao, there’s no need to worry. All medical expenses incurred when you were in a coma and all future rehabilitation costs are completely covered by our nation!”


“And 30,000 credits will be wired into your bank account each month starting this month. This is the Class 1: Disabled Servicemen Pension!”

“If you wish to find work, our Disabled Servicemen Association will give you aid!”

“If you want to go to college, we can also set up arrangements so that you won’t need to take the entrance exams. You can directly go to school at the Federation’s First Military College in the Disabled Servicemen Special Class!”

“In addition, come find us without hesitation if you encounter any sort of troubles in society… The Federation’s Disabled Servicemen Association is one of the most powerful organizations in the whole Heaven’s Origin Sector. As soon as there’s a problem, you will have the backing of the total 63,000,000 disabled servicemen of the Federation!”

The black uniformed disabled serviceman spoke these words with complete domination.

“Things have turned big now.” Li Yao felt a bit guilty.

The image of a disabled serviceman of the Federation in his head was one with a head full of white hair, a face full of wrinkles, and a body of essence prosthetics — an old veteran that staggers along as he walks.

Crimson Nimbus Second will always have some retired servicemen of the Federation as guest speakers to give speeches of their heroic deeds of glory on the battlefield.

In circumstances without ammunition and supplies, in circumstances when their spiritual energy was completely depleted, they hefted their inoperable chainswords with their three-to-five squad mates and rushed towards the sky-blotting tide of Demon Beasts!

Li Yao’s heart would become all fired up every time he heard these inspiring and tragic heroic tales; his battlelust would gale forth!

boxn ovel. c0m
The title “Disabled Serviceman of the Federation” was an extremely high honor and was sacred in his mind. To be awarded this title was truly being subjected to shame.

And so with this train of thought, Li Yao decided to speak the truth, “To tell the truth, my injury really isn’t as serious as you believe. I’ll recover as long as I take a good few days to rest. I’m not disabled.”

The disabled serviceman revealed an expression of unconcealed admiration from his eyes. His prosthetic arm patted down heavily onto Li Yao’s shoulder, causing Li Yao to grimace in pain.

“Great kid! I like you! Us men must have an indomitable will just like you. It doesn’t matter what our bodies are, we must be filled with fighting spirit and hope! That’s right! You’re not crippled! The 63,000,000 disabled servicemen of the Federation aren’t crippled! It doesn’t matter how crippled our bodies are, our fighting spirit and battle lust will never be crippled! Whenever our nation demands it, we will suit up and go into battle to explosively kill a Demon Beast with each fist!”

“This is……”

Li Yao had somewhat of a toothache. He figured out that his circumstances would be very hard to explain clearly with just a few sentences.

The middle-aged disabled serviceman spoke, “Student Li Yao, Doctor Gu and I have talked. I understand your circumstances clearly. I know you can’t possibly accept your circumstances in such a short time, but…”

“The nation has national laws. The military has military rules. Rewards and penalties are defined clearly. Only in this way could we have strict compliance!”

“Before you entered the Limit Challenge Competition, you should have signed a document letting you know that all competitors are considered to be ad hoc enlisted military during the competition, possessing the status of a serviceman and having to comply with the orders of the military. Of course, you get to enjoy benefits provided by the military!”

“You faced a mutated large-eyed ape in the competition. You fully demonstrated the bloody battle spirit of the Federal Army by fighting face to face on a treacherous road and braving out victory by slaying the Demon Beast in the end!”

“If you had not struggled in a blood-soaked battle undaunted by danger, there would have likely been much more competitors meeting their bitter ends!”

“You received injuries for the sake of protecting your comrades in the midst of battle while under the status of a serviceman. You are obviously 100% a Disabled Serviceman of the Federation and are qualified to enjoy receiving the treatment of a war hero!”

“Remember this: The Federation never forgets each warrior who struggles for the nation. This compensation belongs to you, not a single cent can be missing!”

“If the nation was unconcerned with their heroes, if the nation remains indifferent when their heroes sink into bad circumstances… Who would defend this kind of nation? Who would fight their battles to the bloody end?”

“So no matter what you say, our nation will at least provide you with all basic necessities for this next half of your life since we can’t help you recover your ability to cultivate. And we will let you receive respect from the masses of society… This is what a nation ought to do. It’s what a nation absolutely must to do!”

The eye’s of this disabled veteran was like two scorching warblades deeply stabbing into Li Yao’s neural field.

Without waiting for Li Yao’s explanation, the disabled serviceman saluted, turned his body, and walked out of the room with large strides.

Despite half of his body being completely made of metal, when he walked, he still maintained a tall and straight posture like a pine tree. The distance between each step was completely identical, as if accurately measured by a ruler.

After the disabled serviceman left, Li Yao sat stunned on the edge of the medical treatment pod for a long time.

“Forget it. There’s no need to think about other matters. My priority is to restore my actual strength completely. This fact should naturally explain everything clearly.”

Even though this man had promised that he wouldn’t need to take the entrance exams and could directly enter the Federation’s First Military College’s and go to school as part of the Disabled Serviceman Special Class.

Li Yao immediately rejected this thought still.

One of the only reasons was that he was unwilling to take up the convenience of the Federation’s Disabled Servicemen.

A more important reason was that Li Yao still had not given up the idea of entering Deep Sea University.

“Only 7% remains of my Actualization Quotient, but this is just a temporary state. As long as I have enough energy and I go through appropriate cultivation training, I will soon be able to recover to my peak state!”

“There’s still a month’s time until the entrance exams. I can still give it my all!”

Upon discovering that he had actually consumed the memory shards of the Hundred Smelting Guild’s leader, Ou Yezi, larger ambitions were expanding at flying speeds in Li Yao’s heart,

Ou Yezi represented the highest level of crafting techniques in the ancient era of cultivation — an unsurpassable pinnacle.

And similarly, Deep Sea University possesses the strongest crafting techniques in the modern cultivation world.

If he could combine these two together…

“Godsword Lithe, Warblade Carnage Dragon, Spear Soul Devourer… These masterwork weapons crafted by Ou Yezi are powerful enough to slay old Spirit Transformation Stage monsters!”

“Although the treasures of heaven and earth needed to craft these masterwork weapons are hard to come by and there are many critical steps in crafting that are hard to reproduce in modern techniques, the theory of the essence operation is still the same!”

“If I could one day engulf these memory shards of Ou Yezi crafting these masterwork weapons, mastering the techniques behind these ancient weapons, figuring out the principles of the essence operations driving them, I’ll take these techniques and implement them into modern artifacts.”

“For example, if I can analyze and figure out the essence operation model of the three masterwork weapons Godsword Lithe, Warblade Carnage Dragon, and Spear Soul Devourer and apply it to the main cannon of crystal battleships, I’ll be able to craft three joint main cannons for battleships possessing the characteristics of these three masterwork weapons!”

“A single shell would be able to explosively kill an old Spirit Transformation Stage monster!”

“I can eliminate a mountain full of old Nascent Soul Stage monsters with a single volley from these three joint cannons!”

“How unreasonably powerful would that be? What tyranny! What a crisp and ecstatic matter!”

Li Yao’s heart stirred as he thought to this point. He took out his microprocessor from his bedside drawer and opened his e-crane application.

There were several hundred unanswered messages in his e-crane. Li Yao skimmed over at lightning speeds; the majority of the messages were from friends.

Among them were several dozens of messages sent by his bro for life Meng Jiang. They were all inquiries about his condition.

He looked at the times and found out they were all from within the last four weeks.

Li Yao typed out the three words “I have awakened” at lightning speeds and sent out the message. The other side did not respond; thinking about it, Meng Jiang should still be in class.

Then Li Yao entered Xie Tingxian’s e-crane number, searched him up, and sent him the following message: “This is Li Yao. I’ve awakened.”

Doctor Gu had just given this number to him.

Soon, Xie Tingxian’s wrinkle covered face flashed out with a paper crane from the hologram. He spoke with surprise and delight, “Student Li Yao, I just received the news from Doctor Gu. I was just about to get in touch with you. I didn’t expect you would wake up so soon. This is really something to celebrate!”





Home  Forty Millenniums of Cultivation  Chapter 74
 

Chapter 74
 
Chapter 74: Time and Tide Wait for No Man
Translator: Strivon, Ash  Editor: Geoffrey_, Lancent

“Professor Xie, many thanks for your concern. I just finished a full-body inspection. The doctor said my body is a bit weak is all. I will start rehabilitation training immediately. I will attend the entrance exams in a month for sure, during which my number one ambition remains to be Deep Sea University.”

Li Yao had spoken filled with confidence.

Xie Tingxian’s smile stiffened. He said rather awkwardly, “Student Li Yao, I’ve recently discussed your condition with your assigned doctor. We’ve also discussed to a point of understanding about your situation… In my opinion, there’s no need for you to be hasty. The most important thing for you to do is to first properly take care of your body! Only a month remains until the entrance exams. No matter how much you try your best to cultivate, you won’t be able to produce a good score on the exam and there’s even the chance that you might completely break your body. Would that be worth it? It would be better to spend a year to recover and wait till next year. This would be good for everyone, right?”

Li Yao was stunned. His mind coursed with electricity and quickly understood. “Professor Xie, your school won’t give me a preferential score?”

Xie Tingxian’s old face went red. He hesitated for a long time before he nodded as he spoke, “Student Li Yao, you need to understand. To make the decision to give a preferential score treatment is an extremely serious matter in regards to time-established advanced education establishments such as Deep Sea University who possess deep inner resources. Every student given a preferential score need to go through a strict inspection. And the quota creates an utterly fierce competition. No one ever thought you would awaken in such a short time of a month according to your previous circumstance. So… someone else has seized your spot.”

After a pause, Xie Tingxian appeared to make a firm decision and continued, “And to tell the truth. Even though you’re awake now, only 7% of your Actualization Quotient is left. The chances of you testing into Deep Sea University this year are far too uncertain. Even if your required score decreases by twenty points or even thirty points, would that be of any use? Listen to me. Spend a year at home to properly recover and take a test for your Actualization Quotient next year. If your Actualization Quotient is restored to 70% or above, I will fight for you to receive a preferential score treatment or even special enrollment. I vow this to you, Student Li Yao!”

A person called from behind Xie Tingxian right at this moment. Xie Tingxian wiped off some sweat and said, “I’m terribly sorry, Student Li Yao. I’m in the middle of directing an extremely complicated project. We’re assisting the military with crafting the newest model of individual assault artifacts. I wasn’t able to make time to get in touch with you over the past few days… You are welcome to come contact me more in the future when there’s time. If you have any questions regarding cultivating, you can discuss them with me. I will help you with all my strength!”

“… I understand. Many thanks for your kindness, Professor Xie.”

Li Yao closed his e-crane application somewhat disappointedly. He blinked his eyes. He felt a sadness and frustration indescribable.

It was inevitable and expected that Deep Sea University canceled his qualifications to receive a preferential score treatment. According to the rules, he was “slain” by the large-eyed ape and totally lost all his points, even though his points beforehand was higher than the collective total of the next 9-10 students.

What’s even more was that all that remains of his Actualization Quotient was 7%. Anyone would take him to already have become a pile of trash through and through upon seeing this number.

boxn ovel. c0m
Not a single school would give preferential treatment for this kind of trash.

But Li Yao still had a trace of disappointment born from the bottom of his heart.

“I know you don’t believe in me right now, Professor Xie. There isn’t anyone who would believe in me now. But that doesn’t matter. I’ll use my entrance exam score to speak for me a month from now!”

“I don’t need special enrollment, and I don’t need preferential score treatment. I will enter Deep Sea University properly and frankly using my own strength!”

“But if you were able to believe in me in this moment for just a little bit. How great would that be…”

After thinking and pondering, Li Yao decided to first go to school and check out what’s going on.

He remembered that Headmaster Zhao Shude treated him with complete importance while he was back on Devil Dragon Island. The Headmaster was even willing to represent the Crimson Nimbus Guild in signing an Entrusted Education contract with him.

He had turned into trash in the eyes of others; this contract certainly is null and void. But he could ask the teacher of the Important Class to create a thirty day final sprint training program for him and also divert some school resources to nurture him. To let him strive with all his might in the entrance exams… This single request wouldn’t be excessive right?

……

Upon leaving the hospital, Li Yao chose to ride the underground crystal rail in order to save on time.

He was just about to take out his gold transfer card and swipe at the underground ticket window when a crystal processor monitor within the window suddenly shot out with faint green ray. The ray scanned Li Yao’s face and went beep beep, turning gold.

An utterly stiff voice sounded out on the spot, “This passenger should be a Class 1 Serviceman of the Federation according to facial recognition. This passenger may ride all public transport within the Federation free of charge.”

The missus behind the ticket window went “ah!” and her face was full of admiration. As she passed over the ticket covered with glyph script, she looked through the window with curiosity to size up Li Yao.

Her beautiful eyes immediately sparkled and shined as soon as she found out how unexpectedly young Li Yao was. She shouted with amazement: “Oh my! You’re so young and yet you’re already a Class 1 Disabled Serviceman of the Federation? How amazing! My name is Li Sisi. Can we get to know each other?”

With that hungry appearance of hers, she would probably have directly leapt out if it were not for the counter blocking her way.

Li Yao didn’t expect to enjoy the status of being a Class 1 Disabled Serviceman of the Federation so soon. His cheeks burned red from the hungry fixed eyes of the ticket seller missus.

“Crazy! So the status of a Class 1 Disabled Serviceman of the infantry actually has this kind of power? No wonder so many hot-blooded youths strive over each other to enter the Federal army, to be willing to struggle and be bathed in blood — to purge evil!”

It was already four in the afternoon by the time he arrived at Crimson Nimbus Second.

At this time, the first and second year students were starting to be dismissed one after another. Quite a few flying shuttles were descending and rising at the parking lot to the side of the school.

The third year students also finished up their heavy morning classes. They were right in the middle of walking beneath the shade of the trees on campus or on the sports field to get fresh air; they were preparing to continue with an all night cramming session after dinner.

As Li Yao walked through the school gate, he raised his head to take a look. The entrance exam countdown sign was still there. Upon it were the words: “Time until the entrance exams: 31 Days 7 Hours 44 Minutes and 32 Seconds remain!”

Time and tide wait for no man!

Li Yao clenched his fist tight and he felt his hot blood start to boil in every vein of his body. He itched to start cultivating like crazy right now.

He walked with large strides towards the classroom.

At first, nobody recognized him due to his quite petite figure; he simply was just skin and bones. But soon, a student pointed at him and shouted, “Isn’t that Li Yao?”

“What? Li Yao? That fleeting and passing Fiend Star? Wasn’t he in an accident on Devil Flood Dragon Island and is still sleeping in a coma?”

“It really is Li Yao! He actually woke up! But he’s gotten so skinny. It’s like he’s shed his form!”

“Ah! He was quite buff in the video of him in Devil Flood Dragon Island. I never expected he would turn into this purely miserable and ghastly appearance!”

“I’ve heard that his brain took a mental attack and his spirit root to be torn to shreds. Only 7% of his Actualization Quotient is left. He’s simply a cripple… What has he come to school for?”

The numerous students whispered secretly in each others’ ears.

The students who were just about to leave also halted in their place. Some students even faced towards their parents to explain the situation. They dragged their parents to come look at the lively scene.

After all, Li Yao was still the man of the hour at Crimson Nimbus Second, even though it’s more of the negative type of famous.

Li Yao’s five senses were quite keener than they were in the past. He heard the whispers of the numerous students clearly; however, he did not stop moving to explain himself.

Many things don’t need to be explained. Just wait until the entrance exams scores are announced, then everyone will naturally know that this Fiend Star absolutely isn’t fleeting and passing by!

Only, a tall figure appeared right in front of him before he could enter the school building.

This guy brought a smile on his face. Faint sneering and ridicule were contained deeply in his irises. It was Helian Lie.





Home  Forty Millenniums of Cultivation  Chapter 75
 

Chapter 75
 
Chapter 75: Abandoning All Civility
Translator: Strivon, Ash  Editor: Geoffrey_, Lancent

“Fellow Student Li Yao, I never thought you would wake up so quickly. Your vitality is quite astonishing, just like an unkillable cockroach. Really, congratulations!”


Helian Lie towered above him arrogantly. He stooped down next to Li Yao’s ear and spoke softly.

The surrounding students were unable to hear his words. They could only see the overflowing cordial smile on his face. They even believed that these two people had already resolved their conflicts and that Helian Lie was welcoming Li Yao back to school!

Li Yao raised his eyebrows. After swallowing a great amount of Ou Yezi’s memory shards, his true strength had increased astonishingly. This fellow Helian Lie was completely reduced to the same level of existence as cannon fodder. He really wasn’t worth getting angry over.

Once again, Li Yao thought of Zheng Dongming.

Only those monsters like Zheng Dongming who can cultivate in both spiritual energy and tenebrum were qualified to become his enemy or prey, to force him to bring out his full spirit in the hunt.

Helian Lie was indistinguishable from the food between his teeth!

“Fellow Student Helian Lie, please pardon me.” Li Yao’s face was expressionless. He had spoken completely undisturbed.

Helian Lie’s eyebrows shot up. It seemed that he didn’t anticipate that Li Yao would still dare to be undisturbed in front of him, even to the point of unconcern.

A fierce expression flitted past Helian Lie’s face. He spoke through gritted teeth, “Li Yao, do you still believe you’re the tyrannical cultivator genius on Devil Flood Dragon Island? Bah! Right now you’re a cripple with an actualization quotient of 7%. A piece of trash! You still dare to be arrogant in front of me? I have a hundred different ways to toy you to death!”

“Hmm?”

boxn ovel. c0m
Li Yao squinted his eyes. His gaze turned sharp like two ice picks fiercely stabbing into Helian Lie’s eyes.

Helian Lie felt only a sinister chill in his neural field. It was as if his pair of eyes had been ferociously stabbed, causing them to flow with tears. He subconsciously retreated two steps.

By the time he came to, Li Yao had already moved around his body.

“You…”

Helian Lie looked at his surroundings. Everyone was looking at him dumbstruck. They didn’t understand why he had suddenly froze; it was like he was terrified.

Helian Lie’s fury suddenly raged. But right before he was about to move to intercept Li Yao, he suddenly saw a dark-skinned middle-aged man walking towards Li Yao.

Helian Lie relaxed and spoke with a devilish laughter, “Fellow student Li Yao, looks likes the head instructor has some business with you. You should prepare yourself mentally. Don’t be too excited… I’ll wait for you to come out of his office, then let’s chat some more!”

Li Yao sized up the dark-skinned face with some suspicion.

The name of this head instructor was Hei Yiming, but all the students called him the “Black Faced God”. This guy’s methods were strict in the school and he was known to be ruthless. He liked to appear in the back of the classroom in complete secret to grab students who broke the rules. He was abhorred by all the students and was infamous for being stealthy and fierce.

“Student Li Yao, our school has just received news of your awakening. We were just about ready to send people to the hospital to find you. We didn’t expect you would come by yourself to school! Excellent, let’s go to the Instructor Office. I shall represent the school in communicating the issue about you attending school from this moment on!” the Black Faced God spoke coldly.

Li Yao frowned from the Black Faced God’s unkind tone. Usually, this guy had a face of a dead person, but today his expression has become especially strange. His expression seemed to actually reveal a trace of… pity?

Anyway, Li Yao didn’t say much else. With eyes staring at the back of the Black Faced God, he arrived at the Instructor’s Office.

In the Instructor’s’ Office, several teachers were in the middle of conversations in low voices, but they were distracted when they saw Li Yao enter the room. They exchanged glances containing profound meaning and left the room one by one.

The last one to go even closed the door lightly.

The Black Faced God coughed dryly. A bit of awkwardness appeared on his ice-cold face. As he sat on a chair, his fingertip subconsciously rapped against the table. Finally, he spoke aloud the school’s decision.

Li Yao was silent for a long time after the Black Faced God was done speaking. The trace of an electric aura congealed gradually deep in his serene eyes. At last, his rage reached to the peak where he found it almost funny and ridiculous. He said indifferently, “You want me to take a break from school?”

“Student Li Yao, I know how you feel right now and I’m extremely sympathetic towards your misfortune, but I still ask you to keep your cool when you hear me out… Our Crimson Nimbus Second is a famous and excellent high school in Floating Spear City. We ask strictly of our students. Not to mention the Important and Ascending Classes, even for the Common Class students we require an Actualization Quotient of at least 25% or above!”

At first, the Black Faced God was even a bit ashamed, but his expression soon turned calm. It seemed that he even convinced himself.

He rapped against the table calmly yet not slowly and said, “Your body’s current condition clearly isn’t suitable for learning and cultivating at the rigorous level of the third grade. You would barely persevere. Not only won’t you be able to test into a university, you will completely break your body. Wouldn’t it be better to take a step back and first go through a year break from school? You can slowly nurse yourself back to health for a year, or even two or three years. It doesn’t matter. When your body recovers, when your Actualization Quotient increases, you can still come back and continue with learning!”

Li Yao only gave a sneer. He did not answer these words. The fury in his heart expanded, filling his chest to the point of bursting. It seemed he was about to explode out with lava.

He very much expected to have his special enrollment and preferential score treatment qualifications canceled by Deep Sea University. Before coming to school, he also thought that Crimson Nimbus Guild would never proceed with the recommendation to enter Star Nebula University for education. An even more of an impossibility was Crimson Nimbus Guild signing a job contract with him.

These were all reasonable matters in this business. He did not complain, and he was not disappointed.

The thing was… He never thought that Crimson Nimbus Second would force him to take a break from school for a year in this key moment. And they wanted to see the state of his body recovery next year — to see if he could continue with school!

In the end, Li Yao represented Crimson Nimbus Second in entering the competition at Devil Flood Dragon Island. If he had really gotten the number one ranking in points at that time, besides himself reaping great benefits, Crimson Nimbus Second would also be radiating with pride. They would have become the most famous school known by everyone in the South East Region.

But right now, he has been injured and has become a cripple. The school discarded him like a piece of trash, and now they’re kicking him aside?

Li Yao’s thoughts coursed at lightning speed. His eyes squinted into two blade-like slits.

He had just woken up. The school absolutely wouldn’t have made the decision for him to take a break from school so quickly under normal procedures.

The school would have first gone to the hospital to comfort him if they truly were sincere in making their decision for his sake. They would simultaneously ask for his own opinion, give him a few days of time to decide, and give him all sorts of compensation at the same time.

After all, this was a major matter where a student’s future was determined. How could they be this careless?

There has to be people playing games in the background!

“I understand. It’s Helian Lie right?” Li Yao spoke in a thick voice.

A trace of panic flashed on the Black Faced God’s face, but he quickly recovered to normal. He dragged out his voice as he spoke, “Student Li Yao, this is the best decision made by the school in regards to your individual circumstances. This is most appropriate for the school and you. This has nothing to do with other students. Don’t make things too complicated! Really, go home and slowly self-cultivate for a few years. You might even be able to recover your Actualization Quotient. The school will still welcome you back unconditionally when that happens…”

“Haha. Hahahaha!” Li Yao couldn’t hold back at last. He laughed absolutely unrestrained.

“W-w-what’s the meaning of this?” A layer of cold sweat trickled out from Black Faced God’s forehead. No matter how much he wiped, he couldn’t wipe his forehead clean.

He felt an incomparably brutal aura suddenly surge from this cripple in front of him. It was even more fearsome than Zhao Shude, who was a Foundation Building Stage cultivatorthe Zhao Shude as a Foundation Stage Cultivator.

“I appreciate the good intentions offered by your school; however, there’s no need for me to take a break from school. From this moment on, I will straightforwardly quit school. I will no longer be a student of Crimson Nimbus Second!”

Li Yao had suddenly put away his smile. His expression had changed to become incomparably intense. He had spoken pausing after each word.

After he was done, he strode outside with large steps without looking back.

Ridiculous. It was really too ridiculous. Helian Lie really believes that he’s turned into a cripple. He believes that he can pat himself on the back by toying with Li Yao using these methods. Little did he know that the Li Yao at this time was stronger by three-to-five times than the Li Yao back on Devil Flood Dragon Island. And, his potential for growth increased by several hundred fold.

The great big world had vast seas and wide skies outside. Where can’t he cultivate? Since Crimson Nimbus Second was this blind, everyone might as well sever ties and see who will regret it in the end!

“Student Li Yao, you don’t need to do this. The school never intended for you to quit school. STUDENT LI YAO!” the Black Faced God was sweating as he shouted dryly.

Li Yao suddenly stopped when walked to the door, turning his head slowly. He gave an expressionless glance at the Black Faced God.

Just this single glance caused the Black Faced God to feel his heart be grasped firmly by an invisible claw. The claw pulled fiercely, causing him to shout out “Ahh!” in pain. Tears even flowed uncontrollably from his eye sockets.

What’s going on?

This cripple was clearly as thin as a rake. He looked like he would topple merely by a gust of wind. How could his gaze be so intense? It was simply like a sword that stabbed directly in his heart!

The Black Faced God held his sternum as he gasped for a long time. By the time he raised his head, all he saw was the large open door. Li Yao had long since disappeared.

The Black Faced God felt an unfathomable fear for the first time from the bottom of his heart.

He felt the school had made an irreparable mistake. A gargantuan mistake that they would soon regret.





Home  Forty Millenniums of Cultivation  Chapter 76
 

Chapter 76
 
Chapter 76: A Hammer Decides
Translator: Strivon, Ash  Editor: Geoffrey_, Lancent

Li Yao wandered, feeling pleased on the path under the shady trees on the campus with two hands in his pockets.


He really had not even a bit of reluctance leaving Crimson Nimbus Second. This was a private high school. They thought in terms of money. The high amount of money he paid for tuition was only able to get him into the worst class, the common class. Other than the last month when he was under Teacher Sun Biao’s care, no other teachers had taken him seriously. And he was actually ruthlessly kicked to the side when he came back from the only time he represented the school in entering a competition.

Even though there was the certain element of Helian Lie playing games on the inside, the school didn’t have the intentions of persisting in fighting for Li Yao.

What sort of loss would there be in leaving this kind of school?

“Right now, I’m going to enjoy the status of being a Class 1 Disabled Serviceman of the Federation. I’ll be able to receive preferential treatment from quite a few cultivation gyms. In the worst case, I’ll find a high-quality cultivation gym in the last month and cultivate on my own. Then I’ll sign up individually to enter the entrance exams. I just don’t believe that I won’t be able to test into Deep Sea University!”

Li Yao resolved himself firmly. He spat out a long breath and spread out his arms. He felt only that the sky was high and the clouds were faint. An unfathomable grand feeling surged from his chest.

“Fuck you! Crimson Nimbus Second!”

A shadow obstructed the top of his head right at this moment. Helian Lie had appeared once more in front of him.

Li Yao was stunned at first, but quickly he let out a laughter from his heart.

His laughter was utterly vicious. He was like a stomach rumbling prehistoric t-rex discovering a hungry wolf. Although it was as thin as a match, it was perfect to grind his teeth with!

“This is precisely what’s called refusing to walk an available road of heaven and instead bursting into the doorless hells. Helian Lie, you’re seeking your own death. Don’t blame me!” Li Yao laughed coldly in his heart.

boxn ovel. c0m
“I’ve heard you went into a fury in the administration office and directly quit school~ Fellow Student Li Yao!” Helian Lie spoke with a smile. He purposely spoke loudly to let all the surrounding students hear.

“What? Li Yao quit school?”

“That’s quite normal. He’s just trash with only 7% of his Actualization Quotient left. What can he do if he doesn’t quit school? It’s not like that he can test into the Nine Elites right?”

“What a real pity. I remember that he was quite fierce last month on Devil Flood Dragon Island in the Limit Challenge Competition!”

“It doesn’t matter how fierce you are. If you offend Helian Lie in Crimson Nimbus Second, you won’t have a good outcome to enjoy!”

Quite a few students discovered the confrontation between Helian Lie and Li Yao. The surrounding students withdrew one after another to the not far distance in order to spectate cautiously. Everybody’s tongue was waggling. No one thought optimistically for Li Yao.

“Helian Lie, it was you proposed the idea for me to take a break from school for a year, right?” Li Yao laughed indifferently.

… If the fierce people back in the Artifact Graveyard, like Fatty Leung or Wild Wolf, were to see Li Yao revealing this kind of smile, they would run for sure to the furthest distance they can run.

No one was willing to be the target of this smiling Vulture.

However, it seemed that no one knew the significance of this smile on campus.

Helian Lie maliciously laughed. His pair of eyes seemed to be bulging out as he spoke through gritted teeth, “You got it. It was me who used my family’s influence to force you to take a break from school. And what can you do about it? To tell you the truth, even if you hadn’t voluntarily quit school, I would have thought of a way for you to never be able to enter the gate of Crimson Nimbus Second ever again. I just want to exterminate you, and what can you do about that?”

“And my father has already bribed practically all the famous and excellent high schools in Floating Spear City. Not a single quality school will accept you, you piece of trash!”

“As for that damned old Sun who supported you… I’m terribly sorry. When he heard the news of your spirit root being torn, his old internal wounds left from several dozen years ago flared up again, leading to his heart rupturing. He was in the hospital for two weeks. Now, he’s already quit all jobs at school to enjoy a life at home in retirement!”

The more Helian spoke, the louder his voice got. He towered arrogantly above Li Yao and extended a finger, jabbing with force at Li Yao’s chest. He howled with incomparable pleasure.

“What’s wrong? Weren’t you quite ferocious back on Devil Flood Dragon Island? Didn’t you rely solely on your own strength to blow up several dozen people into the skies? Just how domineering, just how mighty, just how arrogant you were at that time! But look! Look at you now! Only 7% remains of your Actualization Quotient. You’ve shrunk to just skin and bones. I can cause you to fall by stabbing with a single finger!”

“What does this show? This shows that trash will forever be trash. Even if a gust of wind would occasionally blow you to the skies, soon you will drop to the ground. Striking you back to your true place. Becoming a pile of trash once more!”

Li Yao picked his ears as he spoke dully with an expressionless face. “I loathe three hundred twenty four things the most in my life. The 138th thing I loathe is when people call me trash. The 275th thing I loathe is when people use the finger to jab me… Can you stop it?”

“I just want to jab you, and what can you do about it?”

Helian Lie’s excitement warped his entire face. The least bit of the elegant handsome and bright look couldn’t be seen. “I’ve cultivated like crazy this month. My Actualization Quotient has reached 78%!”

“It’s a given I’ll test into the Nine Elites. I might even seize the Top Scorer title in Floating Spear City’s entrance exams, treading onto the world of cultivators from that time on. I’ll become an unsurpassable cultivator! And you… will forever be a piece of trash! Trash! TRASH! You refuse to accept this? Well, you’re welcome to find me for revenge. I’ll wait for you patiently for 10 years, 20 years, 30 years! Trash!”

“No need. I’m not the type to hold a grudge.” Li Yao spoke without thinking, “I’m the type who takes his revenge on the spot when there’s animosity.”

His hand suddenly shot out like lightning before the final word left his mouth. He gripped fixed Helian Lie’s finger that was jabbing his sternum.

Before Helian Lie could even react in the least, he felt as if his finger had stabbed into a blob of magma. It was burning to an astonishing degree, causing him to start to subconsciously withdraw back, but unexpectedly, he didn’t withdraw.

Li Yao squeezed with force, causing a few cracking sounds to burst out. Helian Lie’s finger bones were squeezed into shattered bones. A few short finger bones were squeezed into 70~80 fragments. His finger was turned into a soft worm!

Helian Lie’s originally flush red faced changed deathly pale in a flash. A terrified and shocked expression flashed across his face. Before his expression could settle down, his expression was replaced by an even more twisted painful expression. Li Yao had actually kicked Helian Lie in the lower stomach.

All Helian Lie felt was a high-speed crystal rail train directly colliding and entering below his belly button. He was hit rigidly into letting out a few drops of urine. His entire body suddenly flew several dozen meters and crashed ferociously into a big tree. The tree shook, causing its branches to shake crazily and its leaves to fly randomly like drops of rain.

Before he could scream a first blood-curdling screech, he was overtaken by a second blood-curdling screech. The two screeches superimposed to become a strange shriek like that of a neutered chicken.

“AHHHH!…”

“The 47th hand of the Chaos-Gale Hammer Technique, Heart-Piercer Hammer!”

Li Yao’s legs spread out like a bow drawn to its limits. He crossed five meters with a single step. And he crossed to be in front of Helian Lie with two steps. His 10 toes were like 10 iron hooks, tearing through his hard cultivation shoes and stabbing deeply into the earth. The back of his foot had veins throbbing like crazy and every strand of muscle fiber pulsed chaotically. His body extended forward at an incomparably fast speed. From his foot to his calf. From his calf to his thigh. Then to his abs, his pecs… A ripple of muscles surged like the tide. In the end, they converged to the end of his right arm. A fist punched out, bringing with it seven explosions of “Bang Bang Bang Bang Bang Bang Bang”. Layers and layers, folds and folds of skull-cleaving air ripples smashed against Helian Lie’s body.

“*CRACK!”

The bark suddenly exploded on the back of giant tree behind Helian Lie, causing a clear and distinct imprint of a fist to appear!

The screech came to an end. It was as if Helian Lie was hammered fixed into the tree. His expression was lifeless for a long time before he suddenly went “Puu”, wilding spouting out a bloody mist.

He could not hold on any longer. He hugged his stomach with his hands and slowly kneeled in front of Li Yao. Then his two hands landed on the ground to support him and started to vomit in large mouthfuls.

The skin of Li Yao’s entire arm had exploded and ruptured. Fresh blood dripped and dropped.

If a medical expert cultivator were to come and examine his bones, the cultivator would certainly discover microfractures covering all over the bones in his arm.

After all, he had just awakened. His body was far too overtaxed and was incapable of bearing such an intense Heart-Piercer Hammer. This fist caused his body the same enormous harm. The pain spread like wildfire along the tips of every nerve fiber.

What was different about him from Helian Lie was that… He could take it.

Li Yao grabbed Helian Lie’s ear and pulled it with all his strength. Half of Helian Lie’s ear was torn off. The pain was so much that Helian Lie couldn’t even cry out at all. His pair of legs thrashed randomly. The urine soaked spot in the crotch of his pants grew larger and larger.

Going close to Helian Lie’s ear, Li Yao spoke articulately by pausing after each word, “Can’t even take a single blow. You are… garbage!”





Home  Forty Millenniums of Cultivation  Chapter 77
 

Chapter 77
 
Chapter 77: The Scarlet Flame Queen
Translator: Strivon, Ash  Editor: Geoffrey_, Lancent

A silence. A deathly silence was all around!

There were several hundred students congregated around these two. Each one of them looked as if they had sunk into an incomparably absurd nightmare. They completely weren’t capable of understanding everything that had happened.

Everyone from the first years to the third years, from the students to the parents, looked at each other in confusion. The countless bewildered expressions all turned incomparably crazed, condensing into a single question:

“Did you see that? How about you, did you see that? Everyone saw that, right? I’m not the only one whose eyes are playing tricks on me, making me see this hallucination, right?”

Such a large campus gave birth to a strange silence. The sound of Helian Lie vomiting stood out alone. He vomited until he was dizzy and dim, practically vomiting out all his intestines.

“He. he. he…”

Only after a long time passed did some people pinch their thighs to come back to their senses. They said “He” for quite a while; they were actually unable to speak half a sentence.

“This cripple Li Yao actually sent Helian Lie flying with a single kick. Then he caused him to vomit by punching with a single fist?” Finally, there were some people who were able to stammeringly squeeze out a sentence.

It was as if a floodgate was opened by this sentence. The just-deathly silent campus turned incomparably noisy in a flash. Everyone tore their throats in producing gasps of shock and disbelief.

“Did we get this wrong? Didn’t Li Yao receive a critical injury and become a cripple? Isn’t there only 7% of his Actualization Quotient remaining? How could he be this powerful? So powerful that Helian Lie is completely no match for him?”

“Quitting school? This kind of expert is actually quitting school? What the heck is the school doing!”

boxn ovel. c0m
“I’ve seen his battle videos on Devil Flood Dragon Island. He didn’t look to be as ferocious during that time. What the hell is going on? He’s simply much more powerful than he was a month ago!”

“He clearly looks as thin as a match! But when he punched out with that fist just then, his entire body seemed to be pumped with air, expanding by a factor in a flash! Were my eyes blurry? Was I mistaken?”

“Your eyes weren’t blurred. I also saw it. That one fist was super ferocious; it had the faint hint of ancient martial techniques. But it’s much more exquisite than the ancient martial techniques taught by our school. Look, you guys! Even the back of that large tree exploded from the strike!”

“Wow! It’s true! How crazy! Is this still a high school student?”

Li Yao spat out a breath slowly. All he felt was that his mind was clear and the air was crisp. The resentment that had filled his body had been swept clean, giving him an indescribable happiness. He did not feel like getting involved with his fellow students. So he strode open his legs, stepped over Helian Lie’s body like stepping over a dead dog, and headed walking towards the school gate.

A few dumbstruck teachers were standing to the side. Their bodies were completely frozen. They didn’t know if they should go up and stop Li Yao.

Right at this moment, an ear-piercing rumble permeated over Li Yao’s head, sounding like an arriving giant beast.

Li Yao squinted his eyes and raised his head to look. He saw a flame shoot from the southeast over here at lightning speeds. It cut the skies in two, looking like a sharp flaming warblade. It reached the skies over the school in a flash and orbited around the school in a circle, creating a flaming tornado.

It was an incomparably domineering flying shuttle!

Its rumbling sound was like a great, wild giant beast howling, drawing the attention of the other students. Quite a few people raised their heads to take a look and found that they were unable to take their eyes off it. The knowledgeable students cried in astonishment:

“It’s the Scarlet Flame Battle Shuttle! It’s just as famous as the Mystic Bird Battle Shuttle, the Scarlet Flame Battle Shuttle!”

“Wow! It really is the Scarlet Flame Battle Shuttle! You can tell from its sound! It’s the highest quality model! Its Propulsion Glyph Array went through special customization to allow its speed to burst out to two times the speed of sound! It’s a super amazing top-grade flying shuttle!”

“It’s too beautiful! It’s simply just like how they show it in the ads, a mass of concentrated flame! Its design is totally different from the Mystic Bird Batte Shuttle, but it has the same kind of complete boldness to it! It’s incomparably tyrannical!”

“Wow! You can’t find this shuttle for cheaper than 30 million right?”

“30 million? That’s just the base model! This top-grade version with its specifically customized Propulsion Glyph Array can cost at least 80 million!”

“Who else can drive such an unrestrained flying shuttle besides Demon Blade Peng Hai? To come to our school?”

The Scarlet Flame Battle Shuttle made one more circular loop in the air under the surrounding incomparably envious gazes of everyone. Finally, the shuttle found its target. It made an utterly strange, sharp angled turn in the air and stabbed down, aiming at Li Yao.

“Whoosh!”

Li Yao closed his eyes subconsciously. All he felt was a shooting star pierce through the sky heading straight in front of him!

The Scarlet Flame Battle Shuttle came to a stop at low altitude at a distance of 3-4 meters away from Li Yao. It was like a mass of raging flames hovering in the void.

This was a flying shuttle with a completely different style of design than that of the Mystic Bird Battle Shuttle. The Mystic Bird Battle Shuttle was stealthy, minimalist, and profoundly concealed. In contrast, this Flame Battle Shuttle was totally a byword for aggressiveness, domination, and unrestrained. It was as if this shuttle was made by directly taking lava and congealing it with the skeletal remains of a phoenix. It could burn a path to your heart with just a glance of an eye. It made people be fired up with hot blood, igniting their souls!”

“Tssss…”

The cockpit door to the Scarlet Flame Battle Shuttle opened. Wearing a red tank top and shorts that were as revealing as you could imagine, with skin as exquisite as honey, with a series of eight bells tied to her ankle, a long legged woman leapt out of the shuttle.

“Gasp!”

Everyone took in a breath of cold air.

This woman was not beautiful in the traditional sense, but she was the type that was best at attracting people’s eyes. She was like a forever radiating tiny sun. An unmatched beauty, no matter how devastatingly beautiful, would be incapable of seizing away people’s gazes as long as she was present.

“What a young woman! I’m guessing she must be at most in her twenties and she actually drives a luxury flying shuttle worth nearly a 100 million!”

“Her aura is so powerful! I can’t even breath from the pressure! She has to be a cultivator right?”

“She’s certainly a cultivator and a very ferocious one at that. Even if she hasn’t reached the same level as Fiend Blade Peng Hai, she’s at least around the same level as Headmaster Zhao. Her aura is way too powerful.”

“Her eyes are super sharp; they’re simply like two blades. Two scorching blades. Scary! She’s way too scary!”

The surrounding observers were chatting animatedly. Not one of them dared to look face to face against this tiny sun. They held their heads low and whispered amongst themselves.

In an instant, everyone had taken the matter between Li Yao and Helian Lie and threw it to the back of their minds.

Everyone discussed in low voices. They could tell that this woman had a large background with a single glance. Who did she come looking for here at Crimson Nimbus Second?

Even Li Yao was stupefied in place. It took a long time before he spoke, “Ding… Ding…”

“Sister Ling, or Ding-ling-dang-lang. It’s up to you!” With a large wave of her hand, Ding Lingdang slapped Li Yao on the shoulder. She spoke with complete domination, “Come then. Sister is treating you for a meal!”

“You came here for me?”

Li Yao blinked his eyes, unable to get over his shock. Shouldn’t this woman long have returned to the Grand Desolate?

“Nonsense! I was in Floating Spear City for a whole month, precisely waiting for you to wake up! I got some information five days ago about an extremely rare Winged Indigo Shark roaming about the Far East Ocean. Its swim bladder is a priceless treasure. After going through decoction, the swim bladder has an extremely good recovery effect for patients in comas. I just paid a visit to the Far East Ocean. It took me three days to finally hunt down a Winged Indigo Shark. I didn’t expect that you would wake up already and had even sneaked out of the hospital. I had to ask around for quite some time before I found out that you went to school… Looks like your recovery is going quite well to be able to hit someone into pissing their pants!”

Ding Lingdang had casually glanced a look at Helian Lie and spoke, beaming with smiles.

“It’s going so-so. The main thing is that I haven’t eaten yet. If I ate until I’m full, my kick just then would have destroyed his bladder. He wouldn’t be able to piss at all.”

Li Yao returned to being calm and spoke while shrugging his shoulders.

Ding Lingdang laughed with a “Pfff”. She pinched Li Yao’s shoulders forcefully a few times while speaking, “You’ve really lost weight! You’re just skin and bones! Come on, let’s go eat. I spent quite some time looking for you. I’m hungry even if you’re not!”

She dragged Li Yao into the flying shuttle without giving him a chance to speak.

The Scarlet Flame Battle Shuttle was a racing-type shuttle, so it used saddle-like seats. At most, it could seat two people front and back. Li Yao sat behind Ding Lingdang. He hesitated for a moment, hardened his courage, and hugged tight her strong, supple, and powerful waist.

“Hold on tight! We’re leaving!”

With a whistle from Ding Lingdang, the cockpit door closed. The interior of the shuttle was flowing with brilliant colorful lights. It was like there was a myriad of flaming serpents dancing on the walls. Soon, a gigantic kickback force arose, forcing Li Yao to stick to Ding Lingdang’s body.

Her short hair was very hard like steel needles. They pricked against Li Yao’s face, creating a very strange numbing sensation.

“Whoosh!”

The Scarlet Flame Battle Shuttle was perpendicular to the ground, rushing perfectly straight into the air. It merged with the scarlet red sunset in a flash!

All the people throughout campus had their mouths as wide open as possible. Their necks stretched as high as they could. And their line of sight was locked dead-on the Scarlet Flame Battle Shuttle. They maintained this posture frozen until the Scarlet Flame Battle Shuttle faded through the highest clouds. It took a long time before they were able to lower their heads.

It was shocking! There was a heaven falling and earth splitting shock in everyone’s hearts!

It was outside everyone’s realm of thought! This female cultivator, who drove a near 100 million credit flying shuttle, actually came here to find this piece of trash Li Yao. The two were even good old acquaintances!

Wasn’t Li Yao a poor destitute kid from the slums? Didn’t he receive a critical injury? Wasn’t his spirit root destroyed, reducing him to a cripple? How can he be this powerful? This irrepressible? This fortunate!”

Li Yao… Was he really a piece of trash?

The surrounding observers looked at each other in confusion. Occasionally, some people would notice Helian Lie still laying on the ground and vomiting.

The look of pity thrown at Li Yao just now was increased by ten-fold at this time and was tossed towards Helian Lie.

And, Crimson Nimbus Second’s Headmaster Zhao Shude and the Black Faced God were together in the Headmaster’s Office facing the window. They watched the Scarlet Flame Battle Shuttle speechless. They were incapable of retracting their expressions of stupefaction for a long time.

It took a full thirty seconds or so for Zhao Shude to have a cold sweat trickle from his forehead. His two legs also began to tremble lightly.

“Helian Ba. Helian Lie. You two father and son have brought me disaster and calamity this time!”

Zhao Shude talked to himself at the volume of a mosquito and his facial color gradually turned ashened. He spoke through gritted teeth, “Investigate. Investigate ASAP! Which cultivator does this Scarlet Flame Battle Shuttle belong to? How could Li Yao, this destitute kid, have a relationship with a cultivator? What sort of hidden powers are backing this kid? Investigate now! NOW!”

“Yes! Headmaster! I-I-I will go right away!” The Black Faced God’s speech was also messy. He staggered and stumbled out of the Headmaster’s Office.





Home  Forty Millenniums of Cultivation  Chapter 78
 

Chapter 78
 
Chapter 78: The Wind Sweeps and Spreads the Clouds
Translator: Strivon, Ash  Editor: Geoffrey_, Lancent

In the sky.


The way Ding Lingdang drove the flying shuttle was exactly the same as her personality. It was as rough as possible, it was as dominating as possible, and it was as tyrannical as possible.

She floored the Propulsion Glyph Array of the Scarlet Flame Battle Shuttle to its limits within only 0.1 seconds. The Scarlet Flame Battle Shuttle tore through the skies in a flash, reaching the speed of sound. It surged and charged, battering through the air completely freely.

Yet, this woman was still not satisfied. She piloted the Scarlet Flame Battle Shuttle to rush left and charge right in between the clouds, turning at incomparably exceedingly fast speeds. It seemed that Li Yao had placed himself amongst the raging waves and stormy seas; it was as if he was being yanked around fixed by an enormous maelstrom, when suddenly, a tide flung him several hundreds of meters in the air, then falling suddenly once more to the distant sea floor.

Li Yao was forced to embrace Ding Lingdang’s waist tightly. His face was a deathly white sheet. Had he not have prior car racing experience in his previous life, he probably would have vomited up even his bile long ago.

Ding Lingdang rode as fast as lightning for about three minutes before stopping. She turned around to look and raised her eyebrows in a bit of surprise. She laughed, saying, “Not bad there~ Out of ten people who ride my flying shuttle, nine of them would pass out on the spot.”

“P-p-people ride your flying shuttle often?” Li Yao had to take a few deep breaths in order to recover. He asked incredulously.

Ding Lingdang shrugged.

“At first, there were a few people. However, there hasn’t been many in the past few years. Every time I want to take people out of the kindness of my heart, everyone would avoid me like they’ve seen a ghost. How boring. Forget it. Let’s not talk about this stuff. Come on! I’ll show you something invigorating!”

She pressed a Glyph Array on the control panel and the cockpit door of the flying shuttle opened with a “Tsss”. A thick biting cold air danced madly in the narrow cockpit.

Li Yao was dumbstruck, then he gazed through the small crack to the outside. All around him was a boiling sea of clouds.

boxn ovel. c0m
They’re several thousands up in the sky. What the hell was this woman up to?

Ding Lingdang chuckled and she actually stood atop her seat and spread open her arms. She walked swaying to the outside of the cockpit.

There were two small flame shaped wings on the two sides of the Scarlet Flame Battle Shuttle.The wings had a streamlined shape and were utterly narrow. Rather than saying they were wings, it might be better to say they were decorative bumps.

Ding Lingdang was standing on the left flame wing at this moment. She looked at Li Yao with squinted eyes that contained an expression of utter provocation.

Li Yao’s mind heated up. A unrestrainable craze surged forth wildly from the depths of his veins. With an unknown source of courage, he actually clung to the edge of the cockpit, crawled out swaying, and stood on the right flame wing.

“Didn’t you say you were going to treat me for food?”

Li Yao did not avoid Ding Lingdang’s eyes in the least. He used an even sharper expression as a counterattack.

Ding Lingdang bathed in the afterglow of the setting sun. She spoke with utter content, “The surrounding here is quite decent, right? Look at this sky. Look at this earth. Don’t you feel all your worries being flung to the back of your mind; your appetite will immediately open wide and you’ll be able to eat 10 roasted chickens right away?”

Li Yao was stunned. He gazed off to the horizon and was immediately moved by the several thousand meters high view.

Layers of clouds boiled like angry waves within the vast and boundless world, molding into divine-like shapes. Layers upon layers of red were painted under the blood-red illumination of the setting sun, condensing to a rouge-like color in the greatest depths and diluted to a peach-like color on the lightest surface.

Li Yao never knew that this world actually contained thousands upon thousands of different shades of red. Every shade of red was a core-shaking red that pulled one’s heartstrings.

This red cloud sea churned, changed, condensed, and dispersed endlessly along a whistling gale. And suddenly, from the thousands of different forms of red came sketches of gold lines. They were like gold fish leaping forth from the red sea, morphing out wings and soaring freely.

A gale of wind would occasionally rip tears into the sea of clouds. Looking below the tears, Li Yao could see all of Floating Spear City below his feet.

The city was like a giant turtle with its limbs spread out, lying unmoving on its belly. Needless to say about the flying shuttles and pedestrians, even the sky-scraping buildings turned into tiny toy building blocks.

It was like they left this mortal secular world and all that was left between the billowing and grand world was these two.

Their surroundings were extremely noisy. The wind tore endlessly against their eardrums, yet at the same time, things were extremely quiet; not even the least bit of noise from the secular world existed. All they could hear was the “Badum Badum” beating of each other’s hearts.

Looking above their heads at the transparent, bowl-like sky dome, one could see the cyan blue sky gradually fade away into a draping curtain of darkness. The stars in the entire sky were like raindrops sprinkled amongst the clouds.

Li Yao’s heart stirred. He somewhat understood why Ding Lingdang brought him here.

The secular mortal world becomes incomparably ridiculous in front of such a breathtaking spectacular sight, wiping their gargantuan worries into thin air.

Even if he had turned into a cripple, seeing this magnificent view in front of him would likely still restore his fighting spirit and reignite his confidence!

Under the final illumination of the setting sun, Li Yao’s face turned flush red and a smile came from the bottom of his heart.

“This restaurant is nice. Now, where are the roasted chickens?”

Ding Lingdang fished out an enormous military pack from the back of the Scarlet Flame Battle Shuttle and closed the cockpit cover with her long legs. She placed the greasy and dirty military pack directly on the rooftop of the flying shuttle worth several tens of millions.

She fished out one after another as if performing magic, wholes and wholes of wonderfully fragrant roasted chicken, chops and chops of braised pork joints, and links and links of blood sausages. There was even an entire trunk filled with high-energy and high-nutrient performance drinks.

Li Yao’s nose quivered and he took a deep breath. With eyes radiating with an energetic glow, he said, “It’s all Ghost Food and Drinks from the Underground Ghost Market?”

Ding Lingdang grinned widely, exposing two rows of snow-white teeth. She laughed while saying, “You just woke up from a long coma. According to common sense, you should eat light porridge and mild meals. Would something this greasy be fine?”

Of course it was fine.

A thunder cry rang out from Li Yao’s stomach. Without a word, he directly spread open his hand and grabbed a roasted chicken. A bite from the left. A bite from the right. A bite from the top. A bite from the bottom. He ate this 1.5-2 kg roasted chicken completely clean in just four bites. “Crack crack” A meat grinder-like sound rang out from his mouth. His cheeks bulged out enormously, but they returned to normal in a flash.

“This is what it means to be alive again!”

With a roasted chicken down his stomach, Li Yao’s face revealed a small trace of healthiness. He licked and licked the oil-drenched edges of his mouth, wishing for more. He stretched his hand once more towards a second roasted chicken.

This time, it was Ding Lingdang’s turn to be dumbstruck. She couldn’t have possibly foreseen that Li Yao, a patient who had just awakened from a deep coma, would eat so ferociously. She was stunned for a long time before she snorted lightly and tore into a roasted chicken with her hands without a trace of etiquette. Each of her hands held half of the chicken. She stared down Li Yao as she ferociously chewed in big mouthfuls.

At an altitude thousands of meters in the air, within the waves of boiling clouds, on top of a luxurious vehicle worth nearly 100 million credits, two people exchanged not a word. They carried out in gorging ravenously in an eating competition.

The two did not keep up even a trace of proper appearances. They were like two fearsome beasts that had hungered for ten days and ten nights. A beast rammed into the mountain and the sea of meat, shaking its cheeks and revealing its back molars. They ate like a locust plague, savagely sweeping everything clean. These two ate the entire military pack of greasy meaty food clean in under half an hour. Even the chest of performance drinks was drunk such that not even a drop remained. The two should have eaten about the same amount after some careful calculations.

Ding Lingdang held the military pack from its bottom, shook it forcefully a few times, and shook out the last blood sausage. She split the sausage into two halves to split with Li Yao to eat. They looked at each other and discovered that they both had made a mess of their faces. They could not hold back from grinning and laughing at the same time.

“You never left. Why?” Li Yao finally asked this puzzle he had hidden in his heart.

Ding Lingdang really didn’t have a proper appearance when she licked her fingers; she was still immersed in the seduction of the fine food. It took a long time before she burped and said, “I was just about to leave after waiting for three weeks. But on the day before I was going to leave, I saw a diagram of your brainwave activity… A Meditation Healer had used a secret technique to draw out the approximate shape of the depths of your neural field while you were in your coma.”

Ding Lingdang extended her wrist and out from a red micro processor jumped a hologram.

It was like the colors of the rainbow at first glance. Various shades of colors were packed together to form a tall cloud-piercing mountain peak and a deep abyssal valley. Some places even appeared to be like erupting volcanos, bursting with the numerous brilliant and varied colors of the rainbow.

“And this diagram here is of another patient in a deep coma. It’s a very typical brainwave activity diagram.” Ding Lingdang brought up a second hologram.

The colors of this diagram were much darker. It seemed that only two colors black and white existed in this world, causing the entire world to change incomparably dark. There were no mountain peaks or valleys. It was just like a deathly still flat desert without hardly a trace of life.

“These two diagrams are a bit different,” said Li Yao.

Ding Lingdang nodded her head.

“The doctor told me that it was because you had recently entered your coma that your neural field world was still relatively active. As days go by, as a long time passes, your neural field world will slowly turn to a deathly still desert… But I felt that something was off. The degree of activity of your neural field world is simply much more intense than a normal person’s by a hundredfold. And moreso, I felt something faintly familiar about it, so…”

She tapped a few times against a virtual keyboard projected by the crystal processor, bringing out a third brainwave activity diagram.

This diagram was the same as the first. It had seven bright colors of the rainbow, it was filled with life, and fiery sparks radiated all around.

“Look. What’s different between this diagram and the first?” Ding Lingdang stared straight at Li Yao’s eyes when she asked.

Li Yao carefully compared the two for a long time.

There were obviously a lot of differences between the fine details of the diagrams. But, their colors were both dazzling, their undulations were both intense, and they both revealed a bloody, brave aura that caused people’s spirits to be raised with a single glance, to be all fired up.

“This is also a diagram of my brainwave activity?”

Ding Lingdang shook her head and unraveled the riddle, “Nope, I pulled a few strings with the army to get this. It’s the brainwave activity diagram gathered from several seasoned soldiers of the army. And they gathered this brainwave activity when… these soldiers were situated in the most dangerous of battlefields. They were engaging in precipitous close combat, fighting against the Demon Beasts to the bloody end!”

Li Yao was stunned for a moment. He tried again to carefully examine the two brainwave activity diagrams to identify any differences; he was still unable to differentiate too much between the two.

He never thought his neural field activity would be this crazy while he was swallowing Ou Yezi’s memories. It was actually the same as blood-soaked soldiers engaging in close combat.

Or maybe it was due to this crazy brainwave activity that led to his spirit root to be torn and caused his Actualization Quotient to plummet.

Ding Lingdang spoke with eyes filled with admiration, “I knew it when I saw your brainwave activity diagram. Even though you had fallen into a coma, you still continued to engage endlessly in close combat within your mental world! So I changed my plans. I decided to wait one more month. And sure enough, I waited it out. So how goes it? What’s the next step you’re planning to take? Are you still going to enter in this year entrance exams?”

“Of course!”

Li Yao responded instantly. He squeezed his hand lightly into a fist, making the veins on the back of his hand gradually come into view. They were like dragons hibernating within his body totally coming to!





Home  Forty Millenniums of Cultivation  Chapter 79
 

Chapter 79
 
Chapter 79: Sticking to His Dreams
Translator: Strivon, Ash  Editor: Geoffrey_, Lancent

The large mass of food that he whale-swallowed entirely transformed into pure energy, endlessly nourishing Li Yao’s body. The energy caused every single dried up cell in his body to be filled once more with strength and shine with thriving vitality.


“I will be cultivating like mad for this next month. I will strive in recovering to my peak state. I will absolutely attend this year’s entrance exams with all my effort!”

Li Yao punched his fist out hard. A sound of silk tearing rang suddenly in the air. A faint white ripple swept outward starting from his fist, slowly undulating across.

This white ripple caused Ding Lingdang’s eyes to flash. “You’re confident that you can test into the Nine Elites?”

Li Yao was silent for a moment and he squeezed his fist tighter. “My spirit root has been torn. Only 7% of my Actualization Quotient is left. If I had a year’s worth of time, I’m confident I can restore my AQ to 70%. I may even be able to charge into the most powerful realm, 90% AQ and above! But one month of time is really too short. Honestly, I don’t have the confidence for an absolute victory.”

“However, even if I only have a 1% chance, I will use 100% of all my strength to strive for it… It would be good if I win, but losing is fine too. I will only know after I go for it with all my effort. Not giving it my all is the same as giving up — it’s not my style!”

“Great! I knew it then that you were destined to be a member of our Grand Desolate War Institution!”

Ding Lingdang did not conceal the hungry glow in her eyes at all. It looked as if she wanted to swallow Li Yao whole with a single bite.

Li Yao was stunned… Deep Sea University had given up on him. Crimson Nimbus Second also pressured him to quit school. He never thought that Ding Lingdang would represent Grand Desolate War Institution and still offer him an invitation!

Li Yao didn’t understand. “I only have 7% left of my Actualization Quotient. I’ve turned into a cripple under the vast majority of people’s eyes. Your Grand Desolate War Institution still supports me?”

Ding Lingdang looked straight at him while she spoke seriously, “I told you this when I first met you. There is a total of Nine Elite Universities in the Federation. Eight of them educate cultivators, as for our Grand Desolate War Institution… We only breed true warriors! This wasn’t an exaggeration, but is the basis upon which the Grand Desolate War Institution was founded on!”

boxn ovel. c0m
Ding Lingdang sat her buttocks down next to Li Yao. She faced Li Yao and narrated the origins of the Grand Desolate War Institution.

Li Yao only knew then the massive difference between the Grand Desolate War Institution and the other eight Elite Universities.

Aside from the Federation’s First Military College, the other Elite Universities were created when the nation was first founded. Each and every Cultivator Guild united together to create these universities. The goal of these schools was to educate cultivators for the sake of creating new blood for the various Cultivator Guilds.

They walked the path of eliteness from the start, counting as the typical academic institutions.

The Federation’s First Military College also, more or less, had the same goal when they were established; their goal was to foster military cultivators.

Therefore, the cultivation potential of students was of high consideration by these eight universities. They looked especially at the Actualization Quotient; it was unacceptable if the AQ was even the least bit lacking.

However, the Grand Desolate War Institution was different. The Grand Desolate War Institution was located in the Demon Beast Wasteland. It was spontaneously established by unaffiliated cultivators and the martial civilians. It was completely unorthodox.

… There were over ten million square kilometers of land in the northern region of the Federation. Even though the environment was of the poorest of qualities with a sky filled with yellow sand and desert land everywhere, there was actually a rich abundance of resources and crystal mines stored underground. Countless adventurers came here within the past several hundred years with hopes of making a fortune. They settled here and multiplied.

Yet, this place was actually the region where Demon Beasts had wreaked the most havoc in the Heaven’s Origin Sector. There were many Demon Beasts, comparable to the Far East Demon Kingdom back in the day.

According to the speculation of many experts and scholars in the cultivator world, countless cracks of space exist in the depths of the Grand Desolate Region located in the extreme north of the Federation. These cracks allow passage to a Greater Thousand World controlled by the Demon Race… The Blood Demon Sector!

The Grand Desolate Region was precisely the border between the Heaven’s Origin Sector and the Blood Demon Sector. The powerful Demon Beasts and Demon Race can come at any time through the cracks in space from the Blood Demon Sector, entering the Heaven’s Origin Sector in a steady stream.

The Grant Desolate Region became the Star Glory Federation’s front line for all eternity, engaging in the flames of war for several hundreds of years continually. It was known as The Demon Beast Wasteland!

Even though the Federal Army had stationed troops in the Grand Desolate Region, each of the major cultivator guilds also formed their own hunting squads to infiltrate the wasteland and purge evil. But the Grand Desolate Region spanned a distance of thousands of miles. In the end, there were several places that were unable to be covered by the army and the cultivator guilds.

The human race that lived in the Grand Desolate Region could encounter Demon Beasts at any given time. After several hundred years of cleansing, the remaining survivors were not lacking in bravery and had no fear of death! They were the strong who fought with bravery and fierceness!

Natural selection. Survival of the fittest. By slaying several Demon Beasts in close combat, these powerful also turned into absolutely strong existences with ferocity on the level of Demon Beasts. Even ordinary people, who originally did not possess good talent, were able to ascend to become cultivators through experiencing several hundred bloody battles and luckily escaping death.

The powerful amassed together automatically for the sake of survival. They took their own close-combat experience and passed it on to those like them.

At first, there simply were just some unfixed and casual activities such as Martial Arts Exchange Conventions, Hunting Experience Lectures, etc. Everyone sat around and compared notes on their martial arts while roasting Demon Beast meat, exchanging their experiences.

It wasn’t until later for the organization known as the Grand Desolate War Institution to be formed. A portion of the people who faced Demon Beasts in close combat had received critical injuries. No longer suited for fighting the enemy, these powerful stayed in this organization and passed on their martial arts and combat experiences to the youngsters.

The number of powerful humans in the Grand Desolate Region grew larger and larger with the passing of several hundred years of development within the hundred year bloody battle with the Demon Beasts. Even quite a few high stage cultivators were able to emerge forth from the mountain of corpses and the blood filled sea. The actual strength and teaching standards of the Grand Desolate War Institution kept increasing. Finally, they rose to become one of the Nine Elites!

Although they were one of the Nine Elites, Grand Desolate War Institution continued to maintain its crudeness, barbarism, and their tradition in emphasizing actual combat. Their standards of selecting students were not quite the same as the other Eight Elites.

To become a cultivator, one needs to have their Actualization Quotient reach 100%; their spirit root must be awakened.

But it wasn’t necessary for things to be that complicated when becoming a warrior. Even if there was only 1% of an Actualization Quotient remaining, as long as one’s fist can still be clenched tight, as long as one’s heated blood can still boil, as long as one can still charge and attack without being affected by the howls of the opposing powerful Demon Beasts…… it was enough!

The Grand Desolate War Institution did not breed cultivators — they only bred warriors!

Ding Lingdang’s glowing eyes shined as she stared at Li Yao. She spoke earnestly, “You’ve just awakened. I still don’t know to what degree you can recover your body to in the end, so right now I can’t give you any guarantees. However, please be convinced of Grand Desolate War Institution’s sincerity. Student Li Yao, if you are willing, I hope to be able to closely observe your cultivation for the following month, to move one step closer to confirming your recovery state. At the same time, I will fight for preferential treatment for you as much as possible. The time for Special Enrollment has already passed; it would be very hard to arrange, but a Preferential Score Treatment shouldn’t be a problem. I will do my best to fight for the best Preferential Score Treatment!”

Li Yao was finally moved.

The style revealed by the Grand Desolate War Institution was completely different than that of Deep Sea University.

Ding Lingdang held a unique charm that was different than that of Xie Tingxian. It was the kind that comes when one will persist until the very end once a target has been fixed. The charm that comes from absolutely completing something.

It caused one to unable to keep their blood from boiling, to wish to fight shoulder to shoulder with her, to fight until the bloody end!

“What do you think, Student Li Yao? I saw the blazing flame in your eyes. Your heart has already stirred. That’s right! Be a straightforward man! Let’s do our best together for this following month and blast out a never before seen miracle! Let’s make those people who look down on you feel regret! Then let’s enter the Grand Desolate War Institution’s Combat Department in a magnificent fashion! Become a heaven and earth defying warrior! What do you say!”

Ding Lingdang’s passion radiated all around. She was completely ignited!

Li Yao also was boiling. Suddenly, he smashed his fist down and growled, “No good!”

“Ah?” Ding Lingdang blinked her eyes. Her expression was sluggish. “Whaddya say?”

“No good. I won’t enter Grand Desolate War Institution’s Combat Department,” Li Yao repeated very seriously.

Ding Lingdang’s charming face broke down completely.

“Yo yo yo yo. Student Li Yao, we just ate that meal so happily just now. We chatted in our conversation so amiably. When I introduced the history of the Grand Desolate War Institution to you, the flame in your eyes was blazing and bursting! You were clearly super interested! That rejection you did in the end was way too snappy!”

“Amiableness is Amiableness. Happiness is happiness. Blazing flames are flames. But Dreams… aren’t something that can be sold!”

Li Yao looked straight at Ding Lingdang’s beautiful eyes. He spoke with complete seriousness, “Sister Ling, I am extremely thankful for everything you’ve invested for my sake in this month. When everyone else no longer supported me, when everyone else gave up on me, only your Grand Desolate War Institution continued to favor me and believe that I’m a manufacturable material… To the me at this very moment, this belief is the most precious of invaluable treasures!”

“The Grand Desolate War Institution’s founding history and traditional school of thought are really to my liking… You should have looked through my profile and know that I was born in the Artifact Graveyard. That I am a small garbage scavenger. I’ve struggled since young at the very bottom. I started 100% from the grassroots. It should be natural for someone like me to go to your Grand Desolate War Institution!”

“However, I’ve always wanted to become a Master Refiner from the very beginning. This is not only my dream but a promise was given to the deceased person closest to me!”

“The Combat Department of the Grand Desolate War Institution is the Federation’s strongest. I believe there are many youths who thirst to become the most powerful of warriors. They are like the me at this time, striving with all their strength to chase their dreams and break into the Combat Department of the Grand Desolate War Institution.”

“If I gave up my dream of becoming a Master Refiner for the sake of emotion, for the sake of trust, for our amiable chat and other causes, to enter into the Grand Desolate War Institution’s Combat Department unresigningly and unwillingly… This would be an insult to my dream. It would also be an insult to the Grand Desolate War Institution’s Combat Department. It would be even more of an insult to the thousands up thousands of students cultivating with their all, thirsting to test into the Grand Desolate War Institution!”

“So, I’m very sorry. I can’t choose the Combat Department of the Grand Desolate War Institution. My number one goal still remains to be the Refining Department of Deep Sea University!”

“As for the trust and assistance the Grand Desolate War Institution has given me, I will engrave it all in my heart. One day in the future when I become a Master Artificer and break through in my career, I will absolutely pay back everything you’ve done for me today.”

“A dream once made is a dream forever fixed. One absolutely has to persist down that road. There isn’t anyone who can change my path!”

Ding Lingdang remained quiet until he finished his speaking. Her expression was somewhat lonely. “You’re this determined? You won’t give even a 1% chance for our Grand Desolate War Institution?”

Li Yao hesitated for a moment.

For some unknown reason, the hesitating face of Xie Tingxian had suddenly flashed in his mind alongside with Ding Lingdang’s ravenous eating appearance just now.

Right when he was about to painfully nod his head, Ding Lingdang actually laughed crisply and brightly, revealing a mouth of white teeth. “You hesitated. That means I still have a 1% chance, right? I remember that someone told me just now that even if there’s only a 1% chance, he will bring out 100% of his strength and strive with all his might. After giving his all, it didn’t matter if he loses or wins, but if he didn’t give his all, it would be the same as giving up. It just wasn’t his style!”

“Excellent excellent. These words are my spoken feelings. Likewise, these are my thoughts!”

“It’s fine even if you haven’t promised me. I will stick to you like sticky candy for this following month. The Grand Desolate War Institution will also bring forth its most alluring preferential treatment, to make you understand completely our sincerity!”

“Unless I see with my own eyes you fill out the words Deep Sea University’s Refining Department on the College Entrance Exam Application Form a month later, I will, like you, persist until the very end. Before that happens, I absolutely won’t give up!”

“Why?”

Li Yao really didn’t understand. He wasn’t a narcissistic person; he really couldn’t see what was so special about him to be worthy of Ding Lingdang being attached like this, to not be discarded, to not be given up!

Ding Lingdang stood up on the flame wing and spread out her arms. Her beautiful feet tapped and she rocked swaying into to the front most portion of the Scarlet Flame Battle Shuttle. She relied on her big toe to stand on a condensed flame.

Underneath the blood-red illumination of the setting sun, she had the appearance of a devastatingly beautiful goddess.

She closed her eyes and bathed in the warmth of the setting sun. She was silent for a long time, long enough for Li Yao to believe that she wouldn’t answer this question. Then she slowly opened her mouth, “Because I see myself in you.”

“What do you mean?” Li Yao was completely confused.

But this time, Ding Lingdang only giggled lightly. She wouldn’t reply no matter how Li Yao asked.

She just stood like this quietly, looking at the beautiful view of the changing wind and clouds. Her eyes were somewhat blurred; it was as if she had sunk into distant memories.





Home  Forty Millenniums of Cultivation  Chapter 80
 

Chapter 80
 
Chapter 80: Idol!
Translator: Ash  Editor: Geoffrey_

In the dark curtain of the night, the pitch black Mystic Bird Battle Shuttle stealthily slipped into the Crimson Nimbus Second Senior High School. Its exterior was riddled with multiple pot-holes as well as a starling dent. It appeared as if it was ruthlessly nibbled on by a giant demon beast.

The Mystic Bird Battle Shuttle stopped before a brightly lit office building. In the blink of an eye, the cruiser melted into thin air and was replaced by a black armor wearing young man who was covered in dust. With a flicker of his figure, the black-armored young man disappeared and reappeared inside the principal’s office.

The lights of principal’s office were still on. Several school leader’s eyes were boiling red, noticing the black-armored young man’s arrival, some hope burst forth in their eyes. One by one, they all ecstatically stood up.

“Peng Hai, you’re here!”

Fiend Blade Peng Hai looked at everyone around. His facial expression was cold as ice, he appeared to be laughing yet not laughing, “What happened? I only went away to the wasteland to cultivate for just a month, yet you’ve created such a ruckus here. Not only that, but you also drove away Teacher Sun Biao in anger?”

Zhao Shude, Hei Mianshen, and a few other high-level school leaders were all shocked. Zhao Shude embarrassingly replied, “Old Sun is too stubborn. If he wants to go home, no matter what we do we can’t stop him. We planned to wait for few days till his anger has subsided, but we didn’t expect you to be back before that! However, today, it’s not about Old Sun but Li Yao, did you know…”

Zhao Shude was not yet finished before Peng Hai coldly interrupted him, “Do you know why I had promised I would help Crimson Nimbus Second Senior High School in instructing the students?”

Zhao Shude and Hei Mianshen stared at each other before replying hesitatingly, “Peng Hai, you’re an outstanding graduate of Crimson Nimbus Second Senior High School. Now, everyone is Crimson Nimbus Sect’s family. You coming to instruct the younger generation is a matter of course.”

“Hei hei, hei hei hei hei!”

Peng Hai laughed strangely as he very slowly and calmly said, “Zhao Shude, you listen to me carefully — if you can’t remember, then let me refresh your memory. It was Teacher Sun Biao who had rescued me from the slums and brought me to the Crimson Nimbus Second Senior High School. I was just a hillbilly with a dusty and dirty appearance. At that time, all of you acted like snobs and didn’t take me seriously. On the contrary, all of you scolded and shouted at me and made it difficult for me. Don’t even think for a minute that I’ve forgotten anything!”

“If I wasn’t trying to be respectful to Teacher Sun Biao, I would be too lazy to even look at your rotten faces, let alone fostering the new students of Crimson Nimbus Second Senior High School!”

boxn ovel. c0m
“As for Li Yao, not only is he the newest seedling uncovered by my most respected Teacher Sun Biao, he has also helped me conduct special training for one month, by virtue of which my strength has stepped onto a new level!”

“I have the best relationship with these two. Since your actions have driven them away, why should I even stay to help you chop sueys to train new people?”

“You can look out for yourself. From this moment on, any cooperation between us is completely terminated. If Zhou Yin has anything to say, he can come and directly look for me!”

Peng Hai coldly spoke, took a long deep glance at everyone, and suddenly disappeared.

From outside the window came the departing noise of the Mystic Bird Battle Shuttle. By the time Zhao Shude and the others got to the window, a black tail like the ripples left by in a sea of black ink appeared in their sight as it disappeared into the darkness of the night.

Zhao Shude lost his wits completely. He sat down on a chair and his lips trembled for a long time, but nothing came out from his mouth.

…

Inside the Mystic Bird Battle Shuttle.

The spiritual glyphs engraved upon the control panel emitted a faint light, shining upon Fiend Blade Peng Hai’s face. The expression on his face was exceptionally heavy.

After pondering for a bit, Peng Hai turned on the crystal processor and sent a message to a spiritual crane number.

Just 0.01 seconds after, dozens of kilometers away in the clouds, Li Yao’s wristwatch slightly shook. The mini crystal processor had received a message from some unknown number.

“It’s him?”

Li Yao was a little taken aback. It was the contact info of the man he had been sparring for one month in the Militant Wolf Slayer Gym.

Li Yao was really curious about this tyrannical mysterious figure. However, in the Underground Ghost City, everyone had to abide by its rules. One must never remove their mask if they don’t know the identity of the opposing party.

“He’s inviting me to the Upper East District to see his real identity and also wants to make a deal with me?”

Li Yao pondered over the address sent by the gym guy. The address happened to point at the most central location in the Upper East District and was one of the tallest buildings in Floating Spear City. It was one of the Floating Spear City landmark, rumored to have the personal training rooms of many cultivators inside.

“Who the hell is that gym guy? Unexpectedly calling me to meet him at the ‘Crystal Sky Building’!”

Li Yao was a little surprised. From the bottom his heart, an impulse to leap surged forth — he now had the opportunity to actually see how luxurious a legendary cultivator’s private training room was.

After thinking for a moment, Li Yao accepted the gym guy’s invitation.

“A friend is looking for you? Where do you want to go? I’ll take you there!” Ding Lingdang said with a smile.

Li Yao lightly tapped on the hologram before the location area of the hologram turned into a fragment and flew out to build an extremely vivid three-dimensional map.

Ding Lingdang arbitrarily swept a glance, but suddenly, her gaze was transfixed. She appeared to be frightened out of her wits, “You want to go to this place? Do you know the owner of this place? What is your relation with him?”

Li Yao, after a bit of thinking, replied, “You can say… we have trained together for a month.”

“You have trained with him for a month?”

Ding Lingdang turned completely foolish. Looking at Li Yao, the expression in her eyes was also a little sluggish, as if she was looking at some monster — one out-and-out evildoer!

“Is there a problem? Do you know this guy?” Li Yao touched his cheek while Ding Lingdang looked at him with a hint of fear.

“Yeah… this guy is your high school alumni. It would be more strange if he could not discover a monstrous genius like you with his sinister insight…”

Ding Lingdang muttered in such a low voice that only she was able to hear herself. Her facial expression had turned extremely weird. After laughing several times, she shouted, “Hold on tightly, we’re leaving!”

Ding Lingdang’s pair of hands tightly grabbed the Scarlet Flame Battle Shuttle’s handle. The spiritual energy around her body burst to its limit, and like the outbreak of a flood in a steady stream, it flooded into the Scarlet Flame Battle Shuttle.

Her crazy spiritual energy stirred up the array glyphs powering the Scarlet Flame Battle Shuttle in an instant. The Scarlet Flame Battle Shuttle blasted off with a dazzling aura, like the dance of a peacock, and whistled towards the most prosperous Upper Eastern District of Floating Spear City, leaving a trail of flames and a series of deafening noises behind.

In a second, the Scarlet Flame Battle Shuttle tore away the sea of clouds. Rows upon rows of sky rising buildings were glistening in the dark curtain of the night as if the sun was shining upon a city of crystal.

As the Scarlet Flame Battle Shuttle soared into the Upper Eastern District’s space, the battle shuttle slightly trembled and gradually slowed down as if it hit a transparent cushion.

Multiple shiny round objects floated in the sky. A translucent “Eyeball” unsteadily floated over; despite its seemingly clumsy movement, it was astonishingly fast.

Presumably, it was the defensive magical equipment responsible for guarding the Floating Spear City.

A few cultivators could also be found floating in the sky as rainbow colored lights danced around their bodies. They were in the process of absorbing moon essence.

The roaring noise of the Scarlet Flame Battle Shuttle had obviously made them a little unhappy. One after another, everyone looked over with a sharp look in their eyes.

Even through the thick wall, Li Yao felt a cold chill inside the room.

In front of the abundant cultivators, even Ding Lingdang did not dare to act rashly. She slowed down the battle shuttle, circled around at a lower altitude, and flew towards an approximately 1000m high round building.

In the Upper Eastern District, flying shuttles were the main means of transportation. Cultivators also liked to fly as high as possible on their flying swords, thus the top of each high-rise building had hundreds of branches spread out, at the end of which was a small air terminal. Looking from afar, it appeared as if the rows upon rows of crystal trees were growing to create a city of trees.

Ding Lingdang’s Scarlet Flame Battle Shuttle landed upon one of these branches.

At the center of each air terminal was a small transmission formation. Ding Lingdang brought Li Yao to the transmission formation and entered a glyph on the control panel.

In Li Yao’s vision, everything suddenly disappeared. With the flash of a blinding light, Li Yao and Ding Lingdang appeared inside a small training room.

The length and width of the small training room were no more than 20 meters. It was much smaller than the underground city’s “Militant Wolf Slayers Cultivation Gym”.

There were no windows inside; the walls slightly exuded a milky white aura, and the air inside was extremely fresh, giving off a slight grassy fragrance.

Breathing the air here made one feel refreshed.

Strengthening equipment and treadmills were casually placed inside the room. There were no priceless, high-level training equipment as Li Yao has imagined. At the corner of the room, a tall and thin young man was exercising his body. From his posture, it was quite clear he was the man from the Militant Wolf Slayers Cultivation Gym.

“How do you know this room’s glyph key?” Li Yao was extremely puzzled.

Ding Lingdang seemed to be quite familiar with this place. It was like she was returning to her own room.

Instead of replying to Li Yao, with a grin on her face, she shouted in a crisp and clear voice, “Senior Brother Peng!”

The young man slowly and methodically completed his last exercise, stood up, and walked towards the two in large strides, “Junior Sister Ding, when I heard fellow student Li Yao was picked up by a Crimson Flame Battle Shuttle, I knew it was you!”

Ding Lingdang wrinkled her nose, “Senior Brother Peng, you are at fault this time. When I asked you for a place to stay, you already knew I was here for Li Yao, but why didn’t you say anything to me?”

Peng Hai faintly smiled.

“At that time, I was cultivating deep inside the wasteland and I was not coming anytime soon. Not to mention, it was a secret between me and Li Yao; moreover, Li Yao was still in a coma. Even if I told you, would it have mattered? Hello, fellow student Li Yao. We are finally meeting in our true appearances. I very much miss our month long sparring!”

Li Yao’s gaze was completely transfixed. He kept staring at Peng Hai with wide open eyes. Simply put, his eyes were ready to pop out.

His mouth was agape; he opened and closed his mouth a few times before stammering, “Peng, Peng Hai? Fiend Blade Peng Hai!”

“No, no, not possible! The man I’ve been training with for a month in the Militant Wolf Slayers Cultivation Gym was actually Peng Hai?”

Li Yao’s mind went blank; he didn’t know what to do.

Fiend Blade! Fiend Blade Peng Hai! His idol!

Ever since his admittance into the Crimson Nimbus Second Senior High School, Fiend Blade Peng Hai had been the object of worship and envy for Li Yao and was the one idol whose place he wanted to take!

Li Yao’s excitement was at its peak, and his scalp tingled yet again. Who was Feind Blade Peng Hai? He was a Building Foundation Stage cultivator! Just his hair alone could cut him into two! Yet, he actually trained with Peng Hai for a month, fought a good number of times with him, and was even beaten black and blue by him!

This was too scary!

Fiend Blade Peng Hai arrived in front of Li Yao. His sharp gaze swept over Li Yao from top to bottom.

Fiend Blade Peng Hai withdrew his gaze and lightly snapped his finger. Immediately, a big round metal ball flew in from outside the room and hovered in between the three. The metal ball automatically opened from both sides before a beautiful tea set was revealed inside.

Two long spirit arms came out from the side of the metal ball and then poured tea for the three one by one.

Peng Hai smiled and said, “Fellow student Li Yao, perhaps you don’t understand, but it doesn’t matter! Let me tell you two things first.”

“First, one month ago in the Militant Wolf Slayers Cultivation Gym, you have helped me finish a crucial training. Precisely due to your help, I was finally able to completely consolidate the ‘High-Level Building Foundation Stage’ and even began to touch the ‘Peak-Level Building Foundation Stage!”

Ding Lingdong exclaimed in surprise before joyfully speaking, “Senior Brother Peng, have you started to touch the Peak Building Foundation Stage? Tsk tsk tsk, if you are successful, we will have a Peak Building Foundation Stage cultivator who has not even crossed the age of thirty. There’s no doubt you will become the top expert of the younger generation of the Federation!”

Peng Hai nodded his head and continued, “Junior Sister Ding should know… At my level, each advancement is more difficult than the previous ones! So, fellow student Li Yao, I owe you a favor!”





Home  Forty Millenniums of Cultivation  Chapter 81
 

Chapter 81
 
Chapter 81: Fiend Blade’s Saber
Translator: Ash  Editor: Geoffrey_

Li Yao flushed to his ears and scratched his head in embarrassment, “I didn’t know you were Fiend Blade Peng Hai. If I knew, I wouldn’t have dared to spar with you. Wasn’t I simply seeking death?”


Peng Hai slightly smiled and continued, “Second, in the Crimson Nimbus Sect, the Crimson Nimbus Second Senior High School and the Crimson Nimbus Transportation Group under me are two different organizations, not to mention I have only signed a six-year contract with the Crimson Nimbus Transportation Group. Once the contract period is over, I won’t have any relation with them. I could leave them without any delay!”

“Even now, although the contract period isn’t over, so long as I’m willing to pay high liquidated damages, I can similarly leave the Crimson Nimbus Sect!”

“Strictly speaking, I’m just an employee of the Crimson Nimbus Sect, not a Crimson Nimbus Sect disciple. I too got angry at the Crimson Nimbus Sect when I came to know about the disagreement between you and the Crimson Nimbus Second Senior High School. However, I hope these silly things do not harm our friendship. To tell you the truth, I too don’t like those bastards of the Crimson Nimbus Second Senior High School!”

Li Yao was once again stunned; his heart gave birth to a very strange feeling.

He didn’t expect to hear such a vulgar word like “Bastard” from the mouth of his idol, Fiend Blade Peng Hai.

Like he had never thought of cultivators excreting and urinating.

Although thinking about it carefully, they too were human; they would definitely eat, drink, and do all the regular things a normal person would do. However, if you really encountered a cultivator in the public washrooms, the subsequent shock would be extremely startling.

Peng Hai smiled again.

His smile was very bright and very lively, much like a twenty-year-old naughty fellow. He lowered his voice and said, “Thinking of which, when I was in Crimson Nimbus Second Senior High School and had still not yet made a name for myself, I also suffered under them. These supercilious bastards had made things difficult for me too. Many times, like you, I too wanted to quit school, but looking at Teacher Sun Biao’s face, I had to give in. Fellow student Li Yao, you have accomplished what I wanted but couldn’t do in the past!”

Hearing this statement, Li Yao was excited. He felt the distance between them was a little closer.

boxn ovel. c0m
When he looked at Peng Hai again, he didn’t seem to appear high and mighty again — he was like a trusted, neighborhood elder brother.

Peng Hai patted his shoulder, and with an undisguised appreciative look in his eyes, he said, “How about it? Are you confident in this year’s college entrance exams?”

“But of course!” Li Yao, with all his strength, immediately straightened his chest. He did not want to appear weak in front of Peng Hai.

“Ambitious, huh! That’s more like it!”

Peng Hai neither lightly nor heavily punched his chest and said, “The Crimson Nimbus Second Senior High School is nothing special. Since you’ve already quit school, then forget it. For the next month, I will be training in the Demon Beast Wasteland to further consolidate my level. Until then, you can have this cultivation room to yourself. You can use any strengthening agent or high energy nutrient solution anyway you like — it’s all on me!”

Ding Lingdang, who stood to the side, stared with wide-opened eyes and shouted, “Senior Brother Peng, you’re too much! We’ve known each other for so long, and yet you’ve only occasionally brought me to your training room. You’ve never allowed me to use it for one month, how can you be so generous to this brat?”

Peng Hai faintly smiled, “This is a ‘Transaction’ between me and him!”

Li Yao looked all around, yet he did not find anything mysterious about this small training room.

However, he knew that since it was Fiend Blade Peng Hai’s private training room, it must have some mysterious, remarkable ability that was hidden from plain sight and gave the utmost advantage for training. He could not help but ask, “What deal? What do you want from me?”

Peng Hai stretched out his two fingers, “You’ve two options.”

“First, I’ll let you use my training room free of charge while providing you sufficient strengthening agents and various resources at the same time. No matter how much you want to use, you will get it until the college entrance exam. Think of it as my investment on you! Until you’ve stepped onto the Core Formation Stage [1], you don’t need to pay me back! And if you are lucky and became a Core Formation Stage Cultivator, then go to the Demon Beast Wasteland and kill the strongest demon beast you can to repay me!”

“That’s quite fair, what’s the second choice?”

Li Yao was deep in thought. In this deal, Peng Hai didn’t seem to be at a loss. It was like throwing a long line to catch a big fish. Even if he didn’t become a cultivator, the most Peng Hai would lose would be some strengthening agents.

Although it was an astronomical sum for Li Yao, for Peng Hai, it was a drop in the bucket.

Once Li Yao had formed the Jindan (Golden Core), he could kill a demon beast as strong as a Core Formation Stage cultivator, which would be worth a couple of towns together!

“Second, I’ll invest in you just like before; however, you don’t need to kill a demon beast for me so long as you address me as… Brother Hai!”

Peng Hai spoke with bright and shining eyes.

Li Yao was stunned. He could react only after a long period of time; his heart was brimming with excitement.

Fiend Blade Peng Hai, who was the talk of Floating Spear City and the new rising figure in the world of cultivators, unexpectedly wanted to become friends with a no name like him!

If he chose the first option, then it would simply be just a business deal — just an investment. Peng Hai would pay for a few insignificant resources and would get a hundredfold in return when Li Yao beheads a giant beast in the future. Once this deal was over, there would not be any relation between the two whatsoever!

If he chose the second option, it would no longer be a business deal — Fiend Blade Peng Hai would be his friend and would be paying for a friend!

“Brother Hai!”

Without any hesitation, Li Yao shouted, yet in his mind, he was still left extremely puzzled. He could not help but ask, “Brother Hai, my Pineal Gland is ruptured and my Spiritual Root Development Quotient has fallen to 7%. At a time where everyone is not optimistic about me, why do you still have such confidence in me? Why do you believe that I can still cultivate and even reach the Core Formation Stage one day?”

Peng Hai smiled, “It’s very simple. It’s because I’ve met another person just like you. At the age of thirteen, she was a super cultivation genius who had a Spiritual Root Development Quotient of 85%, but all of a sudden, her Spiritual Root Development Quotient fell to 11%. She could barely even stand up; she was reduced to a cripple. Everyone believed that she could no longer cultivate and would spend the rest of her life in bed!”

“But this person, not only did she stand up again by putting in a hundred times more effort, an amount that no man can imagine, she once again stepped onto the road of cultivation. At the age of twenty-two, she soared to the Pinnacle Refinement Stage!”

“If I’m not wrong, after at most a year and a half, she will successfully build her foundation and become one of the youngest Building Foundation Stage Cultivator in the Federation. And If you give her thirty to fifty years… she would become the youngest Nascent Soul Stage Cultivator in the Federation!”

“There is such a fearsome person!?”

Li Yao was secretly surprised. He could not help but ask, “Who is she? Which university or cultivation sect is she in now?”

A faint smile appeared on Peng Hai’s face, “She is standing next to you.”

“What!?”

Li Yao was dumbfounded. His gaze turned towards Ding Lingdang.

He didn’t think that such a dazzling girl would have such an unexpected past.

No wonder she said “I see myself in you”.

Was this her reason for “not abandoning and giving up on him”?

Ding Lingdang pulled a straight face and firmly nibbled her lips. She seemed to have put on a mask. Evidently, she didn’t want to let others see through her.

Peng Hai also knew she was not willing to mention her past. He quickly changed the topic and said to Li Yao, “Do you understand now, fellow student Li Yao? Even if the whole world is not optimistic about you, even when no one believes you can rise once again, Ding Lingdang and I are the two people who will still believe that you can still create miracles!”

Li Yao felt warmth coursing through his body.

“Unexpectedly, there are still people in this world who still have confidence in me!”

When he had just woken up, Deep Sea University Professor Xie Tingxian didn’t believe he could participate in the college entrance exams, and then the Crimson Nimbus Second Senior High School directly asked him to leave the school.

These two things had really made him feel somewhat disappointed.

However, at this moment, all of his disappointment was thrown deep into the sea. Li Yao’s eyes turned moist, his blood was boiling, and his will to fight turned wild like a hurricane!

“Alright!”

Li Yao no longer hesitated and readily accepted Peng Hai’s good-will.

“Brother Hai, since we are friends, we don’t need to say any words of thanks. However, I just want to say one thing — if someday I become a Grand Refiner, I will definitely forge the perfect saber that could even split the seas and cut the stars for you!”

As long as he assimilated the later parts of the memories of Ou Yezi, Li Yao had absolute confidence that he would be able to forge the strongest magical equipment in the Heaven Origin Sector!

Peng Hai burst into laughter.

“Alright, you’re really frank. I’ll be waiting for that day to arrive then. However, a saber is not necessary because I’m proficient in swords, halberds, tridents, hooks, forks, and altogether seventeen types of weapons. It doesn’t exactly need to be a saber. If you can refine eight to ten flying swords for me, then I’ll take them all!”

“Then, why does everyone call you ‘Fiend Blade’ when you don’t even use a saber?” Li Yao was once again dumbfounded.

He discovered that his brain cells were not used enough when dealing with Peng Hai.

Peng Hai winked at him. The expression on his face now was revealed to be the same as the “Degenerate of the Cultivator World”, Sun Biao, and with a smile on his face, he said, “The nickname ‘Fiend Blade’ was something I intentionally publicized to let others know. Now throughout the entire world of cultivators, everyone knows me as Fiend Blade and naturally believes that I use a saber. How could they know that I’m, in fact, more proficient in swords? In the scenario where I am fighting, if I suddenly brought out 17-18 flying swords or 20 long spears or used illusions to turn myself into a three-headed, six-armed man waving 7-8 meteor hammers instead of a saber, wouldn’t the other guy be dumbfounded? At that moment, they would start to think about what I, ‘Fiend Blade’, was actually hiding. Just this moment of surprise would be enough for me to cut him a hundred times. Remember this — all warfare is based on deception!”

Li Yao was covered in cold sweat. He finally knew for sure that this “Brother Hai” of his was the personal disciple of the “Degenerate of the Cultivator World”, Sun Biao — both of them had no sense of shame!

“Isn’t it very bad to casually reveal such a big secret?”

“It doesn’t matter. Many people in the world of cultivation know me personally, and even my enemies say I’m very frank and upright. Let’s say you told everyone that I don’t use saber, that I’m cheating everyone, and that my name ‘Fiend Blade’ is just for fame and nothing more. Do you think they would believe you?”

Li Yao, after thinking about it for a long time, suddenly discovered that Peng Hai’s methods were truly too insidious and too cunning!

“Brother Hai, then can you actually use a saber or not?”

“What do you think?”

“I’m not guessing, I have decided to forge a set of blades for you, comprising of flying knives, a dagger, a Miaodiao, a whip blade, a nine-ringed golden saber [2]. You can then hold a ‘Blade Exhibition’ in the world of cultivators and let everyone know of the name ‘Fiend Blade’. This way, the next time you and your enemy cross paths, he would be worried whether you are going to take out a flying knife or a dagger to slit his throat or suddenly pull out the nine-ringed golden saber to cut him into two. At the moment he is pondering over your weapon, you can suddenly take out a ten-feet-long snake spear and stab him to death. Tsk tsk tsk, this scene will be really pleasing!”

An adult and a child; the two people started laughing crookedly at the same time.

Ding Lingdang, who stood beside them, had her eyes turned white. The shamelessness of these two guys was completely beyond her imagination.

“Alright brat, I like you more and more. Come, let me take you to see my ‘real’ training room!” Peng Hai smiled and said.

[1] In chapter 6, the cultivation level introduced were as follows: Refinement Stage < Foundation stage < Orichalcum Stage < Monad stage. From now on I’ll be using Refinement Stage < Building Foundation Stage < Core Formation Stage < Nascent Soul Stage.]

[2] The Nine-ringed golden saber should look something like this http://daomenga.com/large/G061.jpg. Miaodiao you can check it out here https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Miaodao





Home  Forty Millenniums of Cultivation  Chapter 82
 

Chapter 82
 
Chapter 82: Small Grayfield
Translator: Ash  Editor: Geoffrey_

Peng Hai walked up to a milky white wall nearby and drew an imaginary line. Soon, a vibrant hologram shone on the wall.

As Peng Hai quickly punched in a few glyphs, a burst of buzzing noise came from the ceiling before a metal disc lightly fell from above.

The disc was approximately two meters in diameter, and with over a thousand glyphs engraved on a winding course, it formed a spiral-like glyph array. Its edge was slightly raised and was also embedded with over a hundred shining, transparent crystals. Evidently, one could easily discover an unlimited amount of starlight clustered at the center of each crystal.

It didn’t take long for Li Yao to recognize that it was an extremely high-rank transmission formation.

From the many crystals inlaid on its edge, it was quite evident that this transmission formation required an exorbitant amount of spiritual energy to start. Certainly, the transmission formation must teleport to a very remote place.

Peng Hai swiftly punched in a couple of glyphs into the hologram. Soon, three small screens emerged in the hologram with each screen depicting a completely different world.

Peng Hai clicked on the gray world among them, then set the coordinates and other parameters before stepping onto the transmission formation.

Li Yao and Ding Lingdang similarly followed him onto the disc. The crystal inlaid around its edges were getting increasingly brighter, making it impossible to directly look at them. The array engraved underneath their feet started moving like a whirlpool, generating an inexplicable suction force which seemed to pull them into the ground.

Everything went black before Li Yao’s eyes. He felt like he was like a noodle which was stretched to a hundred meter, and in 0.1 seconds, he was reverted back to his original form.

Li Yao was hit with a burst of dizziness; he had an urge to vomit. When he opened his eyes, he found himself in a very strange world.

From the sky to the earth, everything was completely gray. As far as his eyes could see, it was a lifeless gray dessert. The earth beneath his feet was composed solely of broken stones and gravel… One would not be able to find the slightest trace of life here.

boxn ovel. c0m
This world seemed to have no atmosphere. The air here was sparse; for each breath, Li Yao had to exert all his strength. Moreover, there was an unpleasant smell in the air, and upon inhaling the air, a feeling of extreme discomfort rose within him as the air travels down from his nasal cavity to the trachea. Li Yao felt like it was not air that he had breathed but some hot volcanic gas. As the air reached his lungs, he felt as if a ball of fire had been hurled into his lungs, it was extremely stifling.

What made him even more uncomfortable was that the gravity here was several times more than that of the Heaven Origin Sector. Just from standing, Li Yao felt his strength seeping away as his knees almost buckled to the ground.

The gray sky above was devoid of any stars, the moon, and the sun. Instead, a couple huge pieces of gray rocks with a human face carved upon them were hanging in the sky. They floated in an extremely strange manner, and their eyes seemingly stared directly upon the people on the ground. Looking at those rocks, Li Yao felt jittery.

In addition, he noticed one more staggering thing — standing approximately seven to eight hundred meters away from them were three people on the other side who dressed exactly like them!

“You don’t need to check, that’s us. This world has a diameter of approximately a kilometer. It is a typical world fragment,” Peng Hai smiled and said.

“We are inside the legendary world fragment?” Li Yao curiously looked at everything around him.

According to textbooks, there were two kinds of worlds in the universe.

The first was something like the Heaven Origin Sector which occupied a vast piece of space and stretched across several galaxies and had several habitable planets that had stable atmospheres and complete ecosystems.

This type of world was ideal for the humans or demon beasts to thrive and evolve, and for the development of civilization.

This type of world was called the “Main World” or also known as the “Boundless Universe”.

The other type was much miserable. Perhaps you could say it was the space-time fragment formed due to the Big Bang at the beginning of the Universe, or perhaps a part of the Main World blasted off during the fight between super ancient cultivators, or maybe a part torn away during the spiritual energy tide, or it might even be possible that it was artificially created for all sorts of strange and unusual reasons.

This type of world was often very small with a radius varying from a couple hundred meters to even a few dozen meters, while the largest one would not even exceed the size of a continent. On account of its small volume, the fluctuation of spiritual energy was extremely intense. This type of world was very unstable and lacked a set of fixed rules of operation. It might even collapse in minutes.

This type of world went by the name of “World Fragment” or also known as the “Small World”.

The Main World and the World Fragment were separated through a space-time gap; however, once the exact coordinates of the World Fragment were known, one could directly enter it through the transmission formation.

In the early days of modern cultivation civilization, mankind discovered many such World Fragments. However, at that time, humans had not yet learned how to utilize these World Fragments. These World Fragments were simply treated as a dumping site for waste from the Main World or were treated as a place of exile.

After 10,000 years of development, mankind had discovered millions of such World Fragments and realized the advantages of these World Fragments. From then on, these World Fragments were developed and utilized — they were no longer waste but turned into treasures to be exploited.

One of the most common use was to develop the World Fragment into a training field for powerful cultivators!

Peng Hai said, “This World Fragment is called ‘Small Grayfield’. The specialty of this place lies in the underlying terrifying density of the ground and the high gravity which is approximately ten times that of Heaven Origin Sector. The strangest thing about this place is the gravity, which is unstable — it changes by the minute or even seconds. The gravity may vary from eight times to twelve times of that of the Heaven Origin Sector. It doesn’t follow any law whatsoever. Often, the gravity would be twelve times for one second, and in the next, it could suddenly drop to eight times! For training the control over your body, the ‘Small Grayfield’ is the best place for cultivation!”

“So strange!” Li Yao was secretly shocked. This World Fragment was truly weird.

If the gravitational force was ten times higher than that of the Heaven Origin Sector, then according to the norms, the density of this place could be said to be especially high.

But the gravitational field here was subjected to change in an irregular fashion, and this phenomenon had no rule or any explainable reason.

And why were there statues engraved with human faces floating in the sky? Who created them? And even more, why could they violate all the laws of gravity and float in the sky? He could not find a single anti-gravity array on them anywhere!

However, Li Yao was not a scientist. Since he could not figure it out, he simply threw it at the back of his mind. When he arbitrarily blasted two punches, sure enough, he found some irregularities at the moments when his punches discharged power.

It was the so-called “force from the ground”. The first part of any attack was to take a step to borrow strength from the ground.

The subtle changes in the gravitational field had led to Li Yao having a feeling as if he was stepping on cotton. The heavy-headedness and light-footedness kind of feeling rendered the punches, which were originally strong enough to tear the air, into powerless light jabs.

“There is a full set of training equipment in here. If you can adapt to the gravity of this place within a month, then I believe that after returning to the Heaven Origin Sector, your strength will have advanced to a completely new level, and getting admitted to the ‘Nine Elite Universities’ would be a piece of cake for you!” Peng Hai said with a smile.

Peng Hai paused and took a glance at the nearby Ding Lingdang, who seemed like she wanted to say something, before continuing, “Junior Sister Ding, you can’t say senior brother didn’t take care of you later. For the period of an entire month, the training room is under your management. You must operate the transmission formation and also help me look after this brat. Make sure to never ever step onto the other World Fragments besides the ‘Small Grayfield, especially him. Even you have to be careful there. Both World Fragments were prepared for Building Foundation Stage cultivators and are extremely dangerous. If an ordinary person stepped in there, he would vanish in the puff of smoke.”

Ding Lingdang was brimming with happiness. She jumped in jubilation and cheered, “Long live senior brother! For a long time, I’ve been wanting to cultivate in the ‘Small Grayfield’! However, can’t you promise me one more thing?”

Peng Hai frowned, “I knew you’d be insatiable. Say it, what else do you want?”

A huge grin appeared on Ding Lingdang’s face, “Senior Brother Peng, as you know, fellow student Li Yao is hesitating between the Grand Desolate War Institution and the Deep Sea University. How about the two of us have a round of bout to let fellow student Li Yao experience the true strength of the Grand Desolate War Institution. Maybe watching us will cause his blood to start boiling and burst with joy. And who knows? He might just, on the spot, gave up on becoming a bullsh*t Refiner [1] and realize that a Body Practitioner is a very promising career!”

Once she was finished, without even waiting for Peng Hai to agree, Ding Lingdang began exercising her hands and feet on her own as very frightening sounds began to come from her joints.

Peng Hai calmly and collectedly backed away half a step. A helpless smile appeared on his face, “Do you want to show fellow student Li Yao, or do you simply want to have a round of spar with me?”

Ding Lingdang stuck her tongue out.

“You saw through me! Senior Brother Peng, you’re the most outstanding graduate of Grand Desolate War Institution before me. All this time, I’ve been looking for an opportunity to learn from you, but you’ve always refused. Today, think of it as… letting fellow student Li Yao have a taste of the firepower of a battle-type cultivator! Let him see exactly how crazy it is!”

Peng Hai glanced at Li Yao before a peculiar aura started surging in his eyes. Finally, he nodded in agreement.

“Alright, for fellow student Li Yao’s sake, I’ll suppress my strength to ‘Pinnacle Refinement Stage’ and spar with you. But first, you have to agree that this is only for thirty seconds.”

“No need. If it’s just ‘Pinnacle Refinement Stage’, then I’ll blow you away in ten seconds!”

Notes:

[1] I’ll be using Refiner instead of Artificer.





Home  Forty Millenniums of Cultivation  Chapter 83
 

Chapter 83
 
Chapter 83: Your’s is but a Cannon!
Translator: Ash  Editor: Geoffrey_

Ding Lingdang was completely excited. Her excitement was clearly visible on her face; her skin, as exquisite as honey, was slightly flushed red. Even though there was no trace of visible movements on her, the eight bells tied to her beautiful ankles suddenly started vibrating frantically, producing sharp yet delicate jingles.


The jingles coming from these bells were unlike any ordinary bells. Surprisingly, they sounded like the clashing of swords and blades!

When those light and crashing jingles of bells connected into a loud bang, Ding Lingdang suddenly took off!

“Shua!”

What remained at the place she once stood was an incomparably distinct blur. Unexpectedly, Ding Lingdang appeared in front of Peng Hai!

Her pair of arms completely turned into two groups of imaginary shadows, seemingly as if she had thousands of hands, as wave after wave of white mist wandered around her body. Her arms appeared to have turned into air cannons, firing straight towards Peng Hai’s head!

Yet, Peng Hai appeared to be calm and collected as a smile appeared on his face while he retreated a few steps.

Every time he withdrew a step, the step seemed to be very light, yet it somehow fractured the incomparably hard ground beneath his foot into spider web-like cracks, spattering numerous stones and gravel to create a scattered barrier in front of him.

As Ding Lingdang’s rain of punches bombarded upon these bits of stone, these bits of stones were all crushed into powder, not even a single stone could remain unscathed. The strength of her punches continued to decline. She simply couldn’t land a punch on Peng Hai.

“Senior Brother Peng, as expected, you’re really something!”

Ding Lingdang’s pair of eyes lit up. Her whole body, as if it was burning up, released a large amount of crimson aura that began to shoot out from the thirty-six thousand pores on her body, creating the image of millions of fire serpents coiling around her body, rendering the image of her body to become distorted.

boxn ovel. c0m
On the other hand, the energy around Peng Hai also started surging with faint sounds of wind and thunder. Round after round of faint black energy emerged from the depth of his limbs and bones that poured out along the pores of his body to congeal into a sturdy set of armor which wrapped around his body.

Their figures clearly remained unchanged, but their aura was several times stronger than a moment ago. Red and black energy continued to diffuse around them as an area of a dozen meter in radius was completely enveloped by their energies.

And between the two, the point where the two energies met, had already started emitting crackling sounds, as if two armies were in the midst of war.

While criss-cross cracks started to appear on the ground, the rocks, which were within the reaches of their powerful energy, were smashed into powder.

“Come again!”

Ding Lingdang gave a long howl. Her breath shot like an arrow, creating a gorgeous ripple in front of her. This time, her figure completely disappeared. What stood in its place was a fire serpent whose length exceeded a hundred meters. Like a real snake preying upon some rodent, the fire serpent coiled around Peng Hai — Peng Hai was completely surrounded at the center!

As opposed to the fire serpent, at the center, a black mist escaped into the air as Peng Hai metamorphosed into a falcon, escaped the clutches of the fire serpent as it flapped its wings, and soared into the sky before bearing down its claws upon the fire serpent. The falcon immediately struck down towards the heart of the fire serpent!

The speed of the two seemed to have no bounds. As the two fought, their speed kept on increasing as the fire serpent and black falcon tore each other and congealed again in no time.

At the beginning, Li Yao could see the snake and falcon’s form clearly. He could see each and every action and watch how they fought, but as the fight went longer, their forms later became vague and appeared to be badgering each other. Their forms now turned into a huge black and red mass of air. Li Yao could only hear lightning-like thunderclaps coming from the mass of air as the air around it burst into fierce gales, sweeping the sand and stones nearby. The ground, on the other hand, was as if a meteor shower had swept across the earth, leaving dozens of few meters deep craters behind with white steam rising from them — the scorching hot air was directly soaring into the sky!

A couple hundred meters away, watching all this, Li Yao was completely dumbfounded. His mind seemed to have lost its bearing, he was muddle-headed like he was senile, like he was intoxicated.

This was not the Heaven Origin Sector but the Small Grayfield, where the gravity was ten times stronger, yet, these two were staging such a gorgeous battle!

Such power, such violence… This was precisely the strength of cultivator which could not be stopped by anyone other than another cultivator!

And they were just Peak Refinement Stage cultivators, a stage that could only be seen as the lowest rung of the entire cultivation world.

If it was a cultivator with a step stronger cultivation, the Building Foundation Stage cultivators, or the Core Formation Stage cultivators, or some Nascent Soul Stage old devils, coupled with peerless divine weapons along with a few pieces of tyrannical magical equipment, that would simply be ——

It would not be impossible to pave a path from one end of the universe to the other, devastating everyone and everything in his path!

No wonder humankind could dominate the Universe for forty millennia, kill countless upon countless of aliens, and acquire the title of “The strongest family in the endless space”!

“Soon, I too will become a cultivator like them — even stronger than them!”

Along with strong feelings of jealousy and envy, an intense impulse to overtake them emerged in Li Yao’s heart.

His bones, blood vessels, muscles, internal organs, and each and every single cell of his body began to itch. They could not wait for even a fraction of a second to start to cultivate!

A couple hundred meters away, the two entwining masses of air suddenly separated from each other and turned distinct. Soon after, the two red and black shining, bubble-like mass disappeared without a trace. Peng Hai and Ding Lingdang once again reverted back to their true form.

Ding Lingdang’s whole body was laden with wounds. It appeared as if she was baked inside an oven as whirring hot air rose from her body.

Peng Hai looked down from high above as an exceptionally large metal ball appeared behind him. The surface of the metal ball happened to have nine openings. In the blink of an eye, nine unstable masses of spiritual energy started to gather in front of these openings.

“Spiritual Energy Star Cannon?”

The onlooking Li Yao almost had his eyes pop out of their sockets. This magical weapon was equipped on crystal warships — from where did Peng Hai steal this stuff?

Ding Lingdang screamed, “Senior Brother Peng, you’re cheating!”

Peng Hai slightly smiled. “Junior Sister Ding, I only said that I’ll fight with Peak Refinement Stage strength. When did I say I won’t use magical equipment!?”

Ding Lingdang simmered in anger. “If it was a saber or sword, I might be able to withstand it— but your’s is a cannon!”

“Oh, it’s your mistake.”

Peng Hai pursed his lips into a smile as the Spiritual Energy Star Cannon opened fire with full force. Nine balls of light converged together and, without any delay or a trace of compassion, ruthlessly blasted towards Ding Lingdang!

Ding Lingdang’s final line of defense, her spiritual energy force field, crumbled into nothing. Like a boneless snake, her whole body heavily crashed onto the ground!

As Ding Lingdang crashed, a burst of tremor ran through the ground before a few meters deep crater appeared.

Ding Lingdang, with an aggrieved look on her face, directly lost her consciousness.

Peng Hai slowly descended from the sky and very calmly walked towards Li Yao.

Li Yao glanced at the Spiritual Energy Star Cannon floating above Peng Hai’s head before staring at the calm and unperturbed look on Peng Hai’s face. He wanted to say something but, on second thought, swallowed his words.

“Just because I go by ‘Fiend Blade’, do you think I’m a sword cultivator?? Just because I have used a cannon during the fight, do you think I’m mean?” Peng Hai asked with a light smile on his face.

“A little bit.” blinking his eyes, Li Yao replied. He didn’t know how to comment on Peng Hai’s conducts of battle.

“The purpose of any battle is to defeat the enemy. How you do it… is the trick. Whether it is by sword or a knife, fist or cannon, so long as the enemy is down, what’s the difference?”

Li Yao felt a jolt in his mind. He came to realize the hidden meaning in Peng Hai’s words.

Peng Hai snapped his fingers before the Spiritual Energy Star Cannon disappeared silently, as if it never existed.

Peng Hai patted Li Yao’s shoulder and earnestly said, “Li Yao, the two of us came from the same background and struggled to get here from the lowest rungs of society. You and I are like the pebbles that had been eroded for a few hundred millennia under the waterfall. Even if we appear to be all shining and glossy on the surface, on the inside, there is a part of us which is persistent — which could never be crushed! If we have selected a target, we will stick to our path and always strive to go till the end. Even if we hit an iron wall, we will always find a way to knock a hole through the iron wall and continue to walk on our road!”

“However, you are forgetting something. There are more than one way to our destination and also more than one way to realize our dreams.”

“Deep Sea University is indeed the holy land for refiners; however, if you enter the Grand Desolate War Institution’s Combat Department, you will learn the applications of various kind of magical equipment. You will realize the advantages and disadvantages of various magical equipment as well as the top magical equipment requested by the soldiers at the frontline… With all these experiences, if you study refining again, perhaps you might be able to refine even more powerful magical equipment which are more suitable for combat!”

Li Yao was absorbed in his thoughts. Peng Hai’s words had set off waves in his heart.

“You do not need to decide now. After all, this is a life changing decision for a student. You still have one month’s time, so you should think about it. And in the end, if you still decide to go to Deep Sea University, I am still going to support you! Alright, it’s getting late. I have to go to a party with a bunch of old comrades tomorrow afternoon before leaving for the Demon Beast Wasteland. You slowly cultivate here. Ding Lingdang will wake up in another ten minutes. At that time, everything will be arranged by her.”

“Brother Hai!”

Peng Hai was just about to leave before Li Yao suddenly called out to him.

“What else?” Peng Hai asked with a smile.

Li Yao hesitated for a moment before finally he decided on something. He summoned up the courage to ask, “Brother Hai, it maybe be a little rude, but — could you show me the true strength of a High Building Foundation Stage cultivator?”





Home  Forty Millenniums of Cultivation  Chapter 84
 

Chapter 84
 
Chapter 84: Jumping to the Peak!
Translator: Ash  Editor: Geoffrey_

Peng Hai raised his eyebrows and, with a look of surprise, stared at Li Yao.


Li Yao clenched his teeth, mustered up his courage, and directly received Peng Hai’s gaze.

After a moment, a smile appeared on Peng Hai’s face. He relaxed his whole body before nodding. “Alright, little brother. You are very interesting. I will let you see what a High Level Building Foundation Stage cultivator is like!”

Peng Hai raised his hand as a translucent spirit glyph flew out from his palm towards Li Yao’s head.

“Bang!”

With a thunderous bang, the spirit glyph exploded into pieces before streams of light flew around Li Yao’s body, coiling around his body and congealing into a transparent shield.

Li Yao knew it was the spiritual energy force field that would prevent him from getting injured by the spiritual energy waves.

“I usually suppress my strength to 3%, which is equivalent to a common martial artist. That’s why you don’t feel any expert-like aura from me; however, so long as I have 0.001 seconds, I can become like this —”

Peng Hai’s pair of eyes opened wide as he took a long, deep breath. His entire body suddenly doubled in size. His muscles expanded as if air was blown into them, and each and every one of his blood vessels were thick and sturdy like a python that had completely wrapped around his body, moving up and down as the blood coursed through the vein.

Just a moment ago, that ordinary looking man with a tall and thin physique had turned into a super muscular man with a physique of over two meters high in an instant. Even his skin that was as hard as iron and as bronze as copper faintly reflected an oppressive kind of gloss.

Peng Hai’s voice too was now incomparably hoarse as well as deep and resonant.

boxn ovel. c0m
“Now, I have only exerted approximately 7% of strength, which is the limit to which I can stimulate and fortify my flesh and blood. This is the pinnacle state which a human body can attain and is also known as the coup de maître of a martial artist! A step further and I will have no choice but to arouse the spiritual root to absorb the world spiritual energy and use it to further strengthen the body. This is the so-called ‘Refinement of Energy’!”

While speaking, Peng Hai’s stature suddenly shrank down and once again turned into a tall and thin figure. However, on the top of his head, a faint splendor was flowing, proliferating invisible ripples one by one. Each ripple was like a huge ripple which spread in all directions with Peng Hai as the center.

A faint black mist surged out from all 36,000 pores of his body and lingered around him to create a hideous-looking armor of spiritual energy. The entire armor appeared to be glistening in a faint blood-red glow.

“This is 12% of my strength, then 13%, 14%…”

Peng Hai, while smiling, very slowly and unperturbedly increased his strength as round after round of the black mist around his body continued to spread, completely enveloping an area with a radius of a few dozen meters. A black falcon rose from the black mist as it opened its wings, eclipsing over a hundred meters in the sky.

“This is the Peak Refinement Stage strength that you saw a while ago — Next is the Building Foundation Stage!”

Peng Hai’s pair of eyes opened wide as he let out a deafening shout. Meanwhile, the black falcon once again metamorphosed into a group of black mist. Afterward, the black mist turned into strands of black silk which retreated back into his body in an instant!

Peng Hai’s pair of eyes turned as dark as an abyss; they were like a deep ancient well, like the dark sky during an eclipse!

The facial expression on his face now was extremely cold and indifferent; it was without any trace of humanity. The land beneath his feet continued to crack and create a huge spider web-like fissures within a radius of a couple hundred meters!

In an instant, Peng Hai’s hair became long as his feet left the ground and his body floated in the air. Even in the absence of wind, his long hair kept on swaying on its own. It seemed extremely wild. The black mist from his pores once again spread all over the place, turning even denser, darker, and terrifying as it ran amok in all direction.

Li Yao, even after hiding inside the spiritual energy force field, could still feel the overwhelming strength which continued to surge out from Peng Hai in a steady flow.

“Bang Bang!”

Deafening explosions rang as the black mist madly crashed into the spiritual energy force field!

This kind of power had the ability to shake the heavens and the earth, a power which Li Yao absolutely could not withstand. He had a feeling — if not for the shelter of the spiritual energy force field, under Peng Hai’s aura, he might have been grinded into minced meat within a half second.

Peng Hai stood tall and erect in the sky. His pair of eyes were now completely black, one could not find a single trace of white in his eyes.

Around his body, a pure black force field of spiritual energy had already taken shape. Countless number of stones ripped out the ground, rose into the air, and started orbiting around his force field.

A hint of strange smile floated on Peng Hai’s face. “This is high level of the Building Foundation Stage. However… this is still not my limit!”

Just as the last word spelled out from his mouth, Peng Hai let out a wild roar. His pair of eyes became like a black sun from which an incomparably dark aura continued to surge out.

Li Yao was completely unable to describe everything he saw. He never knew that “Darkness” could be so “Dazzling”!

“Crack, Crack!”

Countless black electric currents appeared around Peng Hai, madly swimming around his body to create a second layer of spiritual energy force field. In contrast, much to Li Yao’s surprised, Peng Hai’s long ebony colored hair had turned dark golden, as if his head was full of dancing golden snakes as they stood erect from the roots of his hair!

“Crack, Crack!”

One after another, cracks began to appear in the space before Li Yao as criss-cross cracks spread rapidly in every direction.

Finally, the spiritual energy force field was unable to resist the terrifying aura coming from Peng Hai — it was about to collapse!

“A step stronger than the high level of Building Foundation Stage!!! This… this is the peak of Building Foundation Stage!”

Seeing all this, Li Yao became muddle-headed as if he were a drunkard. Only god knew when he had started to tightly clench his fists to the point where his nails dug into the flesh of his palms. Despite this, Li Yao didn’t feel anything. He was completely immersed in the spiritual energy storm produced by Peng Hai!

“I want to become a cultivator like him. I’ll definitely become a cultivator like him!”

Li Yao madly shouted deep within his heart.

Finally——

The spiritual energy storm raged for three seconds before Peng Hai withdrew the force field as all his aura returned back to his body. He reverted back to the ordinary human form — the 3% state.

“Brother Hai, you’ve actually cultivated to peak level of the Building Foundation Stage!?” Li Yao excitement held no bounds.

“No, I can occasionally burst out with the strength of a peak level of Building Foundation Stage cultivator but it can only last for a few seconds. It still can not be considered as having reached the peak of Building Foundation Stage.” Peng Hai shook his head.

“This is still very terrifying. The complete strength exerted by a Building Foundation Stage cultivator is truly fearsome!”

As Li Yao recalled the scene from a moment ago, he was deeply shocked.

Peng Hai calmly smiled and said, “Although that was my highest state, I didn’t have an ounce of ‘killing intent’ in my heart. Isn’t that frightening? If it was a real battlefield where I’m facing vicious demon beasts, my killing intent would burst out. And if I was facing someone of same level, my strength can further elevated by three to five times. Coupled with a peerless divine weapon… now that would be truly fearsome!”

“Can strengthen again by three to five times?”

Li Yao was so awed that he couldn’t speak. He was completely flabbergasted; he was simply unable to imagine that kind of scene.

Peng Hai laughed in a jovial manner, patted Li Yao’s shoulder, and, without turning his head, walked towards transmission formation. “You better cultivate well, little brother. The road of cultivation is still very long. One day, when you will arrive at my level, then you’ll know!”

Li Yao stared for a long time.

Under the changing gravitational field, his breathing would sometimes become rapid, sometimes heavy, sometimes slow; it was ever-changing within the gravitational field.

However, in the end, his breathing would still remain even.

Towards the disappearing silhouette of Peng Hai in the transmission formation, Li Yao sent out a powerful punch as a smile brimming with confidence appeared on his face.

“Brother Hai, I will cultivate well and catch up to you soon!”





Home  Forty Millenniums of Cultivation  Chapter 85
 

Chapter 85
 
Chapter 85: Mining Clan High School
Translator: Ash  Editor: Geoffrey_

For the next three days, Li Yao spent all his time doing restorative training. He was working hard to restore his body back to its peak state in the shortest span of time.


To sum it up, it was just eating and sleeping.

Eating the high-energy compressed food that was specifically made for the military.

It was military specialized because it was for the cultivators preparing to hunt in the Demon Beast Wasteland. Just a fingernail-sized piece was enough to fuel a low-level cultivator with enough energy to fight for an entire day. Every hour, Li Yao would force himself to eat a jar full of this highly energy-compressed food before he would use <The Great Art of Swallowing Whale> to assimilate it, subsequently converting the food into the most basic energy used to repair his over exhausted body.

After eating, he would sleep in the special “Deep Sleep Chamber” inside Peng Hai’s private training room. An hour of sleep within the Deep Sleep Chamber was equivalent to sleeping normally for an entire day and night!

In order to restore his body to its peak condition as soon as possible, for the past few days, Li Yao only slept; he didn’t attempt to assimilate Ou Yezi’s memory fragments in his dreams.

Every second, Li Yao felt his energy and stamina increase by a point as though each crack in his bones was being repaired every second, further advancing his body’s strength!

After three days ——

In the “Small Grayfield”, Li Yao was jogging with ease. During the jog, he would sometimes alternate between jumping, squatting, and shadow boxing.

Each of his punches left an afterimage behind.

Li Yao had already recovered his vigorous and healthy physique. Compared to before his coma, he was now three centimeter taller. His body was neither skinny nor did it have excess fat. His build was well-proportioned such that it was perfectly symmetrical and filled with muscles but not to the point that it could be considered in excess. He had a streamlined body like the pebbles that had eroded under a waterfall for hundreds of millennia. Each and every bone was symmetrically arranged on his rock-hard skeleton.

boxn ovel. c0m
Because he had not basked in the sun for quite a while, his skin was slightly pale, but it had a healthy luster to it, overflowing with a powerful aura.

“I’ve now completely recovered. I feel stronger than before the coma. If I test my Spiritual Root Development Quotient, I am confident that it has progressed by at least 20-30%!”

Li Yao took a long, deep breath. Under the gravity that was ten times stronger, each step sprung him 4-5 meters forward.

He squinted his eyes and felt the steady flow of power in his four limbs and bones; Li Yao was completely satisfied with his new body.

Ding Lingdang mockingly said, “The Spiritual Root Development Quotient is purely an imaginary number. In the Grand Desolate War Institution, only chicks would be crazy about Spiritual Root Development Quotient day and night — an unyielding man would only believe in their own fist!”

Li Yao was surprised for a moment as he slowly clenched his pair of fists.

“Makes sense. Even if my Spiritual Root Development Quotient tumbled down to 1%, I will not give up! Since that’s the case, let’s forget about whatever development quotient. Let’s go for a run!”

“Wait!”

Ding Lingdang lifted her wrist and shone a hologram from the mini crystal processor. “You are forgetting the most important thing — signing up for the college entrance examination! I have already checked things over. The examinee has to register his identity in order to take part in the college entrance exam. It is quite troublesome, but you’ll have to run around to several places and get a comprehensive body exam along with several other tests.”

“So troublesome!”

A frown appeared on Li Yao’s face as he carefully went through the introduction on the hologram. He discovered that what Ding Lingdang said was correct. In accordance with the “College Entrance Examination Identity Registration Process”, even if all went well, an entire three days would be spent to complete the registration process, and if even a single thing went wrong, it could drag on for one or two weeks, which was a normal occurrence.

The college entrance exam was just less than one month away and every single second was immensely valuable. He didn’t want to waste too much time on this matter.

“Perhaps I can ask the ‘Disabled Serviceman Association’ to help me shorten the registration process.”

Thinking of this, Li Yao turned on the mini crystal processor and launched the spiritual crane messenger.

He was preparing to send a message to Chairman Zhao of the Floating Spear City’s Disabled Servicemen Association to ask if there was any way to shorten the process, but instead he received a message from Grandpa Wang of “Old Wang’s Secondhand Shop”.

Grandpa Wang had an order to repair a large-scale magical equipment framework. The individual who was supposed to help repair it was busy and could not come, so he was asking Li Yao to lend a helping hand.

Li Yao hesitated for a bit as he prepared to refuse.

However, Grandpa Wang has always been good to him. After the death of the old man, Grandpa Wang had treated him like his own son. When he was in the coma, Old Wang also came to visit him at the hospital many times. When he knew that he was awake, Old Wang had specifically invited him to a feast at his home, but as Li Yao was busy with cultivation, he had turned down Old Wang’s invitation.

As a matter of fact, he also felt quite sorry for the old man.

Thinking up to this point, Li Yao agreed to Old Wang’s proposition. He planned to spend half a day to accompany the old man.

On the one hand, he was going to help him, and on the other hand, he could also let the old man see for himself that he was quite alive and kicking, that he was still a fine strong man, besides it would also free the old couple of worries.

Upon discussing it with Ding Lingdang, this girl turned very excited. She readily proposed to start the Crimson Flame Battle Shuttle to send him off, though Li Yao, without an ounce of hesitation, flatly refused her. Using the transmission formation, Li Yao returned to the Heaven Origin Sector and took the underground crystal rail to quickly reach Grandpa Wang’s address.

“Floating Spear City’s Mining Clan High School?”

After an hour of trekking, Li Yao arrived at a shabby high school entrance in the slum on the northwest side of Floating Spear City — the “Limestone District”.

Approximately a hundred years ago, the northwest district of Floating Spear City used to have several crystal mines with abundant reserves. Several sect’s mining companies cooperated with one another and turned the Limestone District into a very prosperous mining district.

During that period of prosperity, this place was home to the hundred thousand miners and to the couple hundred thousand families. They had their own schools, hospitals, and various public facilities.

The Mining Clan High School was established at that time.

However, the prosperity was short-lived. With the gradual depletion of the lodes, all the sects withdrew one by one, leaving the couple hundred thousand unemployed miners and their families behind. Those who had the money, connections, or another means to earn money left one after another, thereby leaving only a few ten thousand unemployed miners who didn’t have any other skills behind. These miners and their families continued to eke out their meager existence here.

The Mining Clan High School had also become the worst high school in Floating Spear City. Compared with the Crimson Nimbus Second Senior High School, which was one of the private schools with top quality facilities, the difference was simply like heaven and earth — they were not in the same world.

Li Yao entered the campus. The campus seemed as though a cultivator had wantonly devastated the area, leaving only wreckage in its wake. Every building seemed to have been neglected over the years and have never been repaired. The playground too was also full of potholes. A rustic strength testing machine was placed in a corner. Looking at its model, it was surprisingly an antique from a hundred years ago. It appeared as if it would fall apart just from a light breeze.

The various basic facilities of this school were built a hundred years ago and, with the passage of time, were now long beyond their lifespan. Multitudes of problems could be found in every equipment.

Grandpa Wang was commissioned to repair the large-scale crystal tube system that was used to adjust the temperature in the classrooms.

The crystal tubes were like snakes, passing through each classroom to the next before finally converging at the array glyph room behind the teachers’ building.

In the array glyph room, a two-pole array glyph system composing of the “Freezing Glyphs” and the “Fire Glyphs” was installed. During the summer, the “Freezing Glyphs” would activate and blow cold air through the crystal tubes, while during the winter, the “Fire Glyphs” would activate and blow hot air through the tubes. In this manner, the classroom could be kept at room temperature, as if it were Spring, in all four seasons.

Because of thermal expansion and contraction caused by the alternation between hot and cold temperatures, the crystal tubes were vulnerable to cracks. Although the maintenance of the tubes was not complicated, as the crystal tubes were entwined and passed through a few dozen classrooms, to completely repair the entire tube network was not only very time consuming but arduous as well.

Grandpa Wang was way past his working age, and he couldn’t see properly. Now that this kind of project fell into his lap, he had no choice but to call Li Yao for help.

This kind of maintenance work was quite ordinary. As the two were familiar with each other, they had no need to greet or say anything. Li Yao rolled up his sleeves and stuck out his buttocks as he and Grandpa Wang began to check and perform maintenance on the crystal tubes, classroom by classroom. After a long, arduous maintenance that spanned half a day, the two were covered in dust from head to toe. Finally, all the crystal tubes had been cleaned out from the inside out, and the broken tubes had been replaced with new ones.

Li Yao pressed his ears to the crystal tubes and listened for a while before confirming that the sound was normal and the array glyphs were operating very smoothly — the task was complete!

Li Yao pursed his lips as a grin appeared on his dark face, revealing the snow-white teeth inside.

“It’s done. Grandpa Wang, this time, I’m not going to calculate money with you. Treat it as my respect for Grandma Wang. If there is nothing else, then I’ll take my leave first.”

“Wait.”

Grandpa Wang laughed like an old fox as he dragged Li Yao out of the school building. Inside the playground stood a chubby, old man.

“This is the Principal of the Mining Clan High School, Mao. He is an old classmate of mine.”

“Nice to meet you, Principal Mao.”

Li Yao blinked his eyes. He found it a little strange. The maintenance of crystal tubes was not some big project. At best, it was worth a couple thousand bucks, yet Grandpa Wang dragged him out to meet the Principal, why?

Principal Mao and Grandpa Wang glanced at each other. The two were a little embarrassed. After a moment of silence, Principal Mao squeezed out a little smile on his face and said, “Student Li Yao, it is like this… I heard Old Wang say that you have withdrawn from Crimson Nimbus Second Senior High School and were thinking of registering your identity in order to apply for the college entrance examination. However, perhaps you don’t know, but the process to register one’s identity is extremely complex. Besides, you still have not yet found a suitable place to train. So if you don’t mind, I was thinking it might be better for you to join my Mining Clan High School. The entire registration process will be handled by the school, and you can also train here. As you can see, although the training equipment are a little old, they are all in working condition and are maintained quite well. It would be better than what you might find at home! As for the cost, you don’t need to worry. Old Wang and I have been friends for many years, so I will not take a single penny from you!”

“What, Grandpa Wang, you…”

Li Yao realized that this was the real intention of Grandpa Wang for calling him here. He could not help but feel warm in his heart.

Grandpa Wang coughed twice.

“Little Devil, this old man has heard everything about you. You have offended people at Crimson Nimbus Second Senior High School who have power and influence, they forced you to drop out, and you… also had a little accident. I’m afraid you won’t be admitted to a top university, but you should not give up. It is better for you to train here and vie for a good technical school. After you have graduated, you can come back and formally join me as my partner. I don’t have a son, and the few grandsons I have are not interested in magical equipment maintenance. The day when my two legs can no longer support me, I’ll leave my secondhand magical equipment shop to you. Don’t say it doesn’t bring in money! It can somehow bring food to the table. What do you think?”

Li Yao took a long deep breath to slow down his throbbing heart.

Grandpa Wang didn’t know that he had already recovered his strength, and even more, he didn’t know about the shocking mutation that had taken place inside his brain. Everyone believed that his spiritual root had ruptured and he was completely crippled.

Even so, Grandpa Wang didn’t give up on him, still thought about him sincerely, and even helped him find such a school!

Although it was the worst high school in the entire Floating Spear City, Li Yao knew that Grandpa Wang had done the best he could.

A warm feeling slowly filled up Li Yao’s chest.





Home  Forty Millenniums of Cultivation  Chapter 86
 

Chapter 86
 
Chapter 86: School Bullying
Translator: Ash  Editor: Geoffrey_

After a moment of hesitation, Li Yao said, “Principal Mao, I have angered some very powerful figures from Crimson Nimbus Second Senior High School. Aren’t you afraid that your Mining Clan High School will become the target of their anger if you took me in?”


Principal Mao laughed as he pointed at the surroundings, speaking in a self-deprecating tone, “Take a look around. As far as my school is concerned, it is the worst high school in Floating Spear City. Only the children of penniless miners would come here to study and that too only for the purpose of getting into a technical school to learn cooking, maintenance, or some similar expertise in other fields. How would they take revenge?”

“Alright!”

Li Yao felt warm in his heart. He continuously nodded his head. “Grandpa Wang, Principal Mao, thank you for your kindness. I have decided to attend the college entrance examinations as a student of your Mining Clan High School. However, since I have already found a training room, I won’t always come to school. I hope you do not mind.”

“It does not matter. Anyways, you just have to register your name to ease your way into the college entrance examinations, that’s all. However, training rooms outside are very expensive, especially before the college entrance examination. Many training rooms will use ‘Crash Course’ type rooms as a way to cheat examinees of their money. You can’t be fooled. If you can get a refund, then you should take it. Train in the school and save a little bit!” Principal Mao said.

Li Yao smiled. Principal Mao’s character was almost the same as Grandpa Wong; both were sincere and kind men.

He shook his head. “It’s alright. It’s my friend’s training room, so its cost is very cheap.”

“Oh!”

Principal Mao exclaimed and no longer tried to persuade Li Yao. He then said, “Student Li Yao, wait here for a while. If you’d like, you can look around and familiarize yourself with the environment. I’ll settle the account for today’s maintenance with Old Wang first, then I’ll check how I should complete your procedures. To be honest with you, it has always been our students who transferred to another school. If I’m not wrong, in the past few decades, we have not received even a single transfer student from another school. Hahahaha, I will go and sort out a few files. You just need to sign a few papers.”

“Alright, I’ll definitely go all out in the college entrance examination to win glory for the Mining Clan High School!” Li Yao said in a serious tone.

Principal Mao laughed jovially. Regarding Li Yao’s commitment, he made no comments. The two old men, with arms around each’s shoulder, went inside the office building.

boxn ovel. c0m
Li Yao, with hands behind his back, leisurely explored the simple and crude campus. His mood was pretty good.

Helian Lie, Zhao Shude, and Hei Mianshen… All of them were not optimistic about him, did not believe him, and treated him like a cripple, like trash.

However, there were others who were unconditionally good to him, like Ding Lingdang who believed in him, Fiend Blade Peng Hai who was optimistic about him, Grandpa Wang who had been very concerned about him since he could remember, and the recently acquainted Principal Mao also didn’t hesitate to support him!

He was not alone; he had so many people who believed in him, cared for him, and supported him. Why would he have any reason to fail the exam?

“Are you the guy who was kicked out of Crimson Nimbus Second Senior High School and had to transfer to our Mining Clan High School?”

“Are you that fleeting Fiend Star from the news?”

“Obviously, he was just repairing the crystal tubes inside the classroom. His dirty appearance fits very well with our school. No wonder he was kicked out from Crimson Nimbus Second Senior High School!”

The three burst into laughter.

Li Yao raised his head to look the three who were speaking. All three were tall and mighty; the shortest among them was approximately 190 cm tall, while the tallest was almost 2 m tall. They had well-developed muscles and wrapping around their bodies was a simple yet crude school uniform that was spun from coarse cloth. A casual movement would seemingly tear their uniform apart.

Looking at their appearance…

All three were vicious as their faces were filled with arrogance. Apparently, they were the bullies of Mining Clan High School.

Li Yao heaved a sigh. In a flash, he jumped back two meters and tossed a fist-sized pebble on the ground with his toe before sending out a punch!

“Crack!” The pebble was smashed into pieces, and its fragments splattered on the three faces, bringing them quite a bit of pain.

“Correct, I am that fleeting Fiend Star. Today, I have just transferred to Mining Clan High School. May I ask, is this the legendary school bullying?” Li Yao enthusiastically asked as he patted his hands to dust off the powder on his fists.

Silence. The three were struck with silence as if they had been subjected to some restraining technique. They remained silent for a total of ten seconds before they could wake from their stupor.

“Of course not! When we heard that there was a new student, you have no idea how happy we were! We are responsible for welcoming the new students!”

“Right, although our Mining Clan High School’s teaching quality is very poor, our school’s spirit is indescribably a lot better. Between fellow students, there is only a sense of unity and friendship. Everyone here is family. School bullying in Mining Clan High School? I’ve never heard about this!”

“Come, come, fellow student Li Yao. No, please allow us to call you ‘Brother Yao’. Wow! Brother Yao’s punch is truly powerful. Just in this punch alone, I’m afraid that there was over a thousand pound of force! Brother Yao, if you have some time, be sure to instruct your little brothers a little!”

…

Inside the principal office, Old Wang sincerely said, “Old friend, I truly have to thank you. You have really helped me out!”

Principal Mao smiled and said, “Small stuff. About student Li Yao, I have seen it on the news; a genius with a promising future, but because of an accident, he fell from the sky, unable to cultivate again. It is truly pitiful! Not to mention he is also your friend. Even if you never knew each other, so long as it came to my attention, I would also be very willing to help such a child.”

“Yes!”

Old Wang heaved a long sigh as a drop of tear trickled down from the corner of his eye. “Unfortunately, it is truly pitiful. If it was someone else, they would definitely be unable to withstand such a blow. They would have long been reduced to a shadow of their past. But this brat is rather strong-willed — ‘His body might be disabled, but his will is firm’’. He is still planning to attend this year’s college entrance examination. Didn’t you see? He behaved so calmly in front of us and even staged a completely confident look. This truly puts me at ease. It is truly…”

“Indeed, Student Li Yao has an indomitable spirit. I was very moved. You don’t need to worry. Even if he can’t go to college this year, he can still study at Mining Clan High School next year. So long as I, Dagang Mao, am still here, the doors to the Mining Clan High School will always be open for him.

While talking, Principal Mao walked to a window to get a fresh breath of air.

“Hey!”

As he arbitrarily glanced over to the ground, he suddenly exclaimed.

“What happened?”

Old Wang went to the window and looked around on the ground.

In front of the office building at the playground, three stocky and imposing muscular boys nodded and bowed as they respectfully followed Li Yao to an antique Strength Testing Machine.

In an instant, Principal Mao’s face turned dark and bitter as he clenched his teeth and said, “These good-for-nothing punks! I just left for a few minutes and they are already bullying the new student. Awful! I have taught them to be better than this — they should not be doing this!”

“That’s not right.” Old Wang scratched his bald head, hesitated a moment, and then said, “It doesn’t seem like they are bullying.”

“Yeah, it is a little odd. What are they doing? Do they want to test Li Yao’s punching force? What a joke! Student Li Yao’s spiritual root is torn; he is already a cripple, yet they still want to test his punching force! Do they want to make a joke out of student Li Yao!?” Principal Mao was extremely furious. As he prepared to stop them, Old Wang grabbed his shoulder.

Standing before the Strength Testing Machine, Li Yao had already taken three steps back, pulled his right fist as far back as he could, as if he was a cannon ready to fire, and postured himself to send out a punch with his right fist.

“He —”

Principal Mao blinked his eyes. Although he was not a cultivator, during his youth, he had been to the battlefield and had seen the blood of many soldiers. Despite being separated by a few dozen meters, he was still able to sense the exceptionally powerful and dangerous aura emitted from Li Yao.

In an instant, Principal Mao returned to a few decades back — to the moment when he had an unexpected encounter with a demon beast in a corner of the trenches in the front-lines.

Principle Mao shrunk his neck as he was suddenly covered in goosebumps.

Li Yao remained motionless, yet his aura continued to increase. The air around him became a little distorted, creating a field exclusive to him.

The three muscular boys near Li Yao, upon noticing the strangeness, involuntarily retreated 3-4 steps.

“His aura is exceptionally strong. His spiritual root is obviously torn, so how is this possible?” Principal Mao muttered to himself. Without a single blink, Principal Mao watched with widely opened eyes, carefully observing Li Yao’s each and every action.

—— But he missed everything! In his eyes, Li Yao had completely turned into a blur. In only one hundredth of a second, his right fist had ruthlessly landed upon the Strength Testing Machine.

“Boom!”

Even inside his office, the cups on Principal Mao’s table madly shook.

“How’s that possible? That’s completely crazy!”

Principal Mao’s eyes almost jumped out of their sockets. He immediately looked at the counter above the Strength Testing Machine; however, the numbers on the counter were quickly changing as if the shockwave of his punch had spread to the interior of the machine — like a flood, it was out of control!

Finally ——

“Boom!”

From inside the Strength Testing Machine rang a thunderous explosion as a mass of black smoke slowly rose into the air, spreading a strong smell of fire and metal!

Like a shot beast, the Strength Testing Machine swayed for three seconds as it held its ground before it finally collapsed completely, turning into a pile of crushed parts!

This punch of Li Yao had surprisingly sent this antique — with over a hundred years of history — to its grave!

“This——”

Inside the office, Principal Mao and Old Wang were like two wooden statues that had been carved using rooted trees — they stood aghast!

After over a minute of silence, Principal Mao reached out for a cup whilst his hands continued to shiver. The cup made a series of tattering noises as it collided with his teeth. He chugged down the entire tea into his stomach in one go.

“Are you sure he… he is crippled?” Principal Mao stammered as he asked.

“Yes, yes,” Old Wang also stammered as he replied.

“Can a cripple’s punch wreck a Strength Testing Machine!? Was he some Nascent Soul Stage old devil in the past before he fell!?” Principal Mao screamed.





Home  Forty Millenniums of Cultivation  Chapter 87
 

Chapter 87
 
Chapter 87: Eve of the College Entrance Examination
Translator: Ash  Editor: Geoffrey_

As the problem of applying for the college entrance examination was settled, Li Yao could wholeheartedly start his final preparations.


Aside from Ding Lingdang, an unexpected person had shown up in the Small Grayfield. It was the man who had unearthed Li Yao and Fiend Blade Peng Hai — the “Scum of the Cultivation World”, Sun Biao!

This old fogey appeared to be a man of feelings. When he came to know that Li Yao was already awake and was even undergoing special training in the Small Grayfield, he said that he would help him train in any way he could. Initially, Peng Hai refused him on the spot. Because the old man had just gotten back on his feet after serious injuries, if he entered the Small Grayfield, where the gravity was ten times greater the normal, it could be extremely dangerous for him. It was quite possible that he wouldn’t even be able to take a breath and would directly pass away. However, the old man’s stubbornness hit the extreme as he showered Peng Hai with curses and directly broke into Peng Hai’s training room. Peng Hai could not manage old man; he could only ask Li Yao and Ding Lingdang to take good care of Sun Biao. If there was something wrong, ask him to withdraw from the Small Grayfield without delay.

Sun Biao did not, in any way, have the appearance of someone who had just recovered from a serious illness. As though he was granted youth again, he was bursting with vitality, even his muddy eyes seemed to be shining. Seeing Li Yao, he laughed and said, “The training program for the next twenty-eight days is the one that I had devised for Peng Hai to advance to the Refinement Stage. Are you ready? If you are not, then you can just tell me so!”

“Come on!” Li Yao licked his lips as he hooked his fingers with Old Sun’s.

“Alright! Although I, Sun Biao, am just a mediocre cultivator who doesn’t have any standing in the Cultivator World, in this life, Fiend Blade Peng Hai and you, the Fiend Star, are my greatest achievements — my life was totally worth it! The final training starts now. Your first objective is to blast apart a hundred boulders!”

Sun Biao eyes turned round as he shouted.

“Where are the rocks?”

Li Yao dumbfoundedly looked all around him. As far as he could see in this endless gray field, it was just a flat gray desert. Where were the boulders?

“First one!”

Next to Sun Biao, Ding Lingdang’s beautiful eyes turned round as she exerted her strength and pounded on the ground. Criss-cross spider web-like cracks suddenly appeared beneath her foot. Grabbing it with her jade-like foot, she then tossed a hard rock that appeared to be even bigger than Li Yao’s head and needed at least both arms to firmly grasp it. The boulder rolled twice in its place before it ruthlessly flew towards Li Yao!

boxn ovel. c0m
“Come on!”

Li Yao recalled the domineering and peerless might that came from Fiend Blade Peng Hai when his strength soared to its utmost limit, bursting to the Peak of the Building Foundation Stage. Everything under the soles of Li Yao’s feet blew away as he gave a furious roar, twisted his waist, deeply bent his knees, and pulled his right hand back as if he was drawing an arrow. His entire body cut into a pose in preparation to send a fierce punch. As the boulder drew near, Li Yao sent out a punch, ruthlessly colliding with the boulder!

“Explode for me!”

First day — Li Yao forcibly smashed a hundred rocks, ran fifty kilometers cross-country whilst carrying a hundred kilogram weight under the influence of tenfold gravity before “Sparring” with Ding Lingdang using the <Thirteen Forces of War Beast>, analyzing and re-learning each stance one by one, and inevitably get beaten black and blue by Ding Lingdang.

Second day… Third day… Fourth day…

Li Yao trained almost like a lunatic. His daily consumption of food and strengthening agents was ten times more than that of the average high school student. If Ding Lingdang and Sun Biao had not personally seen this, they might suspect whether there was a miniature black hole hidden in his stomach. How else could he engulf so much food?

Seventh day… Eighth day… Ninth day…

The speed of Li Yao’s progression was insane, even to the point where it was visible to the naked eye. The training schedule drafted by Sun Biao was not able to keep up with his progress; every day, Li Yao would only need 70% of the time to complete the training program.

In the remaining time, he would review the <One-Hundred-and-Eight Hands Chaos Gale Hammer Technique> over and over again to thoroughly master this set of hammer techniques down to his soul and completely evolve it into One-Hundred-and-Eight Fist Techniques.

Fourteenth day… Fifteenth day… Sixteenth day…

Two weeks elapsed. Every day, Li Yao would now stay in the Small Grayfield for only half a day, while for the rest of the day he would enter the Deep Sleep Chamber, during which he would assimilate Ou Yezi’s memory fragments crazily. With the identity of an “Iron-Forge Worker”, he would learn the Hundred Smelting Clan’s secrets of tempering all kinds of metals.

Finally, twenty-eighth day. This was also the last day of his training.

Tomorrow was the college entrance examination!

Today, the Small Grayfield had only one person, Li Yao. Before him laid a square-shaped boulder, weighing several tons.

“Ahh!”

Li Yao exerted strength into both his fists. The muscles on his arms burst out with strange fluctuations as a wave-like power landed upon the boulder before carving a spiral-like pattern on the boulder, thereby forcibly sending it a dozen meters away.

Li Yao’s pair of legs kicked the grounds. Before the boulder could hit the ground, in a flash, Li Yao caught up with the mid-air boulder. His entire figure became indistinct as his phantom silhouettes surrounded the entire boulder.

“Kacha Kacha”

Only the sounds of the boulder breaking resounded in the silent gray field as though a wild, hungry beast treated the boulder as food, munching on it with all its force.

The phantom silhouettes continued to scatter pieces of stone from the boulder like a Goddess scattering flowers.

After three seconds, Li Yao silently landed on the ground. In a radius of approximately seventeen to eighteen meters around him, there was nothing but broken stone fragments.

“I did it!”

Using his toes, Li Yao tossed a fist-sized stone into the air before grabbing ahold of it. As he ruthlessly pinched the stone, “Kacha Kacha” sounds suddenly came from his palm as the stone broke apart and fell through the gaps between his fingers.

“I am now at least four to five time more powerful than I was when I was at the Devil Flood Dragon Island. I am sure with my current strength that if I now charge into the ‘Blue Team’, even without a strategy, I can directly crush them and can even kill several dozen blue team experts one by one!”

“It seems my assumptions were correct. Assimilating Ou Yezi’s memory fragments is greatly beneficial for the development of my brain. My Spirit Root Development Quotient is definitely higher than the past; otherwise, no matter how severely I cultivated, I would not have progressed so much within one month!”

“Still, I don’t know how much my Spirit Root Development Quotient had actually increased. Maybe I should check it now?”

“Forget it, Ding Lingdang was right; Spirit Root Development Quotient is just an imaginary number. What’s important is one’s own ability! Whether it’s 1% or 99%, it doesn’t matter — I will keep moving forward!”

“I have done my best, and I don’t have any regrets. Tomorrow at sunrise, a war will shake the heaven and the earth!”

Li Yao took a long, deep breath, suppressed his agitated heart, and returned to the Heaven Origin Sector using the transmission formation.

There was no one present inside the room. After twenty days in the Small Greyfield, Grandpa Sun Biao’s body was no longer able to hold on; his heart almost gave out. Li Yao and Ding Lingdang forced him to go home and rest.

Ding Lingdang was enjoying the wind on the balcony.

Today, she wore a fiery, thin, long, red, yarn dress. The gentle breeze made her yarn dress flutter, causing her strong and perfectly round legs to become partly visible. In the sunset, it painted an absolutely beautiful picture.

Li Yao could not help but walk over.

Upon hearing the sounds of his footsteps, Ding Lingdang also turned her head and tossed a scroll made of Demon Beast hide to him.

“What is this?” Li Yao curiously received the letter and opened it.

Now that the spiritual network had been developed, normal information was sent using the spiritual crane messenger. Only very important documents would be sent using letters.

The contents of the beast hide made Li Yao gasp for breath.

“You actually helped me get 30 points of preferential treatment? As long as I apply for the Grand Desolate War Institution, I’ll get preferential treatment of 30 points?”





Home  Forty Millenniums of Cultivation  Chapter 88
 

Chapter 88
 
Chapter 88: I Have Decided!
Translator: Ash  Editor: Geoffrey_

Li Yao went through the contents of the beast hide scroll over and over again to confirm that what he was seeing was right. On the lower right corner of the letter was engraved with the unique spirit seal of the Grand Desolate War Institution, which absolutely could not be forged by anyone else.


Getting 20 points of preferential treatment was already considered by far the best and most common preferential treatment a student could get, but much to his surprise, Ding Lingdang actually got him 30 points of preferential treatment — it was unbelievable!

Li Yao could not help but ask, “After my Spiritual Root was torn, I have desperately trained for just a month and have not even tested my Spiritual Root Development Quotient. How were you able to get me such preferential treatment?”

Ding Lingdang pursed her lips into a smile as she shook her fist. “I had a talk with the guys from the student recruitment center. I told them that out of all the cultivation geniuses I have seen, you are the most insane, the most ferocious, and have the highest potential. 30 points of preferential treatment was a must — if it was even a single point less, then once I return, I would smack their heads!”

Li Yao took a long, deep breath as complex feeling burst forth from the depths of his heart.

Of course, he knew Ding Lingdang was joking. The enrollment process of the Nine Elite Universities was extremely strict. How did she persuade them to give him 30 points of preferential treatment?

Ding Lingdang must have done a lot of work quietly in the back. She must have painstakingly spent a lot of effort. That’s the only reason why she was able to get such conditions!

“How is it? Didn’t I say I will let you see the sincerity of the Grand Desolate War Institution? What do you think? Does our sincerity have enough weight? Well, did you think about it? Is it going to be the Grand Desolate War Institution’s Combat Department or the Deep Sea University’s Refining Department?” Ding Lingdang turned her head and stared at Li Yao with bright and shining eyes.

“I—”

While holding onto the beast hide, Li Yao stood in place as he was dazed. In his mind, various scenes appeared one by one.

The excitement that he had when he first repaired a civilian magical equipment, the promise he made to the old man, the embarrassed Xie Tingxian, the passionate Ding Lingdang, the sincere and earnest words of Fiend Blade Peng Hai. Each scene entangled with one another, turning into a complex mess.

boxn ovel. c0m
Suddenly, a very strange yet extremely insane idea jumped out from this mess. As if a giant Kraken had instantly occupied his brain, no matter how much he pulled, he was unable to extract this idea from his brain; it was completely stuck in his mind.

Little by little, the hesitation in Li Yao’s eyes dissipated. In its place was an incomparably relaxed and eased look.

Almost as if a saber had cut off the chaotic thoughts in his heart in an instant!

“Have you decided?” Ding Lingdang, upon noticing his expression, knew that he had already made his decision.

“En, I have decided!” Li Yao smiled. His smile was as bright as sunlight.

“You were finally impressed by my sincerity, right!? You have decided to join the Grand Desolate War Institution, right!?” Ding Lingdang both eyes turned round. She looked as though she would pounce at Li Yao at any moment, as if she was an anxious mother leopard who was restraining herself.

“Sister Ling, before I say my choice, I want to know one thing — What if, in the end, I don’t choose the Grand Desolate War Institution’s Combat Department? What will you think?” Li Yao asked in a serious tone.

The corners of Ding Lingdang’s mouth twitched as she had a slightly puzzled look. Hesitating for a moment, she clenched her teeth and said, “As someone from the Grand Desolate War Institution, obviously, I would be greatly disappointed; however, since I have done all I can and was still unable to change your thoughts, I will not regret anything! And as your friend, I will support your choice. If your dream is to go to the Refining Department of the Deep Sea University and to become a Master Refiner, I will wish for all your dreams to come true!”

“I am relieved to hear that. You are truly a good person. I’m going to treat you as my friend for life, Sister Ling.”

“Good my ass. If you call me a good person again, believe it or not, I will smack you head. Anyway, so to say, have you decided to apply to Deep Sea University’s Refining Department?

“I did not say so.”

“Then which institute are you going to choose!? Is it the Grand Desolate War Institution’s Combat Department or Deep Sea University’s Refining Department, or is it some other institute?”

Li Yao laughed jovially as he blinked his eyes and slowly said, “Tomorrow, wait for tomorrow. After the college entrance exam is over, you will know.”

“You…”

Ding Lingdang clenched her teeth in anger. Looking at the teasing smile hanging on Li Yao’s face, she could not wait to punch him in the face. After grimacing for a while, she suddenly climbed the fence and yelled toward the setting sun before jumping down — she jumped down from a few kilometer high building!

After a second, from below the balcony came a violent roar. The Crimson Flame Battle Shuttle transformed into a long rainbow and pierced towards the setting sun!

Under the light of the setting sun, Li Yao closed his eyes. Feeling its warmth, he quietly listened to the noise that came from the depths of his heart, the sound of flowing blood.

After a good while, Li Yao opened his eyes. His eyes were clear and transparent, devoid of any hesitation.

Yes, he had confirmed it again — that’s what he wanted and that was the university he wanted to attend.

He turned on the mini crystal processor and sent a spiritual crane message to the Deep Sea University professor, Xie Tingxian; however, there was no reply from the other side.

Li Yao, with unrelenting patience, sent the second, third, and fourth message.

On the fifth try, he finally connected to the other side. A tired Xie Tingxian appeared on the hologram screen, barely squeezing out a smile. “Long time no see, Student Li Yao.”

“Hello, Professor Xie. It seems you are quite busy with work. Long story short, today, I have sent you a spiritual crane message; however, it was not for the purpose of gaining a preferential treatment score, but rather it was solely to express my gratitude. Thank you for once being so optimistic about me and treating me as a promising student, and even waiting for so long when I was in coma — I’m really sorry for all this. I’m truly grateful for all your endeavors!” Li Yao spoke from the depths of his heart.

Xie Tingxian was surprised for a moment. With a slightly embarrassed look, he said, “Student Li Yao, I’m really sorry. I really wished to recruit you into Deep Sea University and had even wanted to make you my protege, but —”

“Yeah, I also wished to enter the ‘Holy Land of Refiners’ and learn the most profound refining techniques. Even now, I still don’t want to give up on this dream; however, the god of destiny makes fools out of the people. But let’s not talk about that. The other reason I contacted you is that I want to sincerely apologize to you. I am truly sorry, truly, truly sorry!”

Xie Tingxian frowned. He didn’t understand Li Yao’s words at all; he was at loss. “Why are you apologizing to me? It should be me who should be apologizing!”

Li Yao replied, “I have made a decision, and this decision might very well bring a certain degree of trouble to you in the future. That’s why, I would like to apologize in advance — for my actions in the future.”

“Student Li Yao, what do you mean?” Xie Tingxian, upon hearing this, was even at more of a loss.

Li Yao faintly smiled. Deep within his eyes flashed an incomparably vigorous flame. He wanted to explain, but from the hologram suddenly came a loud noise. An old woman with bizarre purple eyes appeared on the screen, shoving Xie Tingxian away and took his place.

The old woman had a completely deadpan look. “I am the Dean of Deep Sea University’s Refining Department, Chu Xiuhong. You are Li Yao? What is your Spiritual Root Development Quotient at now?”

A frown appeared on Li Yao’s face. He was a little dissatisfied with Chu Xiuhong’s tone.

However, in front of him was a highly respected elder. He honestly replied, “I don’t know. For the past month, I was completely busy with training. I don’t know know how much of it has recovered; maybe a few percent.”

Chu Xiuhong sneered.

“Recovered only a few percent? One month ago, your Spiritual Root Development Quotient was only 7%. Even if you have recovered to 30-50%, what of it? Student Li Yao, I advise you not to rack your brain anymore to try to get any preferential treatment score. Deep Sea University will not agree to this!”

Li Yao’s pupils contracted to the size of a needle.

“Dean Chu, I’m afraid you are mistaken. Today, I simply wanted to relay a few words to Professor Xie. I had no intentions of discussing any preferential treatment conditions. I only wanted to say a few words to him, that’s all.”

Chu Xiuhong’s wrinkles shrunk into a mass as a look of mockery appeared on her face. “Right? I have seen a lot of young men like you. You all say you don’t want any preferential conditions, yet it is nothing more than taking a step back before advancing. You’re just playing cat and mouse, that’s all! Young man, I advise you to give up on this. Behave well and don’t think about using underhanded means! If you have the strength, then prove yourself in the college entrance examination. So long as your score is decent, the doors of our Deep Sea University would naturally be open to you. If your strength is inadequate, no matter how many strings you pull, they all will be useless!”

Li Yao smiled. “Dean Chu, I am truly not looking to pull any strings. Not to mention, I am also not going to be applying to the Deep Sea University’s Refining Department.”

“That’s for the best. After all, Deep Sea University’s Refining Department is the Refiner’s Holy Land. The requirements to join our school is extremely high. In your current state, I’m afraid that it will truly be difficult for you to enroll here. If you have truly recovered a little, I suggest you apply to the Star Nebula University or the Refining Department of Federation’s First Military College. Although they are not in the same grade as us, at any rate, their cut-off score is low enough. Last year, it was 200 hundred points lower than our department.”

“Thank you for your advice, I will consider it seriously.”

“Is there anything else? Professor Xie and I are conducting a crucial refining experiment. An entire team of more than thirty Refiners is waiting for you.”

“Nothing, I am truly embarrassed. I was too abrupt and had hastily sent a message. I apologize for disturbing you and Professor Xie.”

Chu Xiuhong coldly snorted and directly cut off the connection. She simply didn’t give Li Yao any opportunity to say anything else. The hologram screen turned dark.

Under the dark curtain of night, Li Yao stood for a long time, gazing at the countless stars in the pitch black sky.

His pair of eyes also gradually brightened like the stars.

“There are no more problems. Now, I don’t have the slightest of concerns. I can’t wait for tomorrow to arrive — I’m going to fight happily!”





Home  Forty Millenniums of Cultivation  Chapter 89
 

Chapter 89
 
Chapter 89: College Entrance Examination Champion!
Translator: Ash  Editor: Geoffrey_

That night, Li Yao, in deep slumber, slept soundly without a single wisp of a dream. Once he fell asleep, only at dawn did he finally open his eyes again.


In contrast, in several other places in Floating Spear City, there were many who were having troubles sleeping through the night.

2 O’clock in the night, approximately twenty kilometers away, Villa District.

In a giant container filled with silver liquid, Helian Lie gradually floated up. His face was now lacking in arrogance; instead, his eyes carried a sliver of sinisterness and ruthlessness. His face, on the other hand, was devoid of any expression. Slowly, he walked out from the giant container. His skin gave off a silver light, seemingly as if he was covered in silver armor.

“I did it!”

Standing nearby, Helian Ba showed a happy expression as he shouted, “Ah Lie, you did not disappoint Elder Zhou Yin’s expectations. You have finally mastered the ‘Profound Silver War Body’ with the help of his secret method. From now on, your strength will soar!”

Helian Lie’s face, on the other hand, had a completely hideous look. Slowly caressing his iron-like big and tall body, he spoke through clenched teeth, “For this entire month, I had to suffer an inhumane pain day in and day out without even a single breath of respite. In hopes to transform my body into the ‘Profound Silver War Body’, I have soaked my body in the ‘Mysterious Silver Strengthening Serum’ every day and night without rest, suffering an indescribable amount of pain. As a result, my Spiritual Root Development Quotient was forcefully raised to 88%. From now on, my road to cultivation will be completely flat, allowing me to gallop straight ahead!”

“Finally, it is the moment to pluck the fruit. Tomorrow, I will definitely become the ‘Floating Spear City’s Champion of the College Entrance Examination’!”

Helian Ba nodded his head. “Yes, you must become the ‘Floating Spear City’s Champion of the College Entrance Examination’. It is no longer just related to only you, nor is it solely a matter for our Helian Family — now, your college entrance examination score will determine the winner of the ongoing struggle between Elder Zhou Yin and Fiend Blade Peng Hai!”

“Elder Zhou Yin is an expert from the older generation of the Crimson Nimbus Sect, while Fiend Blade Peng Hai is the most recent rising star; it is a struggle between the older generation and the younger generation. They appear to be in harmony; however, this is only on the surface. Elder Zhou Yin had only invited Peng Hai to train the new students at Crimson Nimbus Second Senior High School in hopes to create an illusion that the two gets along harmoniously.”

“But in the dark, the two have had a lot of disagreements. Their contradictions run very deep — the two have even secretly fought several times!”

boxn ovel. c0m
“The college entrance examination this year can also be considered as another form of fighting! Elder Zhou Yin is optimistic about you; he believes that you are a promising student that is worthy to be trained. That’s why he has poured so many resources to nurture you. On the other hand, Peng Hai seems to be supporting that little bastard, Li Yao. I heard that he had even lent his training room to that little bastard. He has made it clear that he is standing behind that bastard!”

Upon hearing Li Yao’s name, all of Helian Lie’s muscles instantly swelled, doubling the size of his body. Stroking his lower abdomen, he slowly spoke word by word, “Li Yao, I will always remember this punch for the rest of my life. After the college entrance exam, I will definitely make you pay for it!”

Helian Ba said, “As long as you become the ‘Floating Spear City’s Champion of the College Entrance Examination’ and prove that Elder Zhou Yin’s insight was correct, his position in the Crimson Nimbus Sect will be more stable, possibly enough for him to suppress Fiend Blade Peng Hai. By then, it will be completely okay to take revenge on Li Yao however you want. Elder Zhou Yin and our Helian Family’s several Elders will completely support you. However, if your test results aren’t good…”

Helian Lie narrowed his eyes. “That’s impossible, father. You have seen with your own eyes the kind of inhumane suffering I have gone through this month. The title of Floating Spear City’s Champion of the College Entrance Examination is already in my bag. No one could take it from me!”

“Alright, our Helian Family’s members should be domineering like this. Father will be waiting for good news!”

“Right. Father, is there any news regarding Li Yao? Is he going to be taking the college entrance exam?”

“It is rather strange. I have thoroughly checked up on the list of examinees who have personally registered their identity for this year’s college entrance examination in Floating Spear City, yet out of the 5788 examinees who have personally registered, Li Yao’s name wasn’t there.”

Helian Lie was surprised for a moment. “Maybe he has transferred to another school?”

Helian Ba shook his head. “I have asked all the high-quality high schools in the city and even inquired some relatively strong, ordinary high school, but there is no record of him. It seems that the brat has yet to recover his strength and is not going to be taking part in this year’s college entrance examination.”

“Oh! What a pity. These days, I have been busy training and did not put any effort to look for that waste. Once the college entrance exam is over and I get the title of Floating Spear City’s Champion of the College Entrance Examination, I will look for him… and slowly compare notes with him!”

…

3 O’clock in the night, approximately twenty-five kilometers away, in an another antique villa.

Si Jiaxue softly yawned, rubbed her beautiful sleepy eyes, and carefully shut down the crystal processor hologram.

“Xiao Xue, rest a little. Tomorrow is the college entrance examination; right now, the most important thing is not reading but a good night sleep. You have to stay in your best state,” a chubby, middle-aged woman behind her said with concern.

Si Jiaxue faintly smiled and said, “Mom, do not worry. It’s just a college entrance exam — it’s a piece of cake for me. Four hours of sleep will be enough.”

…

4 O’clock in the night, approximately thirty kilometers away, inside a dense jungle.

From inside a holiday cottage completely constructed from wood, the voices and laughter of women along with tender moans were coming again and again.

“Young Master Zheng, Young Master Zheng, you should take it easy. You have to take the college entrance exam soon, Young Master Zheng!” On a large pink bed, seven beautiful and charming girls with jade-like bodies laid on the bed. They were all dead drunk.

Zheng Dongming’s two cat-like eyes shone as he lewdly laughed and said, “Finally, after dieting for two months, this young master has finally recovered. Naturally, before anything else, I must first gratify myself. College entrance exam? That’s nothing!”

…

In addition to them, in the entire Star Glory Federation, a countless number of high school students were having difficulty sleeping as they impatiently waited for the arrival of dawn. There were some who were sleepless until the darkest moment before dawn. But finally unable to endure, they fell into deep slumber.

And when they opened their eyes again, it was already 8 O’clock in the morning.

“Sh*t! The exam is going to start at 9 O’clock, get up quickly!”

Countless students throughout the federation jumped from their bed, as if they had heard the sounds of soldiers charging. They rushed out from the gate, rushed to their school, and rushed to the examination room!

Li Yao too was among them.

While the faces of the other examinees were filled with impatience, too much excitement, or panic, Li Yao’s face was, instead, devoid of these emotions; he was calm and unperturbed.

Keeping the same expression all the way to the classroom, Li Yao wormed his way through the examination chamber as its gate gradually closed. Only after he was inside the chamber and isolated from everyone else did a vibrant look appear on his face. From the depths of his eyes, a sliver of thirst could be found…

If Fatty Long and Ye Lang from the Magical Equipment Graveyard saw this expression, they would definitely recognize it within a single glance —— this was the look the “Vulture” gave when he was about to pounce on his prey.

The college entrance examination which would determine the fates of countless students in the federation officially started!

The entire Star Glory Federation was covered in a sheet of calm; no matter which city it was, it was completely quiet. A few flying shuttles that were as slow as a snail were quietly crawling their way through the sky. Even those cultivators who usually whistled across the sky as they flew on their flying swords had all now become cautious. They did not dare to make even a pin-drop noise.

Who would dare to disturb the examinees at this moment when they were giving their all? Even if it were those Nascent Soul Stage old devils, they would be drowned in the hundreds of millions of furious parents.

One hour… Two hours…

Countless examinees were diligently doing to the best of their abilities in the examination chambers, while countless parents eagerly waited outside.

Three hours elapsed. For the Star Glory Federation, those three hours were both the most tranquil and the most tense.

Finally ——

After more than three hours of examination, it was finally over. One by one, examinees who had finished their exam early left the examination chambers. They were all profusely sweating as they left the campus with ease, seemingly as if a weight had been lifted off their mind. They were the cause of the first wave of excitement and cries.

After five hours, the time allotted for the exam was over. Every examinee was forced to leave their examination chamber.

The Star Glory Federation resumed its ordinary days of hustling and bustling, even more so than five hours ago. Every parent and every examinee were gathered inside the school, waiting for the college entrance examination results to be announced!

The examination chamber used for taking the college entrance examination were all equipped with an advanced crystal processor with ultra-high computing capability. When the examinees kill the beasts in the Virtual Space, it was possible to calculate the examinee’s score in real time.

Theoretically, the moment the examinees walk out of the examination chamber, it was possible for the crystal processor to calculate the final college entrance examination score.

However, in order to ensure the fairness of the college entrance examination, after the final score was calculated, it would then be transmitted to other crystal processors in the spirit network to be reviewed again.

Each and every examinee’s score would be calculated by seven different crystal processor, and at the end, when each crystal processor gave exactly the same result, it would be determined that the review was correct. Afterward, it would be uploaded to the main crystal processor of the city’s board of education.

The entire process would approximately need one hour.

One hour later, the main crystal processor of the city’s board of education would announce the results and rankings of all the examinees, and the examinees would be able to inquire through their own mini crystal processor.

However, the top-quality high schools like the Crimson Nimbus Second Senior High School who had the strength to obtain the title of ‘Floating Spear City’s Champion of the College Entrance Examination’ would set up a huge hologram in the most conspicuous place, displaying the names and scores of the city’s top 100, 500, and 1000 students.

At the Crimson Nimbus Second Senior High School, the principal, the trustees, the Head of the Teachers Office, the teachers, and the thousands of students as well as the thousands of parents were all utterly quiet as not a single sound could be heard. A tense expression could be seen on everyone’s face; their eyes were never taken off the hologram set at the center of the playground; they were all quietly awaiting for the final results to be announced.

Helian Lie stood out in the crowd like a stork in a flock of fowls; his entire body was surrounded by a powerful aura. No one dared to be within half a step close to him, thus in an area of approximately one meter in radius, there was no one else.

With both hand wrapped around his shoulders, he appeared to be perfectly calm and collected. However, if one look closer at this fingers, they were lightly tapping, revealing the restlessness within his heart.

Suddenly, the originally pitch black hologram slightly flickered before it was flooded with ripples one after another.

The deathly silent crowd promptly turned restless.

“Look, the results are going to be announced!”

“I wonder if there is anyone in our school who could grab ahold of the title of ‘Floating Spear City’s Champion of the College Entrance Examination’?”

“Rumor has it that this time we have two very powerful candidates. They look very promising!”

“Ah, results are out!”

The ripples in the hologram spread faster and faster as a series of blood-like red numbers fell from the top of the hologram like rain, creating a list of hundreds of examinees with their names and achievements.

The top most line displayed ——

“Crimson Nimbus Second Senior High School’s Helian Lie, College Entrance Examination Total Score – 715, Spiritual Root Development Quotient – 88%, Final Score – 629.2, First in Provisional Score Ranking!”





Home  Forty Millenniums of Cultivation  Chapter 90
 

Chapter 90
 
Chapter 90: Breaking News
Translator: Ash  Editor: Geoffrey_

“Wow!”


The crowd remained silent for half a second before suddenly erupting into a pandemonium of cheers and exclamations.

“Helian Lie is Floating Spear City’s champion in this year’s college entrance examinations! A Spiritual Root Development Quotient of 88% and a total score of 629.2! In recent years, such a good score is rare!”

“After all these years, our Crimson Nimbus Second Senior High School has finally produced a Floating Spear City’s champion of the College Entrance Examination again!”

“Wow, look! Zheng Dongming from the Phoenix Ridge Second High School is second place. His Spiritual Root Development Quotient is 2% higher than Helian Lie, but his score is lower, making his final score just half a point lower than Helian Lie — that’s amazing!”

“Look, Si Jiaxue, another student of Crimson Nimbus Second Senior High School, is in third place and is just half a point behind Zheng Dongming!”

“Two of the top three are students from the Crimson Nimbus Second Senior High School. This time, Crimson Nimbus Second Senior High School definitely deserves to be called the top high school in Floating Spear City!”

“I did it!”

Helian Lie yelled in excitement. Fiercely punching the air with his fist, his fist had unexpectedly given rise to ripples in the space before him.

Nearby, Principal Zhao Shude, the Disciplinary Head Hei Mianshen, and as well as the various trustees of the school took a deep breath in succession. Their faces revealed a look of ecstasy; they were all mad with joy.

Helian Ba was extremely complacent as he grinned from ear to ear.

boxn ovel. c0m
“Old Zhao, this year, our Crimson Nimbus Second Senior High School has a record-breaking harvest, and we have completely suppressed the Phoenix Ridge Second High School’s fame!”

“Yes, due to this year’s exam results, many good seedlings will definitely choose our Crimson Nimbus Second Senior High School next year. If the students are good, the results will keep getting better and better. Now that we have gotten rid of the predicaments from the previous years and have stepped onto this virtuous cycle, we will only get stronger and stronger!”

“Old Zhao, this was only possible because of all of your meritorious deeds. As soon as this news reaches the Crimson Nimbus Sect, presumably even the Sect Master will be very happy!”

“How can that be? First and foremost, our students were able to get such a good score because of the collective support of every trustee. Credit also needs to be given to the hard-working teacher who had put a lot of effort into each student. Finally, it is also because of the hard work of our students. How could it be related to this Zhao? Hahahaha!”

Zhao Shude laughed very jovially. Over the past these months, Li Yao’s matter had been stuck in his throat. He always felt as if there was a thorn in his heart; it was very uncomfortable.

Today, all the troubles had vanished in a puff of smoke. He felt as if all the dark clouds shrouding his heart had vanished; he felt as calm and clear as the clear sky and as boundless as the sea and sky. He was relaxed to the extreme. Even if he were granted the freedom and everlasting life of an immortal, he would not change!

“Beep Beep Beep!”

Someone had sent him a spiritual crane message. It was Elder Zhou Yin, who was the person in charge of education in the Crimson Nimbus Sect.

In the hologram, a smile that was as bright and as beautiful as a spring was hung on Zhou Yin’s face, as if hundreds of flowers were in full bloom.

“Principal Zhao, this time, the performance of the Crimson Nimbus Second Senior High School is very good; two of the top three are students of Crimson Nimbus Second Senior High School. Even Sect Master came to me for advice. Hahahaha. It is all due to your meritorious service. After discussing with the Sect Master, we have decided it will be better to let you, Principal Zhao, personally speak in the Sect’s General Assembly. What do you think?”

Zhao Shude was so excited that he was about to have a heart attack; his face was flushed red to the ears. “It is all due to Elder Zhou’s care, it is all due to Elder Zhou’s care!”

Zhou Yin waved his arm.

“Fostering begets fostering, and hard work is paid with hard work. In short, this time, we got a big win and those who had done meritorious service will be rewarded! Ha, even the stocks of our Crimson Nimbus Sect are beginning to fluctuate. It seems they have already received the news. Our stock prices are going to soar! First, let’s not talk about you. I still have to discuss with Sect Master about how we’re going to disseminate the news to the public — we are going to completely spread the good news! So you must be prepared to do several press releases. In a short while, we are certainly going to hold a press conference. Later, there will be a celebration party which will span over a few days. You and Helian Lie are going to be the main guests, so you can not be careless!”

“Yes! Elder Zhou, don’t worry. I will ardently promote the Crimson Nimbus Second Senior High School!” Zhao Shude was radiating in happiness; his entire face was flushed red like a completely ripe persimmon.

Soon after, from the sky came deafening whistles. A dozen or so flying shuttles were approaching at very high speed.

“It’s the reporters! The reporters from all the major news channels have arrived!” Several parents with good eyesight immediately recognized the flying shuttles.

Sure enough, the flying shuttle had yet to land, but several impatient journalists jumped out from the flying shuttle. With a murderous look on their faces, they plunged into the crowd and started shouting at the top of their lungs.

“Student Helian Lie? Where is Student Helian Lie?”

“Student Helian Lie, you are the Floating Spear City’s Champion of this year’s college entrance examination. Please tell us how you are feeling.”

“Student Helian Lie, may I ask how do you usually train? Can you share some of your training experience with the other students?”

“Principal Zhao, Principal Zhao Shude! Since the sudden appearance of the cultivation genius ‘Fiend Blade Peng Hai’ a few years back, your Crimson Nimbus Second Senior High School has been completely silent. In Floating Spear City, which is one of the important cultivation city in the federation, you have been continuously suppressed by the Phoenix Ridge Second High School. But why has two geniuses suddenly appeared this year in Crimson Nimbus Second Senior High School? Please tell us about your thoughts, Principal Zhao!”

“There is no need to hurry; you don’t need to be so anxious. Friends from the media, please be patient. I will answer all your questions, but it’ll be in the press conference which will be held very soon. If you have any questions, please wait till then. I promise I will speak without any reservation — I’ll tell you all I know!”

Zhao Shude’s face was radiating happiness, grinning from ear to ear.

Helian Ba also squeezed to his son’s side and patted Helian Lie’s shoulder with force. He could not hide his joy. “Atta boy, you have saved your father’s face. Well done, you did well!”

“Are you Helian Lie? I am a reporter from Floating Spear Morning Post. First. Please reveal a bit of your experiences in private with us!” A few reporters recognized Helian Lie and desperately squeezed over.

After the excitement at the start, Helian Lie became very calm. He swept over the hologram, shook his head, and said, “Wait! Only 80% of the scores of Floating Spear City’s examinees have been calculated; there are still some districts where the scores of their examinees have yet to be calculated. This is not the final ranking.”

Because there were too many examinees, the amount of data was too much, thus all the data was divided into batches, calculated one by one, and fed into the database.

Until now, there were several slum districts where the examinees’ scores had not yet been uploaded and calculated.

However, in light of the results from previous years, these examinees from the slum district would not raise any big storm. After all, they didn’t have enough money to put food on their table, so how were they going to train? How could they score within the top one thousand of Floating Spear City’s College Entrance Examination?

Even if they somehow made their way into the top one thousand list, it would be near impossible for them to create any big effect on top hundred. At least, in the last few decades, it was unheard of for any high school within the slum districts to have an examinee who paved a road to the city’s top one hundred.

Therefore, once the top hundred students were determined, it was 100% certain that the ranking would not change!

Very soon, at the bottom of the hologram, the progress had jumped to “90%”. Citywide 90% of the examinees’ scores had been uploaded to the database and had been calculated.

“Now, the examinees’ scores from the three districts had been uploaded. There has been no change in the top thousand rankings. First place is still Helian Lie — are you now ready for the interview?”

“Wait a minute!” Helian Lie gaze still didn’t leave the hologram. On the back his hand, blue veins were bulging.

“93%! This time, even the scores of examinees who had personally registered for the college entrance examination have been calculated. You are still first. Student Helian Lie, please tell us about your experiences. You absolutely can not hide it! Student Helian Lie, the majority of viewers are now anxiously waiting for your interview!”

“Wait a minute!”

“97%! In the entire Floating Spear City, only the scores of the examinees from the Limestone District have yet to be calculated. The Limestone District is a famous slum district. The few high schools it has are all rotten to the extreme. Even last year, not a single student from the Limestone District could enter the top ten thousand in the entire city! Student Helian Lie, now can you give us an interview!”

Several journalists shouted at the top of their voice. They had almost plugged Helian Lie’s mouth with their crystal mic.

“Only the Limestone District is left?”

Helian Lie heaved a sigh of relief. His entire body seemed to be brimming with energy and vitality, radiating with cheerfulness.

He nodded his head at the several journalists, took the crystal mic, and started speaking with fervor and confidence, “Respected viewers, parents, students, and teachers, hello! I am Floating Spear City’s champion of the college entrance examination, Helian Lie. A reporter had asked me if I have any tips to give — Of course, I do! I have three tips: first is hard work, second is hard work, and the third is work hard like a madman! I believe as long as you have worked hard enough, everyone can create miracles…”

He was prepared to speak some more when he noticed all the journalists, parents, and students were all dumbfounded. As if they had seen some ghost, they were all firmly staring at the huge hologram behind him.

Helian Lie felt as if his heart had been ruthlessly clutched by an invisible hand. He immediately turned his head and noticed that the hologram, which had been entirely still till now, was beginning to fluctuate. At the bottom of the ranking, there were some changes happening.

“Wow, breaking news!”

“Impossible, it is absolutely impossible!”

“An examinee from the Limestone District has actually made his way into the top thousand of the Floating Spear City — Rank 998!”

“That’s incredible! Student Ge Qiang from Limestone High School is truly incredible. He has actually subverted so many competitors from high-quality high schools and paved his way into the top thousand. Amazing, this is truly amazing!”

One by one, several journalists started talking about him. All of them were talking of going to the Limestone High School to interview Student Ge Qiang after interviewing the college entrance examination champion, Helian Lie.

Helian Lie once again took a long deep breath, wiped the cold sweat from his forehead, glanced at the progress rate at the bottom of the hologram, and found that 99.9% of the examinees’ scores had been fed into the database.

Only the waste school, the “Floating Spear City’s Mining Clan High School” that was at the bottom of the ranking in last year’s college entrance examination, had not entered the database.

Helian Lie collected himself. On his face appeared a smile once again.

“As everyone can see, as I have said before, as long as you work hard enough, it is possible for everyone to create miracles! At the moment, behind me, nothing less than a miracle has occurred. An examinee from the Limestone High School has actually made his way into the top thousand of the Floating Spear City’s college entrance examination rankings. You can imagine how hard it must have been! In fact, you should not be interviewing me, you should go to Limestone High School and interview Fellow Student Ge Qiang. It’s not strange for me to get the title of college entrance examination champion. Fellow Student Ge Qiang is truly worthy…”

Helian Lie’s voice once again abruptly came to a stop.

He discovered that everyone in front of him, regardless of whether it was the reporters, parents, students, teachers, head instructor, trustees, and even his own father, Helian Ba —

Everyone was staring with their mouth agape, as if they have all lost their wits — they were all extremely horrified!

This time, the expression on their faces was completely different from a moment ago.

A moment ago, it was like they had seen a ghost.

But at this moment, as if they had become a ghost, as if they had become a wandering ghost, as if they had become a zombie… or as if some spirit glyph had been pasted onto their forehead, suppressing their bodies — their bodies had become completely rigid!

In an instant, the large campus became dead silent, much like an abandoned cemetery.

Thousands of people stood upright like the thousands of weed growing by a tombstone!

Helian Lie’s breath became extremely rapid. Every one of his joints was as if it had been covered in rust, even turning his neck had become extremely difficult for him.

“Look, you, you quickly take look, quickly look…”

A reported stammered. His gaze was as if it had been stuck on something behind Helian Lie; he was unable to move.

Helian Lie’s mind went blank. With all his strength, he turned his head inch by inch, forcing his own gaze to fall upon the hologram.

At the top of the hologram, just above his name, appeared a brand new name.

The name was like a ghost — from the abyss of the large amount of data, it silently made its way to the top, suddenly climbing above Helian Lie!

“Floating Spear City’s Mining Clan High School’s Student Li Yao, college entrance examination total score 781, Spiritual Root Development Quotient 92%, final score 718.52, citywide first!”





Home  Forty Millenniums of Cultivation  Chapter 91
 

Chapter 91
 
Chapter 91: Where is the Champion of the College Entrance Examination?
Translator: Ash  Editor: Geoffrey_

“No——”


Helian Lie let out a heartrending cry as thick red blood from his neck spread everywhere, instantly swallowing his entire face. As his face alternated between pale and flushed in turns, his facial features completely twisted together as if it had been smashed like a broken drum!

He felt as if stars were dancing before his eyes, as if someone was playing the drums next to his ears, as if everyone was laughing at him! His temples were throbbing as if two midgets were about to drill out of his temples. His entire body was shuddering, barely able to remain standing.

“Li Yao! Li Yao! Where did you come from!? A Spiritual Root Development Quotient of 92%? A full hundred points higher than me? It’s impossible! It is absolutely impossible! There must be a mistake!”

Helian Lie gasped for breath. In his heart, he was screaming in madness. Deep down his throat, it was flooding with an unstoppable tide.

Not far away from him, Crimson Nimbus Second Senior High School’s Principal Zhao Shude, Disciplinary Head Hei Mianshen, and the thousand other trustees were all in a trance. They were all on the verge of collapse. The look on their faces could be described in one sentence — as if they were bereaved of both parents!

“How is this possible? How could a student from the Mining Clan High School actually defeat our student and make his way to the top, seizing the title of Floating Spear City’s Champion of the College Entrance Examination?”

“Li Yao? Yes — Li Yao!”

With foreheads completely drenched in sweat, Zhao Shude and Hei Mianshen glanced at each other before stealing a glance at Helian Ba. The all-smiling Helian Ba who was like a peach flower in blossom just a moment ago has now wilted; his complexion was completely pale. He turned into an ice statue.

The quickest to react were the reporters; shortly after the silence, they started bouncing one by one as if they had been shot with a stimulant.

“Breaking news, super breaking news! The college entrance examination champion actually appeared in the worst high school in Floating Spear City! Today’s ratings are going to go through the roof!”

boxn ovel. c0m
“Wait! Li Yao… Li Yao… Why does this name sound familiar!?”

“Hey, isn’t Li Yao that ‘Fleeting Fiend Star’? He had actually recovered? Isn’t he a lot stronger than before?”

“Something must have happened — I am sure something must have happened here! Wasn’t Li Yao a student of Crimson Nimbus Second Senior High School? Why did a student who was able to win the title of Floating Spear City’s champion of the college entrance examination take the college entrance examination at the Mining Clan High School?”

“Principal Zhao, please explain it to us. Why did Student Li Yao’s name appear alongside Mining Clan High School?”

“Yea, Principal Zhao, what actually happened? Why has Student Li Yao left the Crimson Nimbus Second Senior High School? How can you bear to let such a cultivation genius leave your school?”

Under the questioning of numerous reporters, Zhao Shude wanted to cry but had no tears. His complexion turned pale, his lips started shivering, he continuously shook his head and said, “No comments, no comments!”

“Brothers, what are we waiting for? Let’s quickly go to the Mining Clan High School and interview Student Li Yao!”

Noticing the deathly expression as if he was devoid of all life on Zhao Shude’s face, a few reporters with quick wits instantly reacted and shouted within their heart, ‘Why should we waste our time talking to this guy? Someone with authority has yet to arrive!’

Suddenly, the situation took a complete turn. A moment ago, several dozen reporters were swarming around Helian Lie and Zhao Shude, while in the next moment, they were all completely scattered. One by one, the flying shuttles impatiently soared into the sky and sprang towards the Limestone District.

“You, all of you come back to me!”

Helian Lie’s pair of eyes were blood-red. Unable to contain his fury, he tightly grabbed the sleeve of a journalist and madly shouted, “It must be a mistake made by the crystal processor! I am the Floating Spear City’s champion of the college entrance examination, it can only be me! Quickly interview me, quickly interview me! You bunch of bastards are as blind as a bat!”

“Don’t waste my time!”

The reporter exerted his strength to hurl him but was unable to. Suddenly, he flared up with fury as he ruthlessly shoved at Helian Lie’s stomach.

With Helian lie’s strength, it would simply be impossible for him to get knocked down by a reporter, but at this moment, his body was as though all the bones in his body had been removed. From this shove alone, he softly fell onto the ground, landing on his ass.

The reporter did not even spare him a single glance. He hurled his sleeve and quickly left.

Helian Lie sat on the ground for a while with a sluggish look and a forced smile. Suddenly, he felt his stomach churn as if lightning and clouds were billowing.

“Poof”

He vomited out everything inside.

—— This was the sequelae that remained after he had suffered Li Yao’s “Heart Piercing Hammer”. Every time his tension reached the extreme, he would be unable to contain his vomit.

In the contest between him and Li Yao, Helian Lie had been thoroughly crushed. He was so miserable that one could not bear to look at him!

…

Limestone District, Mining Clan High School.

Compared to Crimson Nimbus Second Senior High School where the scene was seething with enthusiasm, the atmosphere at the Mining Clan High School was significantly relaxed. Here, they simply didn’t set any big hologram. Every examinee was querying their own results and rankings through their mini crystal processors.

Here, the examinees all knew their own limitations. They never thought they would be able to get into those big universities. They were all completely satisfied with getting into some technical schools.

So after the results of the college entrance examination was out, there wasn’t an ounce of tension visible on examinees’ faces here. 30-40% of the students were gathered together as they talked and laughed.

“I scored 345 points, I am ranked 75562 in the city. Haha, it’s enough. This score should be enough for me to enter the ‘Mysterious Fire Cooking School’!”

“Mine is also not bad; I scored 341 points, but I have not decided which school I want to attend. My father explicitly said that I am not allowed to learn to operate mining equipment or learn any crafts related to mining. It has always been my dream to be a beautician!”

While the countless examinees of slum district were talking and laughing, deafening roars suddenly came from the sky one after another as several dozen rainbows flashed over from the sky above the Mining Clan High School, leaving a trail of colorful flames behind as they slowly dispersed.

“Wow, so many luxurious flying shuttles!”

“Look at that. That flying shuttle seems to have the insignia of the city’s board of education!”

“Our Limestone District is just notorious for being a slum district. Why are there so many luxurious flying shuttle approaching here? They seem to be flying towards Limestone High School!”

Soon, all the students received the news. The “Limestone High School” belonging to the Limestone District had an examinee called “Ge Qiang” who, as if possessed by a god, had unexpectedly paved his way into the top thousand in the Floating Spear City’s college entrance examination rankings.

The entire campus suddenly burst into exclamations.

“Amazing! I never would have expected that an examinee from our slum district would be able to get into the top thousand of Floating Spear City!”

“I know this Ge Qiang. His mother died very early on and his father was a miner, but he was seriously injured in an accident. As a result, his entire body was paralyzed. The whole family relied on the meager subsidy to survive, so Ge Qiang worked extremely hard. He wanted to get a good score in order to cure his father and reverse the fate of his family!”

“Yes, several times I woke up at 4-5 AM in the morning and saw Ge Qiang carrying a heavy stone running down the street. All the neighbors called him an out and out training maniac!”

“Are so many reporters as well as the officials from the board of education going to interview Ge Qiang? This kid is a perfect example of a fish leaping across the dragon gate — he has reached the sky in a single leap!”

All the examinees of the Mining Clan High School were feeling envious of Ge Qiang’s result. Such a good result was enough for him to choose a good university, and perhaps some companies under a cultivation sect might spend money to train him. It could be said that from now on, his fate had completely changed.

However, who asked him to train like a madman?

No sweets without sweat. For such a result, he had paid for it with his sweat and no one was going to get jealous over that.

While the examinees were chatting with each other, an extremely strange scene appeared in the sky. Those luxurious flying shuttles, which happened to be rushing towards the Limestone High School and were about to disappear in the horizon, suddenly made a U-turn, and much to everyone’s surprise, they were all directly flying toward the Mining Clan High School!

Many more luxurious flying shuttles were closing in on the Mining Clan High School from every corner of the city. The space around the Mining Clan High School was completely packed!

“What… what’s going on?”

All the examinees and their parents were mind-boggled. They all stood still like wooden chickens in their place; they didn’t even dare to breathe loudly.

There were so many luxurious flying shuttles, with the cheapest among them being worth a few million bucks. Why were such flying shuttles, without any previous arrangement, acting in consort and gathering at the Mining Clan High School?

This was the last ranked high school in Floating Spear City with the worst of the worst teaching quality!

A while later ——

“Where is the college entrance examination champion?”

A large group of luxuriously dressed cultivators with spiritual light looming around their bodies jumped out of the luxurious flying shuttles. They could not wait to land on the campus.

They were the managers of various sects in the Floating Spear City responsible for soliciting talent.

“Where is the college entrance examination champion?”

Behind the group, a bunch of officials from the board of education followed one after another.

“Where is the college entrance examination champion?”

A large group of journalists followed after them as they boisterously squeezed into the crowd.

The examinees and the parents of the Mining Clan High School started at each other before looking at the numerous well-dressed high society figures with a strange look in their eyes.

As though they were looking at a bunch of idiots and madmen.

—— If they were not idiots and madmen, why would they come looking for some college entrance examination champion in this ghastly place, the Mining Clan High School?

“You still don’t know? Your Fellow Sstudent Li Yao is this year’s college entrance examination champion! Quickly, ask Student Li Yao to come out and give an interview! Li Yao, Student Li Yao!”

An impatient reporter started his mini crystal processor and adjusted the hologram to show the Floating Spear City’s College Entrance Examination Ranking.

Reading the small characters on the first row of the list, all the examinees and the parents at Mining Clan High School were feeling confused and disoriented as stars danced before their eyes.

After a silence of an entire ten seconds, the huge campus was like a dormant volcano that suddenly recovered from its stupor. In an instant, the entire campus burst into deafening cries and exclamations.

“Are you serious? Our Mining Clan High School’s examinee actually became the Floating Spear City’s champion of the college entrance examination?”

“My god, is my eyesight correct? I am not seeing wrong, right?”

“Incredible, it is truly incredible. This is simply, this is simply——”

The reporter was getting anxious. He waved his hand and shouted, “Respected students and the parents, everyone should first take it easy. Can you please first ask Student Li Yao to come out and speak a few words? He is the anticipated college entrance examination champion, you can not be able to hide him any longer!”

“Right, Li Yao, where did Student Li Yao go?” All the examinees put their head together, asking each other. Because Li Yao was a transfer student who just joined the Mining Clan High School a month back and usually didn’t come to school to revise, the majority of the examinees didn’t know him. After asking everyone nearby, an examinee finally said with hesitation, “I just passed the boiler room a while ago. I think I saw Student Li Yao there. He seemed to be… repairing the boiler.”

“What!”

All the reporters screamed as if they were all rooster whose neck had been stepped upon.





Home  Forty Millenniums of Cultivation  Chapter 92
 

Chapter 92
 
Chapter 92: From out the Boiler Room Came the Champion!
Translator: Ash  Editor: Geoffrey_

Li Yao was indeed repairing the boiler.

In the entire Star Glory Federation, he was one of the examinees who had completed their college entrance examination early; it only took him three hours to complete all the examination questions. And immediately after, he had left the examination chamber without any delay.

There were still two hours before the college entrance examination was over. In the meantime, Li Yao chose to wander around. With his hands behind his back, he leisurely strolled around the campus. Unknowingly, he had arrived at an abandoned bath house behind the school.

When the Limestone District was in its most prosperous period, the Mining Clan High School once had more than 10,000 students. And in the residential area behind the school, a large bathhouse was built to provide students convenience in their free time. During holidays, it was even open to the community.

However, the Limestone District gradually declined with the depletion of the lodes as the number of Mining Clan High School students became fewer and fewer over time. Hence, as the number of people who came to take a bath was low, heating a large pool of water for a handful of people was simply too uneconomical. It was unknown when it began, but the bathhouse has been closed since.

After being unattended for several decades, the boiler room which was responsible for providing heat to the bathhouse was laden with rust and covered in spider webs and dust.

Through the broken window, Li Yao casually swept a glance inside the boiler room. His eyes suddenly lit up as his line of sight transfixed upon a pitch black boiler.

In the boiler room, he discovered a towering boiler which had been manufactured nine or so decades ago — the “Fire Bear” Boiler. This type of boiler was one of the first civilian magical equipment that utilized 3-dimensional array architect. The core of the boiler was enclosed in two layers flame array glyphs, consisting of an upper and a lower layer. These two layer acted as a cooling system that made it possible to remove any potential excess heat energy in a steady stream, thereby allowing the temperature to remain extremely stable. Its structure was a classic.

Previously, Li Yao had seen the schematics of this type of boiler only in a book; he never had the chance to lay his eyes upon it.

As a magical equipment fanatic, naturally, he would not miss such a great opportunity.

The door to the boiler room simply wasn’t locked. Its hinges had all become rusty. Li Yao exerted his strength to push open the door.

boxn ovel. c0m
“Crash!”

With a loud crash, the door was forcibly opened, causing the dust in the boiler room to swirl around in the air as bats and small birds flew out.

Some of the bird poop had even landed on Li Yao’s head.

Li Yao simply didn’t pay any attention to all of these things. His pair of eyes shone like a rat who had discovered a sack of rice. Ignoring everything else, he swooped over and hugged the “Fire Bear” Boiler as he began to research the boiler with rapt attention.

For the entirety of three or so hours, he was completely immersed in the wonderful world of magical equipment.

Although the Fire Bear Boiler was a magical equipment from almost a century ago, its double-layer array structure was astonishingly mysterious. A total of 36 fire array glyphs were connected through over a hundred very fine crystal wires. It could even be said that just moving a single wire could affect the entire structure. Completely immersed within it, every design left an unforgettable memory in Li Yao’s mind.

Unconsciously, Li Yao had bent down and crawled his way into the boiler. His face, his hands, and his entire body was covered in oil. His entire body was dirty and dusty; the only thing left untainted were his two rows of neat and tidy white teeth. He could not get any more unkempt than his current state.

His eyes, on the other hand, were getting brighter and brighter. His ten fingers as gentle as a goose feather lightly whisked the crystal wire, as if he were a world-renowned zitherist lightly playing the zither and creating a beautiful tune.

Vaguely, he seemed to grasp the essence of the 3-dimensional array structure. In his eyes, the components of the huge boiler gradually turned translucent; within the depths of his mind, the large boiler was continuously being disassembled before being reassembled into its working state.

“So it was like this — this is completely ingenious! The dissipating fire-type spiritual energy is collected again in order to lower the amount of wasted spiritual energy. This design is truly a work of art!” Li Yao clucked his tongue in marvel.

“Student Li Yao? Student Li Yao? Li Yao!”

Principal Mao ran with a red flush that extended from his face to his neck. Standing at the entrance of the boiler room, he leaned on his knees as he gasped for breath for a good while. He shouted for several times, but it was all in vain as he didn’t receive a single response. He was truly unable to catch Li Yao’s attention. He took a look around before picking up a wooden torch and lightly poked Li Yao’s ass with it.

“Student Li Yao!”

“Wait! Principal Mao, whatever it is, it can wait. I will soon figure it out… so it was like this, so it was like this… this is too formidable! Why didn’t I think of this sooner!? Originally, these three crystal wires were working in conjunction!”

Li Yao slapped his thigh. Without turning around, he said in excitement, “Principal, can you wait again? I’m absolutely sure that I can fix this boiler — it will be as good as new!”

Principal Mao didn’t know whether to laugh or cry. He yelled, “Li Yao! It’s getting late. You still want to repair this boiler? Quickly come out now. You have to give interviews. You are Floating Spear City’s champion of the college entrance examination!”

“Don’t yell. The echoes inside the boiler room make my head hurt. Whatever it is, it can wait for me. Let’s talk about it after I repair the boiler. Even the college entrance exam’s cham… what? I am the college entrance exam’s champion!?”

Inside the boiler, Li Yao let out a wolfish howl and jumped in excitement.

“Boom!”

But soon after, the entire boiler room started shaking as the dust accumulated upon the beams of the room fell and covered the whole boiler room.

Li Yao had forgotten that he was still inside the boiler. His head violently collided with the steel plates as a bulge soon appeared on the boiler as well as on his head.

Li Yao did not care about the pain. Holding his head, he crawled out of the boiler and took two deep breaths as he collected himself. He grabbed Principal Mao’s shoulder and started shaking him. “Principal, am I really Floating Spear City’s champion of the college entrance exam?”

“Hey hey hey, can’t you spare my old bones? Won’t you know after checking the net?” Tears of pain trickled down from Principal Mao’s eyes.

Li Yao immediately let go and somewhat embarrassingly scratched his head, thereby sprinkling the dust from his messy hair. Starting up the crystal processor, he opened the page dedicated to the college entrance examination. Entering his student ID before clicking to confirm, his score and ranking soon floated up on the display.

“Floating Spear City’s Mining Clan High School Li Yao, College Entrance Examination total score – 781, Spiritual Root Development Quotient – 92%, final score – 718.52, citywide first!”

“Awesome!”

Li Yao’s excitement had reached its peak. He even did three backflips before jumping three feet high into the air as he violently sent out a punch mid-air!

“I did it!”

“In one month, I, a waste with a Spiritual Root Development Quotient of 7%, has once again become a cultivation genius with a Spiritual Root Development Quotient of 92%. And I had also won the title of ‘Floating Spear City’s Champion of the College Entrance Examination’!”

“I didn’t disappoint Sun Biao, Peng Hai, Ding Lingdang, Grandpa Wang, and Principal Mao’s expectation!”

“The most important thing is that I’m one step closer to my dream. With this score, I can pick any one of the Nine Elite Universities!”

“Student Li Yao, calm down. There are hundreds of reporters waiting outside to get your interview. Don’t get excited. Calm down, you have to be calm!” Principal Mao said in a trembling voice.

He was asking Li Yao to remain calm, yet his appearance revealed the opposite of anything but calm; he appeared as though he had been injected with a large dosage of some stimulant. From his neck to his ear, his face was flushed red. His arms, his legs, and even his entire body was trembling; he was excited to the extreme.

The College Entrance Examination Champion, ah! Since the establishment of Floating Spear City’s Mining Clan High School, for over a century, let alone the College Entrance Examination Champion, not a single student had appeared within the top thousand. How could Principal Mao remain calm? How could he be calm and collected?

If not for his old and frail body, he too would not be able to contain himself and would somersault a few times like Li Yao!

Upon hearing Principal Mao’s words, Li Yao took a long, deep breath as he forcefully rubbed his cheeks and muttered to himself, “Calm down, calm down. It’s just Floating Spear City’s champion of the college entrance exam. I will become a Master Refiner in the future. My name will move the Federation and shake the entire Heaven Origin Sector. How can I lose my bearing just from such a small scene? That’s too embarrassing…”

As he spoke these words, a calm smile emerged on Li Yao’s face. His pitch black face was accompanied by shining white teeth, just like a fool.

Noticing that Li Yao was a little complacent, Principal Mao reminded him, “Student Li Yao, I heard some reporters speak and it appears that they seem to be very interested in the relationship between you and the Crimson Nimbus Second Senior High School. When you talk to them, you need to be careful of what you say. Try not to offend others. After all, we do not have any deep-rooted hatred. It would not be very good to completely shed all pretenses of cordiality, do you understand?”

“Oh?”

Upon hearing the words “Crimson Nimbus Second Senior High School”, Li Yao was surprised for a moment. The smile on his face disappeared as two strange glints flashed through his eyes. In large strides, he left the boiler room.

Like a bunch of uncontrollable, wild dogs, a large group of reporters vied with each other as they rushed over to the boiler room.

“Student Li Yao! Student Li Yao! Please give us an interview!”

Li Yao immediately collected himself as he quickly drew a draft in his mind. After a second, he proudly raised his head and went ahead to welcome the reporters.

He gave a cough to clear his throat. Just as he wanted to speak, the large group of reporters walked right past him as if they hadn’t seen him. Like a river met with a reef, they automatically separated to either of his sides and went around him.

“Student Li Yao, where are you? Please come out to give me an interview!”

A slightly embarrassed Li Yao raised his right hand. “I’m here!”

“Where? We don’t see you, Student Li Yao!”

The large group of reporters surrounded Li Yao. A few dozen of them doubtfully gazed at Li Yao as they measured Li Yao from head to toe. Not one of them paid attention to him.

The reporters couldn’t be blamed for being as blind as a bat. In fact, Li Yao’s current appearance was far from the most anticipated “College Entrance Examination Champion”.

He looked as if he had been digging for coal for three straight days and nights. His hair was a mess, and he also had a bulge at the center of his head. The bird poop that had fallen on his shoulder was starkly visible. Only god knows when his clothes had snagged onto some rusted part of the boiler, causing it to tear a large hole on his clothes. Apparently, he could not become even more unkempt than he already was and could not look any more miserable.

For almost half a minute, the reporters looked at each other before their line of sight gradually gathered on Li Yao. With some hesitation, a female reporter took out a handkerchief from her purse and handed it over to Li Yao. “Are… are you Student Li Yao?”

Li Yao expressed his gratitude and took the handkerchief as he forcefully wiped his face for a few seconds. After having wiped his face, his appearance looked slightly better, yet remnants of dirt and oil were still smeared all over his face; his facial features were barely recognizable.

Li Yao was a celebrity in Floating Spear City and many reporters had seen him at the hospital when he was in the coma. The monicker “Fleeting Fiend Star” had come out from one of the journalist’s hand.

Immediately, someone shouted, “Yes, that’s Li Yao!”

Upon hearing that, the eyes of all the reporters began shining. Once again, they scrambled to surround him as they thrust their crystal mics that were like eight feet long snake spears toward Li Yao one by one. The female reporter who had given him the handkerchief was in the forefront and got the advantage. Wrapping her arms around Li Yao’s shoulder, she placed a crystal mic between them.

“Student Li Yao, your performance in this year’s college entrance examination can be described as completely shocking. It was as if you had been possessed by some devil or god. You have made a complete reversal, shocking the hell out of everyone! Everyone is very curious about you. However, what we are most concerned about is — why did you drop out of Crimson Nimbus Second Senior High School and come to this no-name school? As you know, Crimson Nimbus Second Senior High School is a famous school within Floating Spear City. Every year, its overall strength is in the top three, while Mining Clan High School has been at the bottom of the list for the past few decades. If I may, can you tell us if there’s some underlying reason for all of this!”





Home  Forty Millenniums of Cultivation  Chapter 93
 

Chapter 93
 
Chapter 93: Igniting the Whole City
Translator: Ash  Editor: Geoffrey_

Principal Mao stood on his toes behind the crowd as he forcefully waved both his hands. Without uttering a single sound, in hopes to remind Li Yao, he mouthed the words, “Don’t be fooled! These reporters just want breaking news, don’t look for trouble!”

Li Yao slightly smiled at Principal Mao, indicating he had a sense of propriety. However, in his heart, he secretly apologized.

“Principal Mao, I’m sorry. I know you are looking out for me. You don’t want me to openly offend the Crimson Nimbus Second Senior High School and bring harm to myself…”

“But you are too honest and too good. How could you understand the kind of person Helian Lie is?”

“Even if I am just a point ahead in the college entrance exam… For someone like him, it would be the biggest insult. No matter how low-key I remain, how I gloss over things to stay on good terms, or how much good will I express—it will be all in vain as it will be impossible for him to give up any thoughts to go against me!”

“Any compromise from my side will only be interpreted as me being weak. It would only encourage him, even more than he already has, to take revenge on me.”

“If so, then why should I have any second thoughts? An eye for an eye and a tooth for a tooth. Since I have the opportunity to slap him in the face, I should use all my strength to ruthlessly slap—this is how I, Li Yao, do things!”

Clearing his throat, Li Yao grabbed the crystal mic and loudly said, “Of course, there is an underlying reason!”

“What?”

The spirit of every reporter rose as if they were wolves that had gotten a whiff of the scent of a lamb. In an instant, they all became completely awake as they stared at Li Yao with their glossy and sleek eyes.

They had thought that Li Yao would just casually say a few words or simply say “no comments”.

boxn ovel. c0m
How could they have expected that this young man would say such a thing and had even wanted to give such hot news!

In an instant, the reporters simply wanted to burst into tears. They could not wait to loudly applaud and cheer for Li Yao.

Principal Mao, on the other hand, heaved a sigh. With one hand massaging his temple, his face was filled with helplessness.

He knew that this brat was simply someone one shouldn’t mess with. Give him an inch and he’d take a mile.

“Zhao Shude, Zhao Shude… The guy you have offended is really not someone to be trifled with. You should not have offended this ‘Fiend Star’. This time, your Crimson Nimbus Second Senior High School is going to have a hard time!” Principal Mao secretly shook his head. He could not help but heave a sigh.

With a sharp glint in his eyes, Li Yao spoke with a clear and mellow voice, “As you all know, two months ago, I represented the Crimson Nimbus Second Senior High School in this year’s Limit Challenge Competition. Because of an accidental injury, my Spiritual Root Development Quotient fell sharply, which had even sent me into a coma. Only after an entire month did I finally wake up!”

“It is reasonable to say that I went to win glory for the school. After my injuries, don’t you think it’s reasonable for the school to take good care of me no matter the circumstances? But after Crimson Nimbus Second High School’s management discovered that I was injured and wasn’t able to cultivate, the very day I woke up, they heartlessly asked me to leave the school and told me that whether or not I could continue would depend on my recovery!”

“And all this is just because I had once offended the son of Crimson Nimbus Second Senior High School’s trustee, Helian Ba—the Crimson Nimbus Second Senior High School’s student council president, Helian Lie!”

“Helian Lie and I have old grudges. On Devil Flood Dragon Island, he was eliminated from the competition by me and also had his spotlight taken away from him. This new hatred along with the old grievances made him disregard everything as he started to take revenge against me frantically!”

“Everyone in Crimson Nimbus Second Senior High School knows about this. You can casually pick any student and interview him. Even the aunt responsible for cleaning the canteen is clear about this!”

“Fortunately, the heavens never seals off all paths of retreat! The Mining Clan High School’s Principal Mao had discerning eyes that could distinguish greatness from mediocrity; he was able to discern whether a person had potential and whether they could be trained. He took a big risk to protect me. Over this past month, I have been undergoing intensive training, and fortunately, I was able to recover to my previous form, allowing me to obtain a good score in the college entrance exam!”

“For sure, I’m happy to become Floating Spear City’s champion of the college entrance exam, but there are two things I’m more happy about.”

“First, I didn’t disappoint Principal Mao, who trusted and cared for me, and won the supreme honor for Floating Spear City’s Mining Clan High School. In the future on my road of cultivation, I will keep the identity of ‘Mining Clan High School’ graduate as I continue to tread forth!”

“Second, I have used the facts to prove that the Crimson Nimbus Second Senior High School’s management is as blind as a bat. Them asking me to leave school was not my loss; on the contrary, it was their biggest lost—they can now regret without any hesitation!”

“I have said all I wanted to say. For the rest of the details, you can go to Crimson Nimbus Second Senior High School and interview the students, the principal—Zhao Shude, the school trustee—Helian Ba, and the student council president—Helian Lie. Maybe they will give you a different version of the story!”

After he finished speaking, Li Yao threw the mic and elegantly took his leave.

However, he had set off a mighty uproar which in just a few hours was enough to shake the entire Floating Spear City!

A month ago, a seriously injured, poor brat from the slums who could not oppose the rich and was kicked out of a famous school. However, after a single month, he mystically turned things around and entered some no-name, waste school, eventually winning the title of “College Entrance Examination Champion” in one fell swoop and giving a ruthless slap to the face of the famous school. Through twists and turns, the entire story had become a soul-stirring journey; it was simply more exciting than any novel. Upon listening to Li Yao’s words, every reporter felt an upsurge of emotion, and their blood was seething.

The reporters had a keen sense for breaking news. One by one, every one of them had realized that all of Li Yao’s experiences could be turned into a sensational story!

It was too late to return to the mobile production control room. All the reporters sat down on the ragged campus of the Mining Clan High School one after another. For a long time and with half-squinting eyes, the reporters wracked their brain as they assembled the information piece by piece, drawing a draft for their respective news channel.

The reporters from the formal media groups still took a relatively objective stand. Their focus was on either the recovery of Li Yao or the improvement of his Spiritual Root Development Quotient. The title of their drafts were also relatively restrained, many like the following:

“THE FIEND STAR RISES AGAIN!”

“THE BIGGEST MIRACLE IN THE HISTORY OF FLOATING SPEAR CITY’S COLLEGE ENTRANCE EXAMINATION!”

“WHAT TRULY TOOK PLACE PAST THIS MONTH?”

In contrast, the reporters from small media groups as well as media from the entertainment industry were not as reserved. Generally speaking, these reports would be more afraid of calm and peace in the world. Even if they had nothing, they would, out of nothing, piece out some breaking news, let alone the earth-shattering information that Li Yao had unveiled. So, titles without any ounce of integrity were born.

“BREAKING NEWS! THE BIGGEST CONSPIRACY IN THE HISTORY OF FLOATING SPEAR CITY’S EDUCATION! THE POOR GENIUS OFFENDED THE SECOND GENERATION WEALTHY AND GOT KICKED OUT OF THE SCHOOL!”

“REVENGE OF REGAL’S SON AFTER LOSING HIS GIRLFRIEND!”

“FIVE DAYS AND FIVE NIGHTS OF LOVE AND HATE—THE CHRONICLES OF DISPUTE ON DEVIL FLOOD DRAGON ISLAND!”

“THE BIGGEST JOKE OF THE COLLEGE ENTRANCE EXAMINATION!”

“HELIAN LIE—THE HALF-MINUTE COLLEGE ENTRANCE EXAMINATION CHAMPION!”

In this era of information where public attention was everything, it was the era of attention economic. Within just ten minutes, sensational articles upon sensational articles, like adding oil and vinegar, through the spiritual net had spread to every corner of Floating Spear City. The terminal of every crystal processor was featuring the video of Li Yao as he hurled all kinds of abuses at the Crimson Nimbus Second Senior High School. Some relatively smart media groups would feature the scene of Helian Lie kneeling down on the ground vomiting next to Li Yao’s video, creating a very big impact. The headlines at the top of the screen were:

“GUESS WHO IS THE COLLEGE ENTRANCE EXAMINATION CHAMPION?”

In just a short period of time, the public was in an uproar. Every forum related to Floating Spear City was hustling and bustling with comments. In the blink of an eye, several posts burst forth with over ten thousand comments!

It was not that the users liked Li Yao or anything. A majority of the netizens simply took pleasure in other’s misfortune. Not too long ago—when Li Yao was seriously injured, when he was given the nickname “Fleeting Fiend Star”—the netizens’ comments were merciless, brimming with jeers and taunts; they belittled him and called him worthless.

But since Li Yao had staged such a gorgeous comeback, the netizens, almost without even blinking, instantly became his most loyal supporters.

The taunts and jeers that were initially pouring on Li Yao’s head like a storm had immediately expanded by a hundredfold, turned around, and fell upon the Crimson Nimbus Second Senior High School and Helian Lie’s head instead.

“LOL, did you see? The guy called Helian Lie began to think that he was the college entrance examination champion. He was jumping up and down in excitement, but when the results came out, it was like he was struck by lightning. He even started to vomit later!”

“Yes, I have also seen the video. Everyone go take a look, it’s absolutely amazing!”

“I heard Helian Lie is second generation wealthy. He is very arrogant, but he is out of luck this time!”

“The eyes of the principal of Crimson Nimbus Second Senior High School are all just for show. Can’t he even tell between a genius and a waste? A genius who had the strength to seize the titles of “College Entrance Examination Champion” was actually thrown out? If I were him, I would simply gauge out my dog eyes!”

As the majority of the netizens were all ordinary working class citizens, they didn’t hold any goodwill towards expensive private high schools like Crimson Nimbus Second Senior High School. And towards a wealthy kid like Helian Lie, they felt even more jealousy and envy.

This time, Li Yao, a kid from the slums, had actually very neatly and brilliantly slapped the face of Crimson Nimbus Second Senior High School. This is something that they simply loved to see and hear about.

While some posts focused on Li Yao, videos of Li Yao’s ventures from Devil Flood Dragon Island were once again unearthed and posted on the net. Many of the netizens got to see his video for the first time and had all been completely shocked by his natural and fluent attacks that were sudden as well as mysterious as he continuously appeared and disappeared like some ghost.

“How is this possible? How can one person alone annihilate the opposing team’s entire command post!”

“Powerful… he is truly powerful! No wonder he could be crowned as the College Entrance Examination Champion!”

“Rumor has it that Li Yao had confronted a mutated large-eyed ape which had been injected with stimulant alone and even beheaded it. Is he really a human?”

“Helian Lie is simply nothing compared to him!”

“From now on, Brother Yao is the only idol for me! We are both poor kids from slums. If Brother Yao can do it, then why can’t I! From today onwards, I will also start training madly like Brother Yao. After three years, I will also become the College Entrance Examination Champion!”

“You? Do you even know how Brother Yao trained? Come, come, come. Let me show you a copy of a special training chart secretly taken out from Crimson Nimbus Second Senior High School. It’s said that this is how Brother Yao trained.”

“This—Is this really the amount of training Brother Yao did in one day? That’s completely crazy! He’s simply a monster! Impossible, that’s absolutely impossible!”

“A day? That’s only the amount of training he did in half a day!”

Li Yao was like a tiny spark that completely ignited the entire Floating Spear City. From the shabby Limestone District to the resplendent Upper East District, from the elderly to the young students, from ordinary citizens to the cultivators, every single one of them was cheerfully and energetically discussing his endeavors.

The entire city was like a hot furnace; everyone was either feverishly watching Li Yao’s videos or having heated discussions of him. There was only one place that was as cold as a morgue—the principal’s office in Crimson Nimbus Second Senior High School!

Behind his desk, Zhao Shude sat as if he had lost his soul and as if his body had become paralyzed. On the desk sat a crystal processor; the hologram was constantly flashing, showcasing the news from major news channel as well as the comments of the netizens.

As he began to go through article by article, he first gnawed his teeth, but very soon, his heartbeat became erratic; he was not too far away from having a Qigong Deviation. He could no longer stand watching the hologram!

Zhao Shude’s look was that of a loser as he wheezed like a cow. His forehead was covered in soybean-sized sweat, and his muddy eyes occasionally shot pernicious and furious brilliance.

As he glanced at the management staff, they lowered their heads one after another. Not a single one of them dared to look him straight in the eyes.

“How is this possible?”

Zhao Shude muttered to himself. More than once he had tried closing his eyes as he rubbed them with force, as if by doing so he could turn back time and return to two hours ago—to the moment when Helian Lie had just seized the first place ranking.

More than once he had hoped he could freeze that moment—the moment during which he was full of mettle, the moment in which he was in high spirits, the moment when Crimson Nimbus Second Senior High School’s fame soared through the roof, and the moment where its brilliance had covered the entire Floating Spear City!

Unfortunately, every time he opened his eyes, the hologram would always be showcasing Li Yao’s cheap face.

This damned Fiend Star ruined everything!

“Principal, it’s bad, it’s really bad!”

Notes:

[1] Fiend Star(妖星) – I once saw somewhere someone commenting that Fiend Star was referring to him killing the people from Demon Clan, but the Fiend Star as in Fleeting Fiend Star refers to a cultivator of the newer generation who is extremely powerful compared to his peers, whose glory has completely overshadowed others. There is also another meaning of Fiend Star, which means bad luck. But I don’t think the author meant that.





Home  Forty Millenniums of Cultivation  Chapter 94
 

Chapter 94
 
Chapter 94: Worst Situation!
Translator: Ash  Editor: Geoffrey_

Head instructor Hei Mianshen unsteadily charged his way into the office and had even failed to knock on the door as he crashed right through the door.


“Bastard!”

Zhao Shude, who had been holding in his anger for the past hour, finally erupted. The blue veins at the back of his hand were completely visible as he forcefully smacked his palm on the table, causing the huge office desk carved in redwood to break into pieces.

Zhao Shude jumped right out of the chair, grabbed Hei Mianshen’s collar, and angrily shouted, “Of all the time you could’ve done this, why are you doing this now!? Can the situation even get any worse!? The worst of all has already occurred, or is there still something left!?”

Although Zhao Shude was not a battle-type cultivator and had suffered serious injuries in his youth, in the end, he was still a fierce cultivator at the peak level of the Refinement Stage. As he stared at Hei Mianshen, the temperature in the office suddenly dropped by a few dozen degrees.

Everyone’s face went blue; they all started shivering as a layer of white frost had seemingly covered their entire body.

And Hei Mianshen, whose collar were tightly gripped by him, was so scared that he wanted to cry. Only after shivering for a good while was he able to speak and that too with a crying look, “Principal, something big has truly happened. You… you need to quickly take a look. Some people have surrounded our school!”

“What? Who is so bold that they would even dare to surround our Crimson Nimbus Second Senior High School? Don’t they know that our school is a division of the Crimson Nimbus Sect!?”

Zhao Shude was fuming in anger; his pair of eyebrows interlocked as he frowned in anger. It appeared as if some aura surged forth from every one of his 36,000 pores and lingered around his body!

Hei Mianshen stammered, “It’s… it’s a whole crowd of soldiers…”

“The military?”

boxn ovel. c0m
Zhao Shude’s anger had reached its maximum. “We only kicked out a student, is there a need for the military to intervene? Our Crimson Nimbus Second Senior High School is a private school. How we deal with our students is our private matter, so why is the military stepping in? Is there any justice left in this world? What happened to all the laws? Do they think that our Crimson Nimbus Sect doesn’t have anyone in the army?”

Hei Mianshen swallowed a mouthful of saliva with difficulty and said, “Principal, I didn’t finish speaking. They’re not active duty soldiers… All of them are veterans—all of them are members of the Disabled Servicemen Association!”

“What!”

Zhao Shude was frightened out of his wits. He immediately sent Hei Mianshen flying into a corner with a kick and stumbled his way to the window. As he opened the window, he saw a dense crowd of over a thousand soldiers dressed in black military uniforms standing at the entrance of Crimson Nimbus Second Senior High School. A chilling terror crept over the entire campus.

Looking carefully at these soldiers…

These soldiers didn’t have epaulets on their uniforms. Furthermore, the color of their uniforms had faded due to having been washed over a long time. There were some soldiers whose uniforms were dated back to a few decades ago and had been worn out from the washing. A few holes could even be seen on the uniforms which had been subsequently patched up; the uniforms were completely shabby. Occasionally, one would be able to find a young soldier amongst the group of soldiers.

No matter if they were an old soldier with white hair or a young soldier, they all had one thing in common—they were either missing an arm, or a leg, or were blind, or some other part of their body. Every single one of them was fitted with spiritual prosthetics. They leaned on crutches, sat in wheelchairs, and many even had to cough for a long time just to take a few steps; they looked as if even a light sneeze could blow them away.

However, when they were not coughing, they would stand straight like the pines that grew on the cliffs and precipices!

The group of over a thousand disabled veterans did not speak a single word. Like over a thousand ghosts, like over a thousand tombstones, they quietly stood at the entrance of the Crimson Nimbus Second Senior High School as a strong stench of blood lingered around them.

A murderous air had enveloped the entirety of the huge campus, causing many students and their parents to shudder in fear. Those who were more timid didn’t even dare to make the least bit of noise!

The number of disabled soldiers was constantly increasing. After receiving the notification from the Disabled Servicemen Association, thousands of ordinary-looking, middle-aged men and old men with missing body parts stretched out their trembling hands and rummaged through their drawers, looking for their black military uniform which they had once worn in the past to some campaign before putting it on with difficulty

Once they were dressed in the military uniform, they no longer trembled nor were there any instability in their movements. On the contrary, they raised their head high, stuck out their chest, walked out of the house in large strides with a fierce glint in their eyes. Step by step, they neatly marched their way to Crimson Nimbus Second Senior High School as if they have once again returned to the battlefield—as if they were not marching to some school but advancing to some hill which had been occupied by Demon Beasts!

It seemed as if no one would be able to stop their advance.

In just half an hour, over three thousand disable veterans had already gathered at the entrance of the Crimson Nimbus Second Senior High School. And yet, thousands of disabled veterans were still firmly advancing towards the entrance like black streams that eventually converged into the sea. They seemed as if they wanted to completely swallow Crimson Nimbus Second Senior High School.

The denizens of Floating Spear City soon discovered this anomaly.

From the bottom of their hearts, the Federation citizens held these disabled veterans in high regards. Very soon, a passerby on the road asked, “Sir, where are you going?”

The disabled veteran who was asked was already 130 years old. His head was full of white hair and wrinkles upon wrinkles covered his face to the point where his facial features could hardly be discerned.

The military uniform he donned was once in fashion a long time ago in the past; however, it was now covered in patches upon patches. His chest was adorned with three shining medals while his left sleeve was dancing along the rhythm of the wind.

This elderly man also had some problem hearing. Only after identifying the source of the voice and carefully listening to the passerby as he asked the question again did he understood.

The elderly slightly smiled. As a majority of his teeth had already fallen out due to his age, the air seemed to be leaking when he spoke, making it difficult to discern what he was saying. Yet, the passerby could not help but shudder due to the bloody aura lingering around him. “I want to help out a little brother from the association—to seek justice for him,” the elderly brushed his black military uniform and calmly said.

“What?” All the onlookers were shocked to the extreme.

Disabled veterans were the most respected bunch in the federation, and the Disabled Servicemen Association was the most close-knit organization. It is one of the organizations in the federation on whose bad side you don’t want to get on. Many in the association had done meritorious deeds and had even bled for the federation, and many in the association were strange and powerful old fogies who had suffered serious injuries to do so. Whether it was in the military, among the civilians, or even in various sects, they had some very deep connections. All kinds of social and political figures were involved. One could say that they had a direct connection to the heavens.

Much to everyone’s surprise, there was actually someone so audacious that he even dared to provoke the Disabled Servicemen Association?

“Who is so bold that they even dare to provoke the Disabled Servicemen Association?”

“Yea, the federation’s army is busting their asses off in the front lines to fight against the Demon Beasts, shedding blood and laying down their lives. They had to pay a steep price to maintain peace for the entire federation. Who would be so blind that he even dares to bully the disabled soldiers?”

“Everybody, let’s go take a look. Perhaps something big is about to happen!”

Dialogues similar to these could be heard in the streets and alleys of Floating Spear City.

In just a moment, every single disabled soldier was followed by a long tail of civilians. And when they arrived at the entrance of Crimson Nimbus Second Senior High School, the huge campus had already been completely surrounded. The gathered people were no less than seventy to eighty thousand.

Zhao Shude stood dumbfounded in front of the window like a wooden chicken as he watched the dense crowd of people garbed in black uniforms.

Even if he was an expert at the peak level of the Refinement Stage, he was still deeply terrified of the cold, murderous aura emitted by the group of over ten thousand disabled veterans. All 36,000 pores on his body were blocked, and his spiritual energy was completely frozen.

“Why? W-why is this happening?”

Zhao Shude wracked his brain, yet he still couldn’t understand. What had he actually done to offend the Disabled Servicemen Association? What had he done to cause them to create such a big scene?’

At this moment, an extremely sturdy beam of light shot out from the black crowd before it took the form of a dozen meter tall transparent human figure in the sky. The figure took the form of a middle-aged soldier with a scar on his face. He was the president of Floating Spear City’s Disabled Servicemen Association—Zhao Xinglang. He was also the soldier who Li Yao had seen in the First Hospital when he woke up.

Like a war machine purely driven by spiritual energy, the expression in the eyes of Zhao Xinglang was extremely cold, much like the way he spoke. “To the management of the Crimson Nimbus Second Senior High School, listen clearly. We are the members of Floating Spear City’s branch of the federation’s Disabled Servicemen Association. We have gathered here today because we all want to ask your school one question.”

“Student Li Yao is a member of our Disable Servicemen Association who was granted the status of Class 1 Disabled Federation Serviceman. We wanted to ask: why was a disabled soldier forced to leave your school? Or do you not care about all 63 million disabled soldiers in the federation?”

“We have long wanted to ask this question, but us people from the Disabled Servicemen Association are reasonable people. We are convinced with reason—If the reason you have suspended Li Yao from school or made him quit was due to his body truly not being suitable for learning and cultivation, then we have nothing to say.”

“However, Student Li Yao had just obtained the title of ‘Floating Spear City’s Champion of the College Entrance Examination’. In other words, his injuries weren’t serious to the extent that he was unable to cultivate. We can’t help but want to ask: for what reason did you force him to drop out of school? Or is it really as the news says? Did the school management intentionally target him?”

“All of us, the 13,255 disabled veterans of Floating Spear City’s branch, have gathered solely for this. We are waiting for your school’s reply. Don’t worry, we won’t rush inside or break any laws. We will just stand here as we wait for you to give a reasonable explanation!”

Once these words were spoken, the public bursted into an outcry.

Along the way, no matter how much the onlookers asked, the veterans kept their mouths shut. Only at this moment did the onlookers understand that this was related to Li Yao.

Much to everyone’s surprise, the “Fleeting Fiend Star”, Li Yao, had unexpectedly been granted the status of Class 1 Disabled Federation Serviceman!

“This is too much! A Class 1 Disabled Federation Serviceman was actually forced to quit school!”

“That’s right, no matter whether Li Yao was a genius or not, even if he was crippled, he is still a Class 1 Disabled Federation Serviceman. Crimson Nimbus Second Senior High School should really not have done this!”

“Serves them right!”

The reverence the civilians of the federation held for the disabled soldiers was something that was very difficult for others to imagine. In an instant, the public vehemently supported Li Yao from the bottom of their hearts as they started to loudly curse Crimson Nimbus Second Senior High School.

As if he was struck by lightning, Zhao Shude began to sway a bit before falling flat on his ass on the ground.

Class 1 Disabled Serviceman? That bastard, Li Yao, was actually a Class 1 Disabled Federation Serviceman? How is this possible? How! Is ! This ! Possible!?

Zhao Shude’s face was completely distorted. He could only silently ask the heaven!

By heaven and hell, if he had known earlier that Li Yao had received the status of Class 1 Disabled Federation Serviceman, he would still not dare to force Li Yao to quit school even if he had all the courage in the world!

But why did that little bastard not say anything? How could such an important thing remain hidden?

Zhao Shude pounded his chest as he regretted his mistake.

It could not be said that he was ill-informed or ignorant; it was truly not his fault. The status of Class 1 Disabled Serviceman was the highest glory. Each time a disabled soldier was granted this status, a grand ceremony would be held. It was propagandized on such a large scale that even a beggar in the city would know about it.

But when it came to Li Yao, it was a completely different matter.

In the final investigation, the reason why Li Yao was injured was even concealed from the eyes of the military. Some stimulant was secretly brought to Devil Flood Dragon Island. This could more or less be considered as a scandal for the military.

Not to mention that Li Yao was not exactly a regular soldier. Such a status was granted to him with the intention of giving him some kind of compensation. Naturally, the military would not propagandize this on a large scale; hence, the entire procedure was done very discretely.

Certainly, if someone wanted to check Li Yao’s Class 1 Disabled Serviceman status, it could be easily checked. But, Zhao Shude was not some kind of prophet. Once he came to know that Li Yao’s spiritual root had been ruptured and he had become a cripple, for all he knew, Li Yao had become a bag of waste which could only be thrown out. He put this matter at the back of his mind and had forgotten it completely.

Only someone who had nothing better to do would go and check up on this kind of thing!

Until this very moment, only under the pressure of over ten thousand disabled veterans did Zhao Shude come to realize that he had fallen into a pit of his own digging!

“Helian Ba, I, Zhao Shude, have no grievances with you nor do we share hatred. Why did you wish for me to bring my own destruction? If you just wanted to hang yourself, you should have just jumped into the river or lay down on the crystal rail track. Why did you have to go and provoke a member of the Disabled Servicemen Association? If you want to court death, then why did you drag me, Zhao Shude, with you? Why did you bring misery upon me, you f***ing bastard!?”

The Crimson Nimbus Second Senior High School principal, Zhao Shude, wanted to cry but had no tears. Just as he was cursing, his mini crystal processor started to shake wildly.





Home  Forty Millenniums of Cultivation  Chapter 95
 

Chapter 95
 
Chapter 95: The War over the Genius
Translator: Ash  Editor: Geoffrey_

Lifting his wrist to look at the mini crystal processor, he saw a message sent by the district’s police department.


“Sir Li!”

Zhao Shude was much like a drowning man grabbing the last straw as he hastily asked, “You came at just the right time. Currently, we are facing an unprecedented situation. A large crowd of disabled soldiers has gathered at the entrance of Crimson Nimbus Second Senior High School. Quickly help me think of some way to resolve this!”

In the hologram, Commissioner Li, who wore crystal sunglasses, seemed as if he was molded from iron and steel. He calmly and coldly said:

“Principal Zhao, I have specifically come to let you know that the Disabled Servicemen Association plans to hold a large-scale victory parade for the next three days to commemorate the victory in the Battle of 9907 Peak—an extremely arduous battle to regain control of 9907 Peak 153 years ago in which two squads of Federation soldiers put up a fearless fight and had repulsed the onslaught of seven demon beasts four times by just the afternoon!”

“The police force has already approved their application for the victory parade, so it is a legitimate parade that is protected by the law!”

“Of course, if the opposite party is causing a disturbance, throwing garbage on the ground or destroying public property, or have entered the campus and are destroying property, then your school, by all means, can report to us, the police. We will definitely take serious action should such a thing occurs. We will absolutely not show favoritism just because the other party is disabled servicemen.”

Zhao Shude was rendered speechless. He once again peered through the window.

There wasn’t any noise nor was there anyone throwing garbage on the ground; absolutely nothing. Thousands of disabled soldiers like a frozen sea stood silently outside the campus.

Sometimes, silence was also a kind of noise—a noise more deafening than any other noise.

Zhao Shude’s lips quivered. He really had nothing to say. Even if he wanted the police to intervene, he must still provide a reason. However, the other party was neither hitting you nor shouting at you; they just quietly stood outside as they deeply stared at him from all directions. No matter where you looked, they weren’t breaking any laws!

boxn ovel. c0m
Zhao Shude was completely disheartened as he disappointedly said, “Sir Li, I know our Crimson Nimbus Second Senior High School is in the wrong here, but please show us some way!”

Commissioner Li heaved a sigh and said, “As your friend, let me give you a piece of advice—make the person who first asked for Li Yao’s suspension stand before the Disabled Servicemen Association to explain everything clearly!”

“As if I could do that!”

In his heart, Zhao Shude really wanted to hand over the Helian father and son duo. However, the two would definitely be skinned alive and swallowed without even having been dipped in vinegar by the large group of disabled veterans—not even dregs would remain of them!

“Alright, that’s all I can say. You better take care of yourself. It’s time for me to get off work!”

Commissioner Li gradually stood up. Very slowly and imperturbably, he started unbuttoning his deep blue police uniform before taking it off and opening a suitcase that had been gathering dust for god knows how long.

“Sir Li, you…”

Zhao Shude was somewhat at a loss as he watched the other party change into a well-ironed black military uniform.

Commissioner Li took off his sunglasses, revealing a pair of spiritual prosthetic eyes that shone in a red aura from the depths of his eye sockets.

Enunciating word by word, he said, “I should have told you that in the past I had lost both my eyes in Demon Beast Wasteland. I am also a member of the Disabled Servicemen Association. Now that I am off duty, I need to quickly leave and participate in the victory parade. Goodbye!”

“Swish!”

The hologram went pitch black, as the opposite party had simply cut off the connection.

In the darkness, Zhao Shude’s facial muscles began to twitch uncontrollably. His lips quivered for a long time as if he wanted to say something; however, in the end, not one word came out.

Outside the window, everything was shrouded in a deathly silence. The disabled veterans, as if assimilating into the darkness of the night, looked from afar, giving off an appearance akin to a giant black beast that was trying to thoroughly devour Zhao Shude’s soul.

“Beep Beep Beep!” The mini crystal processor on his wrist started vibrating.

Zhao Shude was already scared out of his wits. He simply wasn’t in any state to care about it; however, the caller seemed to be very stubborn, as the mini crystal processor kept on ringing.

Just as he was about to curse, lowering his head to look at the crystal processor, his entire body was struck by a chill.

He suddenly jumped up. First and foremost, he sent everyone out of the principal office and locked the door. Only then did he respectfully receive the call as he bowed and said in a flattering tone, “Elder Zhou, how are you doing!?”

Zhou Yin seemed as if he had aged by a dozen years. He very gloomily stared at Zhao Shude for a while before speaking slowly:

“What do you think!? In just a short span of one hour, the shares of our Crimson Nimbus Sect fell by more than 4 points—and it still has not shown any signs of stabilizing! Do you know what this means? Do you know how much money had been burned off?”

Zhao Shude’s whole body started shaking.

With a completely deadpan look, Zhou Yin continued, “In addition, I had recommended a Core Formation Stage cultivator’s wife to invest $200,000 in Crimson Nimbus Sect’s shares just yesterday. This cultivator has quite a bit of influence in the northeastern region. I have already been communicating with him for over two years, and it was highly possible for me to persuade him to heavily invest in our Crimson Nimbus Sect, or perhaps even join our Crimson Nimbus Sect as an Interim Elder. It would have helped the Crimson Nimbus Sect to disseminate its influence in the northeastern area. Now, he is telling me that he wants to reconsider the whole investment plan—tell me, how do you think I should be feeling?”

Zhao Shude face completely went pale; he was almost about to faint.

He was extremely angry to the point that he was ready to do anything. While gritting his teeth, he said, “Elder Zhou, after all is said and done, it was all that little bastard’s, Li Yao’s, fault. He brought such big trouble to the Crimson Nimbus Sect. We must definitely kill him!”

“Alright, go ahead and kill him,” Zhou Yin coldly said.

“Me? Elder You, as you know, I’m just a teacher; I am not a battle-type cultivator…” Zhao Shude stammered as he was taken back for a moment.

“Oh, so you were a teacher. But from the way the Slaughter Qi that keeps pouring out of your mouth, I thought you were the boss of some triad… Zhao Shude, do you even have a brain!?”

Zhou Yin stared at him and even furiously roared, “Who do you think you are!? Do you think you some ancient cultivator from forty millenniums ago!? Do you think you can kill anyone at the drop of a hat? Don’t you know about the federation’s laws? Don’t you know the punishment for a cultivator is even more serious than a normal criminal? Don’t you know how many eyes are watching our Crimson Nimbus Sect? Don’t you know the Crimson Nimbus Sect has eight Elders, seven of which are just waiting for me to make a fool of myself? If truly something happens to Li Yao, there will be no need for a police investigation—even an idiot would know that it was us! Do you want to completely destroy me and the Crimson Nimbus Sect, ah!?”

Zhao Shude was frightened out of his wits from his scolding; he did not dare to reply with even one word.

The more Zhou Yin spoke, the angrier he got. If he could come out of the hologram, his finger would have already come out and pressed down on the tip of Zhao Shude’s nose. “At least use your f**king brain! Our Crimson Nimbus Sect is an honest and upright sect who respects justice and abides by the laws. There is still room to salvage our current predicament; however, the moment we are associated with murder or have murdered a member of the Disabled Servicemen Association, then it will be beyond redemption! Murder… If you like to kill so much, then why didn’t you join some devil path sect and become a devil cultivator? Tell you what, if killing someone was not a crime, then the Sect Master and the other Elders would have already killed me. Before they could kill me, I would have first chopped a pig like you into pieces!”

“I, I—” Zhao Shude looked mournful as if he was in bereavement; he didn’t know what to do.

Zhou Yin glared at him with a gaze that was as fierce as a tiger’s.

His gaze seemed to be able to penetrate space and directly pierced two holes in the pits of Zhao Shude’s stomach.

Only having stared for a full minute did he finally speak while gritting his teeth, “Forget it. This is not going to help us in any way. In short, someone has to take the fall for such a big incident. Who do you think should be responsible for this incident? You, me, or Helian Ba?”

Zhao Shude was stunned for a moment before quickly replying:

“Elder Zhao, in fact, I know little of this matter. The whole thing was orchestrated by Helian Ba behind my back. As you also know, the Helian Family’s influence in Floating Spear City is not small. Although he is just a trustee, many people are very much willing to give him face. It is easy for him to go behind my back and do some shady dealings. Additionally, since you, Elder Zhou, have to deal with thousands of problems every day and are busy with work, it is quite possible for you to hoodwinked by him once.”

Zhou Yin’s complexion finally eased up a little. He nodded his head and said, “En, this is reasonable. It would be better for you to think it over and give me the specifics. I will also go to Sect Master and explain it to him. Are you clear? Right… Old Ding of the Seventh Primary School affiliated with our Crimson Nimbus Sect is going to be retiring in a month. After his retirement, you are going to take over his position as principal!”

“Ah?”

“Why, don’t want it? There is also a kindergarten. The Ninth Kindergarten is lacking a vice principal, do you want to go?”

“No no no, the Seventh Primary School… the Seventh Primary School is ok!”

Zhao Shude turned pale with fright as he stammered before taking a look at the hologram once more. However, by the time he looked up, he had discovered that Zhou Yin had already cut the connection.

Zhao Shude was frozen for a moment. The gloomy look on his face suddenly changed as he ruthlessly stomped and broke seven or eight tiles.

“Helian Ba, Helian Lie—you father and son can both go to hell!”

…

Most of Floating Spear City had been shocked by the victory parade. As far as the instigator of the entire situation, Li Yao, was concerned, he was totally oblivious to the whole thing, as if he was in the eye of the storm.

In an open space just outside the low-rent residential area—the “Morning Sun Village”, Li Yao was surrounded by many people. If one were to take a look from the sky, the dense crowd of people would give off the impression of a vortex of humans.

Not everyone here was a journalist or a government official; there was also a bunch of recruitment staff from the “Nine Elite Universities”.

Floating Spear City was an important cultivation city in the federation. Every year during the college entrance examination, the “Nine Elite Universities” would send a bunch of recruitment staff to be stationed here.

However, in the recent years, these people had it easy because most of the good seedlings with potential would have already been unearthed during the “Limit Challenge Competition”, and they would have already signed a contract with one of the “Nine Elite Universities” in advance. After the college entrance examination, they would then just have to complete the formalities of the contract, that’s all.

In contrast to the previous year, an earth-shattering miracle had occurred this year. Li Yao, a dark horse, suddenly leaped out of a corner, and in one fell swoop, he sat on the throne of Floating Spear City’s champion of the college entrance examination. And to the surprise of these recruiters, Li Yao had yet to sign a contract with any of the universities.

Li Yao was completely free; it was possible for him to choose any university!

All the recruitment staff crazily rushed over. On one side, they were shouting at the top of their lungs for application to the headquarters of their respective school, while on the other, they staggeringly charged their way to Mining Clan High School and surrounded Li Yao. They were not willing to budge even an inch.

How could they? Ever since the start of the cultivation era forty millenniums ago, the most important thing had always been cultivation talent!

“Student Li Yao, please choose our Star Nebula University. I just got the approval from the university. All your tuition fee will be exempted!”

“Student Li Yao, our university will not only exempt your tuition fee, we can also offer you with a premium scholarship!”

“Student Li Yao, please consider our Federation’s First Military College. As long as you enter our college, you will receive the status of an officer and can directly join the federation’s army once you graduate, acquiring the rank of at least major!”

Looking at the fierce, cruel, and grim looks on every one of the recruitment staff, Li Yao started to have goosebumps all over his body. He incessantly said:

“Ladies and gentlemen, I’m sorry. Everybody’s conditions are very appealing, please give me some time to consider it. Can’t you give me a few days time for me go back and decide?”

“Absolutely not!” All the recruitment staff shook their head.

Are you joking with us? These people were all well experienced in this industry. They were all crystal clear of each other’s shady dealings.

Once Li Yao returned to his home, it was highly possible for someone to secretly sneak into his house in the middle of the night and make some private deal with him. They could possibly resort to some dirty tricks like sending a beauty.

Li Yao was young and filled with passion. It was quite possible for him to lose his head in heat and lust, and he might very well agree.

If so, then they might as well remain here and present generous conditions, competing fair and square.

Li Yao was dumbfounded. He kept scratching his head as he didn’t know how to get rid of these people.

At this moment, a travel-worn and weary flying shuttle screamed its way here. Its door had yet to be open, but the strong imposing manner shocked everyone in the field.

An expert has arrived!

Once the door was opened, an old man dressed in a purple robe flew out and landed before Li Yao with an ashamed look on his face.

It was Deep Sea University’s expert refiner, Professor Xie Tingxian!





Home  Forty Millenniums of Cultivation  Chapter 96
 

Chapter 96
 
Chapter 96: The Final Decision
Translator: Ash  Editor: Geoffrey_

“Professor Xie, why did you come? If you wanted to say something, you could have just sent me a spiritual crane message!”


Li Yao was caught by surprise. Deep Sea University was about 500km away from Floating Spear City, yet Xie Tingxian had personally driven his flying shuttle at a lightning fast speed here—this was truly surprising.

Xie Tingxian forcefully laughed. “How could I sincerely express my apology through a spiritual crane message? Student Li Yao, this time, you have truly given me a slap I won’t forget!”

Li Yao immediately replied, “Professor Xie, you don’t have to apologize for anything. I still highly respect you, truly!”

Li Yao’s conduct towards Xie Tingxian was clearly different than how he treated Zhao Shude.

Although Xie Tingxian had retracted his offer, he at least had his reasons. Besides, within the Refining Department of Deep Sea University, Dean Chu Xiuhong was the one with the final say, thus there were plenty of things that were outside a professor’s control, which was what happened with Xie Tingxian.

Once Xie Tingxian had even said that he would personally come and help him recover. Despite not carrying it out, he could not be blamed, as he was an expert who was busy with many things. In the end, what mattered was that what he had said had already greatly moved Li Yao.

Xie Tingxian very sincerely said:

“I know our Deep Sea University had wronged you. Our Dean Chu is someone who is obsessed with skill, and she is oblivious to the ways of the world. In the cultivation world, her hot temper is already well known. Additionally, in her eyes, the honor of Deep Sea University’s Refining Department is above everything else. That day when you contacted me, she thought that you were trying to rely on our relationship to procure a seat in the Refining Department, so that’s why her tone was a little more harsh than usual.”

“Currently, she is reflecting on her actions, as she thinks that she had quickly jumped to a conclusion and made an arbitrary decision. She should not have spoken like that before the college entrance examination. It was also her who had exhorted me to come here to officially invite Student Li Yao to join our Deep Sea University’s Refining Department!”

Li Yao’s eyes shone brilliantly, much like fireworks; however, the brilliance was instantly extinguished.

boxn ovel. c0m
Xie Tingxian continued, “I know in your heart you are angry. It could only be blamed on Dean Chu and I for failing to see the treasure before our eyes. That’s why, even if you do not choose to enroll in our Deep Sea University, I will understand and agree. However—”

Xie Tingxian paused before he sincerely said in a trembling voice, “Student Li Yao, this is not the time for you to decide with your emotions. We are talking about your dream here! I know that it is your dream to become a great Refiner. You must not forget that our Deep Sea University has the strongest professional Refiners in the federation—we have even been granted the title of ‘Refiner’s Holy Land’!”

“Only if you choose our Deep Sea University could you fulfill your dream!”

“If you want to blame me or Dean Chu, we understand, but please don’t take your dream as a joke. You will only be hurting yourself!”

“As for the conditions for joining Deep Sea University, you completely don’t need to worry about it. Not only will you be completely exempted from your tuition fees, you will also be provided with a premium scholarship. Moreover, we will treat you as an elite student, one of the most important students at our university. We will assemble a team of our most elite Refiners to be responsible for fostering you and ensuring that you will become a registered Refiner within three years. Your future will definitely be brilliant!”

“Have you heard of ‘Supernova Jiang Sheng’? He is the strongest newcomer who had been on the rise within the Refiners Community in the last decade. He is just thirty years old and had become an associate professor at our Deep Sea University’s Refining Department. He is hailed as a leading figure who will be at the forefront of the Refiners Community for the next fifty years, and he was trained by none other than Dean Chu and I!”

“As long as you join our Deep Sea University’s Refining Department, I promise you that you will enjoy the same treatment that Jiang Sheng had once received. After a few years, you will then be the second ‘Supernova’!”

While speaking, Xie Tingxian swept through the entire field with a gaze as fierce as a tiger’s as he raised his voice to speak, “Ladies and gentlemen, you might be able to come out with better materialistic conditions than me; however, when it comes to refining, I’m afraid no other university has the qualifications to rival my Deep Sea University!”

Everyone was rendered speechless as numerous recruiting staff members looked at each other.

This fact was as plain as the nose on one’s face. No matter how artfully they put it, they would still not dare to shamefully say that their university was also the strongest in developing refiners.

Even the Refining Department of the Federation’s First Military College, which ranked second, was far off from the Deep Sea University’s Refining Department. It was like the difference between a mouse and an elephant; they were simply not at the same level.

Over, it’s completely over. It seems that this genius is going to be taken away by Deep Sea University!

Sure enough, the look in Li Yao’s eyes gradually become as firm as a steel saber and as sharp as a sword. His gaze alone could cut off everything.

Glancing around, Li Yao bent his waist as he gave everyone a sincere bow. He then solemnly said “I apologize to everyone for wasting your time. While everyone’s university is the top university in the federation, and the preferential treatment conditions provided are very appealing, I have already decided which university I will be applying for.”

“It’s over!”

Many of the recruitment staff lamented and became dispirited.

“I have already come to my decision. In order to not waste Professor Xie’s and everyone’s time, I will simply fill in my matriculation from online now!”

Li Yao started up the mini crystal processor and switched to spectator mode.

A hologram that overflowed with colorful lights and displayed each character crystal clearly appeared in the air.

By convention, from the moment the result of the college entrance examination was out, each examinee had 15 days to choose their desired university and fill in the matriculation form through the spirit net.

Normally, the examinee would carefully research each university and compare their merits. Not only would he have to consider his subject of interest as well as the employment rates, he would also have to consider whether his score was above the cut-off mark or not.

Thus, a majority of the examinees would fill in the matriculation form only in the last few days, as the application could not be changed once it had been filled in.

On the hologram, a scene of a turbulent river stream filled with countless ugly gray carps appeared. Within the river stream, the carps scurried along the stream as they struggled with one another to move forward. Within these struggling carps, there was one that was not like the others; this gray carp suddenly jumped above the stream and over a magnificent and grand dragon gate. The entire screen shone in dazzling streams of colorful light as the carp transformed into a golden dragon, rising into the sky and soaring to the highest heaven!

A carp leaping over the dragon gate in just one move.

This was the starting screen of the site used to fill out the college entrance examination matriculation form.

Like rain droplets falling in a storm, the name of every university fell from the top of the hologram one by one. The names of the Nine Elite Universities especially stood out from the rest as they shone in a dazzling glow.

“Click click click click click!”

Li Yao entered his student ID on the virtual keyboard before his score suddenly appeared on the hologram.

Along with his score was a long series of texts which provided a thorough analysis of his score as well as recommendations for a dozen of the top professions in the federation.

This was the system’s built-in analysis function. Li Yao didn’t even spare it a glance and directly closed the tab as he switched to the selection interface.

His gaze swept through the name of each and every university one by one and finally came to a halt at “Deep Sea University”.

Li Yao stood still as he looked at the name for a very long time.

At this time, he heard the whistling of the wind.

No, not just the wind, he also heard the sound of fire crackling as a small sun tore through the darkness and rose into the sky.

Narrowing his eyes, Li Yao raised his head to look. God knows when a Crimson Flame Flying Shuttle wrapped in raging flames had appeared in the sky. Sitting inside the hatch was Ding Lingdang, who sat with her long and slender legs crossed as she gazed at him with a restless look.

Li Yao gave a smile, revealing his sharp canines as he curled his fingers at Ding Lingdang, motioning for her to “Come down!”

Ding Lingdang’s eyes widened, sending the message of “Who is afraid of coming down!?”

She lightly leaped up and rose a few dozen meters high into the sky before landing right in front of Li Yao.

The two stood nose-to-nose and lip-to-lip with one another. Breathing at each other’s face as their hearts pounded in synchronization.

“Sister Ling, I’m very thankful to the Grand Desolate War Institution for trusting in me. I will never forget how diligently you have tried to help me train for the college entrance exam in past this month!” Li Yao said straight from his heart.

“Enough with your nonsense. Didn’t I say that as your friend, I will always support you no matter which university you ultimately choose? The Deep Sea University is the ‘Holy Land of Refiners’. You will be able to achieve your dreams there, so choose without hesitation. Don’t be shilly-shally like a b*tch!” Ding Lingdang nibbled her lips.

Li Yao looked at her as he spoke, “Sister Ling, are you really going to support me no matter what I choose? No matter how crazy it is?”

“… Yes, but if you choose the Deep Sea University’s Refining Department, you must do your best to become the strongest refiner, so the time I used to help you train this month is not wasted! Remember! You must become the best, not the second or the third—but the best! If you are even a bit lacking, I will smack your head!” Ding Lingdang earnestly said word by word.

Li Yao burst into laughter from the bottom of his heart, revealing a crescent row of white and shining teeth on his black face. Then, his next action shocked the hell out of everyone on the scene.

He suddenly stepped forward and embraced Ding Lingdang!

Everyone was immediately dumbfounded!

Among the recruitment staff of the Nine Elite Universities, Ding Lingdang could definitely be considered the strangest figure. Many knew that not only was she extremely powerful, she would also let her temper speak for itself. She was the kind of girl who would act first, talk later. No one dared to easily provoke her.

They never would have expected that Li Yao would have heaven-defying guts!

“S-so cool! He truly deserves to be the college entrance examination champion! He is truly a god among men!” Many men had their eyes almost jump out of their sockets.

Ding Lingdang stared with wide-opened eyes. As a cultivator at the peak level of the Refinement Stage, she obviously had thousands of ways to extricate herself from Li Yao’s arms. However, she didn’t know why she just listlessly stood there firmly held in Li Yao’s embrace.

An inexplicable fragrance wafted out from Li Yao’s body and tickled its way into Ding Lingdang’s nose.

No matter how much Ding Lingdang was drenched in fragrant perspiration, she would never give off this kind of sweaty smell. In her over twenty years of life, she had never once smelled such a scent.

Ding Lingdang had no idea what to do; her mind gave birth to a sliver of vacantness, a kind of vacantness which she had never experienced even when faced with demon beasts far stronger than her.

“What is this stinking brat doing in broad daylight!? If you want to do something, at least wait until you go home!” Ding Lingdang angrily roared in her heart.

Li Yao hugged her only for half a second before letting her go. He took a step back and solemnly said, “Sister Ling, ever since I was a child, I have been all alone. Besides the dead old man, I have no other relative. But, I have decided! From this moment onwards, I will treat you as my sister!”

“… Sister my ass! That’s so nauseating!” Ding Lingdang instantly felt goosebumps all over her body.

“But—”

In the depths of Li Yao’s eyes appeared dazzling brilliance while words weighing a thousand kilograms poured out of his mouth, “My dream has always been to become the best refiner. That’s why I can not choose the Grand Desolate War Institution’s Combat Department. For that, I’m truly sorry!”

“It’s alright, I…” Ding Lingdang averted her gaze,

She didn’t know why, but besides the feeling of disappoint, there was surprisingly also a sense of loss in her heart.

Feeling as if a weight had been lifted off his shoulders, Xie Tingxian laughed and said, “Student Li Yao, you have made the right choice. After you have become the second ‘Supernova’ in 20-30 years, you will definitely look back and not regret today’s choice!”

“For my dream, I will never regret. However… the second ‘Supernova’?”

Li Yao just smiled and did not speak another word. His pair of hands quickly bounced over the virtual keyboard, and in a single breath, he had completed the matriculation form.

“Ding Dong!” With a loud and clear sound, a row of clear and large characters shining above everyone’s head emerged on the hologram. At the center, two words were the most conspicuous.

“Refining Department!”

“Congratulations, Student Li Yao! On behalf of Deep Sea University, I welcome you to the holy land of ref…” Finally, the stone over Xie Tingxian’s heart was lifted as a smile crept across his face.

“Professor Xie, I’m sorry. I’m really, really, really sorry.” Without even getting the chance to finish, Xie Tingxian was cut-off by Li Yao, who had an ashamed look on his face.

Xie Tingxian blinked a few times. For a short while, he didn’t understand what Li Yao meant.

At this time, he discovered that the silence around him was a little strange. Everyone’s face revealed a completely horrified look.

“Refining Department” The row of small characters over those two large words seemed to be somewhat strange.

Xie Tingxian narrowed his eyes and only then did he discover the entire text that had emerged in the hologram—

“Grand Desolate War Institution, Refining Department!”





Home  Forty Millenniums of Cultivation  Chapter 97
 

Chapter 97
 
Chapter 97: The Farce and the Miracle
Translator: Ash  Editor: Geoffrey_

“…”

The smile on Xie Tingxian’s face completely turned stiff as his beard trembled. For a long time, he was rendered speechless.

Ding Lingdang’s pair of pretty eyes opened widely, and her lips quivered as she opened and closed them again and again; she was shocked to the extreme.

Every recruitment staff, reporter, student, parent, and every onlooker was as though they had been struck by lightning. For a good while, they were unable to speak.

After half a minute, as if a spiritual energy bomb had been detonated at the center of the crowd, the entire crowd burst into an uproar!

“Grand Desolate War Institution’s Refining Department? Is there some mistake? Does the Grand Desolate War Institution even have a Refining Department? Isn’t it a college specialized for training battle-type cultivators?”

“It does have one, but the Grand Desolate War Institution’s Refining Department is among the four worst departments in all the ‘Nine Elite Universities’. It is small in size, and its level is too low—it’s simply the department which no one would choose on their own volition. The students from the previous years who needed to be removed from the prestigious departments were transferred there.”

“Is he crazy? Instead of choosing Deep Sea University’s Refining Department, why did he go and choose Grand Desolate War Institution’s Refining Department?”

“Even if he wanted to choose the Grand Desolate War Institution, he should have at least chosen the Combat Department! Why did he choose the Refining Department? Has he simply lost his mind?”

“What the hell is going on inside his brain!?”

Many had the urge to pull out their hair with force. No matter how much they wracked their brains, they could not understand what made Li Yao make such a crazy choice—it was simply ridiculous!

boxn ovel. c0m
Xie Tingxian was just like a statue carved out of stone; his silence lasted for an entire minute before he woke up from his stupor as the wrinkles on his face finally stretched when he forcefully smiled and said, “Student Li Yao, you always manage to do things outside of everyone’s expectations. Every one of your actions makes everyone flabbergasted.”

Li Yao sincerely apologized, “Professor Xie, I’m truly sorry. I truly didn’t expect for you to come. Deep Sea University is truly a good university, and I also think that you and Dean Chu have the ability to train me to be the second ‘Supernova’!”

“However, I don’t want to be just the second ‘Supernova’, but rather the first ‘Fiend Star’. That’s why I chose the Grand Desolate War Institution!”

Xie Tingxian heaved a long and deep sigh.

“You had once said that your dream is to enter the ‘Holy Land of Refiners’. Who would have known that you would give up your dream in a spur of the moment—it’s simply not worth it, Student Li Yao!”

Li Yao smiled as he said, “Professor Xie, you are wrong. I have not done this in the spur of the moment, and not even a second had I given up on my dream. At present, Deep Sea University’s Refining Department is certainly the Holy Land of Refiners; however, someday in the future, perhaps this glory will belong to Grand Desolate War Institution’s Refining Department. Who can say for sure?”

“What?”

Xie Tingxian was stunned, Ding Lingdang was stunned, and all the recruitment staff of the Nine Elite Universities were completely stunned.

Li Yao calmly and unperturbedly said, “That’s why… I have been apologizing to you. My decision to join the Grand Desolate War Institution’s Refining Department is not so simple.”

“In the near future, I will lead Grand Desolate War Institution’s Refining Department and issue a challenge to Deep Sea University’s Refining Department. I am going to take away the supreme honor—the title of ‘Holy Land of Refiners’!”

“I am going to let the entire federation, the entire Heaven Origin Sector know that the Grand Desolate War Institution does not only have the Combat Department as its first-class department, they will also have the Grand Desolate War Institution’s Refining Department—the best Holy Land of Refiners!”

With an extremely sincere look, Li Yao gave an incredibly crazy declaration, causing every listener to think that maybe there was something wrong with their ears. His declaration also instantly made Xie Tingxian absent-minded.

“W-what is he saying? Does he even know what he is saying?”

“Young man, just because of a slightly good score, you forgot how high the heaven is and how deep the earth is. Don’t be too proud, and don’t be too overconfident. It would be best for you to temper your disposition!”

“You want to lead the Grand Desolate War Institution’s Refining Department to challenge the Deep Sea University’s Refining Department? Wouldn’t that be the equivalent of a group of mice challenging an elephant?”

“What mouse and elephant? It’s just a group of ants challenging a dinosaur!”

The majority of the recruitment staff from the “Nine Elite Universities” had been angered.

Xie Tingxian’s silence lasted for ten seconds before he could not help but burst into laughter. “Student Li Yao, the young needs to dream, but they should clearly know the difference between dreams and delusions—you are too conceited.”

Li Yao’s eyes remained as clear as water. Shaking his head, he said, “Professor Xie, I’m not arrogant. The only thing I am… is afraid. I’m just afraid, very, very afraid!”

“Afraid?” Xie Tingxian was confused.

“Yes, afraid. I’m afraid because the strength of Deep Sea University’s Refining Department is crystal clear. Deep Sea University’s Refining Department is as though it is a deity who is shouldering the entire heaven as it stood upright. Even if I don’t issue a challenge, the mere thought of issuing a challenge is already near impossible.”

“If in this second I don’t say it, I’m afraid when tomorrow arrives, I won’t be able to—no, there’s no need to wait for tomorrow. In the next hour, the next minute, the next second—I would completely lose my courage to issue a challenge to this deity!”

“But now that I have spoken in front of so many ladies and gentlemen of ‘Nine Elite University’, this completely crazy idea had been made public. I will no longer have any hesitation, I no longer need to afraid of any conflict, I no longer need to be afraid of getting involved, and I no longer need to be worried about retreat or giving up.”

“Perhaps I will become the biggest joke or perhaps I will create a miracle that no one expected. There is no other path for me; I can only do every in my power and bite the bullet — I can only stride forward!”

Xie Tingxian was moved. “I understand. It seems you are not arrogant—you are just too young, too impulsive, too naive! A miracle is called a miracle because the chance of its occurrence is immensely small, so immensely small that perhaps the chance of it happening is only one in a thousand, perhaps even one in ten thousand!”

Li Yao smiled. From the depths of his eyes came a shine that was as dazzling as the stars. “Whether it is one in thousand, one in ten thousand, or even one in a billion… As long it is not zero, isn’t it fine?”

Xie Tingxian remained silent. He just heaved a long sigh and with a deep regret boarded the flying shuttle.

Xie Tingxian left.

“Sister Ling!”

Li Yao let loose a deep breath. The smile on his face was as magnificent as the blossoming of peaches. He turned towards Ding Lingdang and said, “My choice… did not make you too disappointed, right? Do not worry! As long as there is time, I will still go to the Combat Department…”

Before he was able to finish the latter part of his sentence, Ding Lingdang, like a mother leopard, had already violently pounced on him like a bolt of lightning as she grabbed onto his collar and forcefully started shaking him.

“Smelly brat, you had already decided to choose the Grand Desolate War Institution, right? Then you pretended some bullshit of leaving far away and never meeting again, causing this grandma to be in melancholy for a long time and also f**king sigh incessantly! Why did you not just say so!?”

“I wanted to give you a pleasant surprise…”

“Surprise my ass! F**k! You were playing with my feelings! Do you think I will not smack your head!?”

[First Volume <Hundred Day Training> finished]

Next Volume <Wild Storm> Prequel:

“Crystal armor—the greatest magical equipment in the modern cultivation world. It is known as the ‘King of Magical Equipment’, the ‘Magical Equipment Among Magical Equipment’. Even for Deep Sea University’s Refining Department, refining a new type of crystal armor is not an easy task.”

“Just by the virtue of the waste department you call the Refining Department of your Grand Desolate War Institution, you—these wastes—want to refine crystal armor?”

“What? This piece of scrap is the crystal armor you have refined? This is completely rotten! This idiotic piece of black sh’t is simply nothing more than a pile of waste!”

“Such a pile of waste and you dare to call this “Profound Bone Battle Armor’!? May I ask from which angle does this pile of waste look ‘Profound’?”

“I’ll help you name this pile of waste. Don’t call it ‘Profound Bone’—call it ‘Rotten Bone’!”

Deep within the Grand Desolate, an unfathomable storm was brewing—a one in a billion miracle is about to make its debut!





Home  Forty Millenniums of Cultivation  Chapter 98
 

Chapter 98
 
Chapter 98: Taking the First Step
Translator: Ash  Editor: Geoffrey_

Three days later in a shabby little station in the western area of Floating Spear City.

In just three days, Floating Spear City had been turned upside down.

On the second day of the Disabled Servicemen Association’s victory parade, Crimson Nimbus Sect had announced that it would be restructuring the personnel of “Crimson Nimbus Second Senior High School”, the educational institute that was directly subordinate to it.

Both the principal and the head instructor had been transferred to a primary school under the Crimson Nimbus Sect.

And Trustee Helian Ba had been found to have committed several acts of malpractice during the period when he assumed the position as a trustee of the Crimson Nimbus Sect and as well as other four posts within the Crimson Nimbus Sect.

The Crimson Nimbus Sect had immediately taken emergency measures and had sent an investigative team led by two Elders to investigate the issues regarding the Helian Family. Furthermore, they even called for a press conference and had once again reaffirmed that they were one of the righteous factions in the long line of history of the Star Glory Federation. They would absolutely not tolerate any kind of illegal behavior and would definitely deal with it strictly and severely.

One by one, the cultivators of the Helian Family took their stand and announced that the Helian Ba father-son duo were the outright black sheep of their family and that the Helian Family was completely ignorant of their actions. They claimed to feel deeply aggrieved for not having educated the Helian Ba father-son duo well. They said they would support any kind of investigation and punishment meted by the Crimson Nimbus Sect from their end, and after the punishment given by the Crimson Nimbus Sect, the Helian Ba father-son would be dealt with according to the family rules!

Whether it was inside the Crimson Nimbus Sect or the Helian Family, any of Helian Ba’s supporters were, in the blink of an eye, completely uprooted—he was completely forsaken by friends and allies!

Some of the family members who were not related closely drew a clear line. One by one, some even took out pieces of evidence hidden in their safes and ruthlessly stabbed the Helian Ba father-son duo in one move.

The core members of the family did not panic and waited for the arrival of the investigation team. No one dared to even take half a step outside the gate.

Helian Ba even had an urge to hang himself.

boxn ovel. c0m
Even though Helian Lie was the second best scorer of Floating Spear City in the college entrance examination, due to this matter, he didn’t receive even a single invitation from any of the “Nine Elite Universities”. Through unofficial channels, a few universities had even hinted that Helian Lie would not be accepted into their university even if he were to apply.

—— When Helian Lie said “Waste” to Li Yao’s face for the first time, he never would have imagined that it would end like this.

But as far as Li Yao was concerned, he didn’t care whether Helian Lie lived or died.

A world with an even broader horizon and a target even more worth fighting for had already presented itself in front of him—his challenge to the Deep Sea University’s Refining Department!

And to achieve this target, he must become a cultivator as soon as possible.

After his Spiritual Root Development Quotient had advanced to 90%, the spiritual root had entered an “awakening period”.

The final step of awakening the spiritual roots was no longer as simple as the accumulation of resources; the final step was training the spirit.

Once one has arrived at the stage of training the spirit, even if they had a Spiritual Root Development Quotient of 90%, it was quite possible for them to acquire a sudden epiphany, thereby finishing the development of their spiritual root in one fell swoop and embarking onto the road of cultivation.

If the spirit was not trained enough, even if the Spiritual Root Development Quotient had reached 99%, it would still be near impossible to cross the final 1% using an abundance of resources.

At most, they could only become a martial artist with boundless power, that’s all.

In short, only when one has found their own path, when one has discovered the “Truth” that they must pursue, and when one has realized the reason why they wish to become a cultivator could their spiritual root be awakened!

The college entrance examination ended in mid-June. Generally, the new students would enter the college in early October.

For the majority of the students, this three-month break was the most relaxed golden period in their life as a student.

They had been relieved of the pressure of the college entrance examination, and the onerous studying they must undergo during their time in college had yet to arrive, so everyone could enjoy their life to the fullest.

In this three-month time, Li Yao planned to travel to the northern and southern parts of the federation.

In order to broaden his horizons and knowledge, it could also be considered as making up for the regret of having always dwelled in the Magical Equipment Graveyard of Floating Spear City.

And more importantly, he was going to train his heart and soul. He was hoping to get some inspiration from the beautiful mountains and the rivers of the motherland. A sliver of an opportunity or a little epiphany was all he needed to awaken his spiritual root, allowing him to embark on the road of cultivation before stepping foot into the college campus

At this small, shabby station, with a bag on his back, Li Yao was ready to depart.

His close friends arrived one by one to see him off.

“Uncle Zhao, thanks a lot. If there was no pressure from the Disabled Servicemen Association this time, the Crimson Nimbus Second Senior High School would not have been so quick to admit defeat!”

Li Yao spoke sincerely as he tightly bear-hugged Zhao Xinglang, the president of Floating Spear City’s Disabled Servicemen Association.

Zhao Xinglang laughed from the bottom of his heart and heavily punched Li Yao in the stomach.

“I also have to thank you. You have truly increased the prestige of our Disabled Servicemen Association. Hei hei, a seriously injured ‘Disabled Soldier’ had actually made a comeback and topped the college entrance examination. When I heard this information, we uncouth fellows were all completely dumbfounded. We had even suspected that there was something wrong with our ears! Hahahaha!”

Li Yao flushed red.

“Uncle Zhao, since I have already proven that I have completely recovered and have no disability, can the ‘disabled veteran’ status still not be taken back?”

Zhao Xinglang stared at him with wide-opened eyes.

“Do you think that the national honor is something that could be given and taken so easily? You once have suffered serious injuries, and your spiritual root had been ruptured which led to a severe disability—these are clear facts. You can’t say that just because your body has recovered, the nation should reclaim the rightful treatment you deserve!”

“But I have always felt that I was not a true ‘disabled soldier’. I have always felt like I am impersonating one.”

Li Yao was rather embarrassed as he spoke.

“It’s simple. As you tread forward in your path of life, you just have to be strict with yourself so that your actions are worthy of these five words, ‘Class 1 Federation Disabled Soldier’. Isn’t this alright? If the opportunity presents itself, you can always join the federation army and happily fight in the Demon Beast Wasteland. Then, it would be even more justified!”

Zhao Xinglang waved his hand as he resolutely and decisively spoke.

Li Yao stuck out his chest and solemnly said, “I will. After I graduate from the Grand Desolate War Institution, regardless of whether I join the federation army or not, I will go deep into the wasteland and slaughter demon beasts. I will kill every single demon beast in my path!”

Zhao Xinglang burst into laughter as he patted Li Yao’s shoulder with force. “Alright, kid. I know I have not misjudged you. Go! Remember, no matter where you go, you must first find the local Disabled Servicemen Association. All the disabled soldiers in the world are one big family. If you encounter any big difficulties, you can just share the burdens with your family. Your brothers will shoulder the burden with you!”

“Thank you, Uncle Zhao!”

A trace of warmth spread through Li Yao’s heart. He was an orphan, and his foster father had already been dead for a good several years. He did not expect that he would have such a special “home” at almost twenty years of age.

While thinking like this, his gaze turned towards his second friend with a trace of guilt in his eyes.

“Brother Hai, I’m sorry. These days, the Crimson Nimbus Sect’s stocks are tumbling down. It has already tumbled down by 18%, so your loss should be pretty big, right?”

From what Li Yao had heard, Fiend Blade Peng Hai had a lot of Crimson Nimbus Sect shares. It was unknown how much loss he had suffered this time.

“My loss is certainly not small!”

Fiend Blade Peng Hai grinned. Without caring about appearances, he said, “That’s why kid, you must cultivate well and become a cultivator as soon as you can. You better compensate your brother!”

“Is the loss really that big? Is it going to have some effect on your position in the Crimson Nimbus Sect?” Li Yao felt a little tense.

Before Fiend Blade Peng Hai was able to answer, Sun Biao, who was standing beside them, laughed and said:

“Silly brat, you don’t need to worry about him. These stocks are of little matter. The most crucial thing is his position in the Crimson Nimbus Sect! Peng Hai is the representative of the new generation within the Crimson Nimbus Sect and many of the sect affairs are handled by him. His ways are rather radical, while Zhao Ying is the representative of the older generation who upholds conservative and prudent methods. The two factions had long been locked in a fierce struggle! This time, you, as Peng Hai’s junior brother, had actually brought bad luck to the Crimson Nimbus Second Senior High School and had discreetly made Zhou Yin suffer a pretty big loss. Because of you, the younger generation had a big win. You just don’t know how happy you made Peng Hai!”

“Peng Hai’s junior brother?” Li Yao was surprised for a moment which was followed by a sense of relief.

He and Peng Hai were not only fellow students of the Grand Desolate War Institution, they were also both unearthed by the “Scum of Cultivation World”, Sun Biao.

In the past, their relation could only be described as ordinary. These days, just an arbitrary university would have thousands upon thousands of students where fellow students calling each other “Senior Brother” or “Junior Brother” did not have much substance.

But later on, this relation was nothing trifling. If placed in the ancient cultivation world, Sun Biao could be considered as their “Enlightenment Master”[1], and both of them would be Sun Biao’s direct disciples. The closest relation was definitely that of a senior brother and a junior brother.

Peng Hai smiled as he openly rectified Sun Biao’s words:

“Junior Brother Li, you do not need to fret over it so much. The Crimson Nimbus Sect is not necessarily my final destination. Could a mere loss of some shares be counted for something? After you enter the Grand Desolate War Institution, you must focus on cultivation and become a cultivator as soon as possible. Perhaps there may come a day when I establish my own organization. I might even come looking for you to join my own sect as an Elder or some other post. Hahaha!”

“You want to establish your own sect?”

Li Yao was a little astounded. However, when he carefully gave it a thought, he felt that it was reasonable.

Peng Hai was the best among the best in the younger generation of the federation. As the saying goes, a flood dragon would not stay in the pond for too long. To be able to win over such a fierce figure could be considered as a matter of luck. If there comes a day when the treatment of the Crimson Nimbus Sect made him displeased, pulling out his followers and standing alone would be the right course of action.

Thinking of this point, Li Yao nodded his head as he laughed and said, “There is no need to make me an Elder. If Brother Hai truly sets up his own sect, you must leave the ‘Chief Technical Supervisor’ position to me. I will be responsible for refining all the magical equipment in the sect!”

“It’s a deal!”

As Li Yao firmly shook hands with Peng Hai, blue veins stood out on his temples.

Afterwards, he walked up to the three ordinary people before him.

Perhaps these three ordinary people did not have powerful strength or blazing fast computational prowess, and they might not even be able to help him in cultivation…

But…

Li Yao was equally grateful to them.

Grandpa Wang, Principal Mao, and his buddy, Meng Jiang.

“Grandpa Wang, thank you for always buying my magical equipment at a high price and also for occasionally recommending me for jobs. It’s all thanks to you that I was able to gather some money and graduate from high school!”

“Principal Mao, thank you for taking me in and letting me attend the college entrance examination as a student of Mining Clan High School!”

“Little Jiang, there is no need to say anything between us. When I was in a coma, you took some time out of your schedule to visit me at the hospital. When others were jeering at me as ‘Fleeting Fiend Star’, you rebuked them on my behalf and even fought with others over this—don’t think that I don’t know anything!”

Li Yao walked up and tightly hugged his buddy.

Meng Jiang’s eyes turned red as he emotionally said, “What is this? Aren’t we brothers? If even brothers are not going to believe each other, then who will? Little Devil, I knew that you would not fall so easily., To me, you have always been a monstrous genius! Once you arrive at college, you must cultivate well and become a powerful cultivator as soon as possible. At that time, I can go and brag that my buddy is Nascent Soul Stage strange old devil. Hahaha! It will definitely scare the hell out of a large number of people!”

“Rest assured. I will not let you wait for too long. I will definitely let you have the opportunity to boast. But, why is your face all black and blue? Did you have a fight with someone?”

Li Yao carefully looked at his buddy’s face. He discovered that there were heavy bruises under his eyes.

Meng Jiang grinned and said, “It was my father. As a matter of fact, it’s all your fault!”

[1] Enlightenment Master(启蒙恩师) – There is no correct English term for this, as this word in China represent the teacher who acts as a guiding pole, who encourages you and suggests to you the right path or future choices you should make. Sometimes he is also the one who that trains you. All in all, he is just a normal teacher but with pretty big moral values, who really act like a teacher.]





Home  Forty Millenniums of Cultivation  Chapter 99
 

Chapter 99
 
Chapter 99: Remote Reaches
Translator: Ash  Editor: Geoffrey_

Li Yao was stunned as he pointed at his nose. “My fault!? You and your dad fought because of me?”

Meng Jiang nodded his head.

“Yes. As you know, my dad has always hoped for me to apply to a cooking school so that I could inherit my family’s steamed bun store in the future. However, my dream has always been to become the best hairdresser and makeup artist, and perhaps even the best Master Beautician!”

“And I’m sure that you know that my dad is as fierce as a bear. At home, he has the final say in everything and has never allowed me to go against him. That’s why I originally planned to follow his wishes. If he wants me to be a chef, then a chef it is. In the end, it’s just a job!”

“However, when I saw you, Little Devil, choosing the Grand Desolate War Institution’s Refining Department, I was touched. I brood over it for an entire night. Since we’re buddies, if you can stick to your dream, then why can’t I? So, first thing in the morning, I had an ugly fight with my dad. Afterward, I chose a beautician school—despite it being the worst beautician school!”

A brilliant and proud smile appeared on Meng Jiang’s face as he used his thumb to pound on his own chest. “Someday, other people will also call me a ‘Master’. I’ll be known as the king of the Stylist Industry—Master Meng!”

With a heart set ablaze once again, Li Yao tightly hugged Meng Jiang. “In the three years of my life at Crimson Nimbus Second Senior High School, my biggest gain was to have made a good friend and brother like you! Let us both stake everything in university and become the Master of our respective field!”

“Sure, I will definitely use my life to learn, to live, and to fight. I will absolutely not be any worse than you… Although I won’t become a cultivator in this life, I will similarly live a wonderful life!”

Meng Jiang straightened his chest as he shouted in loud and clear voice.

The two chatted and laughed as they once again recalled their glorious school life. Only when both of their eyes had turned a little red did Li Yao reluctantly turn to his other side.

“You don’t need to act all cuddly with me. You and I are not that familiar. We are just ordinary friends.” Vigilantly, Ding Lingdang stared at him.

boxn ovel. c0m
Scratching his head, Li Yao embarrassedly smiled and said, “That day it was just because of a momentary impulse. You don’t need to take it to your heart.”

“I have already taken it to my heart. My heart has suffered a great deal of trauma, but if you think about taking the Combat Department as your major and the Refining Department as your minor instead, then maybe I will feel a little better.” Ding Lingdang still had not given up her hope. She stared at Li Yao with an eager look in her eyes.

“It depends on the circumstances. I still don’t know anything about the Grand Desolate War Institution’s Refining Department!” Li Yao, while speaking, arrived before his last friend.

To be precise, he was exactly not his friend but his swine friend, the one who could control both spiritual energy and tenebrum energy at the same time—the hidden cultivation genius, Zheng Dongming!

“Who would have known that you, Floating Spear City’s champion of the college entrance exam, would go and choose that waste Grande Desolate War Institution’s Refining Department,” Zheng Dongming calmly said.

“Haven’t you, the third highest scorer in Floating Spear City for the college entrance examination, instead chosen the Sky Fantasia Academy’s Combat Department? Aren’t we the same?” Li Yao gave a slight smile.

“We are not the same, we are absolutely not the same. Although it is similarly a waste department in the Nine Elite Universities, there is a fundamental difference between your Grand Desolate War Institution’s Refining Department and my Sky Fantasia Academy’s Combat Department!”

Zheng Dongming said in a high and enigmatic tone.

“What’s the difference?”

Li Yao narrowed his eyes. He could understand what Zheng Dongming was implying.

“The male to female ratio in Grand Desolate War Institution’s Refining Department is 10 to 1, and not only are the girls small in number, they are also not that beautiful. In contrast, the Sky Fantasia Academy’s Combat Department is very different. Although its results are very poor, the male to female ratio is more than 1 to 10, and all of the girls are outstandingly beautiful; they are all women of a thousand charms. Not to mention that there is a large number of close-combat related courses in the Combat Department curriculum. I can have an unreserved, zero distance contact with my senior and junior sisters and feel the collisions of our souls and bodies, don’t you think that it is intrinsically different?”

Zhen Dongming gave a very lewd and lascivious smile.

Li Yao was mouth agape. Only after having been stunned for a while could he reply, “Indeed, it is intrinsically different. Then, I wish for you to have fun till your heart’s content in Sky Fantasia Academy’s Combat Department!”

Zheng Dongming hesitated a bit before pulling Li Yao far away and activating a “Sound Insulating Glyph” around them. Only then did he speak and that too in low voice:

“Fellow Student Li Yao, the matter of Devil Flood Dragon Island… it is better to forget it. Since childhood, I have had no ambitions. Besides eating, I have never thought of doing anything else. My only dream is to flirt with all of the girls in the world that I could flirt with. If possible, I also don’t want to cultivate that damn tenebrum energy! That’s why, you don’t need to worry. If one day my devil techniques reaches the point of culmination, even then I will absolutely not kill you. And you, even more so because of your fear of being killed of me, don’t need to kill me before I kill you. Do you understand?”

Li Yao pondered a bit. “Oh?”

“Hey hey hey, I said so much, I expressed my kind-heartedness and all my sincerity, but all you can say is ‘Oh’? Don’t think that I’m afraid of you. You have had your fortuitous encounter, and I have also had my fortuitous encounter. From here on out, we will drift along in the cultivation world. Who the f*ck wouldn’t have 8-10 fortuitous encounters? Do you think you are formidable?”

Li Yao smiled as he patted Zheng Dongming’s shoulder:

“You see, no matter what I say, you are not going to believe me, and similarly, no matter what you say, I am not going to believe you. Since that’s the case, then why don’t we just sprint on the road of cultivation, climbing to the peak? Come on, let’s compete with each other!”

While speaking, a tattered, long-distance flying shuttle gradually descended.

With a leap, Li Yao climbed aboard, waving his hand at everyone as he said, “Goodbye, everyone! If all goes well, then maybe after three months, I will be a true cultivator myself!”

…

From this day onwards, Li Yao traveled to the far reaches of the Star Glory Federation.

His first stop was the “Seamount Island” located in the southernmost region of the federation.

It was a very small island. All year round, only a palm-sized part of the island was visible above the surface of the water. That was why it was also known as “Palm Island”.

However, under the water, cultivators had instead built a huge underwater city around the endless undersea mountain range.

Here, the residents of the city resided in glittering and translucent crystal bubbles. And to leave and enter, they would use “Waterproof Beads” to clear the path before using a special underwater jet-type flying shuttle to go back and forth.

Under the sea, they cultivated a large number of colorful corals, and much like a herd of sheep and cattle, a large number of fish, shrimp, crab, and turtles were reared. This was the source of the entire federation’s fresh seafood.

In here, the women liked to wear pearl shirts sewn by tying the pearls together the most.

Every night under the pitch black darkness of the sea, wearing colorful and gorgeous pearl shirts, they would beautifully and charmingly sit on the corals as they played their spirit flute which could be heard under the sea, waiting for the powerful men of the sea to quietly come in the darkness.

In here, Li Yao enjoyed the colorful and picturesque scenery, ate the most delicious and sweetest seafood before returning back to the continent and heading to the farthest reaches of the southern west direction.

On the fourth day after his departure, he arrived at the “Lantern City”.

It was a town built in the vast rain forest located at the southern region of the federation. It was a town which was completely devoid of high-rising building. Using a secret technique, the cultivators would constantly accelerate the growth of a fruit on a special tree in the rain forest called the “Lantern Tree”. Finally, each and every lantern fruit hanging from the branches would be modified into houses.

The residents of this city lived in this very lantern fruit. Every night, the fruit radiated in a colorful and gorgeous shimmer, turning the entire city into a sea of lanterns.

Because the rainforest is inconvenient to travel from here and there, the residents of this city liked to ride huge grasshopper-type spirit beasts, hopping from one branch to the other as they harvested precious herbs in the jungle.

Whenever there were guests from afar, the residents would invite the guests to ride the giant grasshopper. If any one of them on their first try managed to successfully ride the giant grasshopper for over a minute, he would be treated as a true warrior and would get to enjoy the finest VIP treatment.

Li Yao tried three times, but at the last moment, he was ruthlessly thrown down by the giant grasshopper. He could only helplessly throw in the towel.

Although he didn’t get to enjoy the VIP treatment, when the straw skirt wearing girls of the rainforest, who had skin as smooth and delicate as honey, held cold salves and meticulously smeared it on his body, he felt a different kind of relish.

On the ninth day of his departure, Li Yao arrived at the “Saber’s Tip Snow Mountain”

Although it was not the highest peak of the Star Glory Federation, it was one of the most difficult mountain peaks to climb.

The entire snow-capped mountain was like a double-edged saber that was as bright as snow, ruthlessly stabbing towards the sky.

The steepest part of the mountain was as smooth as a mirror; it simply didn’t have a single foothold. Furthermore, all year round, the powerful gusts always lingered around the peak. Even for a cultivator riding a flying sword, it would still be very difficult for him to fly to the peak.

At the summit of the snow-capped mountain grew a very precious Seven-Star Snow Lotus. It was one of the natural ingredients absolutely necessary for a dozen types of high-level strengthening drugs.

Consequently, this was where the best flying sword riders in the entire federation were produced.

The November of every year when the wind was at its strongest and the Seven-Star Snow Lotus bloomed, countless flying sword experts would whistle through the sky as they charged through the raging winds to reach the summit.

Amidst these perilous, fierce winds, they would seek for the gaps, try to feel its rhythm as they charged left and right, and would even be tossed around for 3-5 days before eventually conquering these winds and acquiring the most precious herb!

Although it was not the blooming season for the snow lotus when Li Yao arrived, it didn’t decrease the number of flying-sword experts that gathered around the snow-capped mountain. Amidst these winds, they were undergoing training and doing all sorts of eye-catching air maneuvers, which made Li Yao feel like it was not a wasted trip; he was completely satisfied.

If it was an air-battle, the battle prowess of these flying sword expects would absolutely not be less than any flying demon beast.

In the next three months, Li Yao toured mountains, rivers, rainforests, hills, deserts, oases, and farmlands of the federation; he saw all kinds of weird towns.

There was a town located on top of a crater of an active volcano. The entire volcano crater had been sealed by a huge array of glyphs.

Rumor has it that four hundred years ago, this volcano had once erupted, ravaging a dozen nearby towns. A cultivator, after sealing the volcano, had lived here with his family, guarding the volcano.

Even to this day, the family had developed into a new town but they had never forgotten their mission as they referred to themselves as the “Guardians of the Volcano”.

There was a town which was completely built on the back of a few hundred ginormous “Alpine Camel Beasts”.

In the Heaven Origin Sector, the Alpine Camel Beast was one of the largest spirit beasts on land. Each Alpine Camel Beast was like a whale surfing on the sea. People built houses on the back of these Alpine Camel Beasts, and each Alpine Camel Beast could house a few dozen families on its back. Hundreds of Alpine Came Beasts together constituted a mobile city.

The residents of the city took part in the care of animals for a living. With the changes in the season, they would drive the Alpine Camel Beasts to seek water grass to raise the cattle and sheep. Here, Li Yao ate the freshest mutton in his life; he boiled the mutton for ten minutes to the point where the blood didn’t coagulate, and when he took a bite, it immediately melted in his mouth as it rolled down his throat, much like a delicious wine.

Town after town…





Home  Forty Millenniums of Cultivation  Chapter 100
 

Chapter 100
 
Chapter 100: The King of Metal Forging
Translator: Ash  Editor: Geoffrey_

At every hill, every lake, every farmland, every town, Li Yao saw many bizarre things and met many strange people.


One time, he had encountered an old man of 130-years of age. Obviously, he was just an ordinary person; however, he had a pet “Whistling Sky Hawk”, a spirit beast with a length of 4-5 meters.

When the old man was 4 years old, he had inadvertently picked up a palm-sized bird whose wings were broken. As the bird was very pitiful, using branches, the man had helped connect its broken wings and had also smeared healing ointments.

From then on, the little bird always stuck to him, accompanying him all the way through adolescence, marriage, childbirth, and old age.

From the beginning to a century later, the little bird had always remained palm sized. The old man had also gotten accustomed to the existence of this small thing that was always around him.

But who would have known that after its 104th birthday, the height of the little bird would suddenly soar; in just a short span of three years, the bird grew to be 5m long, revealing the lofty appearance that many spirit beasts had.

Only then did the old man come to realize that he had picked up an amazing thing.

“I was just an ordinary wage earner. My house was small, and there was also my son and daughter-in-law as well as my grandchildren who were soon to be married. So, where would I be able to raise such a big bird?”

“I was forced to secretly raise it on the roof of the house. Because of this, I had been nagged by my wife, my son, and my daughter-in-law, and the neighborhood committee had even come looking for me several times—they had even alerted the police!

“A few cultivators from the cultivation sects had come knocking at my door, stating that they were willing to pay an exorbitant price for this guy, but how could I be willing to part with it? In the eyes of cultivators, it is just a spirit beast, but in my eyes, it’s my whole youth, my whole life! I will not sell, I will absolutely not sell!”

The old man gently caressed the Whistling Sky Hawk’s head and laughed as he spoke.

boxn ovel. c0m
The Whistling Sky Hawk, which was known for its fierceness, very gently leaned on the old man.

The left wing was slightly twisted and signs of having been seriously injured in the past could be seen.

“And just like that, after another twenty years, I retired. My children and grandchildren don’t need to worry about me, and my old woman has also left a step earlier. Finally, I can fulfill my childhood dream! Little bird, oh little bird, ever since I was a child, I have always wondered how much better it would have been if you were a spirit beast. If you were a spirit beast, then I could ride you and continue to fly—fly across the mountains, over the rivers, above the clouds, and even fly throughout the Heaven Origin Sector.”

The old man jovially laughed, revealing the lack of front teeth as he climbed up on the back of the Whistling Sky Hawk with difficulty.

“Preet——”

The old man blew a whistle laden with rust. The Whistling Sky Hawk gave a long whistle before flapping its wings and soaring into the sky.

The Whistling Sky Hawk had suffered an injury to its wings, and the old man was not a cultivator and simply didn’t know any skills for riding spirit beasts. A man and a spirit beast slowly soared into the sky; the way they flew was full of twists and turns, it was simply too horrible to watch.

The old man simply didn’t care. He sang a song which used to be popular a century ago as their silhouettes slowly disappeared into the pile of cotton-like layers of clouds.

Along the way, Li Yao had encountered no small number of people who were no different that this old man.

He had met a sword cultivator with tyrannical strength that was both accomplished and well-known, but as the age of 90 dawned upon him, he suddenly came to a realization and had discovered that what he truly wanted to become was a scholar-type cultivator—he wanted to be a poet.

And so, this sword cultivator put down his sword. In the desolate and vast land of snow, he hiked on a mountain of snow, searching for inspiration.

Occasionally, he would encounter some highway robbers or bandits, but only as a last resort would he use the sword. On the contrary, he would try to use poetry filled with warmth and love to reform the evildoers.

Over time, everyone near the snow mountain had heard of a “Devil Poet” who had excellent sword arts as they came to fear his poems and even moreso dreaded the 3-feet-long sword in his hand.

Li Yao had also met a village doctor who had graduated from the Empyrean Capital School of Medicine and had once worked in many cultivation sects. He was a renowned master in the cultivation world and was most skilled in unblocking the eight extra meridians as well as treating Qigong Deviation.

But after the age of 180, feeling obligated, the peak Building Foundation Stage cultivator rejected many high salary offers from major hospitals and cultivation sects, concealed his identity, and started traveling to every remote village in the federation in order to treat the patients in the backwater villages.

“Three decades ago, I had once acted as a protector for a sect leader of a major sect during his breakthrough and had helped him successfully step onto the Core Formation Stage. Later on, the sect leader had gifted me a luxurious seaside villa in addition to five shops on the busiest commercial street in a major city!”

“I used to think that it would be the largest consultation fee I would ever receive in my life.”

In a shabby brick house, the village doctor, while grilling sweet potatoes in the fire furnace, laughingly said to Li Yao, “That is, until yesterday when I had received the most valuable consultation fee.”

“What was it?” Li Yao very meticulously peeled the sweet potato as the hot air blurred his vision.

“I helped a little boy who had lost vision in both his eyes when he was playing with fireworks, helping him see the light after four years. He gave me a fierce kiss right here.”

Pointing at his cheek, the village doctor had the most brilliant smile hanging on his face; it was truly a very natural and serene smile.

A retired old man riding a Whistling Sky Hawk, a sword cultivator who wanted to become a poet, a peak Building Foundation Stage village doctor…

There were many, many people like this.

During the day, Li Yao, in this picturesque paradise of mortals, would listen to all kinds of strange stories from these people.

During the night, even while sleeping, he would not forget to cultivate; he would zealously assimilate Ou Yezi’s memory fragments.

Each memory fragments contained ten days to one month worth of Ou Yezi’s memories.

And, every night, Li Yao would approximately assimilate one or two memory fragments.

If he tried assimilating any more, he would exhaust his spiritual power and would feel as if his whole neural field was on fire, causing him to feel excruciating pain. Assimilating more than he could handle would do more harm than good for his cultivation.

In this long trek which spanned for three months, Li Yao had assimilated about 70-80% of Ou Yezi’s memories of the time when he was a forge worker.

Compared to the previous illusory dreams, this was different. This time, the memory fragments had completely integrated with Li Yao’s, completely integrating with his own memory.

As if he had truly been a forge worker of the Hundred Smelting Clan, practicing the superior metal forging techniques forty millenniums ago.

Although each time in the process of assimilating the memory, Li Yao, as Ou Yezi, would be tortured inhumanely to the point where he wanted to die.

But, the harvest he reaped was also enormous.

He had learned all of Ou Yezi’s forging skills. In addition to < One-Hundred-and-Eight Hands Chaos Gale Hammer Technique> as a foundation, Li Yao had finally reached the peak of perfection on the road of metal forging.

In today’s world where various advanced magical equipment refining techniques were used in mass production, taking a broad view at the entire Heaven Origin Sector, it would absolutely be impossible to find a second Li Yao, one who would so foolishly learn some antique forging techniques from forty millenniums ago.

Therefore, Li Yao could also be known as “The Star Glory Federation’s Top Expert in the Ancient Art of Manual Forging Techniques”!

Although it sounded like a pretty prestigious title, it didn’t have much practical value. But still, Li Yao found a little satisfaction in his heart.

“Today is forging techniques, and tomorrow will be the most sophisticated refining equipment techniques. After I assimilate all of Ou Yezi’s memories about forging divine equipment and sharp equipment, even Deep Sea University will be nothing! And finally, one day, the title of Holy Land for Refiners will belong to my Grand Desolate War Institution’s Refining Department!”

After three months, in a nameless small mountain village in the northern reaches of the federation.

“Moo…”

“Baa…”

“Woff, woff! Woff woff!”

At the entrance of a village, a large group of the wooden oxen[1] reeled left and right as they let out feeble bellows in the grain drying field.

The wooden oxen were all generic metal beast puppets made for farming purposes.

Taking the sheep that kept bleating “Baa baa” as an example, its entire body was built from metal, its joints were inlaid with various crystals, and its entire body was engraved with dozens of array glyphs, allowing it to automatically walk and look for dead branches, leaves, and straw.

After swallowing, everything would be broken down into plant fibers and would again be entwined together, turning into woolen-shaped fibers in its belly.

These kinds of fibers could be used to weave nets, and in the economically backward places, they could even be directly used to sew clothes. It was an extremely valuable puppet beast.

And the huge copper bull next to it, needless to say, was not only used to plow the fields; during the harvesting season, so long as some common parts were installed, it was possible to change its body, turning it into a harvesting machine.

Through the horn-like blades on its head, rice stalks could be completely cut off which would then enter its stomach through its mouth, where it would be processed before shining rice grains were discharged from behind.

In poor areas, these metal beast puppets were the life and blood of an entire family and would often be used for a good several generations.

The same was true for this small nameless mountain village.

The few dozen metal beast puppets were antiques from a hundred or so years ago and had already passed their life expectancy. Either their mechanical limbs were broken, or their crystals had been stolen by thieves, or some crucial place of engraved array glyphs was worn out due to the passage of time.

“Young Master Li[2], can you help auntie check whether or not this iron bull can be salvaged? It was the dowry my grandmother brought when she got married!”

“Young Master Li, if you have time, can you help this grandpa check this big dog? Although it is not alive, it had accompanied me ever since I was born. This is but 130 years of feelings!”

Li Yao was surrounded by bright and honest villagers. On one side of the house, a villager was killing a pig to make pork stew for Li Yao. It was the most delicious meat in the entire grains drying field.

It was not easy to find a master who could repair magical equipment in this kind of backwater village.

The honest villagers didn’t know how to thank Li Yao, so a villager was simply butchering the big, fat pig which was prepared for the new year celebration.

Many foolhardy kids thought it was the new year as they ran around in the drying grains field with their runny nose, jumping and shouting in joy as they giggled in a sound that was as sweet as the rings of a silver bell

“Hold on for a moment, hold on for a moment, uncles and aunts! I am going to slowly check, one by one. However, I also have no way. Some are completely worn out. But as long as there is still some breath in me, I will try to completely repair these wooden oxen and flowing horses!”

Li Yao said while happily smiling.

After three months of experience, Li Yao’s current appearance was completely different from the time when he had just departed. If his friends came to see his current appearance, they would absolutely be surprised.

Compared to 100 days ago, he seemed to be a bit taller, about a half centimeter. He was slightly skinny, and due to living and traveling in the wilderness for a long time, his skin had become quite tanned. His hair was in a mess, and a beard has grown on his face. All in all, it completely gave off a slightly sloppy appearance.

He was dressed in workwear sown from ordinary coarse cloth which was covered in dust and grease. At first glance, he looked no different than most of the common field workers.

But, the biggest change could be found in his temperament.

Translator notes-

[1] – 木牛流馬 – Wooden Oxen and Flowing Horses.

[2] – Here, the young master doesn’t refer to a child of a wealthy family; the master here is like expert or professor.

————–

Note: Sorry for the delayed releasing. Ash got food-poisoning in last week and he has been back from now on. Let’s look forward more amazing chapters will be coming up!

